<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20020719082313.txt.gz
TIME:20020719082313
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:
(212) 887-1300
 
Item 5. Other Events.
     On July 18, 2002, we issued a press release reporting 2002 second quarter financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 7. Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits.
(c)  Exhibits.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
#19878

 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the quarter ended June 30, 2002.
NEW YORK, July 18, 2002 
For the second quarter 2002, the Company reported revenue of $56.5 million, an increase of 12.4% over revenue of $50.3 million during the second quarter of 2001. Earnings before interest and taxes (EBIT) for the quarter were $15.0 million, compared with EBIT of $12.8 million during the comparable period last year. Net income for the quarter was $6.6 million, compared with $4.7 million for the second quarter of 2001.
Cost and expenses for the quarter increased by 11.0%, from $40.4 million in 2001 to $44.8 million in 2002, largely the result of spending related to the RADAR service, which was acquired in the third quarter of 2001, royalties, data collection and sales and marketing. Increased expenses for the Portable People Meter initiative during the quarter were partially offset by a planned reduction in Webcasting expenses. Interest expense declined $1.0 million from 2001 as a result of significant reductions in debt.
Net income per share for the quarter was $0.22 (diluted), compared with $0.16 per share (diluted) during the comparable period last year. Effective January 1, 2002, the Company discontinued the amortization of goodwill in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. Had the company been required to adopt this accounting effective as
Arbitron Inc.  -  142 West 57 Street  -  New York, New York 10019  -  www.arbitron.com
th
 
of January 1, 2001, net income and net income per share (diluted) for the three months ended June 30, 2001 would have been $5.1 million and $0.18, respectively.
For the six months ended June 30, 2002, revenue was $122.4 million, an increase of 10.8% over the same period last year. EBIT was $42.6 million, compared to $40.1 million in 2001. Net income for the six months was $20.9 million or $0.70 per share (diluted), compared with $21.0 million or $0.72 per share (diluted) last year. Had the discontinuation of amortization of goodwill been in effect in 2001, net income and net income per share (diluted) for the six months ended June 30, 2001 would have been $21.9 million and $0.75, respectively.
Commenting on the results for the second quarter, Stephen Morris, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron said, "Arbitron continues to perform well, despite a difficult economic environment. Our revenue, EBIT and net earnings growth in the second quarter is a reflection of the good performance of our core ratings business and our recent acquisition of RADAR. While we expect the general business climate to remain challenging throughout the year, we enter the second half of 2002 with strong fundamentals, a stable and growing core business and exceptional opportunities in new markets such as Latin America. As a result, we remain on track to meet our previously provided guidance for 2002.
"This week, Arbitron signed contract extensions with Infinity Broadcasting Corporation and with ABC Radio which gives their stations access to our quarterly radio ratings up to the release of the Spring 2003 radio survey as well as access to additional services currently provided," said Mr. Morris. "As we continue to make progress in our ongoing market trial of the Portable People Meter, and in our joint venture discussions with Nielsen Media Research, we will be better able to articulate the value proposition for the new ratings service. This will allow us to give our customers the additional information they have requested in our continuing discussions for the long-term renewals of their ratings contracts."
Arbitron also noted that during the second quarter, the company announced plans to collaborate with the Outdoor Advertising Association of America on a comprehensive research program. The objective of the program will be to create a reliable, comprehensive
 
methodology by which to measure outdoor audiences. On June 30, the company also opened Guadalajara, its second radio ratings market in Mexico.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. Arbitron Webcast Services measures the audiences of audio and video content on the Internet, commonly known as webcasts. The Company is developing the Portable People Meter, a new technology for radio, TV and cable ratings.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 800 full-time employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU Media Measurement & Information, Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper, outdoor and online industries.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this release that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from the information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
 
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on Form 10-K, which discussion is incorporated herein by reference.
The forward-looking statements contained in this release speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
 
 
(1)  Effective January 1, 2002, the Company adopted the provisions of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 142 "Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets," which required the Company to discontinue the amortization of goodwill and rather test such assets for impairment on an annual basis. Had the Company been required to adopt the provisions of the pronouncement effective as of January 1, 2001, net income and diluted net income per share for the three months ended June 30, 2001 would have been $5,140 and $0.18, respectively. The Company will not have any goodwill impairment charges from the adoption of the new pronouncement during 2002.
(2)  EBITDA is presented as supplemental information that management of Arbitron believes may be useful to some investors in evaluating Arbitron because it is widely used as a measure to evaluate a company's operating performance before interest expense, as well as to evaluate its operating cash flow. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization to net income. EBITDA should not be considered a substitute either for net income, as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBITDA is not calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
 
 
(1)  Effective January 1, 2002, the Company adopted the provisions of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 142 "Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets," which required the Company to discontinue the amortization of goodwill and rather test such assets for impairment on an annual basis. Had the Company been required to adopt the provisions of the pronouncement effective as of January 1, 2001, net income and diluted net income per share for the six months ended June 30, 2001 would have been $21,861 and $0.75, respectively. The Company will not have any goodwill impairment charges from the adoption of the new pronouncement during 2002.
(2)  EBITDA is presented as supplemental information that management of Arbitron believes may be useful to some investors in evaluating Arbitron because it is widely used as a measure to evaluate a company's operating performance before interest expense, as well as to evaluate its operating cash flow. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization to net income. EBITDA should not be considered a substitute either for net income, as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBITDA is not calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
(3)  For the six month period ended June 30, 2001, the computations of pro forma net income per weighted average common share are based upon Ceridian's weighted average common shares and potentially dilutive securities outstanding for the three months ended March 31, 2001, and Arbitron's weighted average common shares and potentially dilutive securities thereafter. In November 2000, Ceridian's board of directors approved a one-for-five reverse stock split, which was effective immediately after the spin-off. Pro forma net income per common share and weighted average common shares outstanding presented herein have been adjusted to reflect this reverse stock split. The diluted weighted average common shares amounts assume that all of Ceridian's historical dilutive securities were converted into Arbitron securities.
 
(4)  Prior to the spin-off from Ceridian Corporation, Arbitron distributed its earnings to Ceridian. Those distributions, together with a $250 million distribution made to Ceridian on the date of the spin-off, gave rise to the stockholders' deficit. Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt were used by Arbitron to make the $250 million distribution.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20021018093139.txt.gz
TIME:20021018093139
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:    
(212) 887-1300
 
Item 5.      Other Events.
     On October 17, 2002, we issued a press release reporting 2002 third quarter financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 7.      Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits.
(c)               Exhibits.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

 
Company Contact: Bill Walsh, CFO Arbitron Inc. Phone: 212-887-1408 bill.walsh@arbitron.com
Investor Relations Contact: Todd Fromer KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215 todd@kcsa.com Media contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 212-887-1314 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
The transfer of Federal income tax net operating losses (NOL) from Ceridian Corporation to Arbitron, which had been estimated at the time of the reverse spin-off, was finalized during the quarter. This resulted in a higher NOL tax benefit to Arbitron of $10.7 million. The adjustment reduced cash taxes paid during the quarter but did not impact net income.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2002, revenue was $192.0 million, an increase of 9.0% over the $176.1 million reported for the same period last year. EBIT was $71.6 million, compared to $66.3 million in 2001. Net income for the nine months was $36.3 million or $1.21 per share (diluted), compared with $33.9 million or $1.15 per share (diluted) last year. Had the discontinuation of amortization of goodwill been in effect in 2001, net income and net income per share (diluted) for the nine months ended September 30, 2001 would have been $35.1 million and $1.19, respectively.
Commenting on the results for the third quarter, Stephen Morris, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron said, "Our revenue, EBIT and net earnings in the third quarter have all benefited from the solid performance of our core ratings business. We are seeing signs that the advertising economy is slowly improving, which will help us maintain a stable and growing core business while we pursue opportunities in new markets such as outdoor and Latin America. For all these reasons, we remain on track to meet our previously provided guidance for 2002.
"With each quarter, we see continued positive signs from the marketplace," said Mr. Morris. "In the last three months, the Outdoor Advertising Association of America signed a contract pledging $300,000 in support of our ongoing development of a ratings service for their industry. During the quarter, we also opened Monterrey, our third radio ratings market in Mexico, joining Mexico City and Guadalajara. In the United States, we launched three new radio ratings markets with the Fall 2002 survey. All of these events confirm that our core business is solid and has continuing potential for further growth.
"Also during the third quarter, BBM Canada selected the Arbitron Portable People Meter to measure television audiences in Montreal and Quebec beginning in 2003. This is a significant step forward in our efforts to commercialize our new audience measurement technology around the world," said Mr. Morris. "We also entered into conversations with Nielsen Media Research to expand that company's ongoing participation in the current Portable People Meter market trial in Philadelphia. While we have delayed the
www.arbitron.com
 
commercialization timetable in response to the requests of both our customers and Nielsen, we are confident that the important issues have been identified and will be successfully addressed."
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. Arbitron Webcast Services measures the audiences of audio and video content on the Internet, commonly known as webcasts. The Company is developing the Portable People Meter, a new technology for radio, TV and cable ratings.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 800 full-time employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU Media Measurement & Information, Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper, outdoor and online industries.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this release that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from the information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
www.arbitron.com
 
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on Form 10-K, which discussion is incorporated herein by reference.
The forward-looking statements contained in this release speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
www.arbitron.com
 
(1)  Effective January 1, 2002, the Company adopted the provisions of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 142 "Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets," which required the Company to discontinue the amortization of goodwill and rather test such assets for impairment on an annual basis. Had the Company been required to adopt the provisions of the pronouncement effective as of January 1, 2001, net income and diluted net income per share for the three months ended September 30, 2001 would have been $ 13,282 and $ 0.45, respectively. The Company will not have any goodwill impairment charges from the adoption of the new pronouncement during 2002.
(2)  EBITDA is presented as supplemental information that management of Arbitron believes may be useful to some investors in evaluating Arbitron because it is widely used as a measure to evaluate a company's operating performance before interest expense, as well as to evaluate its operating cash flow. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization to net income. EBITDA should not be considered a substitute either for net income, as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBITDA is not calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
www.arbitron.com
 
(1)  Effective January 1, 2002, the Company adopted the provisions of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 142 "Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets," which required the Company to discontinue the amortization of goodwill and rather test such assets for impairment on an annual basis. Had the Company been required to adopt the provisions of the pronouncement effective as of January 1, 2001, net income and diluted net income per share for the nine months ended September 30, 2001 would have been $ 35,143 and $ 1.19, respectively. The Company will not have any goodwill impairment charges from the adoption of the new pronouncement during 2002.
(2)  EBITDA is presented as supplemental information that management of Arbitron believes may be useful to some investors in evaluating Arbitron because it is widely used as a measure to evaluate a company's operating performance before interest expense, as well as to evaluate its operating cash flow. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization to net income. EBITDA should not be considered a substitute either for net income, as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow,
www.arbitron.com
 
as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBITDA is not calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
(3)  For the nine month period ended September 30, 2001, the computations of pro forma net income per weighted average common share are based upon Ceridian's weighted average common shares and potentially dilutive securities outstanding for the three months ended March 31, 2001, and Arbitron's weighted average common shares and potentially dilutive securities thereafter. The diluted weighted average common shares amounts for the three months ended March 31, 2001 assume that all of Ceridian's historical dilutive securities were converted into Arbitron securities.
(4)  Prior to the spin-off from Ceridian Corporation, Arbitron distributed its earnings to Ceridian. Those distributions, together with a $ 250 million distribution made to Ceridian on the date of the spin-off, gave rise to the stockholders' deficit. Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt were used by Arbitron to make the $ 250 million distribution.
www.arbitron.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20021122171342.txt.gz
TIME:20021122171342
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:  
(212) 887-1300
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
 
Item 5.     
Other Events
     On November 21, 2002, the Board of Directors of the Company declared a dividend distribution of one right ("Right") for each outstanding share of common stock (the "Common Stock") of the Company. The distribution is payable to stockholders of record on December 9, 2002. Each Right, when exercisable, entitles the registered holder to purchase from the Company one one-thousandth of a share of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock ("Preferred Stock") at a price of $135 per one one-thousandth share (the "Purchase Price"), subject to adjustment. The description and terms of the Rights are set forth in a Rights Agreement (the "Rights Agreement") between the Company and The Bank of New York, as Rights Agent (the "Rights Agent").
     Initially, the Rights will be attached to all certificates representing shares of Common Stock then outstanding, and no separate certificates evidencing the Rights will be distributed. The Rights will separate from the Common Stock and a distribution of Rights Certificates (as defined below) will occur upon the earlier to occur of (i) 10 days following a public announcement that a person or group of affiliated or associated persons (an "Acquiring Person") has acquired, or obtained the right to acquire, beneficial ownership of 15% or more of the outstanding shares of Common Stock (the "Stock Acquisition Date") or (ii) 10 business days (or such later date as the Board of Directors of the Company may determine) following the commencement of, or the first public announcement of the intention to commence, a tender offer or exchange offer the consummation of which would result in the beneficial ownership by a person of 15% or more of the outstanding shares of Common Stock (the earlier of such dates being called the "Distribution Date").
     Until the Distribution Date, (i) the Rights will be evidenced by the Common Stock certificates, and will be transferred with and only with the Common Stock certificates, (ii) new Common Stock certificates issued after December 9, 2002 upon transfer or new issuance of the Common Stock will contain a notation incorporating the Rights Agreement by reference, and (iii) the surrender for transfer of any certificates for Common Stock outstanding will also constitute the transfer of the Rights associated with the Common Stock represented by such certificate.
     The Rights are not exercisable until the Distribution Date and will expire at the close of business on November 21, 2012, unless earlier redeemed or exchanged by the Company as described below. The Rights will not be exercisable by a holder in any jurisdiction where the requisite qualification to the issuance to such holder, or the exercise by such holder, of the Rights has not been obtained or is not obtainable.
 
     As soon as practicable following the Distribution Date, separate certificates evidencing the Rights ("Rights Certificates") will be mailed to holders of record of the Common Stock as of the close of business on the Distribution Date and, thereafter, the separate Rights Certificates alone will evidence the Rights. Except as otherwise determined by the Board of Directors of the Company, only shares of Common Stock issued prior to the Distribution Date will be issued with Rights.
     In the event that a Person becomes the beneficial owner of 15% or more of the then outstanding shares of Common Stock, each holder of a Right will, after the end of a redemption period referred to below, have the right to exercise the Right by purchasing, for an amount equal to the Purchase Price, Common Stock (or, in certain circumstances, cash, property or other securities of the Company) having a value equal to two times such amount. Notwithstanding any of the foregoing, following the occurrence of the events set forth in this paragraph, all Rights that are, or (under certain circumstances specified in the Rights Agreement) were, beneficially owned by any Acquiring Person will be null and void. However, Rights are not exercisable following the occurrence of the events set forth above until such time as the Rights are no longer redeemable by the Company as set forth below.
     For example, at a Purchase Price of $135 per Right, each Right not owned by an Acquiring Person (or by certain related parties) following an event set forth in the preceding paragraph would entitle its holder to purchase $270 worth of Common Stock (or other consideration, as noted above) for $135.
     In the event that, at any time following the Stock Acquisition Date, (i) the Company is acquired in a merger or other business combination transaction, or (ii) 50% or more of the Company's assets or earning power is sold or transferred, each holder of a Right (except Rights which previously have been voided as set forth above) shall, after the expiration of the redemption period referred to below, have the right to receive, upon exercise, common stock of the acquiring company having a value equal to two times the Purchase Price of the Right ( common stock of the acquiring company having a value of $270 for the $135 Purchase Price).
e.g.,
     At any time after a person or group of affiliated or associated persons becomes an Acquiring Person and prior to the acquisition by such person of 50% or more of the outstanding Common Stock, the Board of Directors of the Company may exchange the Rights (other than Rights owned by such person or group which have become void), in whole or in part, at an exchange ratio of one share of Common Stock (or, in certain circumstances, other equity securities of the Company which
 
are deemed by the Board of Directors of the Company to have the same value as shares of Common Stock) per Right (subject to adjustment).
     The Purchase Price payable, and the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock or other securities or property issuable, upon exercise of the Rights are subject to adjustment from time to time to prevent dilution under certain circumstances.
     With certain exceptions, no adjustment in the Purchase Price will be required until cumulative adjustments require an adjustment of at least 1% in such Purchase Price. No fractional shares will be issued (other than fractions which are integral multiples of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock) and in lieu thereof, an adjustment in cash will be made based on the market price of the Preferred Stock on the last trading date prior to the date of exercise.
     In general, the Board of Directors of the Company, may cause the Company to redeem the Rights in whole, but not in part, at any time during the period commencing on November 21, 2002, and ending on the tenth day following the Stock Acquisition Date (the "Redemption Period") at a price of $0.005 per Right (payable in cash, Common Stock or other consideration deemed appropriate by the Board of Directors of the Company). Under certain circumstances set forth in the Rights Agreement, the decision to redeem the Rights will require the concurrence of the two-thirds of Directors. After the Redemption Period has expired, the Company's right of redemption may be reinstated if an Acquiring Person reduces his beneficial ownership to 10% or less of the outstanding shares of Common Stock in a transaction or series of transactions not involving the Company and there are no other Acquiring Persons. Immediately upon the action of the Board of Directors of the Company ordering redemption of the Rights, the Rights will terminate and the only right of the holders of Rights will be to receive the $0.005 redemption price.
     Until a Right is exercised, the holder thereof, as such, will have no rights as a stockholder of the Company, including, without limitation, the right to vote or to receive dividends. While the distribution of the Rights will not be subject to federal taxation to stockholders or to the Company, stockholders may, depending upon the circumstances, recognize taxable income in the event that the Rights become exercisable for Common Stock (or other consideration) of the Company or for common stock of the acquiring company as set forth above.
     Except with respect to the Redemption Price of the Rights, any of the provisions of the Rights Agreement may be amended by the Board of Directors of the Company prior to the Distribution Date. After the Distribution Date, the provisions of the Rights Agreement may be amended by the Board of Directors of the Company in order to cure any ambiguity, defect or inconsistency or to make changes which do not adversely affect the interests of holders of Rights (excluding the interests of any Acquiring Person), or to shorten or lengthen any time period
 
under the Rights Agreement; , no amendment to adjust the time period governing redemption may be made at such time as the Rights are not redeemable.
provided
however
     As of November 21, 2002, there were 500,000,000 authorized shares of Common Stock, of which 29,594,004 shares were issued and outstanding and 2,745,257 shares were held by the Company in its treasury. Each share outstanding on December 9, 2002 will receive one Right. A total of 90,000 shares of Preferred Stock are reserved for issuance upon exercise of the Rights.
     The Rights have certain anti-takeover effects. The Rights will cause substantial dilution to a person or group that attempts to acquire the Company in a manner or on terms not approved by the Board of Directors of the Company. The Rights, however, should not deter any prospective offeror willing to negotiate in good faith with the Board of Directors of the Company. Nor should the Rights interfere with any merger or other business combination approved by the Board of Directors of the Company.
     The Rights Agreement between the Company and the Rights Agent specifying the terms of the Rights, which includes the form of Certificate of Designation of the Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock as , the Summary of Rights to Purchase Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock as and the form of Rights Certificate as , is attached hereto as and is incorporated herein by reference. In addition, the press release announcing the declaration of the Rights dividend is attached hereto as and is incorporated herein by reference. The foregoing description of the Rights and the Rights Agreement does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to hereto.
Exhibit A
Exhibit B
Exhibit C
Exhibit 99.1
Exhibit 99.2
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

 
 
 
 
     RIGHTS AGREEMENT, dated as of November 21, 2002 (the ""), between ARBITRON INC., a Delaware corporation (the ""), and THE BANK OF NEW YORK, a New York banking corporation (the "").
Agreement
Company
Rights Agent
     WHEREAS, on November 21, 2002 (the ""), the Board of Directors of the Company authorized and declared a dividend of one Right for each share of Common Stock (as hereinafter defined) of the Company outstanding at the Close of Business (as defined herein) on the Record Date (as defined herein), and has authorized the issuance of one Right with respect to each share of Common Stock of the Company issued between the Record Date (whether originally issued or delivered from the Company's treasury) and the Distribution Date (as hereinafter defined), each Right initially representing the right to purchase one one-thousandth of a share of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock of the Company having the rights, powers and preferences set forth in the form of Certificate of Designation, Preferences and Rights attached hereto as , upon the terms and subject to the conditions hereinafter set forth.
Rights Dividend Declaration Date
Exhibit A
     NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and the mutual agreements herein set forth, the parties hereby agree as follows:
   
Section 1. Certain Definitions.
     For purposes of this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings indicated:
 
 
 
 
 
   
Section 2. Appointment of Rights Agent.
     The Company hereby appoints the Rights Agent to act as agent for the Company in accordance with the terms and conditions hereof, and the Rights Agent hereby accepts such appointment. The Company may from time to time appoint such Co-Rights Agents as it may deem necessary or desirable, upon ten (10) days' prior written notice to the Rights Agent. The Rights Agent shall have no duty to supervise, and shall in no event be liable for, the acts or omissions of any such Co-Rights Agent.
   
Section 3. Issue of Rights Certificates.
     (a)  As promptly as practicable following the Record Date, the Company will send or deliver a copy of a Summary of Rights to Purchase Preferred Stock, in substantially the form attached hereto as (the ""), to each record holder of Common Stock as of the Close of Business on the Record Date at the address of such holder shown on the records of the Company. With respect to certificates for shares of Common Stock outstanding as of the Record Date, until the Distribution Date, the Rights will be evidenced by such certificates for the Common Stock and the registered holders of the Common Stock shall also be the registered holders of the associated Rights. Until the Distribution Date (or the earlier Expiration Date or Final Expiration Date), the transfer of any certificate representing shares of Common Stock in respect of which Rights have been issued shall also constitute the transfer of the Rights associated with the shares of Common Stock represented thereby.
Exhibit B
Summary of Rights
     (b)  Rights shall be issued in respect of all shares of Common Stock issued (whether originally issued or from the Company's treasury) after the Record Date but prior to the earlier of the Distribution Date or the Expiration Date or the Final Expiration Date. Rights shall also be issued to the extent provided in Section 22 in respect of all shares of Common Stock which are issued (whether originally issued or from the Company's treasury) after the Distribution Date and prior to the Expiration Date. Certificates representing such shares of Common Stock shall also be deemed to be certificates for Rights, and shall bear the following legend (in addition to any other legends that may be required):
 
With respect to such certificates containing the foregoing legend, until the earlier of (i) the Distribution Date or (ii) the Expiration Date, the Rights associated with the Common Stock represented by such certificates shall be evidenced by such certificates alone and registered holders of Common Stock shall also be the registered holders of the associated Rights, and the transfer of any such certificate shall also constitute the transfer of the Rights associated with the Common Stock represented thereby.
     (c)  Until the Distribution Date (i) the Rights will be evidenced (subject to the provisions of paragraph (a) of this Section 3) by the certificates for Common Stock registered in the names of the holders thereof (which certificates for Common Stock shall also be deemed to be Rights Certificates) and not by separate Rights Certificates, and (ii) the Rights will be transferable only in connection with the transfer of the underlying shares of Common Stock (including a transfer to the Company). The Company shall give the Rights Agent prompt written notice of the Distribution Date.
     (d)  As soon as practicable after the Distribution Date and receipt of written notice of the Distribution Date from the Company, the Rights Agent upon notification thereof will, at the Company's expense, send by first-class, insured, postage prepaid mail, to each record holder of Common Stock as of the Close of Business on the Distribution Date, at the address of such holder shown on the records of the Company, a rights certificate, in substantially the form of hereto (the ""), evidencing one Right for each share of Common Stock so held, subject to adjustment as provided herein. In the event that an adjustment in the number of Rights per share of Common Stock has been made pursuant to Section 11 hereof, at the time of distribution of the Rights Certificates, the Company shall make necessary and appropriate rounding adjustments (in accordance with Section 14(a) hereof) so that Rights Certificates representing only whole numbers of Rights are distributed and cash is paid in lieu of any fractional
Exhibit C
Rights Certificate
 
Rights. As of and after the Distribution Date, the Rights will be evidenced solely by such Rights Certificates.
   
Section 4. Form of Rights Certificates.
     (a)  The Rights Certificates (and the forms of election to purchase and of assignment to be printed on the reverse thereof) shall be substantially the same as hereto and may have such marks of identification or designation and such legends, summaries or endorsements printed thereon as the Company may deem appropriate, and as are not inconsistent with the provisions of this Agreement, or as may be required to comply with any applicable law or with any rule or regulation made pursuant thereto or with any rule or regulation of any stock exchange on which the Rights may from time to time be listed, or to conform to usage. The Rights Certificates shall be in a machine printable format and in a form reasonably satisfactory to the Rights Agent. Subject to the provisions of Section 11 and Section 22 hereof, the Rights Certificates, whenever issued, shall be dated as of the Record Date, show the date of countersignature, and on their face shall entitle the holders thereof to purchase such number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock as shall be set forth therein at the price set forth therein (such exercise price per one one-thousandth of a share, the ""), but the amount and type of securities purchasable upon exercise of each Right and the Purchase Price thereof shall be subject to adjustment as provided herein.
Exhibit C
Purchase Price
     (b)  Any Rights Certificate issued pursuant to Section 3(d) or Section 22 hereof that represents Rights beneficially owned by: (i) an Acquiring Person or any Associate or Affiliate of an Acquiring Person; (ii) a transferee of an Acquiring Person (or of any such Associate or Affiliate) who becomes a transferee after the Acquiring Person becomes such; or (iii) a transferee of an Acquiring Person (or of any such Associate or Affiliate) who becomes a transferee prior to or concurrently with the Acquiring Person becoming such and receives such Rights pursuant to either (A) a transfer (whether or not for consideration) from the Acquiring Person to holders of equity interests in such Acquiring Person or to any Person with whom such Acquiring Person has any continuing agreement, arrangement or understanding regarding the transferred Rights or (B) a transfer which a majority of the Directors has determined is part of an agreement, arrangement or understanding which has as a primary purpose or effect avoidance of Section 7(e) hereof and any Rights Certificate issued pursuant to Section 6 or Section 11 hereof upon transfer, exchange, replacement or adjustment of any other Rights Certificate referred to in this sentence, shall contain (to the extent feasible) the following legend:
 
     The Company shall instruct the Rights Agent in writing of the Rights which should be so legended and shall supply the Rights Agent with such legended Rights Certificates.
   
Section 5. Countersignature and Registration.
     (a)  The Rights Certificates shall be executed on behalf of the Company by its Chief Executive Officer, President, Chief Financial Officer or Chief Legal Officer and a Secretary or Assistant Secretary either manually or by facsimile signature. The Rights Certificates shall be manually countersigned by the Rights Agent and shall not be valid for any purpose unless so countersigned. In case any officer of the Company who shall have signed any of the Rights Certificates shall cease to be such officer of the Company before countersignature by the Rights Agent and issuance and delivery by the Company, such Rights Certificates, nevertheless, may be countersigned by the Rights Agent, and issued and delivered by the Company with the same force and effect as though the person who signed such Rights Certificates had not ceased to be such officer of the Company; and any Rights Certificate may be signed on behalf of the Company by any person who, at the actual date of the execution of such Rights Certificate, shall be a proper officer of the Company to sign such Rights Certificate, although at the date of the execution of this Rights Agreement any such person was not such an officer.
     (b)  Following the Distribution Date, the Rights Agent will keep or cause to be kept, at its principal office or at offices designated as the appropriate place for surrender of Rights Certificates upon exercise or transfer, books for registration and transfer of the Rights Certificates issued hereunder. Such books shall show the names and addresses of the respective holders of the Rights Certificates, the number of Rights evidenced on its face by each of the Rights Certificates and the date of each of the Rights Certificates.
   
Section 6. Transfer, Split Up, Combination and Exchange of Rights Certificates; Mutilated, Destroyed, Lost or Stolen Rights Certificates.
     (a)  Subject to the provisions of Section 4(b), Section 7(e) and Section 14 hereof, at any time after the Close of Business on the Distribution Date, and at or prior to the Close of Business on the earlier of the Expiration Date or Final Expiration Date, any Rights Certificate or Certificates may be transferred, split up, combined or exchanged for another Rights Certificate or Certificates, entitling the registered holder to purchase a like number of one one-thousandths of
 
a share of Preferred Stock (or following a Triggering Event, Common Stock, other securities, cash, or other assets, as the case may be) as the Rights Certificate or Certificates surrendered then entitled such holder (or former holder in the case of a transfer) to purchase. Any registered holder desiring to transfer, split up, combine or exchange any Rights Certificate shall make such request in writing delivered to the Rights Agent, and shall surrender the Rights Certificate or Certificates to be transferred, split up, combined or exchanged at the office of the Rights Agent designated for such purpose. Neither the Rights Agent nor the Company shall be obligated to take any action whatsoever with respect to the transfer of any such surrendered Rights Certificate until the registered holder shall have properly completed and signed the certificate contained in the form of assignment on the reverse side of such Rights Certificate and shall have provided such additional evidence of the identity of the Beneficial Owner (or former Beneficial Owner) or Affiliates or Associates thereof as the Company shall reasonably request. Thereupon the Rights Agent shall, subject to Section 4(b), Section 7(e) and Section 14 hereof, countersign and deliver to the Person entitled thereto a Rights Certificate or Certificates, as the case may be, as so requested. The Company may require payment by the holder of Rights of a sum sufficient to cover any tax or governmental charge that may be imposed in connection with any transfer, split up, combination or exchange of Rights Certificates.
     (b)  Upon receipt by the Company and the Rights Agent of evidence reasonably satisfactory to them of the loss, theft, destruction or mutilation of a Rights Certificate, and, in case of loss, theft or destruction, of indemnity or security reasonably satisfactory to them, and, at the Company's request, reimbursement to the Company and the Rights Agent of all reasonable expenses incidental thereto, and upon surrender to the Rights Agent and cancellation of the Rights Certificate, if mutilated, the Company will execute and deliver a new Rights Certificate of like tenor to the Rights Agent for countersignature and delivery to the registered owner in lieu of the Rights Certificate so lost, stolen, destroyed, or mutilated.
   
Section 7. Exercise of Rights; Purchase Price; Expiration Date of Rights.
     (a)  Subject to Section 7(e) hereof, the registered holder of any Rights Certificate may exercise the Rights evidenced thereby (except as otherwise provided herein including, without limitation, the restrictions on exercisability set forth in Section 9(c), Section 11(a)(iii) and Section 23(a) hereof) in whole or in part at any time after the Distribution Date upon surrender of the Rights Certificate, with the form of election to purchase and the certificate on the reverse side thereof duly and properly executed, to the Rights Agent at the office of the Rights Agent designated for such purpose, together with payment of the Purchase Price for each one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock (or other securities, cash or other assets, as the case may be) as to which the Rights are exercised, at or prior to the earlier of
 
(i) the close of business on November 21, 2012 (the ""), (ii) the time at which the Rights are redeemed as provided in Section 23 hereof, or (iii) the time at which such Rights are exchanged (the "") as provided in Section 24 hereof (the earliest of (i), (ii) and (iii) being herein referred to as the "").
Final Expiration Date
Exchange Date
Expiration Date
     (b)  Each Right shall entitle the registered holder thereof to purchase one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock, and the Purchase Price for each one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock pursuant to the exercise of a Right shall initially be $135, and shall be subject to adjustment from time to time as provided in Sections 11 and 13 hereof and shall be payable in lawful money of the United States of America in accordance with paragraph (c) below.
     (c)  Upon receipt of a Rights Certificate representing exercisable Rights, with the form of election to purchase and the certificate duly and properly executed, accompanied by payment, with respect to each Right so exercised, of the Purchase Price per one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock (or Common Stock, other securities, cash or other assets, as the case may be) to be purchased and an amount equal to any applicable transfer tax or governmental charge in cash, or by certified check or cashier's check payable to the order of the Company, the Rights Agent shall, subject to Section 18(k) hereof, thereupon promptly (i) (A) requisition from any transfer agent of the shares of Preferred Stock (or make available, if the Rights Agent is the transfer agent) certificates for the total number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock to be purchased and the Company hereby irrevocably authorizes its transfer agent to comply with all such requests, or (B) if the Company shall have elected to deposit the total number of shares of Preferred Stock issuable upon exercise of the Rights hereunder with a depositary agent, requisition from the depositary agent depositary receipts representing such number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock as are to be purchased (in which case certificates for the shares of Preferred Stock represented by such receipts shall be deposited by the transfer agent with the depositary agent) and the Company will direct the depositary to comply with such request, (ii) requisition from the Company the amount of cash, if any, to be paid in lieu of issuance of fractional shares in accordance with Section 14, (iii) promptly after receipt of such certificates or depositary receipts, cause the same to be delivered to or upon the order of the registered holder of such Rights Certificate, registered in such name or names as may be designated by such holder and (iv) after receipt thereof, promptly deliver such cash, if any, to or upon the order of the registered holder of such Rights Certificate. In the event that the Company is obligated to issue other securities (including Common Stock) of the Company, pay cash and/or distribute other property pursuant to Section 11(a) hereof, the Company will make all arrangements necessary so that such securities, cash and/or other property are available for distribution by the Rights Agent, if and when appropriate.
 
     (d)  In case the registered holder of any Rights Certificate shall exercise less than all the Rights evidenced thereby, a new Rights Certificate evidencing Rights equivalent to the Rights remaining unexercised shall be issued by the Rights Agent and delivered to, or upon the order of, the registered holder of such Rights Certificate, registered in such name or names as may be designated by such holder, subject to the provisions of Section 14 hereof.
     (e)  Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, from and after the first occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event, any Rights beneficially owned by (i) an Acquiring Person or an Associate or Affiliate of an Acquiring Person, (ii) a transferee of an Acquiring Person (or of any such Associate or Affiliate) who becomes a transferee after the Acquiring Person becomes such, or (iii) a transferee of an Acquiring Person (or of any such Associate or Affiliate) who becomes a transferee prior to or concurrently with the Acquiring Person becoming such and receives such Rights pursuant to either (A) a transfer (whether or not for consideration) from the Acquiring Person to holders of equity interests in such Acquiring Person or to any Person with whom such Acquiring Person has any continuing agreement, arrangement or understanding regarding the transferred Rights or (B) a transfer which a majority of the Directors has determined is part of an agreement, arrangement or understanding which has as a primary purpose or effect the avoidance of this Section 7(e), shall become null and void without any further action, and no holder of such Rights shall have any rights whatsoever with respect to such Rights, whether under any provision of this Agreement or otherwise. The Company shall use all reasonable efforts to ensure that the provisions of this Section 7(e) and Section 4(b) hereof are complied with, but shall have no liability to any holder of Rights Certificates or other Person as a result of its failure to make any determinations with respect to an Acquiring Person or its Affiliates, Associates or transferees hereunder. The Rights Agent will endeavor to comply with the provisions hereof to the extent it has received instructions from the Company concerning such matters.
     (f)  Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, neither the Rights Agent nor the Company shall be obligated to undertake any action with respect to a registered holder upon the occurrence of any purported exercise as set forth in this Section 7 unless such registered holder shall have (i) properly completed and signed the certificate contained in the form of election to purchase set forth on the reverse side of the Rights Certificate surrendered for such exercise, and (ii) provided such additional evidence of the identity of the Beneficial Owner (or former Beneficial Owner) or Affiliates or Associates thereof as the Company shall reasonably request.
 
   
Section 8. Cancellation of Rights Certificates.
     All Rights Certificates surrendered for the purpose of exercise, transfer, split up, combination or exchange shall, if surrendered to the Company or to any of its agents, be delivered to the Rights Agent for cancellation or in cancelled form, or, if surrendered to the Rights Agent, shall be cancelled by it, and no Rights Certificates shall be issued in lieu thereof except as expressly permitted by any provisions of this Rights Agreement. The Company shall deliver to the Rights Agent for cancellation and retirement, and the Rights Agent shall so cancel and retire, any other Rights Certificate purchased or acquired by the Company otherwise than upon the exercise thereof. The Rights Agent shall deliver all cancelled Rights Certificates to the Company.
   
Section 9. Reservation and Availability of Capital Stock.
     (a)  The Company covenants and agrees that it will cause to be reserved and kept available out of its authorized and unissued shares of Preferred Stock (and following the occurrence of a Triggering Event, out of its authorized and unissued shares of Common Stock and/or other securities or out of its authorized and issued shares held in its treasury), the number of shares of Preferred Stock (and, following the occurrence of a Triggering Event, shares of Common Stock and/or other securities) that, as provided in this Agreement, including Section 11(a)(iii) hereof, will be sufficient to permit the exercise in full of all outstanding Rights.
     (b)  In the event the shares of Preferred Stock (and, following the occurrence of a Triggering Event, Common Stock and/or other securities) issuable upon the exercise of Rights become listed on any national securities exchange, the Company shall use its best efforts to cause, from and after such time as the Rights become exercisable, all shares reserved for such issuance to be listed on such exchange upon official notice of issuance upon such exercise.
     (c)  The Company shall use its best efforts to (i) file, as soon as practicable following the earliest date after the first occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event on which the consideration to be delivered by the Company upon exercise of the Rights has been determined in accordance with this Agreement, or as soon as is required by law following the Distribution Date, as the case may be, a registration statement under the Securities Act with respect to the securities purchasable upon exercise of the Rights on an appropriate form, (ii) cause such registration statement to become effective as soon as practicable after such filing, and (iii) cause such registration statement to remain effective (with a prospectus at all times meeting the requirements of the Securities Act) until the earlier of (A) the date as of which the Rights are no longer exercisable for such securities, and (B) the Expiration Date. The Company will also take such action as may be appropriate under, or to
 
ensure compliance with, the securities or "blue sky" laws of the various states in connection with the exercisability of the Rights. The Company may temporarily suspend, for a period of time not to exceed ninety (90) days after the date set forth in clause (i) of the first sentence of this Section 9(c), the exercisability of the Rights in order to prepare and file such registration statement and permit it to become effective. In addition, if the Company shall determine that a registration statement is required following the Distribution Date, the Company may temporarily suspend the exercisability of the Rights until such time as a registration statement has been declared effective. Upon any suspension of exercisability of Rights referred to in this Section 9(c), the Company shall issue a public announcement stating that the exercisability of the Rights has been temporarily suspended, as well as a public announcement at such time as the suspension is no longer in effect, in each case with simultaneous written notice to the Rights Agent. Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, the Rights shall not be exercisable and shall be null and void so long as held by a holder in any jurisdiction where the requisite qualification to the issuance to such holder, or the exercise by such holder, of the Rights in such jurisdiction shall not have been obtained or be obtainable, or the exercise thereof shall not be permitted under applicable law or a registration statement shall not have been declared effective. The Rights Agent may assume that any Right exercised is permitted to be exercised under applicable law and shall have no liability for acting in reliance upon such assumption.
     (d)  The Company covenants and agrees that it will take all such action as may be necessary to ensure that all one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (and, following the occurrence of a Triggering Event, Common Stock and/or other securities) delivered upon exercise of Rights shall, at the time of delivery of the certificates for such shares (subject to payment of the Purchase Price), be duly and validly authorized and issued and fully paid and non-assessable.
     (e)  The Company further covenants and agrees that it will pay when due and payable any and all federal and state transfer taxes and charges which may be payable in respect of the issuance or delivery of the Rights Certificates or of any certificates for a number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) upon the exercise of Rights. The Company shall not, however, be required to pay any transfer tax or charge which may be payable in respect of any transfer or delivery of Rights Certificates to a Person other than, or the issuance or delivery of certificates for a number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) in a name other than that of the registered holder of the Rights Certificate evidencing Rights surrendered for exercise or to issue or deliver any certificates for a number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) in a name other than that of the registered holder upon the exercise of any Rights until any such tax or charge shall have been paid (any such tax or charge being payable by the holder of such Rights Certificate at the time of surrender) or
 
until it has been established to the Company's satisfaction that no such tax or charge is due.
   
Section 10. Preferred Stock Record Date.
     Each Person in whose name any certificate for a number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) is issued upon the exercise of Rights shall for all purposes be deemed to have become the holder of record of such fractional shares of Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) represented thereby on, and such certificate shall be dated, the date upon which the Rights Certificate evidencing such Rights was duly surrendered and payment of the Purchase Price (and any applicable transfer taxes and charges) was made; , , that if the date of such surrender and payment is a date upon which the Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities as the case may be) transfer books of the Company are closed, such Person shall be deemed to have become the record holder of such shares (fractional or otherwise) on, and such certificate shall be dated, the next succeeding Business Day on which the Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities as the case may be) transfer books of the Company are open. Prior to the exercise of the Rights evidenced thereby, the holder of a Rights Certificate shall not be entitled to any rights of a stockholder of the Company with respect to shares for which the Rights shall be exercisable, including, without limitation, the right to vote, to receive dividends or other distributions or to exercise any preemptive rights, and shall not be entitled to receive any notice of any proceedings of the Company, except as provided herein.
provided
however
   
Section 11. Adjustment of Purchase Price, Number and Kind of Shares or Number of Rights.
     The Purchase Price, the number and kind of shares covered by each Right and the number of Rights outstanding are subject to adjustment from time to time as provided in this Section 11.
     (a)(i) In the event the Company shall at any time after the date of this Agreement (A) declare a dividend on the Preferred Stock payable in shares of Preferred Stock, (B) subdivide the outstanding Preferred Stock, (C) combine the outstanding Preferred Stock into a smaller number of shares or (D) issue any shares of its capital stock in a reclassification of the Preferred Stock (including any such reclassification in connection with a consolidation or merger in which the Company is the continuing or surviving corporation), except as otherwise provided in this Section 11(a) and Section 7(e) hereof, the Purchase Price in effect at the time of the record date for such dividend or of the effective date of such subdivision, combination or reclassification, and the number and kind of shares of Preferred Stock or the number and kind of shares of capital stock issuable on such date, as the
 
case may be, shall be proportionately adjusted so that the holder of any Right exercised after such time shall be entitled to receive, upon payment of the aggregate adjusted Purchase Price then in effect necessary to exercise a Right in full, the aggregate number and kind of shares of Preferred Stock or the number and kind of shares of capital stock, as the case may be, which, if such Right had been exercised immediately prior to such date and at a time when the Preferred Stock (or other capital stock, as the case may be) transfer books of the Company were open, such holder would have owned upon such exercise and been entitled to receive by virtue of such dividend, subdivision, combination, or reclassification; provided, however, that in no event shall the consideration to be paid upon the exercise of one Right be less than the aggregate par value of the shares of capital stock of the Company issuable upon exercise of one Right. If an event occurs which would require an adjustment under both this Section 11(a)(i) and Section 11(a)(ii) hereof, the adjustment provided for in this Section 11(a)(i) shall be in addition to, and shall be made prior to, any adjustment required pursuant to Section 11(a)(ii) hereof.
     (ii)  Subject to Sections 23 and 24 of this Agreement, in the event that any Person (other than the Company, any Subsidiary of the Company, any employee benefit plan of the Company or of any Subsidiary of the Company, or any Person organized, appointed or established by the Company for or pursuant to the terms of any such plan), alone or together with its Affiliates and Associates, shall, at any time after the Rights Dividend Declaration Date, become an Acquiring Person, unless the event causing such Person to become an Acquiring Person is a transaction set forth in Section 13(a) hereof, proper provision shall be made so that promptly following the Redemption Period (as defined in Section 23(a)), each holder of a Right (except as provided below and in Section 7(e) hereof) shall thereafter have the right to receive, upon exercise thereof and payment of an amount equal to the then current Purchase Price in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, in lieu of a number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock, such number of shares of Common Stock of the Company as shall equal the result obtained by (x) multiplying the then current Purchase Price by the then number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock for which a Right was or would have been exercisable immediately prior to the first occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event, whether or not such Right was then exercisable, and (y) dividing that product (which, following such first occurrence, shall thereafter be referred to as the "" for each Right and for all purposes of this Agreement except to the extent set forth in Section 13 hereof) by 50% of the current market price per share of Common Stock (determined pursuant to Section 11(d) hereof) on the date of such first occurrence (such number of shares, the "").
Purchase Price
Adjustment Shares
     (iii)  The Company may at its option substitute for a share of Common Stock issuable upon the exercise of Rights in accordance with the foregoing subparagraph (ii) such number or fractions of shares of Preferred Stock having an aggregate market value equal to the current per share market price of a share of Common Stock. In the event that the number of shares of Common Stock
 
which is authorized by the Company's Restated Certificate of Incorporation, as amended, but not outstanding, or reserved for issuance for purposes other than upon exercise of the Rights, is not sufficient to permit the exercise in full of the Rights in accordance with the foregoing subparagraph (ii), the Board shall, to the extent permitted by applicable law and by any agreements or instruments then in effect to which the Company is a party, (A) determine the excess of (1) the value of the Adjustment Shares issuable upon the exercise of a Right (the "") over (2) the Purchase Price (such excess, the ""), and (B) with respect to each Right (subject to Section 7(e) hereof), make adequate provision to substitute for some or all of the Adjustment Shares, upon exercise of a Right and payment of the applicable Purchase Price, (1) cash, (2) a reduction in the Purchase Price, (3) Common Stock or other equity securities of the Company (including, without limitation, shares, or units of shares, of Preferred Stock which the Board has deemed to have the same value as shares of Common Stock) (such shares of equity securities being herein called ""), (4) debt securities of the Company, (5) other assets, or (6) any combination of the foregoing, having an aggregate value equal to the Current Value, where such aggregate value has been determined by the Board based upon the advice of an investment banking firm selected by the Board; , , if the Company shall not have made adequate provision to deliver value pursuant to clause (B) above within thirty (30) days following the later of (x) the first occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event and (y) the date on which the Company's right of redemption pursuant to Section 23(a) expires (the later of (x) and (y) being referred to herein as the ""), then the Company shall be obligated to deliver, upon the surrender for exercise of a Right and without requiring payment of the Purchase Price, shares of Common Stock (to the extent available) and then, if necessary, cash, which shares and/or cash have an aggregate value equal to the Spread.
Current Value
Spread
common stock equivalents
provided
however
Section 11(a)(ii) Trigger Date
     If, upon the occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event, the Board shall determine in good faith that it is likely that sufficient additional shares of Common Stock could be authorized for issuance upon exercise in full of the Rights, then if the Board so elects, the thirty (30) day period set forth above may be extended to the extent necessary, but not more than ninety (90) days after the Section 11(a)(ii) Trigger Date, in order that the Company may seek stockholder approval for the authorization of such additional shares (such period, as it may be extended, the ""). To the extent that action is to be taken pursuant to the preceding provisions of this Section 11(a)(iii), the Company (x) shall provide, subject to Section 7(e) hereof, that such action shall apply uniformly to all outstanding Rights, and (y) may suspend the exercisability of the Rights until the expiration of the Substitution Period in order to seek any authorization of additional shares and/or to decide the appropriate form of distribution to be made pursuant to the first sentence of this Section 11(a)(iii) and to determine the value thereof. In the event of any such suspension, the Company shall issue a public announcement stating that the exercisability of the Rights has been temporarily suspended, as well
Substitution Period
 
as a public announcement at such time as the suspension is no longer in effect. For purposes of this Section 11(a)(iii), the value of the Common Stock shall be the current market price (as determined pursuant to Section 11(d) hereof) per share of the Common Stock on the Section 11(a)(ii) Trigger Date and the value of any "common stock equivalent" shall be deemed to have the same value as the Common Stock on such date. The Board may, but shall not be required to, establish procedures to allocate the right to receive shares of Common Stock upon the exercise of the Rights among holders of Rights pursuant to this Section 11(a)(iii).
     (b)  In case the Company shall fix a record date for the issuance of rights, options or warrants to all holders of Preferred Stock entitling them (for a period expiring within forty-five (45) calendar days after such record date) to subscribe for or purchase Preferred Stock (or shares having the same rights, privileges and preferences as the shares of Preferred Stock ("") or securities convertible into Preferred Stock at a price per share of Preferred Stock or per share of "equivalent preferred stock" (or having a conversion price per share of Preferred Stock, if a security convertible into Preferred Stock) less than the current per share market price of the Preferred Stock (as defined in Section 11(d) hereof) on such record date, the Purchase Price to be in effect after such record date shall be determined by multiplying the Purchase Price in effect immediately prior to such record date by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the number of shares of Preferred Stock outstanding on such record date, plus the number of shares of Preferred Stock which the aggregate offering price of the total number of shares of Preferred Stock and/or equivalent preferred stock so to be offered (and/or the aggregate initial conversion price of the convertible securities so to be offered) would purchase at such current market price, and the denominator of which shall be the number of shares of Preferred Stock outstanding on such record date, plus the number of additional shares of Preferred Stock and/or equivalent preferred stock to be offered for subscription or purchase (or into which the convertible securities so to be offered are initially convertible); provided, however, that in no event shall the consideration to be paid upon the exercise of one Right be less than the aggregate par value of the shares of capital stock of the Company issuable upon exercise of one Right. In case such subscription price may be paid in a consideration part or all of which shall be in a form other than cash, the value of such consideration shall be as determined in good faith by the Board, whose determination shall be described in a statement filed with the Rights Agent and shall be conclusive for all purposes. Shares of Preferred Stock owned by or held for the account of the Company shall not be deemed outstanding for the purpose of any such computation. Such adjustment shall be made successively whenever such a record date is fixed; and in the event that such rights or warrants are not so issued, the Purchase Price shall be adjusted to be the Purchase Price which would then be in effect if such record date had not been fixed.
equivalent preferred stock
     (c)  In case the Company shall fix a record date for a distribution to all holders of Preferred Stock (including any such distribution made in connection
 
with a consolidation or merger in which the Company is the continuing or surviving corporation) of evidences of indebtedness, cash (other than a regular quarterly cash dividend out of the earnings or retained earnings of the Company), assets (other than a dividend payable in Preferred Stock, but including any dividend payable in stock other than Preferred Stock), or subscription rights or warrants (excluding those referred to in Section 11(b) hereof), the Purchase Price to be in effect after such record date shall be determined by multiplying the Purchase Price in effect immediately prior to such record date by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the current per share market price of the Preferred Stock (as defined in Section 11(d) hereof) on such record date, less the fair market value (as determined in good faith by the Board, whose determination shall be described in a statement filed with the Rights Agent and shall be conclusive for all purposes) of the portion of the cash, assets or evidences of indebtedness so to be distributed or of such subscription rights or warrants applicable to a share of Preferred Stock and the denominator of which shall be such current per share market price of the Preferred Stock; provided, however, that in no event shall the consideration to be paid upon the exercise of one Right be less than the aggregate par value of the shares of capital stock of the Company issuable upon exercise of one Right. Such adjustment shall be made successively whenever such a record date is fixed; and in the event that such distribution is not so made, the Purchase Price shall again be adjusted to be the Purchase Price which would then be in effect if such record date had not been fixed.
     (d)  (i) For the purpose of any computation hereunder, the "" of the Common Stock on any date shall be deemed to be the average of the daily closing prices per share of such Common Stock for the 30 consecutive Trading Days (as such term is hereinafter defined) immediately prior to but not including such date; , , that in the event that the current market price of the Common Stock is determined during a period following the announcement by the issuer of such Common Stock of (i) a dividend or distribution on such Common Stock payable in shares of such Common Stock or securities convertible into such Common Stock (other than the Rights), or (ii) any subdivision, combination or reclassification of such Common Stock, and prior to the expiration of the requisite thirty (30) Trading Day period, as set forth above, after the ex-dividend date for such dividend or distribution, or the record date for such subdivision, combination or reclassification, then, and in each such case, the "current market price" shall be appropriately adjusted to take into account ex-dividend trading. The closing price for each day shall be the last sale price, regular way, or, in case no such sale takes place on such day, the average of the closing bid and asked prices, regular way, in either case as reported in the principal consolidated transaction reporting system with respect to securities listed or admitted to trading on the New York Stock Exchange or, if the shares of Common Stock are not listed or admitted to trading on the New York Stock Exchange, as reported in the principal consolidated transaction reporting system with respect to securities listed on the principal national securities exchange on which the shares of
current market price
provided
however
 
Common Stock are listed or admitted to trading or, if the shares of Common Stock are not listed or admitted to trading on any national securities exchange, the last quoted price or, if not so quoted, the average of the high bid and low asked prices in the over-the-counter market, as reported by the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc. Automated Quotations System ("") or such other system then in use, or, if on any such date the shares of Common Stock are not quoted by any such organization, the average of the closing bid and asked prices as furnished by a professional market maker making a market in the shares of Common Stock selected by the Board.
NASDAQ
     If on any such date no market maker is making a market in the Common Stock, the fair value of such shares on such date as determined in good faith by the Board shall be used. The term "" shall mean a day on which the principal national securities exchange on which the shares of Common Stock are listed or admitted to trading is open for the transaction of business, or, if the shares of Common Stock are not listed or admitted to trading on any national securities exchange, the term "Trading Day" shall mean a Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday or Friday on which banking or trust institutions in the State of New York are not authorized or obligated by law or executive order to close. If the Common Stock is not publicly held or not listed or traded, "current market price" shall mean the fair value per share as determined in good faith by the Board, whose determination shall be described in a statement filed with the Rights Agent and shall be conclusive for all purposes.
Trading Day
         (ii) For the purpose of any computation hereunder, the "" per share of Preferred Stock shall be determined in the same manner as set forth above for the Common Stock in clause (i) of this Section 11(d) (other than the last sentence thereof). If the current market price per share of Preferred Stock cannot be determined in the manner provided above or if the Preferred Stock is not publicly held or listed or traded in a manner described in clause (i) of this Section 11(d), the "current market price" per share of Preferred Stock shall be conclusively deemed to be an amount equal to 1,000 (as such number may be appropriately adjusted for such events as stock splits, stock dividends and recapitalizations with respect to the Common Stock occurring after the date of this Agreement) multiplied by the current market price per share of the Common Stock. If neither the Common Stock nor the Preferred Stock is publicly held or so listed or traded, "current market price" per share of the Preferred Stock shall mean the fair value per share as determined in good faith by the Board, whose determination shall be described in a statement filed with the Rights Agent and shall be conclusive for all purposes. For all purposes of this Agreement, the "current market price" of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock shall be equal to the "current market price" of one share of Preferred Stock divided by 1,000.
current market price
     (e)  Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, no adjustment in the Purchase Price shall be required unless such adjustment would require an
 
increase or decrease of at least one percent (1%) in such price; , , that any adjustments which by reason of this Section 11(e) are not required to be made shall be carried forward and taken into account in any subsequent adjustment. All calculations under this Section 11 shall be made to the nearest cent or to the nearest ten-thousandth of a share of Common Stock or other share or one-millionth of a share of Preferred Stock, as the case may be. Notwithstanding the first sentence of this Section 11(e), an adjustment required by this Section 11 shall be made no later than the earlier of (i) three years from the date of the transaction which requires such adjustment or (ii) the Expiration Date.
provided
however
     (f)  If as a result of an adjustment made pursuant to Section 11(a)(ii) or Section 13(a) hereof, the holder of any Right thereafter exercised shall become entitled to receive any shares of capital stock of the Company other than Preferred Stock, thereafter the number of such other shares so receivable upon exercise of any Right and the Purchase Price thereof shall be subject to adjustment from time to time in a manner and on terms as nearly equivalent as practicable to the provisions with respect to the Preferred Stock contained in Sections 11(a), (b), (c), (e), (g), (h), (i), (j), (k) and (m), and the provisions of Sections 7, 9, 10, 13 and 14 hereof with respect to the Preferred Stock shall apply on like terms to any such other shares.
     (g)  All Rights originally issued by the Company subsequent to any adjustment made to the Purchase Price hereunder shall evidence the right to purchase, at the adjusted Purchase Price, the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock purchasable from time to time hereunder upon exercise of the Rights, all subject to further adjustment as provided herein.
     (h)  Unless the Company shall have exercised its election as provided in Section 11(i), upon each adjustment of the Purchase Price as a result of the calculations made in Sections 11(b) and (c), each Right outstanding immediately prior to the making of such adjustment shall thereafter evidence the right to purchase, at the adjusted Purchase Price, that number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (calculated to the nearest one-millionth) obtained by (i) multiplying (x) the number of one one-thousandths of a share covered by a Right immediately prior to this adjustment by (y) the Purchase Price in effect immediately prior to such adjustment of the Purchase Price and (ii) dividing the product so obtained by the Purchase Price in effect immediately after such adjustment of the Purchase Price.
     (i)  The Company may elect on or after the date of any adjustment of the Purchase Price to adjust the number of Rights, in lieu of any adjustment in the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock issuable upon the exercise of a Right. Each of the Rights outstanding after such adjustment of the number of Rights shall be exercisable for the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock for which a Right was exercisable immediately prior to such adjustment. Each Right held of record prior to such adjustment of the number
 
of Rights shall become that number of Rights (calculated to the nearest ten-thousandth) obtained by dividing the Purchase Price in effect immediately prior to adjustment of the Purchase Price by the Purchase Price in effect immediately after adjustment of the Purchase Price. The Company shall make a public announcement of its election to adjust the number of Rights, indicating the record date for the adjustment, and, if known at the time, the amount of the adjustment to be made. This record date may be the date on which the Purchase Price is adjusted or any day thereafter, but, if the Rights Certificates have been issued, shall be at least ten (10) days later than the date of the public announcement. If Rights Certificates have been issued, upon each adjustment of the number of Rights pursuant to this Section 11(i), the Company shall, as promptly as practicable, cause to be distributed to holders of record of Rights Certificates on such record date Rights Certificates evidencing, subject to Section 14 hereof, the additional Rights to which such holders shall be entitled as a result of such adjustment, or, at the option of the Company, shall cause to be distributed to such holders of record in substitution and replacement for the Rights Certificates held by such holders prior to the date of adjustment, and upon surrender thereof, if required by the Company, new Rights Certificates evidencing all the Rights to which such holders shall be entitled after such adjustment. Rights Certificates so to be distributed shall be issued, executed and countersigned in the manner provided for herein (and may bear, at the option of the Company, the adjusted Purchase Price) and shall be registered in the names of the holders of record of Rights Certificates on the record date specified in the public announcement.
     (j)  Irrespective of any adjustment or change in the Purchase Price or the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock issuable upon the exercise of the Rights, the Rights Certificates theretofore and thereafter issued may continue to express the Purchase Price per one one-thousandth of a share and the number of one one-thousandths of a share which were expressed in the initial Rights Certificates issued hereunder.
     (k)  Before taking any action that would cause an adjustment reducing the Purchase Price below the then-par value, if any, of the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock issuable upon exercise of the Rights, the Company shall take any corporate action which may, in the opinion of its counsel, be necessary in order that the Company may validly and legally issue fully paid and non-assessable such number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock at such adjusted Purchase Price.
     (l)  In any case in which this Section 11 shall require that an adjustment in the Purchase Price be made effective as of a record date for a specified event, the Company may elect to defer until the occurrence of such event the issuance to the holder of any Right exercised after such record date the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock and other capital stock or securities of the Company, if any, issuable upon such exercise over and above the
 
number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock and other capital stock or securities of the Company, if any, issuable upon such exercise on the basis of the Purchase Price in effect prior to such adjustment; , , that the Company shall deliver to such holder a due bill or other appropriate instrument evidencing such holder's right to receive such additional shares upon the occurrence of the event requiring such adjustment.
provided
however
     (m)  Anything in this Section 11 to the contrary notwithstanding, the Company shall be entitled to make such reductions in the Purchase Price, in addition to those adjustments expressly required by this Section 11, as and to the extent that the Board in its sole discretion shall determine to be advisable in order that any (i) consolidation or subdivision of the Preferred Stock, (ii) issuance wholly for cash of any shares of Preferred Stock at less than the current market price, (iii) issuance wholly for cash of shares of Preferred Stock or securities which by their terms are convertible into or exchangeable for Preferred Stock, (iv) stock dividends or (v) issuance of rights, options or warrants referred to hereinabove in this Section 11, hereafter made by the Company to holders of its Preferred Stock shall not be taxable to such stockholders.
     (n)  The Company covenants and agrees that, after the Distribution Date, it will not, except as permitted by Section 23 or Section 27 hereof, take (or permit any Subsidiary to take) any action if at the time such action is taken it is reasonably foreseeable that such action will diminish substantially or otherwise eliminate the benefits intended to be afforded by the Rights.
     (o)  Anything in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, in the event that the Company shall at any time after the Rights Dividend Declaration Date and prior to the Distribution Date (i) declare a dividend on the outstanding shares of Common Stock payable in shares of Common Stock, (ii) subdivide the outstanding shares of Common Stock, or (iii) combine the outstanding shares of Common Stock into a smaller number of shares, the number of Rights associated with each share of Common Stock then outstanding, or issued or delivered thereafter but prior to the Distribution Date, shall be proportionately adjusted so that the number of Rights thereafter associated with each share of Common Stock following any such event shall equal the result obtained by multiplying the number of Rights associated with each share of Common Stock immediately prior to such event by a fraction the numerator of which shall be the total number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately prior to the occurrence of the event and the denominator of which shall be the total number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately following the occurrence of such event.
 
   
Section 12. Certificate of Adjusted Purchase Price or Number of Shares.
     Whenever an adjustment is made as provided in Sections 11 or 13 hereof, the Company shall (a) promptly prepare a certificate setting forth such adjustment, and a brief statement of the facts and computations accounting for such adjustment, (b) promptly file with the Rights Agent and with each transfer agent for the Preferred Stock and the Common Stock a copy of such certificate and (c) mail or deliver a brief summary thereof to each holder of a Rights Certificate (or, if prior to the Distribution Date, to each holder of a certificate representing shares of Common Stock) in accordance with Section 25 hereof. The Rights Agent shall be fully protected in relying on any such certificate and on any adjustment therein contained and shall not be deemed to have knowledge of any adjustment unless and until it shall have received such certificate.
   
Section 13. Consolidation, Merger or Sale or Transfer of Assets or Earning Power.
     (a)  Subject to Section 23 of this Agreement, in the event that, following the Stock Acquisition Date, directly or indirectly,
then, and in each such case, proper provision shall be made so that:
 
 
     (b)  "" shall mean
Principal Party
, , that in any such case, (1) if the Common Stock of such Person is not at such time and has not been continuously over the preceding twelve (12) month period registered under Section 12 of the Exchange Act, and such Person is a direct or indirect Subsidiary of another Person the Common Stock of which is and has been so registered, "Principal Party" shall refer to such other Person; (2) if the Common Stock of such Person is not and has not been so registered and such Person is a Subsidiary, directly or indirectly, of more than one Person, the Common Stocks of two or more of which are and have been so registered, "Principal Party" shall refer to whichever of such Persons is the issuer of the Common Stock having the greatest aggregate market value; and (3) if the Common Stock of such Person is not and has not been so registered and such Person is owned, directly or indirectly, by a joint venture formed by two or more Persons that are not owned, directly or indirectly, by the same Person, the rules set forth in (1) and (2) above shall apply to each of the chains of ownership having an interest in such joint venture as if such party were a Subsidiary of both or all of such joint venturers, and the Principal Parties in each such chain shall bear the obligations set forth in this Section 13 in the same ratio as their direct or indirect interests in such Person bear to the total of such interests.
provided
however
     (c)  The Company shall not consummate any Section 13 Event unless the Principal Party shall have a sufficient number of authorized shares of its Common Stock which have not been issued or reserved for issuance to permit the exercise in full of the Rights in accordance with this Section 13 and unless prior thereto the Company and such Principal Party shall have executed and delivered to the Rights Agent a supplemental agreement providing for the terms set forth in
 
paragraphs (a) and (b) of this Section 13 and further providing that, as soon as practicable after the date of any such Section 13 Event, the Principal Party will:
The provisions of this Section 13 shall similarly apply to successive mergers or consolidations or sales or other transfers. In the event that a Section 13 Event shall occur at any time after the occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event, the Rights which have not theretofore been exercised shall thereafter become exercisable in the manner described in Section 13(a) hereof.
     (d)  In no event shall the Rights Agent have any liability in respect of any such Principal Party transactions, including, without limitation, the propriety thereof. The Rights Agent may rely and be fully protected in relying upon a certificate of the Company stating that the provisions of this Section 13 have been fulfilled. Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, the prior written consent of the Rights Agent must be obtained in connection with any supplemental agreement which alters the rights or duties of the Rights Agent.
 
     
Section 14. Fractional Rights and Fractional Shares.
        (a) The Company shall not be required to issue fractions of Rights except prior to the Distribution Date as provided in Section 11(o) hereof, or to distribute Rights Certificates which evidence fractional Rights. In lieu of such fractional Rights, there shall be paid to the registered holders of the Rights Certificates with regard to which such fractional Rights would otherwise be issuable, an amount in cash equal to the same fraction of the current market value of the whole Right. For the purposes of this Section 14(a), the current market value of a whole Right shall be the closing price of the Rights for the Trading Day immediately prior to the date on which such fractional Rights would have been otherwise issuable. The closing price for any day shall be the last sale price, or, in case no such sale takes place on such day, the average of the high bid and low asked prices, in either case as reported by the New York Stock Exchange or, if the Rights are not listed or admitted to trading on the New York Stock Exchange, as reported in the principal consolidated transaction reporting system with respect to securities listed on the principal national securities exchange on which the Rights are listed or admitted to trading, or such other system then in use or, if on any such date the Rights are not quoted by any such organization, the average of the closing bid and asked prices as furnished by a professional market maker making a market in the Rights selected by the Board. If on any such date no such market maker is making a market in the Rights the fair value of the Rights on such date as determined in good faith by the Board shall be used. In the event the Rights are listed or admitted to trading on a national securities exchange, the closing price for any day shall be the last sale price, regular way, or, in case no such sale takes place on such day, the average of the high bid and low asked prices, regular way, in either case as reported in the principal consolidated transaction reporting system with respect to the national securities exchange on which the Rights are listed or admitted to trading.
        (b) The Company shall not be required to issue fractions of shares of Preferred Stock (other than fractions which are integral multiples of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock) upon exercise of the Rights or to distribute certificates which evidence fractional shares of Preferred Stock (other than fractions which are integral multiples of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock). In lieu of fractional shares of Preferred Stock that are not integral multiples of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock, the Company may pay to the registered holders of Rights Certificates at the time such Rights are exercised as herein provided an amount in cash equal to the same fraction of the current market value of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock. For purposes of this Section 14(b), the current market value of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock shall be one one-thousandth of the closing price of a share of Preferred Stock (as determined pursuant to Section 11(d)(ii) hereof) for the Trading Day immediately prior to the date of such exercise.
 
        (c) Following the occurrence of one of the events specified in Section 11 giving rise to the right to receive Common Stock, common stock equivalents or other securities upon the exercise of a Right, the Company shall not be required to issue fractions of shares of Common Stock, common stock equivalents or other securities upon exercise of the Rights or to distribute certificates which evidence fractional shares of Common Stock, common stock equivalents or other securities. In lieu of fractional shares of Common Stock, common stock equivalents or other securities the Company may pay to the registered holders of Rights Certificates at the time such Rights are exercised as herein provided an amount in cash equal to the same fraction of the current market value of one (1) share of Common Stock, common stock equivalents or other securities. For purposes of this Section 14(c), the current market value of one share of Common Stock shall be the closing price of one share of Common Stock (as determined pursuant to Section 11(d)(i) hereof) for the Trading Day immediately prior to the date of such exercise.
        (d) The holder of a Right by the acceptance of the Rights expressly waives his right to receive any fractional Rights or any fractional shares upon exercise of a Right, except as permitted by this Section 14.
     
Section 15. Rights of Action.
        All rights of action in respect of this Agreement, except the rights of action vested in the Rights Agent pursuant to Section 18 and Section 19 hereof, are vested in the respective registered holders of the Rights Certificates (and, prior to the Distribution Date, the registered holders of the Common Stock); and any registered holder of any Rights Certificate (or, prior to the Distribution Date, of the Common Stock), without the consent of the Rights Agent or of the holder of any other Rights Certificate (or, prior to the Distribution Date, of the Common Stock), may, in his own behalf and for his own benefit, enforce, and may institute and maintain any suit, action or proceeding against the Company to enforce, or otherwise act in respect of, his right to exercise the Rights evidenced by such Rights Certificate in the manner provided in such Rights Certificate and in this Agreement. Without limiting the foregoing or any remedies available to the holders of Rights, it is specifically acknowledged that the holders of Rights would not have an adequate remedy at law for any breach of this Agreement and will be entitled to specific performance of the obligations under, and injunctive relief against actual or threatened violations of, the obligations hereunder of any Person subject to this Agreement.
 
     
Section 16. Agreement of Rights Holders.
        Every holder of a Right by accepting the same consents and agrees with the Company and the Rights Agent and with every other holder of a Right that:
        (a) prior to the Distribution Date, the Rights will be transferable only in connection with the transfer of the Common Stock;
        (b) after the Distribution Date, the Rights Certificates are transferable only on the registry books of the Rights Agent if surrendered at the office of the Rights Agent designated for such purposes, duly endorsed or accompanied by a proper instrument of transfer and with the appropriate form of assignment and the certificate contained therein duly completed and executed;
        (c) subject to Section 6(a) and Section 7(f) hereof, the Company and the Rights Agent may deem and treat the Person in whose name the Rights Certificate (or, prior to the Distribution Date, the associated Common Stock certificate) is registered as the absolute owner thereof and of the Rights evidenced thereby (notwithstanding any notations of ownership or writing on the Rights Certificates or the associated Common Stock certificate made by anyone other than the Company or the Rights Agent) for all purposes whatsoever, and neither the Company nor the Rights Agent, subject to the last sentence of Section 7(e) hereof, shall be affected by any notice to the contrary; and
        (d) Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, neither the Company nor the Rights Agent shall have any liability to any holder of a Right or other Person as a result of its inability to perform any of its obligations under this Agreement by reason of any preliminary or permanent injunction or other order, decree, judgment or ruling (whether interlocutory or final) issued by a court of competent jurisdiction or by a governmental, regulatory or administrative agency or commission, or any statute, rule, regulation or executive order promulgated or enacted by any government authority, prohibiting or otherwise restraining performance of such obligation; , , the Company must use its best efforts to have any such order, decree or ruling lifted or otherwise overturned as soon as possible.
provided
however
     
Section 17. Rights Certificate Holder Not Deemed a Stockholder.
        No holder, as such, of any Rights Certificate shall be entitled to vote, receive dividends or be deemed for any purpose the holder of the Preferred Stock or any other securities of the Company which may at any time be issuable on the exercise of the Rights represented thereby, nor shall anything contained herein or in any Rights Certificate be construed to confer upon the holder of any Rights
 
Certificate, as such, any of the rights of a stockholder of the Company or any right to vote for the election of directors or upon any matter submitted to stockholders at any meeting thereof, or to give or withhold consent to any corporate action, or to receive notice of meetings or other actions affecting stockholders (except as provided in Section 25 hereof), or to receive dividends or subscription rights, or otherwise, until the Right or Rights evidenced by such Rights Certificate shall have been exercised in accordance with the provisions hereof.
     
Section 18. Duties of Rights Agent.
        The Rights Agent undertakes only the duties and obligations expressly imposed by this Agreement upon the following terms and conditions, by all of which the Company and the holders of Rights Certificates, by their acceptance thereof, shall be bound:
        (a) The Rights Agent may consult with legal counsel of its selection (who may be legal counsel for the Company), and the advice or opinion of such counsel shall be full and complete authorization and protection to the Rights Agent, and the Rights Agent shall incur no liability, for or in respect of any action taken or omitted by it in good faith and in accordance with such advice or opinion.
        (b) Whenever in the performance of its duties under this Agreement the Rights Agent shall deem it necessary or desirable that any fact or matter (including, without limitation, the identity of any Acquiring Person and the determination of "current market price") be proved or established by the Company prior to taking or suffering or omitting to take any action hereunder, such fact or matter (unless other evidence in respect thereof be herein specifically prescribed) may be deemed to be conclusively proved and established by a certificate signed by any person believed by the Rights Agent to be any one of the Chief Executive Officer, President, Chief Financial Officer or Chief Legal Officer of the Company and delivered to the Rights Agent; and such certificate shall be full authorization to the Rights Agent, and the Rights Agent shall incur no liability, for or in respect of any action taken, omitted or suffered in good faith by it under the provisions of this Agreement in reliance upon such certificate.
        (c) The Rights Agent shall be liable hereunder only for its own gross negligence, bad faith, or willful misconduct.
        (d) The Rights Agent shall not be liable for or by reason of any of the statements of fact or recitals contained in this Agreement or in the Rights Certificates (except as to its countersignature thereof) or be required to verify the same, but all such statements and recitals are and shall be deemed to have been made by the Company only.
 
        (e) The Rights Agent is serving as an administrative agent and shall not be under any responsibility in respect of, the validity of any provision of this Agreement or the execution and delivery of this Agreement (except the due execution hereof by the Rights Agent) or in respect of the validity or execution of any Rights Certificate (except its countersignature thereof); nor shall it be responsible for any breach by the Company of any covenant or condition contained in this Agreement or in any Rights Certificate; nor shall it be responsible for any change in the exercisability of the Rights (including the Rights becoming null and void pursuant to Section 7(e) hereof) or any adjustment required under any of the provisions hereof or responsible for the manner, method, or amount of any such adjustment or the ascertaining of the existence of facts that would require any such adjustment (except with respect to the exercise of Rights evidenced by Rights Certificates after the Rights Agent's actual receipt of notice of any such adjustment); nor shall it by any act hereunder be deemed to make any representation or warranty as to the authorization or reservation of any shares of Common Stock or shares of Preferred Stock to be issued pursuant to this Agreement or any Rights Certificate or as to whether any shares of Common Stock or shares of Preferred Stock will, when so issued, be validly authorized and issued, fully paid and non-assessable, nor shall the Rights Agent be responsible for the legality of the terms hereof in its capacity as an administrative agent.
        (f) The Company agrees that it will perform, execute, acknowledge and deliver or cause to be performed, executed, acknowledged and delivered all such further and other acts, instruments and assurances as may reasonably be required by the Rights Agent for the carrying out or performing by the Rights Agent of the provisions of this Agreement.
        (g) The Rights Agent is hereby authorized and directed to accept instructions with respect to the performance of its duties hereunder from any person believed by the Rights Agent to be any one of the Chief Executive Officer, President, Chief Financial Officer or Chief Legal Officer of the Company, and to apply to such officers for advice or instructions in connection with its duties, and it shall not be liable for any action taken, omitted to be taken or suffered to be taken by it in good faith in accordance with instructions of any such officer or for any delay in acting while waiting for those instructions. Any application by the Rights Agent for written instructions from the Company may, at the option of the Rights Agent, set forth in writing any action proposed to be taken, suffered or omitted by the Rights Agent under this Agreement and the date on or after which such action shall be taken or suffered or such omission shall be effective. The Rights Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or suffered by, or omission of, the Rights Agent in accordance with a proposal included in any such application on or after the date specified in such application (which date shall not be less than five Business Days after the date any officer of the Company actually receives such application, unless any such officer shall have consented in writing to an earlier date) unless, prior to taking any such action (or the effective date in the case of an omission), the
 
Rights Agent shall have received written instruction in response to such application specifying the action to be taken, suffered or omitted.
        (h) The Rights Agent and any stockholder, affiliate, director, officer or employee of the Rights Agent may buy, sell or deal in any of the Rights or other securities of the Company or become pecuniarily interested in any transaction in which the Company may be interested, or contract with or lend money to the Company or otherwise act as fully and freely as though it were not Rights Agent under this Agreement. Nothing herein shall preclude the Rights Agent from acting in any other capacity for the Company or for any other Person or legal entity.
        (i) The Rights Agent may execute and exercise any of the rights or powers hereby vested in it or perform any duty hereunder either itself or by or through its attorneys or agents, and the Rights Agent shall not be answerable or accountable for any act, default, neglect, or misconduct of any such attorneys or agents or for any loss to the Company resulting from any such act, default, neglect, or misconduct; , , the Rights Agent was not grossly negligent in the selection thereof.
provided
however
        (j) No provision of this Agreement shall require the Rights Agent to expend or risk its own funds or otherwise incur any financial liability in the performance of any of its duties hereunder or in the exercise of its rights if there shall be reasonable grounds for believing that repayment of such funds or adequate indemnification against such risk or liability is not reasonably assured to it.
        (k) If, with respect to any Rights Certificate surrendered to the Rights Agent for exercise or transfer, the certificate attached to the form of assignment or form of election to purchase, as the case may be, has either not been properly completed or indicates an affirmative response to clause 1 and/or 2 thereof, the Rights Agent shall not take any further action with respect to such requested exercise of transfer without first consulting with the Company.
        (l) The Rights Agent undertakes only the express duties and obligations imposed on it by this Agreement and no implied duties or obligations shall be read into this Agreement against the Rights Agent.
        (m) In addition to the foregoing, the Rights Agent shall be protected and shall incur no liability for, or in respect of, any action taken or omitted by it in connection with its administration of this Agreement if such acts or omissions are in reliance upon (i) the proper execution of the certification concerning beneficial ownership appended to the form of assignment and the form of election to purchase attached to the Rights Certificate unless the Rights Agent shall have actual knowledge that, as executed, such certification is untrue, or (ii) the non-execution of such certification including, without limitation, any refusal to honor any otherwise permissible assignment or election by reason of such non-execution.
 
        (n) The Company agrees to give the Rights Agent prompt written notice of any event or ownership which would prohibit the exercise or transfer of the Rights Certificates.
     
Section 19. Compensation and Indemnification of the Rights Agent.
        (a) The Company agrees to pay to the Rights Agent such compensation as shall be agreed in writing between the Company and the Rights Agent for all services rendered by it hereunder and, from time to time, on demand of the Rights Agent, its reasonable expenses and counsel fees and expenses and other disbursements incurred in the administration and execution of this Agreement and the exercise and performance of its duties hereunder. The Company also agrees to indemnify the Rights Agent, its officers, employees, agents and directors for, and to hold each of them harmless against, any loss, liability, or expense, incurred without gross negligence, bad faith or willful misconduct on the part of the Rights Agent, for any action taken, suffered or omitted by the Rights Agent or such other indemnified party in connection with the acceptance and administration of this Agreement and the exercise of its duties hereunder, including but not limited to the costs and expenses of defending against any claim (whether asserted by the Company, a holder of Rights, or any other Person) of liability in the premises. The indemnity provided for hereunder shall survive the expiration of the Rights and the termination of this Agreement.
        (b) The Rights Agent shall be authorized and protected and shall incur no liability for or in respect of any action taken, suffered or omitted by it in connection with its administration of this Agreement or the exercise of its duties hereunder in reliance upon any Rights Certificate or certificate for Common Stock or for other securities of the Company, instrument of assignment or transfer, power of attorney, endorsement, affidavit, letter, notice, direction, consent, certificate, statement, or other paper or document believed by it to be genuine and to be signed and executed by the proper person or persons.
        (c) Anything in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, in no event shall the Rights Agent be liable for special, indirect or consequential loss or damage of any kind whatsoever (including but not limited to lost profits), even if the Rights Agent has been advised of the likelihood of such loss or damage and regardless of the form of the action unless such loss or damage results from the gross negligence, bad faith or willful misconduct of the Rights Agent.
 
     
Section 20. Merger or Consolidation or Change of Name of Rights Agent.
        (a) Any Person into which the Rights Agent or any successor Rights Agent may be merged or with which it may be consolidated, or any Person resulting from any merger or consolidation to which the Rights Agent or any successor Rights Agent shall be a party, or any Person succeeding to all or substantially all the stock transfer business of the Rights Agent or any successor Rights Agent, shall be the successor to the Rights Agent under this Agreement without the execution or filing of any paper or any further act on the part of any of the parties hereto; , , that such Person would be eligible for appointment as a successor Rights Agent under the provisions of Section 21 hereof. In case at the time such successor Rights Agent shall succeed to the agency created by this Agreement, any of the Rights Certificates shall have been countersigned but not delivered, any such successor Rights Agent may adopt the countersignature of the predecessor Rights Agent and deliver such Rights Certificates so countersigned; and in case at that time any of the Rights Certificates shall not have been countersigned, any successor Rights Agent may countersign such Rights Certificates either in the name of the predecessor Rights Agent or in the name of the successor Rights Agent; and in all such cases such Rights Certificates shall have the full force provided in the Rights Certificates and in this Agreement.
provided
however
        (b) In case at any time the name of the Rights Agent shall be changed and at any such time any of the Rights Certificates shall have been countersigned but not delivered, the Rights Agent may adopt the countersignature under its prior name and deliver Rights Certificates so countersigned; and in case at that time any of the Rights Certificates shall not have been countersigned, the Rights Agent may countersign such Rights Certificates either in its prior name or in its changed name; and in all such cases such Rights Certificates shall have the full force provided in the Rights Certificates and in this Agreement.
     
Section 21. Change of Rights Agent.
        The Rights Agent or any successor Rights Agent may resign and be discharged from its duties under this Agreement upon thirty (30) days' notice in writing mailed to the Company. The Company may remove the Rights Agent or any successor Rights Agent upon thirty (30) days' notice in writing, mailed to the Rights Agent or successor Rights Agent, as the case may be, and to each transfer agent of the Common Stock and Preferred Stock by registered or certified mail, and to the holders of the Rights Certificates by first-class mail. If the Rights Agent shall resign or be removed or shall otherwise become incapable of acting, the Company shall appoint a successor to the Rights Agent. If the Company shall fail to make such appointment within a period of thirty (30) days after giving notice of such removal or after it has been notified in writing of such resignation or
 
incapacity by the resigning or incapacitated Rights Agent or by the holder of a Rights Certificate (who shall, with such notice, submit his Rights Certificate for inspection by the Company), then the Rights Agent or the registered holder of any Rights Certificate may, at the expense of the Company, apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for the appointment of a new Rights Agent. Any successor Rights Agent, whether appointed by the Company or by such a court, shall be (i) a Person organized and doing business under the laws of the United States or the States of Delaware or New York (or of any other state of the United States so long as such Person is authorized to do business in the States of Delaware or New York), in good standing, having an office in the States of Delaware or New York which is authorized under such laws to exercise corporate trust power and is subject to supervision or examination by federal or state authority and which has at the time of its appointment as Rights Agent a combined capital and surplus of at least $50 million or (ii) an affiliate of such a Person. After appointment, the successor Rights Agent shall be vested with the same powers, rights, duties and responsibilities as if it had been originally named as Rights Agent without further act or deed; but the predecessor Rights Agent shall deliver and transfer to the successor Rights Agent any property at the time held by it hereunder, and execute and deliver any further assurance, conveyance, act or deed necessary for the purpose. Not later than the effective date of any such appointment the Company shall file notice thereof in writing with the predecessor Rights Agent and each transfer agent of the Common Stock and the Preferred Stock, and mail a notice thereof in writing to the registered holders of the Rights Certificates. Failure to give any notice provided for in this Section 21, however, or any defect therein, shall not affect the legality or validity of the resignation or removal of the Rights Agent or the appointment of the successor Rights Agent, as the case may be.
     
Section 22. Issuance of New Rights Certificates.
        Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this Agreement or of the Rights to the contrary, the Company may, at its option, issue new Rights Certificates evidencing Rights in such form as may be approved by the Board to reflect any adjustment or change in the Purchase Price per share and the number or kind of class of shares or other securities or property purchasable under the Rights Certificates made in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement. In addition, in connection with the issuance or sale of shares of Common Stock following the Distribution Date (other than upon exercise of a Right) and prior to the redemption or expiration of the Rights, the Company (a) shall, with respect to shares of Common Stock so issued or sold pursuant to the exercise of stock options or under any employee plan or arrangement, or upon the exercise, conversion or exchange of securities hereinafter issued by the Company, and (b) may, in any other case, if deemed necessary or appropriate by the Board, issue Rights Certificates representing the appropriate number of Rights in connection with such issuance or sale; , , that (i) no such Rights Certificate shall be issued if, and to
provided
however
 
the extent that, the Company shall be advised by counsel that such issuance would create a significant risk of material adverse tax consequences to the Company or the Person to whom such Rights Certificate would be issued, and (ii) no such Rights Certificate shall be issued if, and to the extent that, appropriate adjustment shall otherwise have been made in lieu of the issuance thereof.
     
Section 23. Redemption.
        (a) The Board may, at its option, at any time during the period commencing on the Rights Dividend Declaration Date and ending on the earlier of (i) the Close of Business on the tenth day following the Stock Acquisition Date (or, if the Stock Acquisition Date shall have occurred prior to the Record Date, the Close of Business on the tenth day following the Record Date), or (ii) the Close of Business on the Final Expiration Date, (the "") cause the Company to redeem all but not less than all the then outstanding Rights at a redemption price of $.005 per Right, as such amount may be appropriately adjusted to reflect any stock split, stock dividend or similar transaction occurring after the date hereof (such redemption price being hereinafter referred to as the "Redemption Price"); , , that, if the Board authorizes redemption of the Rights on or after the time a Person becomes an Acquiring Person, then such authorization shall require the concurrence of two-thirds of the Directors. If, following the occurrence of a Stock Acquisition Date and following the expiration of the Company's right of redemption hereunder (i) a Person who is an Acquiring Person shall have transferred or otherwise disposed of a number of shares of Common Stock in one transaction or series of transactions, not directly or indirectly involving the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, which did not result in the occurrence of a Triggering Event such that such Person is thereafter a Beneficial Owner of 10% or less of the outstanding shares of Common Stock, (ii) there are no other Persons, immediately following the occurrence of the event described in clause (i), who are Acquiring Persons, and (iii) the Board, by a vote of two-thirds of the Board, shall so approve, then the Company's right of redemption shall be reinstated and thereafter be subject to the provisions of this Section 23. Notwithstanding anything contained in this Agreement to the contrary, the Rights shall not be exercisable after the first occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event or a Section 13 Event until such time as the Company's right of redemption hereunder has expired. The Company may, at its option, pay the Redemption Price in cash, shares of Common Stock (based on the current market price of the Common Stock at the time of redemption) or any other form of consideration deemed appropriate by the Board.
Redemption Period
provided
however
        (b) Immediately upon the action of the Board ordering the redemption of the Rights, evidence of which shall have been filed with the Rights Agent, and without any further action and without any notice, the right to exercise the Rights will terminate and the only right thereafter of the holders of Rights shall be to receive the Redemption Price. Promptly after the action of the Board ordering
 
the redemption of the Rights, the Company shall give notice of such redemption to the Rights Agent and the holders of the then outstanding Rights by mailing such notice to all such holders at their last addresses as they appear upon the registry books of the Rights Agent or, prior to the Distribution Date, on the registry books of the Transfer Agent for the Common Stock; , , that the failure to give, or any defect in, any such notice shall not affect the validity of such redemption. Any notice which is mailed in the manner herein provided shall be deemed given, whether or not the holder receives the notice. Each such notice of redemption will state the method by which the payment of the Redemption Price will be made.
provided
however
     
Section 24. Exchange.
        (a) The Board may, at its option, at any time after any Person becomes an Acquiring Person, exchange all or part of the then outstanding and exercisable Rights (which shall not include Rights that have become null and void pursuant to the provisions of Section 7(e) hereof) for shares of Common Stock at an exchange ratio of one share of Common Stock per Right, appropriately adjusted to reflect any stock split, stock dividend or similar transaction occurring after the date hereof (such exchange ratio being hereinafter referred to as the ""). Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Board shall not be empowered to effect such exchange at any time after any Person (other than the Company, any Subsidiary of the Company, any employee benefit plan of the Company or any such Subsidiary, or any entity holding Common Stock for or pursuant to the terms of any such plan), together with all Affiliates and Associates of such Person, becomes the Beneficial Owner of 50% or more of the Common Stock then outstanding.
Exchange Ratio
        (b) Immediately upon the action of the Board ordering the exchange of any Rights pursuant to subsection (a) of this Section 24 and without any further action and without any notice, the right to exercise such Rights shall terminate and the only right thereafter of a holder of such Rights shall be to receive that number of shares of Common Stock equal to the number of such Rights held by such holder multiplied by the Exchange Ratio. The Company shall promptly give public notice of any such exchange; , , that the failure to give, or any defect in, such notice shall not affect the validity of such exchange. The Company promptly shall mail a notice of any such exchange to all of the holders of such Rights at their last addresses as they appear upon the registry books of the Rights Agent. Any notice which is mailed in the manner herein provided shall be deemed given, whether or not the holder receives the notice. Each such notice of exchange will state the method by which the exchange of Common Stock for Rights will be effected and, in the event of any partial exchange, the number of Rights which will be exchanged. Any partial exchange shall be effected pro rata based on the number of Rights (other than Rights which have become void pursuant to the provisions of Section 7(e) hereof) held by each holder of Rights.
provided
however
 
        (c) In any exchange pursuant to this Section 24, the Company, at its option, may substitute common stock equivalents (as defined in Section 11(a)(iii)) for shares of Common Stock exchangeable for Rights, at the initial rate of one common stock equivalent for each share of Common Stock, as appropriately adjusted to reflect adjustments in dividend, liquidation and voting rights of common stock equivalents pursuant to the terms thereof, so that each common stock equivalent delivered in lieu of each share of Common Stock shall have essentially the same dividend, liquidation and voting rights as one share of Common Stock.
        (d) In the event that there shall not be sufficient Common Stock issued but not outstanding or authorized but unissued to permit any exchange of Rights as contemplated in accordance with this Section 24, the Company shall take all such action as may be necessary to authorize additional shares of Common Stock for issuance upon exchange of the Rights.
        (e) The Company shall not be required to issue fractions of shares of Common Stock or to distribute certificates which evidence fractional shares of Common Stock. In lieu of such fractional shares, the Company shall pay to the registered holders of the Right Certificates with regard to which such fractional shares would otherwise be issuable an amount in cash equal to the same fraction of the current market value of a whole share of Common Stock. For the purposes of this paragraph (e), the current market value of a whole share of Common Stock shall be the closing price of a share of Common Stock (as determined pursuant to the second sentence of Section 11(d) hereof) for the Trading Day immediately prior to the date of exchange pursuant to this Section 24.
     
Section 25. Notice of Certain Events.
        (a) In case the Company shall propose, at any time after the Distribution Date (i) to pay any dividend payable in stock of any class to the holders of Preferred Stock or to make any other distribution to the holders of Preferred Stock (other than a regular quarterly cash dividend out of earnings or retained earnings) or (ii) to offer to the holders of Preferred Stock rights or warrants to subscribe for or to purchase any additional shares of Preferred Stock or shares of stock of any class or any other securities, rights or options, or (iii) to effect any reclassification of its Preferred Stock (other than a reclassification involving only the subdivision of outstanding Preferred Stock), or (iv) to effect any consolidation or merger into or with, or to effect any sale or other transfer (or to permit one or more of its subsidiaries to effect any sale or other transfer), in one or more transactions, of more than 50% of the assets or earning power of the Company and its subsidiaries (taken as a whole) to, any other Person, or (v) to effect the liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Company, then, in each such case, the Company shall give to each holder of a Rights Certificate, to the extent feasible and in
 
accordance with Section 26 hereof, a notice of such proposed action, which shall specify the record date for the purposes of such stock dividend, distribution of rights or warrants, or the date on which such reclassification, consolidation, merger, sale, transfer, liquidation, dissolution, or winding up is to take place and the date of participation therein by the holders of the shares of Preferred Stock, if any such date is to be fixed, and such notice shall be so given in the case of any action covered by clause (i) or (ii) above at least twenty (20) days prior to the record date for determining holders of the shares of Preferred Stock for purposes of such action and in the case of any such other action, at least twenty (20) days prior to the date of the taking of such proposed action or the date of participation therein by the holders of the shares of Preferred Stock whichever shall be the earlier.
        (b) In case any Section 11(a)(ii) Event shall occur, then, in any such case, (i) the Company shall as soon as practicable thereafter give to each holder of a Rights Certificate and to the Rights Agent, to the extent feasible and in accordance with Section 26 hereof, a notice of the occurrence of such event which shall specify the event and the consequences of the event to holders of Rights under Section 11(a)(ii) hereof, and (ii) all references in the preceding paragraph to Preferred Stock shall be deemed thereafter to refer to Common Stock and/or, if appropriate other securities.
     
Section 26. Notices.
        Notices or demands authorized by this Agreement to be given or made by the Rights Agent or by the holder of any Rights Certificate to or on the Company shall be sufficiently given or made if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed (until another address is filed in writing with the Rights Agent) as follows:
Subject to the provisions of Section 21 hereof, any notice or demand authorized by this Agreement to be given or made by the Company or by the holder of any Rights Certificate to or on the Rights Agent shall be sufficiently given or made if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed (until another address is filed in writing with the Company) as follows:
 
Notices or demands authorized by this Agreement to be given or made by the Company or the Rights Agent to the holder of any Rights Certificate shall be sufficiently given or made if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed to any such holder at the address of such holder as shown on the registry books of the Company.
     
Section 27. Supplements and Amendments.
        Prior to the Distribution Date and subject to the last sentence of this Section 27, the Company may in its sole and absolute discretion, and the Rights Agent shall, if the Company so directs, supplement or amend any provision of this Agreement in any respect without the approval of any holders of certificates representing shares of Common Stock; , , that the that the right of the Board of Directors to extend the Distribution Date shall not require any amendment or supplement hereunder. From and after the Distribution Date and subject to the last sentence of this Section 27, the Company may in its sole and absolute discretion, and the Rights Agent shall at any time and from time to time, if the Company so directs, supplement or amend this Agreement without the approval of any holders of Rights Certificates in order (i) to cure any ambiguity, (ii) to correct or supplement any provision contained herein which may be defective or inconsistent with any other provisions herein, (iii) to shorten or lengthen any time period hereunder or (iv) to change or supplement the provisions hereunder in any manner which the Company may deem necessary or desirable and which shall not adversely affect the interests of the holders of Rights Certificates (other than an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of any such Person); , , that this Agreement may not be supplemented or amended (A) to lengthen a time period relating to when the Rights may be redeemed at such time as the Rights are not then redeemable, or (B) to lengthen any other time period unless such lengthening is for the purpose of protecting, enhancing or clarifying the rights of, and/or the benefits to, the holders of Rights (other than an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of any such Person). Upon the delivery of a certificate from an appropriate officer of the Company which states that the proposed supplement or amendment is in compliance with the terms of this Section 27, the Rights Agent shall execute such supplement or amendment. Notwithstanding any other provision hereof, the Rights Agent's consent must be obtained regarding any amendment or supplement pursuant to this Section 27 which alters the Rights Agent's rights or duties. Notwithstanding anything contained in this Agreement to
provided
however
provided
however
 
the contrary, no supplement or amendment shall be made which changes the Redemption Price.
     
Section 28. Successors.
        All the covenants and provisions of this Agreement by or for the benefit of the Company or the Rights Agent shall bind and inure to the benefit of their respective successors and assigns hereunder.
     
Section 29. Determinations and Actions by the Board, etc.
        For all purposes of this Agreement, any calculation of the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding at any particular time, including for purposes of determining the particular percentage of such outstanding shares of Common Stock of which any Person is the Beneficial Owner, shall be made in accordance with the last sentence of Rule 13d-3(d)(1)(i) of the General Rules and Regulations under the Exchange Act. The Board (with, where specifically provided for herein, the concurrence of two-thirds of the Directors) shall have the exclusive power and authority to administer this Agreement and to exercise all rights and powers specifically granted to the Board (with, where specifically provided for herein, the concurrence of two-thirds of the Directors) or to the Company, or as may be necessary or advisable in the administration of this Agreement, including, without limitation, the right and power to (i) interpret the provisions of this Agreement, and (ii) make all determinations deemed necessary or advisable for the administration of this Agreement (including without limitation a determination to redeem or not redeem the Rights or to amend the Agreement). All such actions, calculations, interpretations and determinations (including, for purposes of clause (y) below, all omissions with respect to the foregoing) which are done or made by the Board (with, where specifically provided for herein, the concurrence of two-thirds of the Directors) in good faith, shall (x) be final, conclusive and binding on the Company, the Rights Agent, the holders of the Rights and all other Persons, and (y) not subject any director to any liability to the holders of the Rights.
     
Section 30. Benefits of this Agreement.
        Nothing in this Agreement shall be construed to give to any Person other than the Company, the Rights Agent and the registered holders of the Rights Certificates (and, prior to the Distribution Date, the registered holders of the Common Stock) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under this Agreement; but this Agreement shall be for the sole and exclusive benefit of the Company, the Rights Agent and the registered holders of the Rights Certificates (and, prior to the Distribution Date, registered holders of Common Stock). Prior to the Distribution Date, the interests of the holders of Rights shall be deemed coincident with the interests of the holders of shares of Common Stock.
 
     
Section 31. Severability.
        If any term, provision, covenant or restriction of this Agreement is held by a court of competent jurisdiction or other authority to be invalid, void or unenforceable, the remainder of the terms, provisions, covenants and restrictions of this Agreement shall remain in full force and effect and shall in no way be affected, impaired or invalidated; , , that notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, if any such term, provision, covenant or restriction is held by such court or authority to be invalid, void or unenforceable and the Board of Directors determines in its good faith judgment that severing the invalid language from this Agreement would materially and adversely affect the purpose or effect of this Agreement, the right of redemption set forth in Section 23 hereof shall be reinstated and shall not expire until the Close of Business on the tenth day following the date of such determination by the Board.
provided
however
     
Section 32. Governing Law.
        This Agreement, each Right and each Rights Certificate issued hereunder shall be deemed to be a contract made under the laws of the State of Delaware and for all purposes shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of such State; provided, however, that the rights and obligations of the Rights Agent shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York.
     
Section 33. Counterparts.
        This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts. It shall not be necessary that the signature of or on behalf of each party appears on each counterpart, but it shall be sufficient that the signature of or on behalf of each party appears on one or more of the counterparts. All counterparts shall collectively constitute a single agreement. It shall not be necessary in any proof of this Agreement to produce or account for more than a number of counterparts containing the respective signatures of or on behalf of all of the parties.
     
Section 34. Descriptive Headings.
        Descriptive headings of the several Sections of this Agreement are inserted for convenience only and shall not control or affect the meaning or construction of any of the provisions hereof.
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Rights Agreement to be duly executed, all as of the day and year first above written.
 
Exhibit A
     I, Stephen B. Morris, Chief Executive Officer and President of Arbitron Inc., a corporation organized and existing under the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, in accordance with the provisions of Section 103 thereof, DO HEREBY CERTIFY:
     That pursuant to the authority conferred upon the Board of Directors by the Restated Certificate of Incorporation, as amended, of the said Corporation, the said Board of Directors on November 21, 2002 adopted the following resolution creating a series of 90,000 shares of Preferred Stock designated as Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock:
     RESOLVED, that pursuant to the authority granted to and vested in the Board of Directors of this Corporation (the "Board") in accordance with the provisions of its Restated Certificate of Incorporation, as amended, a series of Preferred Stock of the Corporation be and it hereby is created, and that the designation and amount thereof and the voting rights or powers, preferences and relative, participating, optional and other special rights of the shares of such series, and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions thereof are as follows:
     Section 1. . The shares of such series, par value $100.00 per share, shall be designated as "Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock" and the number of shares constituting such series shall be 90,000. Such number of shares may be increased or decreased by resolution of the Board of Directors; provided, that no decrease shall reduce the number of shares of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock to a number less than the number of shares then outstanding plus the number of shares reserved for issuance upon the exercise of outstanding options, rights or warrants or upon the conversion of any outstanding securities issued by the Corporation convertible into Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock.
Designation and Amount
 
     Section 2. .
Dividends and Distributions
     (A)  Subject to the prior and superior rights of the holders of any shares of any series of Preferred Stock ranking prior and superior to the shares of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock with respect to dividends, the holders of shares of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall be entitled to receive, when, as and if declared by the Board of Directors out of funds legally available for the purpose, quarterly dividends payable in cash on the 15th day of January, April, July and October, in each year (each such date being referred to herein as a "Quarterly Dividend Payment Date"), commencing on the first Quarterly Dividend Payment Date after first issuance of a share or fraction of a share of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock, in an amount per share (rounded to the nearest cent) equal to the greater of (a) $10.00 or (b) subject to the provision for adjustment hereinafter set forth, 1,000 times the aggregate per share amount of all cash dividends, and 1,000 times the aggregate per share amount (payable in kind) of all non-cash dividends or other distributions, other than a dividend payable in shares of common stock, par value $0.50 per share, of the Corporation (the "Common Stock"), or a subdivision of the outstanding shares of Common Stock (by reclassification or otherwise), declared on the Common Stock, since the immediately preceding Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, or, with respect to the first Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, since the first issuance of any share or fraction of a share of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock. In the event the Corporation shall at any time after November 21, 2002 (the "Rights Declaration Date") (i) declare or pay any dividend on Common Stock payable in shares of Common Stock, (ii) subdivide the outstanding Common Stock, or (iii) combine the outstanding Common Stock into a smaller number of shares, then in each such case the amount to which holders of shares of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock were entitled immediately prior to such event under clause (b) of the preceding sentence shall be adjusted by multiplying such amount by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately after such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event.
     (B)  The Corporation shall declare a dividend or distribution on the Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock as provided in paragraph (A) above immediately after it declares a dividend or distribution on the Common Stock (other than a dividend payable in shares of Common Stock); provided that, in the event no dividend or distribution shall have been declared on the Common Stock during the period between any Quarterly Dividend Payment Date and the next subsequent Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, a dividend of $10.00 per share on the Series B Junior Participating Preferred
 
Stock shall nevertheless be payable on such subsequent Quarterly Dividend Payment Date.
     (C)  Dividends shall begin to accrue and be cumulative on outstanding shares of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock from the Quarterly Dividend Payment Date next preceding the date of issue of such shares of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock, unless the date of issue of such shares is prior to the record date set for the first Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, in which case dividends on such shares shall begin to accrue from the date of issue of such shares, or unless the date of issue is a Quarterly Dividend Payment Date or is a date after the record date for the determination of holders of shares of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock entitled to receive a quarterly dividend and before such Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, in either of which event such dividends shall begin to accrue and be cumulative from such Quarterly Dividend Payment Date. Accrued but unpaid dividends shall not bear interest. Dividends paid on the shares of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock in an amount less than the total amount of such dividends at the time accrued and payable on such shares shall be allocated pro rata on a share-by-share basis among all such shares at the time outstanding. The Board of Directors may fix a record date for the determination of holders of shares of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock entitled to receive payment of a dividend or distribution declared thereon, which record date shall be no more than 50 days prior to the date fixed for the payment thereof.
     Section 3. . The holders of shares of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall have the following voting rights:
Voting Rights
     (A)  Subject to the provision for adjustment hereinafter set forth, each share of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall entitle the holder thereof to 1,000 votes on all matters submitted to a vote of the stockholders of the Corporation. In the event the Corporation shall at any time after the Rights Declaration Date (i) declare any dividend on Common Stock payable in shares of Common Stock, (ii) subdivide the outstanding Common Stock, or (iii) combine the outstanding Common Stock into a smaller number of shares, then in each such case the number of votes per share to which holders of shares of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock were entitled immediately prior to such event shall be adjusted by multiplying such number by a fraction the numerator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately after such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event.
     (B)  Except as otherwise provided by law, the holders of shares of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock and the holders of shares of
 
Common Stock shall vote together as one class on all matters submitted to a vote of stockholders of the Corporation.
     (C)  Except as set forth herein, holders of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall have no special voting rights and their consent shall not be required (except to the extent they are entitled to vote with holders of Common Stock as set forth herein) for taking any corporate action.
     Section 4. .
Certain Restrictions
     (A)  Whenever dividends or distributions payable on the Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock as provided in Section 2 are not paid, thereafter and until such dividends and distributions, whether or not declared, on shares of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock outstanding shall have been paid in full, the Corporation shall not:
         (i) declare or pay dividends on, or make any other distributions on, or redeem or purchase or otherwise acquire for consideration any shares of stock ranking junior (either as to dividends or upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up) to the Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock; or
         (ii) declare or pay dividends on, or make any other distributions on, any shares of stock ranking on a parity (either as to dividends or upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up) with the Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock, except dividends paid ratably on the Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock and all such parity stock on which dividends are payable in proportion to the total amounts to which the holders of all such shares are then entitled; or
         (iii) redeem or purchase or otherwise acquire for consideration shares of any stock ranking on a parity (either as to dividends or upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up) with the Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock, provided that the Corporation may at any time redeem, purchase or otherwise acquire shares of any such parity stock in exchange for shares of any stock of the Corporation ranking junior (either as to dividends or upon dissolution, liquidation or winding up) to the Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock; or
         (iv) redeem or purchase or otherwise acquire for consideration any shares of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock, or any shares of stock ranking on a parity with the Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock, except in accordance with a purchase offer made in writing or by publication (as determined by the Board of Directors) to all holders of such
 
shares upon such terms as the Board of Directors, after consideration of the respective annual dividend rates and other relative rights and preferences of the respective series and classes, shall determine in good faith will result in fair and equitable treatment among the respective series or classes.
     (B)  The Corporation shall not permit any subsidiary of the Corporation to purchase or otherwise acquire for consideration any shares of stock of the Corporation unless the Corporation could, under paragraph (A) of this Section 4, purchase or otherwise acquire such shares at such time and in such manner.
     Section 5. . Any shares of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock purchased or otherwise acquired by the Corporation in any manner whatsoever shall be retired and canceled promptly after the acquisition thereof. All such shares shall upon their cancellation become authorized but unissued shares of Preferred Stock and may be reissued as part of a new series of Preferred Stock to be created by resolution or resolutions of the Board of Directors, subject to the conditions and restrictions on issuance set forth herein.
Reacquired Shares
     Section 6. .
Liquidation, Dissolution or Winding Up
     (A)  Upon any liquidation (voluntary or otherwise), dissolution or winding up of the Corporation, no distribution shall be made to the holders of shares of stock ranking junior (either as to dividends or upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up) to the Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock unless, prior thereto, the holders of shares of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall have received $135,000 per share, plus any unpaid dividends and distributions payable thereon, whether or not declared, to the date of such payment (the "Series B Liquidation Preference"). Following the payment of the full amount of the Series B Liquidation Preference, no additional distributions shall be made to the holders of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock unless, prior thereto, the holders of shares of Common Stock shall have received an amount per share (the "Common Adjustment") equal to the quotient obtained by dividing (i) the Series B Liquidation Preference by (ii) 1,000 (as appropriately adjusted as set forth in subparagraph (C) below to reflect such events as stock splits, stock dividends and recapitalizations with respect to the Common Stock) (such number in clause (ii) immediately above being referred to as the "Adjustment Number"). Following the payment of the full amount of the Series B Liquidation Preference and the Common Adjustment in respect of all outstanding shares of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock and Common Stock, respectively, holders of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock and holders of shares of Common Stock shall receive their ratable and proportionate share of the
 
remaining assets to be distributed in the ratio of the Adjustment Number to one (1) with respect to such Preferred Stock and Common Stock, on a per share basis, respectively.
     (B)  In the event, however, that there are not sufficient assets available to permit payment in full of the Series B Liquidation Preference and the liquidation preferences of all other series of preferred stock, if any, which rank on a parity with the Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock, then such remaining assets shall be distributed ratably to the holders of such parity shares in proportion to their respective liquidation preferences. In the event, however, that there are sufficient assets available to permit payment in full of the Common Adjustment, then such remaining assets shall be distributed ratably to the holders of Common Stock.
     (C)  In the event the Corporation shall at any time after the Rights Declaration Date (i) declare any dividend on Common Stock payable in shares of Common Stock, (ii) subdivide the outstanding Common Stock, or (iii) combine the outstanding Common Stock into a smaller number of shares, then in each such case the Adjustment Number in effect immediately prior to such event shall be adjusted by multiplying such Adjustment Number by a fraction the numerator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately after such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event.
     Section 7. In case the Corporation shall enter into any consolidation, merger, combination or other transaction in which the shares of Common Stock are exchanged for or changed into other stock or securities, cash and/or any other property, then in any such case the shares of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall at the same time be similarly exchanged or changed in an amount per share (subject to the provision for adjustment hereinafter set forth) equal to 1,000 times the aggregate amount of stock, securities, cash and/or any other property (payable in kind), as the case may be, into which or for which each share of Common Stock is changed or exchanged. In the event the Corporation shall at any time after the Rights Declaration Date (i) declare any dividend on Common Stock payable in shares of Common Stock, (ii) subdivide the outstanding Common Stock, or (iii) combine the outstanding Common Stock into a smaller number of shares, then in each such case the amount set forth in the preceding sentence with respect to the exchange or change of shares of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall be adjusted by multiplying such amount by a fraction the numerator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately after such event and the denominator of which is the
Consolidation, Merger, etc.
 
number of shares of Common Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event.
     Section 8. . The Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall not be redeemable.
No Redemption
     Section 9. . Notwithstanding anything contained herein to the contrary, the Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall rank junior to all other series of the Corporation's Preferred Stock as to voting rights, the payment of dividends and the distribution of assets in liquidation, unless the terms of any such series shall provide otherwise.
Ranking
     Section 10. . The Restated Certificate of Incorporation, as amended, of the Corporation shall not be further amended in any manner which would materially alter or change the powers, preferences or special rights of the Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock so as to affect them adversely without the affirmative vote of the holders of at least a majority of the outstanding shares of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock, voting separately as a class.
Amendment
     Section 11. . Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock may be issued in fractions of a share which shall entitle the holders, in proportion to such holders fractional shares, to exercise voting rights, receive dividends, participate in distributions and to have the benefit of all other rights of holders of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock.
Fractional Shares
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, I have executed and subscribed this Certificate and do affirm the foregoing as true under the penalties of perjury this 21st day of November 2002.
 
Exhibit B
     The Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc., a Delaware Corporation (the "Company"), has declared a dividend distribution of one right ("Right") for each outstanding share of common stock (the "Common Stock") of the Company. The distribution is payable to stockholders of record on December 9, 2002. Each Right, when exercisable, entitles the registered holder to purchase from the Company one one-thousandth of a share of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock ("Preferred Stock") at a price of $135 per one one-thousandth share (the "Purchase Price"), subject to adjustment. The description and terms of the Rights are set forth in a Rights Agreement (the "Rights Agreement") between the Company and The Bank of New York, as Rights Agent (the "Rights Agent").
     Initially, the Rights will be attached to all certificates representing shares of Common Stock then outstanding, and no separate certificates evidencing the Rights will be distributed. The Rights will separate from the Common Stock and a distribution of Rights Certificates (as defined below) will occur upon the earlier to occur of (i) 10 days following a public announcement that a person or group of affiliated or associated persons (an "Acquiring Person") has acquired, or obtained the right to acquire, beneficial ownership of 15% or more of the outstanding shares of Common Stock (the "Stock Acquisition Date") or (ii) 10 business days (or such later date as the Board of Directors of the Company may determine) following the commencement of, or the first public announcement of the intention to commence, a tender offer or exchange offer the consummation of which would result in the beneficial ownership by a person of 15% or more of the outstanding shares of Common Stock (the earlier of such dates being called the "Distribution Date").
     Until the Distribution Date, (i) the Rights will be evidenced by the Common Stock certificates, and will be transferred with and only with the Common Stock certificates, (ii) new Common Stock certificates issued after December 9, 2002 upon transfer or new issuance of the Common Stock will contain a notation incorporating the Rights Agreement by reference, and (iii) the surrender for transfer of any certificates for Common Stock outstanding will also constitute the transfer of the Rights associated with the Common Stock represented by such certificate.
     The Rights are not exercisable until the Distribution Date and will expire at the close of business on November 21, 2012, unless earlier redeemed or exchanged by the Company as described below.
 
     As soon as practicable following the Distribution Date, separate certificates evidencing the Rights ("Rights Certificates") will be mailed to holders of record of the Common Stock as of the close of business on the Distribution Date and, thereafter, the separate Rights Certificates alone will evidence the Rights. Except as otherwise determined by the Board of Directors of the Company, only shares of Common Stock issued prior to the Distribution Date will be issued with Rights.
     In the event that a Person becomes the beneficial owner of 15% or more of the then outstanding shares of Common Stock, each holder of a Right will, after the end of a redemption period referred to below, have the right to exercise the Right by purchasing, for an amount equal to the Purchase Price, Common Stock (or, in certain circumstances, cash, property or other securities of the Company) having a value equal to two times such amount. Notwithstanding any of the foregoing, following the occurrence of the events set forth in this paragraph, all Rights that are, or (under certain circumstances specified in the Rights Agreement) were, beneficially owned by any Acquiring Person will be null and void. However, Rights are not exercisable following the occurrence of the events set forth above until such time as the Rights are no longer redeemable by the Company as set forth below.
     For example, at a Purchase Price of $135 per Right, each Right not owned by an Acquiring Person (or by certain related parties) following an event set forth in the preceding paragraph would entitle its holder to purchase $270 worth of Common Stock (or other consideration, as noted above) for $135. Assuming that the Common Stock had a per share value of $67.50 at such time, the holder of each valid Right would be entitled to purchase four shares of Common Stock for $135.
     In the event that, at any time following the Stock Acquisition Date, (i) the Company is acquired in a merger or other business combination transaction, or (ii) 50% or more of the Company's assets or earning power is sold or transferred, each holder of a Right (except Rights which previously have been voided as set forth above) shall, after the expiration of the redemption period referred to below, have the right to receive, upon exercise, common stock of the acquiring company having a value equal to two times the Purchase Price of the Right (e.g., common stock of the acquiring company having a value of $270 for the $135 Purchase Price).
     At any time after a person or group of affiliated or associated persons becomes an Acquiring Person and prior to the acquisition by such person or group of 50% or more of the outstanding Common Stock, the Board of Directors of the Company may exchange the Rights (other than Rights owned by such person or group which have become void), in whole or in part, at an exchange ratio of one share of Common Stock (or, in certain circumstances, other equity securities of the
 
Company which are deemed by the Board of Directors of the Company to have the same value as shares of Common Stock) per Right (subject to adjustment).
     In general, the Board of Directors of the Company, may cause the Company to redeem the Rights in whole, but not in part, at any time during the period commencing on November 21, 2002 and ending on the tenth day following the Stock Acquisition Date (the "Redemption Period") at a price of $0.005 per Right (payable in cash, Common Stock or other consideration deemed appropriate by the Board of Directors of the Company). Under certain circumstances set forth in the Rights Agreement, the decision to redeem the Rights will require the concurrence of the two-thirds of Directors. After the Redemption Period has expired, the Company's right of redemption may be reinstated if an Acquiring Person reduces his beneficial ownership to 10% or less of the outstanding shares of Common Stock in a transaction or series of transactions not involving the Company and there are no other Acquiring Persons. Immediately upon the action of the Board of Directors of the Company ordering redemption of the Rights, the Rights will terminate and the only right of the holders of Rights will be to receive the $0.005 redemption price.
     Until a Right is exercised, the holder thereof, as such, will have no rights as a stockholder of the Company, including, without limitation, the right to vote or to receive dividends. While the distribution of the Rights will not be subject to federal taxation to stockholders or to the Company, stockholders may, depending upon the circumstances, recognize taxable income in the event that the Rights become exercisable for Common Stock (or other consideration) of the Company or for common stock of the acquiring company as set forth above.
     A copy of the Rights Agreement has been filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission as an Exhibit to a Current Report on Form 8-K. A copy of the Rights Agreement is available free of charge from the Company. This summary description of the Rights does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Rights Agreement.
 
Exhibit C
 
     This certifies that ________________, or its registered assigns, is the registered owner of the number of Rights set forth above, each of which entitles the owner thereof, subject to the terms, provisions and conditions of the Rights Agreement, dated as of November 21, 2002, as the same may be amended from time to time (the "Rights Agreement"), between Arbitron Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), and The Bank of New York, a New York banking corporation, as Rights Agent (the "Rights Agent"), to purchase from the Company at any time prior to November 21, 2012 at the office or offices of the Rights Agent designated for such purpose, or its successors as Rights Agent, one one-thousandth of a fully paid, non-assessable share of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock, par value $100 per share (the "Preferred Stock") of the Company, at a purchase price of $135 per one one-thousandth share (the "Purchase Price"), upon presentation and surrender of this Rights Certificate with the Form of Election to Purchase and related Certificate duly executed. The number of Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate (and the number of shares which may be purchased upon exercise thereof) set forth above, and the Purchase Price per share set forth above, are the number and Purchase Price as of , based on the Preferred Stock as constituted at such date, and are subject to adjustment upon the happening of certain events as provided in the Rights Agreement.
      
     From and after the occurrence of an event described in Section 11(a)(ii) of the Rights Agreement, the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate beneficially owned by (i) an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of any such Person (as such terms are defined in the Rights Agreement), (ii) a transferee of any such Acquiring Person, Associate or Affiliate, or (iii) under certain circumstances specified in the Rights Agreement, a transferee of a person who, concurrently with or after such transfer, became an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of an Acquiring Person shall become null and void and no holder hereof shall have any right with respect to such Rights from and after the occurrence of such Section 11(a)(ii) Event.
     The Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate shall not be exercisable, and shall be void so long as held, by a holder in any jurisdiction where the requisite qualification to the issuance to such holder, or the exercise by such holder, of the Rights in such jurisdiction shall not have been obtained or be obtainable.
     As provided in the Rights Agreement, the Purchase Price and the number and kind of shares of Preferred Stock or other securities, which may be purchased upon the exercise of the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate are subject to modification and adjustment upon the happening of certain events, including Triggering Events (as such term is defined in the Rights Agreement).
 
     This Rights Certificate is subject to all of the terms, provisions and conditions of the Rights Agreement, which terms, provisions and conditions are hereby incorporated herein by reference and made a part hereof and to which Rights Agreement reference is hereby made for a full description of the rights, limitations of rights, obligations, duties and immunities hereunder of the Rights Agent, the Company and the holders of the Rights Certificates, which limitations of rights include the temporary suspension of the exercisability of such Rights under the specific circumstances set forth in the Rights Agreement. Copies of the Rights Agreement are on file at the above-mentioned office of the Rights Agent and are also available upon written request to the Rights Agent.
     This Rights Certificate, with or without other Rights Certificates, upon surrender at the office or offices of the Rights Agent designated for such purpose, may be exchanged for another Rights Certificate or Right Certificates of like tenor and date evidencing Rights entitling the holder to purchase a like aggregate number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock as the Rights evidenced by the Rights Certificate or Rights Certificates surrendered shall have entitled such holder to purchase. If this Rights Certificate shall be exercised in part, the holder shall be entitled to receive upon surrender hereof another Rights Certificate or Rights Certificates for the number of whole Rights not exercised.
     Subject to the provisions of the Rights Agreement, the Rights evidenced by this Certificate may be redeemed by the Company at its option at a redemption price of $0.005 per Right at any time prior to the earlier of the close of business on (i) the tenth day following the Stock Acquisition Date, and (ii) the Final Expiration Date (as defined in the Rights Agreement). Under certain circumstances set forth in the Rights Agreement, the decision to redeem shall require the concurrence of two-thirds of the Directors. After the expiration of the redemption period, the Company's right of redemption may be reinstated if the Acquiring Person reduces its beneficial ownership to 10% or less of the outstanding shares of Common Stock in a transaction or series of transactions not involving the Company, and such reinstatement is approved by the Company's Board of Directors.
     At any time after a person becomes an Acquiring Person and prior to the acquisition by such person of 50% or more of the outstanding Common Stock, the Board of Directors of the Company may exchange the Rights (other than Rights owned by such Acquiring Person which have become void), in whole or in part, at an exchange ratio of one share of Common Stock (or, in certain circumstances, other equity securities of the Company which are deemed by the Company's Board of Directors to have the same value as shares of Common Stock) per Right (subject to adjustment).
     No fractional shares of Preferred Stock will be issued upon the exercise of any Right or Rights evidenced hereby (other than fractions which are integral
 
multiples of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock, which may, at the election of the Company, be evidenced by depositary receipts), but in lieu thereof a cash payment will be made, as provided in the Rights Agreement.
     No holder of this Rights Certificate, as such, shall be entitled to vote or receive dividends or be deemed for any purpose the holder of shares of Preferred Stock or of any other securities of the Company which may at any time be issuable on the exercise hereof, nor shall anything contained in the Rights Agreement or herein be construed to confer upon the holder hereof, as such, any of the rights of a stockholder of the Company or any right to vote for the election of directors or upon any matter submitted to stockholders at any meeting thereof, or to give or withhold consent to any corporate action, or to receive notice of meetings or other actions affecting stockholders (except as provided in the Rights Agreement), or to receive dividends or subscription rights, or otherwise, until the Right or Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate shall have been exercised as provided in the Rights Agreement.
     This Rights Certificate shall not be valid or obligatory for any purpose until it shall have been countersigned by an authorized signatory of the Rights Agent.
 
     WITNESS the facsimile signature of the proper officers of the Company.
Dated as of _________,  _____
Countersigned:
Dated as of________________, _____
THE BANK OF NEW YORK, as rights agent
By:____________________________ Authorized Signatory
 
(To be executed by the registered holder if such holder desires to transfer the Rights Certificate.)
FOR VALUE RECEIVED _________________________________________________________________________________ hereby sells, assigns and transfers unto ______________________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________________________________________________ (Please print name and address of transferee)
______________________________________________________________________________________________________ this Rights Certificate, together with all right, title and interest therein, and does hereby irrevocably constitute and appoint __________________ Attorney, to transfer the within Rights Certificate on the books of the within-named Company, with full power of substitution.
Dated:____________,   ____
Signature Guaranteed:
 
     The undersigned hereby certifies by checking the appropriate boxes that:
     (1)  this Rights Certificate [ ] is [ ] is not being sold, assigned and transferred by or on behalf of a Person who is or was an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of any such Person (as such terms are defined pursuant to the Rights Agreement);
     (2)  after due inquiry and to the best knowledge of the undersigned, it [ ] did [ ] did not acquire the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate from any Person who is, was or subsequently became an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of any such Person.
Dated:____________,  ____
Signature Guaranteed:
 
     The signature to the foregoing Assignment and Certificate must correspond to the name as written upon the face of this Rights Certificate in every particular, without alteration or enlargement or any change whatsoever.
 
     (To be executed if the registered holder desires to exercise Rights represented by the Rights Certificate.)
To:          _________________________
     The undersigned hereby irrevocably elects to exercise _______________ Rights represented by this Rights Certificate to purchase the shares of Preferred Stock issuable upon the exercise of the Rights (or such other securities of the Company or of any other person which may be issuable upon the exercise of the Rights) and requests that certificates for such shares be issued in the name of and delivered to:
(Please print name and address)
Please insert social security or other identifying number: _____________________
     If such number of Rights shall not be all the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate, a new Rights Certificate for the balance of such Rights shall be registered in the name of and delivered to:
Please insert social security or other identifying number: _____________________
Dated:____________,  ____
Signature Guaranteed:
 
     The undersigned hereby certifies by checking the appropriate boxes that:
     (1)  the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate [ ] are [ ] are not being exercised by or on behalf of a Person who is or was an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of any such Person (as such terms are defined in the Rights Agreement);
     (2)  after due inquiry and to the best knowledge of the undersigned, it [ ] did [ ] did not acquire the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate from any Person who is, was or became an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of any such Person.
Dated:____________,  ____
Signature Guaranteed:
 
     The signature to the foregoing Election to Purchase and Certificate must correspond to the name as written upon the face of this Rights Certificate in every particular, without alteration or enlargement or any change whatsoever.

 
Exhibit 99.2
Press Release
Arbitron Inc. Board Adopts Stockholder Rights Plan
NEW YORK (BUSINESS WIRE)  November 21, 2002  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that its Board of Directors has adopted a Stockholder Rights Plan in which preferred stock purchase rights will be granted as a dividend at the rate of one right for each share of Common Stock held of record as of the close of business on December 9, 2002.
The Rights Plan, which is similar to plans adopted by more than 2,200 publicly-traded companies, is designed to deter coercive or unfair takeover tactics. The Rights Plan will assist the Company's Board of Directors in dealing with any future actions taken by hostile entities which attempt to deprive the Company and its stockholders of the opportunity to obtain the most attractive price for their shares.
In implementing the Rights Plan, the Board has declared a dividend of one right for each outstanding share of the Company's Common Stock. Each right initially would entitle the holder thereof to purchase one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock. One one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock is intended to be approximately the economic equivalent of one share of Common Stock. The rights will expire on November 21, 2012.
Commenting on the Rights Plan, Steve Morris, president and chief executive officer, Aribitron Inc., said, "Through the adoption of this new Rights Plan, the Board of Directors has taken a significant step towards protecting the long-term value of the Company for the stockholders. As a result of this new plan, potential acquirers will be encouraged to engage the Board of Directors prior to any takeover attempt and the Board will have increased leverage should any such negotiations occur."
The Company noted that adoption of the plan was not made in response to any specific attempt by any person or entity to acquire Arbitron or its shares, and Arbitron is not aware of any current efforts to do so.
Initially, the rights are represented by the Company's Common Stock certificates and are not exercisable. The rights will be exercisable only if a person or group in the future becomes the beneficial owner of 15% or more of Arbitron's Common Stock or commences, or publicly announces an intention to commence, a tender or exchange offer which would result in its ownership of 15% or more of the Common Stock. The exercise price is $135.00 (one hundred thirty-five dollars). Ten days after a public announcement that a person or group has become the beneficial owner of 15% or more of the Common Stock, all holders of rights, other than the acquiring person or group, would be entitled to purchase Common Stock of the Company upon the payment of the exercise price at one-half of the then-current market price. If the Company is acquired in a merger, or 50% or more of the Company's assets are sold in one or more related transactions, each right would entitle the holder thereof to purchase common stock of the acquiring company at half of the then-current market price of such common stock.
At any time after a person or group becomes the beneficial owner of 15% or more of the Common Stock and prior to the acquisition by such person or group of 50% or more of the outstanding Common Stock, the Company's Board of Directors may
 
exchange one share of Common Stock for each right, other than rights held by the acquiring person or group. The Board generally may redeem the rights at any time until ten days following the public announcement that a person or group has acquired beneficial ownership of 15% or more of the outstanding Common Stock. The redemption price is $0.005 per right.
Details of the Rights Plan will be mailed to all stockholders of the Company.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. Arbitron Webcast Services measures the audiences of audio and video content on the Internet, commonly known as webcasts. The Company is developing the Portable People Meter, a new technology for radio, TV and cable ratings.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 800 full-time employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU Media Measurement & Information, Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper, outdoor and online industries.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this release that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from the information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
 
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on Form 10-K, which discussion is incorporated herein by reference.
The forward-looking statements contained in this release speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
Contact:


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20021218130907.txt.gz
TIME:20021218130907
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:  
(212) 887-1300
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
 
Item 5.     
Other Events
     As previously announced, on November 21, 2002, the Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") adopted a Stockholder Rights Plan. In connection with the Stockholder Rights Plan, a right to purchase one one-thousandth of a share of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock of the Company was distributed for each outstanding share of the Company's common stock held of record on December 9, 2002 (the "Record Date"). On or about December 17, 2002, the Company mailed to stockholders of record on the Record Date a Summary of the Stockholder Rights Plan (the "Summary").
     The Company's cover letter, dated December 13, 2002, and the Summary are attached hereto as Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2, respectively, and are incorporated herein by reference. A copy of the Stockholder Rights Plan was previously filed as an exhibit to the Company's Form 8-K Current Report dated November 21, 2002.
 
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
[Letterhead of Arbitron Inc.]
December 13, 2002
Dear Stockholder:
Your Board of Directors is pleased to announce that it adopted a Stockholder Rights Plan (the "Plan") on November 21, 2002 to further protect your rights and investment in Arbitron Inc. (the "Company"). The Stockholder Rights Plan is designed to protect all stockholders of the Company against hostile acquirors who may seek to take advantage of the Company and its stockholders through coercive or unfair tactics aimed at gaining control of the Company without paying all stockholders of the Company a full and fair price. As part of this Plan, a special type of dividend has been declared on the capital stock of the Company in the form of a distribution of rights. The enclosed summary description describes the principal features of the Plan. I urge you to read the summary carefully and keep it with your stock records as it contains important information.
The rights are not intended to prevent a fair and equitable takeover of the Company and will not do so. However, the rights should discourage any effort to acquire the Company in a manner or on terms not approved by the Board of Directors. The rights are designed to deal with the serious problem of a potential acquiror using coercive or unfair tactics to deprive the Company's Board of Directors of any real opportunity to determine the future of the Company and to realize the full potential value of your investment in the Company.
The distribution of rights will not in any way alter the financial strength of the Company or interfere with its business plans. The distribution will not change the way in which you can currently trade the Company's shares and will not be dilutive or affect reported per share results. While the distribution of the rights will not be taxable either to you or to the Company, stockholders may, depending on their individual circumstances, recognize taxable income should the rights become exercisable. As explained in further detail in the enclosed Summary of Rights, the rights will only become exercisable if certain events occur. You do not need to take any current action with respect to your shares.
More than 2,200 publicly-traded companies have adopted stockholder rights plans similar to the one adopted by the Company. The Board is aware that some argue that such plans could deter legitimate acquisition proposals. Your Board, assisted by the Company's investment banking and legal advisors, carefully considered these arguments and concluded that such arguments are speculative and do not justify denying stockholders the protection which the rights afford against abusive takeover tactics. Among other things, the Board considered third party studies which suggested that rights plans do not prevent takeovers, and that companies protected by rights plans received premiums higher than companies without such plans in takeover contests.
Our overriding objective is to preserve and enhance the Company's value for all stockholders. In declaring the rights dividend, your Board of Directors has expressed its confidence in the Company's future and its determination that you be given every opportunity to participate fully in that future.
 
Enclosure
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.2
     The Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc., a Delaware Corporation (the "Company"), has declared a dividend distribution of one right ("Right") for each outstanding share of common stock (the "Common Stock") of the Company. The distribution is payable to stockholders of record on December 9, 2002. Each Right, when exercisable, entitles the registered holder to purchase from the Company one one-thousandth of a share of Series B Junior Participating Preferred Stock ("Preferred Stock") at a price of $135 per one one-thousandth share (the "Purchase Price"), subject to adjustment. The description and terms of the Rights are set forth in a Rights Agreement (the "Rights Agreement") between the Company and The Bank of New York, as Rights Agent (the "Rights Agent").
     Initially, the Rights will be attached to all certificates representing shares of Common Stock then outstanding, and no separate certificates evidencing the Rights will be distributed. The Rights will separate from the Common Stock and a distribution of Rights Certificates (as defined below) will occur upon the earlier to occur of (i) 10 days following a public announcement that a person or group of affiliated or associated persons (an "Acquiring Person") has acquired, or obtained the right to acquire, beneficial ownership of 15% or more of the outstanding shares of Common Stock (the "Stock Acquisition Date") or (ii) 10 business days (or such later date as the Board of Directors of the Company may determine) following the commencement of, or the first public announcement of the intention to commence, a tender offer or exchange offer the consummation of which would result in the beneficial ownership by a person of 15% or more of the outstanding shares of Common Stock (the earlier of such dates being called the "Distribution Date").
     Until the Distribution Date, (i) the Rights will be evidenced by the Common Stock certificates, and will be transferred with and only with the Common Stock certificates, (ii) new Common Stock certificates issued after December 9, 2002 upon transfer or new issuance of the Common Stock will contain a notation incorporating the Rights Agreement by reference, and (iii) the surrender for transfer of any certificates for Common Stock outstanding will also constitute the transfer of the Rights associated with the Common Stock represented by such certificate.
     The Rights are not exercisable until the Distribution Date and will expire at the close of business on November 21, 2012, unless earlier redeemed or exchanged by the Company as described below.
     As soon as practicable following the Distribution Date, separate certificates evidencing the Rights ("Rights Certificates") will be mailed to holders of record of the Common Stock as of the close of business on the Distribution Date and, thereafter, the separate Rights Certificates alone will evidence the Rights. Except as otherwise determined by the Board of Directors of the Company, only shares of Common Stock issued prior to the Distribution Date will be issued with Rights.
     In the event that a Person becomes the beneficial owner of 15% or more of the then outstanding shares of Common Stock, each holder of a Right will, after the end of a redemption period referred to below, have the right to exercise the Right by purchasing, for an amount equal to the Purchase Price, Common Stock (or, in certain circumstances, cash, property or other securities of the Company) having a value equal to two times such amount. Notwithstanding any of the foregoing, following the occurrence of the events set forth in this paragraph, all Rights that are, or (under certain circumstances specified in the Rights Agreement) were, beneficially owned by any Acquiring Person will be null and void. However, Rights are not exercisable following the occurrence of the events set forth above until such time as the Rights are no longer redeemable by the Company as set forth below.
     For example, at a Purchase Price of $135 per Right, each Right not owned by an Acquiring Person (or by certain related parties) following an event set forth in the preceding paragraph would
 
entitle its holder to purchase $270 worth of Common Stock (or other consideration, as noted above) for $135. Assuming that the Common Stock had a per share value of $67.50 at such time, the holder of each valid Right would be entitled to purchase four shares of Common Stock for $135.
     In the event that, at any time following the Stock Acquisition Date, (i) the Company is acquired in a merger or other business combination transaction, or (ii) 50% or more of the Company's assets or earning power is sold or transferred, each holder of a Right (except Rights which previously have been voided as set forth above) shall, after the expiration of the redemption period referred to below, have the right to receive, upon exercise, common stock of the acquiring company having a value equal to two times the Purchase Price of the Right (e.g., common stock of the acquiring company having a value of $270 for the $135 Purchase Price).
     At any time after a person or group of affiliated or associated persons becomes an Acquiring Person and prior to the acquisition by such person or group of 50% or more of the outstanding Common Stock, the Board of Directors of the Company may exchange the Rights (other than Rights owned by such person or group which have become void), in whole or in part, at an exchange ratio of one share of Common Stock (or, in certain circumstances, other equity securities of the Company which are deemed by the Board of Directors of the Company to have the same value as shares of Common Stock) per Right (subject to adjustment).
     In general, the Board of Directors of the Company, may cause the Company to redeem the Rights in whole, but not in part, at any time during the period commencing on November 21, 2002 and ending on the tenth day following the Stock Acquisition Date (the "Redemption Period") at a price of $0.005 per Right (payable in cash, Common Stock or other consideration deemed appropriate by the Board of Directors of the Company). Under certain circumstances set forth in the Rights Agreement, the decision to redeem the Rights will require the concurrence of the two-thirds of Directors. After the Redemption Period has expired, the Company's right of redemption may be reinstated if an Acquiring Person reduces his beneficial ownership to 10% or less of the outstanding shares of Common Stock in a transaction or series of transactions not involving the Company and there are no other Acquiring Persons. Immediately upon the action of the Board of Directors of the Company ordering redemption of the Rights, the Rights will terminate and the only right of the holders of Rights will be to receive the $0.005 redemption price.
     Until a Right is exercised, the holder thereof, as such, will have no rights as a stockholder of the Company, including, without limitation, the right to vote or to receive dividends. While the distribution of the Rights will not be subject to federal taxation to stockholders or to the Company, stockholders may, depending upon the circumstances, recognize taxable income in the event that the Rights become exercisable for Common Stock (or other consideration) of the Company or for common stock of the acquiring company as set forth above.
     A copy of the Rights Agreement has been filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission as an Exhibit to a Current Report on Form 8-K. A copy of the Rights Agreement is available free of charge from the Company. This summary description of the Rights does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Rights Agreement.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20030123165259.txt.gz
TIME:20030123165259
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: 
 
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
  
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:
(212) 887-1300
  
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
 
                                  On January 23, 2003, we issued a press release reporting 2002 fourth quarter and year end financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

 
[ARBITRON LOGO]
Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
Arbitron Inc. Phone: 212-887-1408 bill.walsh@arbitron.com
Company Contact: Bill Walsh, CFO
KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215 todd@kcsa.com
Investor Relations Contact: Todd Fromer
Arbitron Inc. 212-887-1314 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Media contact: Thom Mocarsky
For Immediate Release
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2002.
NEW YORK, January 23, 2002 
For the fourth quarter 2002, the Company reported revenue of $57.8 million, an increase of 12.3% over revenue of $51.4 million during the fourth quarter of 2001. Earnings before interest and taxes (EBIT) for the quarter were $14.1 million, compared with EBIT of $9.3 million during the comparable period last year. Net income for the quarter was $6.5 million, compared with $2.6 million for the fourth quarter of 2001.
Cost and expenses for the quarter increased by 4.0%, from $46.0 million in 2001 to $47.9 million in 2002. Interest expense declined $1.4 million from 2001 as a result of significant reductions in debt between the two periods.
Net income per share for the quarter increased to $0.21 (diluted), compared with $0.09 (diluted) during the comparable period last year. Effective January 1, 2002, the Company discontinued the amortization of goodwill in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. Had the company been required to adopt this accounting treatment effective as of January 1, 2001, net income and net income per share (diluted) for the three months ended December 31, 2001 would have been $3.0 million and $0.10, respectively.
Arbitron Inc.  142 West 57th Street  New York, New York 10019  www.arbitron.com
 
For the year ended December 31, 2002, revenue was $249.8 million, an increase of 9.8% over the $227.5 million reported for the same period last year. EBIT was $85.7 million, compared to $75.5 million in 2001, an increase of 13.5% for the year. Net income for the year was $42.8 million or $1.42 per share (diluted), compared with $36.5 million, or $1.24 per share (diluted), last year. Had the discontinuation of amortization of goodwill been in effect in 2001, net income and net income per share (diluted) for the year ended December 31, 2001 would have been $38.2 million and $1.29, respectively.
Commenting on the results for the fourth quarter, Stephen Morris, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron, said, "We ended 2002 by meeting our financial goals for revenue and profitability, a good performance in a difficult year for the media industry. Our basic ratings, Scarborough and software services all made good progress in the quarter."
"In the fourth quarter, our RADAR network radio measurement service expanded its roster of clients while staying on track in its transition to a more efficient and more effective sampling system," said Mr. Morris. "Our acquisition of a license to the Measurecast Webcast ratings technology, also in the fourth quarter, should allow us to maintain a leadership position in the webcast ratings arena while keeping a tighter grip on costs."
"Working with Nielsen Media Research, we continue to make progress on the refinements to the Portable People Meter (PPM) that the U.S. ratings marketplace requested. And on our own, we have made solid progress marketing the PPM in the international arena and have broadened our exploration of new applications for this promising technology," said Mr. Morris.
"Given our progress and the overall strength of the core ratings business, we believe Arbitron remains well positioned to deliver solid growth in revenue and profitability while making measured investments in markets with long-term growth potential," Mr. Morris concluded.
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. EST on January 23rd to discuss its fourth quarter and year-end results as well as financial guidance for 2003. The Company invites you to listen to the call at the following telephone number: 1-800-683-1535. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, and
www.ccbn.com
www.streetevents.com
www.arbitron.com
 
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. Arbitron Webcast Services measures the audiences of audio and video content on the Internet, commonly known as webcasts. The Company is developing the Portable People Meter, a new technology for radio, TV and cable ratings.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 800 full-time employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU Media Measurement & Information, Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper, outdoor and online industries.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this release that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans" or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from the information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on Form 10-K, which discussion is incorporated herein by reference.
www.arbitron.com
 
The forward-looking statements contained in this release speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
www.arbitron.com
 
www.arbitron.com
 
www.arbitron.com
 
www.arbitron.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20030224171914.txt.gz
TIME:20030224171914
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: 
Table of Contents
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: (212) 887-1300
Table of Contents
Item 7.   Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits.
Item 9.   Regulation FD Disclosure.
               On February 24, 2003, we issued a letter to shareholders which was a summary of Arbitron's January 23, 2002 conference call and recaps some highlights concerning Arbitron's performance. A copy of the letter to shareholders is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, and is incorporated herein by reference.
Table of Contents
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents

 
Exhibit 99.1
February 24, 2003
Dear Shareholders & Friends,
On January 23, 2003, Arbitron announced its 2002 fourth quarter and year-end financial results. This memorandum, made available to our investors, serves as a summary of the conference call and recaps some highlights concerning the Company's performance.
Q4 Earnings Highlights
Fourth quarter revenues increased by 12.3 percent, from $51.4 in 2001 to $57.8 million in 2002. This resulted in a growth rate of 11.2 percent, after normalizing for the renewal of the Clear Channel contract. Fourth quarter EBIT rose 52.4 percent to $14.1 million. Net income for the quarter rose to $6.5 million or $0.21 per fully diluted share, compared with $2.6 million or $0.09 per fully diluted share in the fourth quarter of 2001. Cost of revenue climbed $3.4 million to $27.7 million, an increase of 14.2 percent over last year's fourth quarter.
s
2002 Year End Highlight
For the year ended 2002, Arbitron posted revenues of $249.8 million, representing an 9.8 percent increase over last year. After adjusting for the RADAR acquisition, the growth rate for the year was 7.8 percent, which was slightly lower than the Company's historical average. The Company reported net income of $42.8 million or $1.42 per fully diluted share, up from $36.5 million or $1.24 per fully diluted share for 2001. EBITDA for the year rose to $90.1 million, an increase of $9.5 million or 11.8 percent over last year. Capital spending for 2002 was $6.8 million.
PPM
Arbitron has made continued progress toward its proposed joint venture with Nielsen Media Research. Both companies have established a highly collaborative research plan in
 
Philadelphia and are working toward resolving the response rate issue, which is one of the subjects identified for more study in the current market trial in Philadelphia. In addition, various research, engineering and business issues are being worked on as the joint venture discussions continue. Thus far, no specific end date has been announced.
PPM has been making strides internationally due in part to the emerging relationship between Arbitron and Taylor Nelson Sofres, which has generated business in Singapore, the Netherlands, and Belgium. Arbitron has placed bids in other countries as well as a result of the relationship.
PPM is currently being commercialized for use in Quebec in 2003 through a license agreement with BBM in Canada. Additionally, two other international research firms have signed evaluation licenses for Arbitron's PPM technology.
Arbitron is also exploring "non-ratings marketing applications" for the Portable People Meter. The PPM's single-source, multi-media database can be linked with product purchase databases in order to provide cause and effect analyses of media spending. More about this application of PPM technology will be discussed in the coming months.
PPM costs increased one million dollars in 2002. Expenses for the year related to PPM increased by $2 million. Research and development expenses remained flat for PPM.
RADAR network
The RADAR network radio division is finishing its planned conversion from a telephone-based measurement system to one based on the radio listening diaries that Arbitron currently uses in its local market measurement services. This conversion has significantly increased sample sizes for national and network radio customers.
e
2003 Guidanc
The Company projects revenues ranging from 7 to 9 percent, assuming a moderate economic improvement for the media industry. Earnings per share are estimated to be $1.60 to $1.64 for the year as the Company continues to pay down debt and reduce interest.
 
Issues To Be Addressed In 2003
Arbitron is looking forward to renewing agreements with Infinity, ABC and other groups. In addition, the Company is working to improve the way in which it reflects the language preference of Hispanics in its diary samples and radio ratings reports. Arbitron will work to balance the concerns of all segments of the radio marketplace as it improves its radio measurement services in this important area.
This recap memorandum contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this memorandum that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans" or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from the information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on Form 10-K, which discussion is incorporated herein by reference.
The forward-looking statements contained in this memorandum speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20030304171441.txt.gz
TIME:20030304171441
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:   (212) 887-1300
 
Item 7.   Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits.
Item 9.   Regulation FD Disclosure.
                On March 4, 2003, the attached presentation was given at the Bear Stearns 16th Annual Media, Entertainment and Information Conference. A copy of the presentation is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
               Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20030320150357.txt.gz
TIME:20030320150357
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:
(212) 887-1300
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
 
Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure.
     As stated in its press release dated January 23, 2003, in order to finalize its Balance Sheet as of December 31, 2002, the Company was in the process of determining the amount of its state net operating loss carryforwards as of the date of the reverse spin-off from Ceridian Corporation. The Company has completed the determination and recorded the deferred tax benefit for state net operating loss carryforwards. This adjustment resulted in an increase in deferred income taxes of $5.7 million, a decrease in other liabilities of $0.9 million and a reduction in stockholders' deficit of $6.6 million. There was no impact on the Company's previously reported net income for the year and three months ended December 31, 2002.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20030417083536.txt.gz
TIME:20030417083536
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
Item 7.    Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits
(c)            Exhibits.
Item 9.    Regulation FD Disclosure
                 The following information is being furnished pursuant to Item 9 and Item 12 of Form 8-K.
                 On April 17, 2003, we issued a press release reporting 2003 first quarter financial results, the current status of our relationship with Nielsen Media Research, Inc. and the commercial deployment of the Portable People Meter (PPM) and our marketing of the PPM in international markets. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. The information furnished in this Item 9 and Item 12 shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to liabilities of that Section or Sections 11 and 12(a)(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, whether made before or after the date hereof, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
                 Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
"We have worked hard to keep our core servicesratings, Scarborough and softwareas valuable, revenue-generating resources for our broadcaster, cable, agency and advertiser customers. In the first quarter, we increased our efforts to train those who work on the buy and sell sides of the media industry. Our continuing goal is to help our subscribers get the maximum value from the dollars they invest in our services," said Mr. Morris.
"We also strengthened our relationship with Nielsen Media Research, Inc., our potential joint venture partner for commercial deployment of the Portable People Meter (PPM) in the United States," continued Mr. Morris. "Last month, Arbitron and Nielsen announced an expansion of our agreement that increases the financial involvement and commitment of resources from Nielsen in a joint research program for the PPM. Already, we are in the field with studies that are designed to further develop the PPM system as a local market ratings service. Even as we work with Nielsen, we are also developing a number of other applications for the Portable People Meter technology that we could implement on our own."
"In international markets, we continue to make progress marketing the PPM. While the Australian radio industry has deferred a decision regarding electronic measurement, IBOPE, the leading South American media research firm, has just concluded a successful evaluation of the PPM encoding technology in Brazil. Mdiamtrie, the leading media research firm in France, has just signed an agreement for a two-year evaluation of the PPM in Paris," Mr. Morris concluded.
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. ET on April 17th to discuss its first quarter results and other relevant matters. To listen to the call, dial the following telephone number: 1-888-262-9189. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: , and
www.arbitron.com
www.ccbn.com
www.streetevents.com
About Arbitron
ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data.
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE:
www.arbitron.com
 
Arbitron Internet Broadcast Services measures the audiences of audio and video content on the Internet, commonly known as webcasts. The Company is developing the Portable People Meter, a new technology for radio, television and cable ratings.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 825 full-time employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper, outdoor and online industries.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on Form 10-K.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date of this release, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
www.arbitron.com
 
Note: The Company has reclassified certain data in the 2002 Consolidated Statement of Income to conform with the 2003 presentation.
(1)  EBITDA is presented as supplemental information that management of Arbitron believes may be useful to some investors in evaluating Arbitron because it is widely used as a measure of evaluating a company's operating performance, as well as to evaluate its operating cash flow. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization to net income. EBITDA should not be considered a substitute either for net income, as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBITDA is not calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. A reconciliation from EBITDA to cash flow from operations follows:
www.arbitron.com
 
(2)  Prior to the spin-off from Ceridian Corporation, Arbitron distributed its earnings to Ceridian. Those distributions, together with a $250 million distribution made to Ceridian on the date of the spin-off, gave rise to the stockholders' deficit. Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt were used by Arbitron to make the $250 million distribution.
www.arbitron.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20030717093241.txt.gz
TIME:20030717093241
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
Arbitron Inc. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:
(212) 887-1300
 
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
 
     The following information is being furnished pursuant to Item 9 and Item 12 of Form 8-K.
     On July 17, 2003, we issued a press release reporting 2003 second quarter financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. The information furnished in this Item 9 and Item 12 shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to liabilities of that Section or Sections 11 and 12(a)(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, whether made before or after the date hereof, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

 
Press Release
Arbitron Inc. Phone: 212-887-1408 bill.walsh@arbitron.com
Company Contact: Bill Walsh, CFO
KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215 todd@kcsa.com
Investor Relations Contact: Todd Fromer
Arbitron Inc. 212-887-1314 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Media contact: Thom Mocarsky
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the quarter ended June 30, 2003.
NEW YORK, July 17, 2003 
For the second quarter 2003, the Company reported revenue of $61.4 million, an increase of 8.7% over revenue of $56.5 million during the second quarter of 2002. Net income for the quarter was $8.0 million, compared with $6.6 million for the second quarter of 2002. Earnings before interest and taxes (EBIT) for the quarter were $16.1 million, compared with EBIT of $15.0 million during the comparable period last year.
Costs and expenses for the second quarter increased by 8.8%, from $44.8 million in 2002 to $48.8 million in 2003. Interest expense for the quarter declined 26.2%, from $4.3 million in 2002 to $3.2 million in 2003, due to reductions in debt between the two periods.
Net income per share for the second quarter 2003 increased to $0.26 (diluted), compared with $0.22 (diluted) during the comparable period last year.
In the second quarter 2003, Arbitron reduced its long-term debt by $20.0 million to $135.0 million.
For the six months ended June 30, 2003, revenue was $132.8 million, an increase of 8.5% over the same period last year. Net income for the six months was $24.1 million or $0.80
Arbitron Inc.  -  142 West 57th Street  -  New York, New York 10019  -  www.arbitron.com
 
per share (diluted), compared with $20.9 million or $0.70 per share (diluted) last year. EBIT was $46.0 million, compared to $42.6 million in 2002.
Commenting on the results for the second quarter, Stephen Morris, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron, said, "In the second quarter of 2003, we once again met our goals for revenue and profitability. At the same time, we continued to make our planned investments in the quality of our core services and in our initiatives for long-term growth."
"Our efforts to commercialize the Portable People Meter (PPM) system continued on several fronts throughout the quarter," said Mr. Morris. "Working closely with Nielsen Media Research, we are running tests in Philadelphia to improve how we recruit consumers for PPM ratings surveys. In addition to the tests we are operating with Nielsen, Arbitron is operating its own proof-of-concept' studies in Philadelphia to demonstrate how the Portable People Meter can be used in other types of marketing research services. We also continue to promote the PPM in international markets."
"In the second quarter, we unveiled, as planned, a comprehensive program designed to enhance the quality of our radio ratings service across a number of key areas including response rates," Mr. Morris said. "These anticipated investments will help us meet the expressed requests of our customers who count on the reliability of our audience estimates for the buying and selling of radio advertising."
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. ET on July 17th to discuss its second quarter results and other relevant matters. To listen to the call, dial the following telephone number: 1-888-889-2497. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: ,  
www.arbitron.com
www.ccbn.com
and www.streetevents.com
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. Arbitron Internet Broadcast Services measures the audiences of audio and video content on
www.arbitron.com
 
the Internet, commonly known as webcasts. The Company is developing the Portable People Meter, a new technology for radio, television and cable ratings.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 825 full-time employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper, outdoor and online industries.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date of this release, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
www.arbitron.com
 
Note: The Company has reclassified certain data in the 2002 Consolidated Statement of Income to conform to the 2003 presentation.
www.arbitron.com
 
Note: The Company has reclassified certain data in the 2002 Consolidated Statement of Income to conform to the 2003 presentation.
www.arbitron.com
 
Note: Earnings before interest and income taxes (EBIT) and EBITDA are widely used measures of operating performance. They are presented as supplemental information that management of Arbitron believes is useful to investors to evaluate the company's results because they exclude certain items that are not directly related to the company's core operating performance. EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income taxes, depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered as substitutes either for net income, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBITDA is not calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
www.arbitron.com
 
(1) Prior to the spin-off from Ceridian Corporation, Arbitron distributed its earnings to Ceridian. Those distributions, together with a $250 million distribution made to Ceridian on the date of the spin-off, gave rise to the stockholders' deficit. Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt were used by Arbitron to make the $250 million distribution.
www.arbitron.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20031021084320.txt.gz
TIME:20031021084320
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:
(212) 887-1300         
 
On October 21, 2003, we issued a press release reporting 2003 third quarter financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. The information furnished in this Item 12, including Exhibit 99.1, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to liabilities of that Section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, whether made before or after the date hereof, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

 
     
Positive preliminary result in key Portable People Meter research test announced
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the quarter ended September 30, 2003.
NEW YORK, October 21, 2003 
For the third quarter 2003, the Company reported revenue of $75.3 million, an increase of 8.3% over revenue of $69.6 million during the third quarter of 2002. Net income for the quarter was $17.0 million, compared with $15.4 million for the third quarter of 2002. Earnings before interest and taxes (EBIT) for the quarter were $30.6 million, compared with EBIT of $29.0 million during the comparable period last year.
Costs and expenses for the third quarter increased by 10.5%, from $39.9 million in 2002 to $44.1 million in 2003. Interest expense for the quarter declined 29.3%, from $4.1 million in 2002 to $2.9 million in 2003, due to reductions in the Company's long-term debt.
Net income per share for the third quarter 2003 increased to $0.55 (diluted), compared with $0.51 (diluted) during the comparable period last year.
In the third quarter 2003, Arbitron reduced its long-term debt by $20.0 million from $135.0 to $115.0 million.
Arbitron Inc.  -  142 West 57 Street  -  New York, New York 10019  -  www.arbitron.com
th
 
For the nine months ended September 30, 2003, revenue was $208.1 million, an increase of 8.4% over the same period last year. Net income for the nine months increased 13.4% to $41.1 million or $1.35 per share (diluted), compared with $36.3 million or $1.21 per share (diluted) last year. EBIT was $76.6 million, compared to $71.6 million in 2002.
Commenting on the results for the third quarter, Stephen Morris, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron, said, "Our financial results for the quarter were substantially in line with our expectations and we remain on track to meet our guidance for the year. We have also made significant progress in our previously announced efforts to enhance the quality of our core services and to develop our opportunities for long-term growth."
"Our programs to address response rates in our radio diary service are yielding positive results. We saw a small but gratifying increase in response rates in the top ten markets during the Summer 2003. These are the markets where we are currently focusing our efforts to get more consumers to say "yes" to the Arbitron survey process," said Mr. Morris. "Going forward, our new interviewing center has already gone on line in time for the Fall 2003 survey and we are actively working on the next steps in our long range plan for expanding the scope of our response rate efforts."
Progress in Portable People Meter Test to Improve Response Rates
In a separate release, the Company is announcing positive, preliminary results in a key research test for its new television, cable and radio audience measurement system: the Portable People Meter (PPM).
"For the better part of a year, Arbitron, Nielsen and the industry have pointed to response rates as a key issue that had to be resolved before the Portable People Meter could be deployed as a means of measuring audiences for radio as well as broadcast and cable television in local markets," said Mr. Morris "We said that Arbitron would work with Nielsen to devise techniques that could increase the percentage of consumers who would accept our invitation to take part in PPM surveys and then carry the meters on a continuing basis."
"I am pleased to report that Arbitron and Nielsen have developed two separate methods that have increased the rate at which we can recruit consumers for PPM surveys. Initial results are in line with what Nielsen would expect when recruiting a new set-top meter panel, which is what we both wanted to achieve. While the response rate test needs to be
www.arbitron.com
 
completed so that we can confirm that acceptable rates can be sustained over time, and the turnover rates also remain acceptable, Arbitron is confident that we have found a solution for this key issue."
"We will continue our work with Nielsen Media Research on the expanded research program for the Portable People Meter. At the same time, Arbitron will also continue to develop the marketing applications of PPM and work to expand the list of international companies that have chosen the PPM as their solution for media measurement in the 21st century," concluded Mr. Morris.
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. ET on October 21st to discuss its third quarter results and other relevant matters. To listen to the call, dial the following telephone number: (888) 694-4728. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: and
www.arbitron.com,
www.ccbn.com
www.streetevents.com
About Arbitron
ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. Arbitron Internet Broadcast Services measures the audiences of audio and video content on the Internet, commonly known as webcasts. The Company is developing the Portable People Meter, a new technology for radio, television and cable ratings.
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE:
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 825 full-time employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper, outdoor and online industries.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this document that are not
www.arbitron.com
 
     
historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on Form 10-K.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date of this release, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
www.arbitron.com
 
Note: The Company has reclassified certain data in the 2002 Consolidated Statement of Income to conform to the 2003 presentation.
www.arbitron.com
 
Note: The Company has reclassified certain data in the 2002 Consolidated Statement of Income to conform to the 2003 presentation.
www.arbitron.com
 
Note: Earnings before interest and income taxes (EBIT) and EBITDA are widely used measures of operating performance. They are presented as supplemental information that management of Arbitron believes is useful to investors to evaluate the Company's results because they exclude certain items that are not directly related to the Company's core operating performance. EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income taxes, depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered as substitutes either for net income, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBITDA is not calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
www.arbitron.com
 
(1)  Prior to the spin-off from Ceridian Corporation, Arbitron distributed its earnings to Ceridian. Those distributions, together with a $250 million distribution made to Ceridian on the date of the spin-off, gave rise to the stockholders' deficit. Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt were used by Arbitron to make the $250 million distribution.
www.arbitron.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20040127075334.txt.gz
TIME:20040127075334
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
                On January 27, 2004, we issued a press release reporting 2003 fourth quarter and year end financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. The information furnished in this Item 12, including Exhibit 99.1, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to liabilities of that Section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, whether made before or after the date hereof, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

 
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2003.
NEW YORK, January 27, 2004 
For the fourth quarter 2003, the Company reported revenue of $65.4 million, an increase of 13.2% over revenue of $57.8 million during the fourth quarter of 2002. Costs and expenses for the fourth quarter increased by 13.8%, from $47.9 million in 2002 to $54.5 million in 2003. Earnings before interest and taxes (EBIT) for the quarter were $16.1 million, compared with EBIT of $14.1 million during the comparable period last year.
Interest expense for the quarter declined 30.8%, from $3.8 million in 2002 to $2.6 million in 2003, due to reductions in the Company's long-term debt.
Net income for the quarter was $8.7 million, compared with $6.5 million for the fourth quarter of 2002. Net income per share for the fourth quarter 2003 increased to $0.28 (diluted), compared with $0.21 (diluted) during the comparable period last year.
In the fourth quarter 2003, Arbitron reduced its long-term debt by $10 million from $115 million to $105 million.
 
Arbitron Inc.  -  142 West 57th Street  -  New York, New York 10019  -  www.arbitron.com
 
For the year ended December 31, 2003, revenue was $273.6 million, an increase of 9.5% over revenues of $249.8 million for the same period last year. EBIT for 2003 increased 8.1% to $92.7 million compared with $85.7 million in 2002. Net income for 2003 increased 16.6% to $49.9 million compared with $42.8 million in 2002. Net income per share (diluted) in 2003 was $1.63 per share (diluted), compared with $1.42 per share (diluted) last year.
Commenting on the results for the year, Stephen Morris, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron, said: "2003 was a very demanding year. Yet despite the challenges, we still met the guidance for revenue, EBIT and earnings per share that we established at the beginning of the year. Equally important, we worked hard to help our customers weather a difficult year and prepare to take advantage of an improving environment in 2004."
"We also devoted considerable time, effort and money to our programs to enhance the willingness of the public to take part in our surveys, and continued our effort to improve how we manage the representation of Hispanics by their language preference. Working with Nielsen Media Research, we developed promising new sample recruitment techniques that make it possible for us to take the first steps toward deploying a second Portable People Meter demonstration market in the United States in 2004." said Mr. Morris.
"We also enhanced the technical capabilities of the Portable People Meter system and continued to explore new ways to use that technology to meet the needs of marketers and advertisers," said Mr. Morris.
"Given the overall strength of the core ratings business, we believe Arbitron remains well positioned to deliver solid growth in revenue and profitability in 2004. At the same time, we expect to continue our investments in new services that have long-term growth potential for our company and for our customers," Mr. Morris concluded.
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. ET on January 27th to discuss its fourth quarter results and other relevant matters. To listen to the call, dial the following telephone number: (877)-780-2271. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: , and
www.arbitron.com
www.ccbn.com
www.streetevents.com
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor
 
www.arbitron.com
 
advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. Arbitron Internet Broadcast Services measures the audiences of audio and video content on the Internet, commonly known as webcasts. The Company is developing the Portable People Meter, a new technology for radio, television and cable ratings.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 850 full-time employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper, outdoor and online industries.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on Form 10-K.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date of this release, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
 
www.arbitron.com
 
 
www.arbitron.com
 
 
www.arbitron.com
 
Note: Earnings before interest and income taxes (EBIT) and EBITDA are widely used measures of operating performance. They are presented as supplemental information that management of Arbitron believes is useful to investors to evaluate the Company's results because they exclude certain items that are not directly related to the Company's core operating performance. EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income taxes, depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered as substitutes either for net income, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBITDA is not calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
 
www.arbitron.com
 
(1) Prior to the spin-off from Ceridian Corporation in March 2001, Arbitron distributed its earnings to Ceridian. Those distributions, together with a $250 million distribution made to Ceridian on the date of the spin-off, gave rise to the stockholders' deficit. Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt were used by Arbitron to make the $250 million distribution.
 
www.arbitron.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20040225145234.txt.gz
TIME:20040225145234
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:
(212) 887-1300
 
 
Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure
     On February 25, 2004, the attached presentation was given at the R.W. Baird Business Solutions Conference. A copy of the presentation is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, and is incorporated herein by reference.
     The information contained in this report on Form 8-K, including Exhibit 99.1, shall not be deemed "filed" with the Securities and Exchange Commission nor incorporated by reference in any registration statement filed by the Company under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20040420085314.txt.gz
TIME:20040420085314
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:
(212) 887-1300
 
 
     On April 20, 2004, we issued a press release reporting 2004 first quarter financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. The information furnished in this Item 12, including Exhibit 99.1, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to liabilities of that Section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, whether made before or after the date hereof, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the quarter ended March 31, 2004.
NEW YORK, April 20, 2004 
For the first quarter 2004, the Company reported revenue of $76.6 million, an increase of 7.3 percent over revenue of $71.4 million during the first quarter of 2003. Costs and expenses for the first quarter increased by 7.7 percent, from $40.2 million in 2003 to $43.4 million in 2004. Earnings before interest and taxes (EBIT) for the quarter were $31.9 million, compared with EBIT of $29.9 million during the first quarter last year.
Interest expense for the quarter declined 32.8 percent, from $3.6 million in the first quarter 2003 to $2.4 million in the first quarter 2004, due to reductions in the Company's long-term debt.
Net income for the quarter was $18.1 million, compared with $16.1 million for the first quarter of 2003, an increase of 12.3 percent. Net income per share for the first quarter 2004 increased to $0.57 (diluted), compared with $0.53 (diluted) during the comparable period last year.
In the first quarter 2004, Arbitron reduced its long-term debt by $20 million from $105 million to $85 million.
Arbitron Inc.  -  142 West 57th Street  -  New York, New York 10019  -  www.arbitron.com
 
Commenting on the results for the quarter, Stephen Morris, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron, said: "In the first quarter 2004, we again met our goals for revenue and profitability. Our core radio ratings business remains strong, and we continued our investments in new services that have long-term growth potential for our company and for our customers. In particular, we acquired Marketing Resources Plus, a leading provider of media buying software systems to local and regional advertising agencies for broadcast and print media."
"Throughout the quarter, we also made steady progress across all three facets of our Portable People Meter (PPM) development strategythe market research application, our international ratings efforts and U.S. local market ratings services.
SM
"We are continuing our work toward the development of a national marketing research panel based on the PPM. Our goal is a service that would enhance the accountability of ad-supported media and enable marketers to gain a better understanding of consumer media behavior.
"Arbitron is also making steady progress with the PPM in international markets. Expanded trials of the PPM are now under way in France, Portugal and Norway, and we are laying the groundwork for more trials in the United Kingdom later this year.
"And, we continue to work closely with leading radio and agency executives who asked us to demonstrate our upgraded PPM methodology in a second U.S. market that has a significant Hispanic and African-American population. We remain focused on achieving our goals for PPM through our proposed Houston demonstration and are working to garner additional support."
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00AM ET on April 20 to discuss its first-quarter results and other relevant matters. To listen to the call, dial the following telephone number: (877) 780-2271. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: , and .
www.arbitron.com
www.ccbn.com
www.streetevents.com
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing
 
application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company is developing the Portable People Meter, a new technology for radio, television and cable ratings.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 900 full-time employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper, outdoor and online industries.
PPM is a service market of Arbitron Inc.
SM
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
 
 
Note: Earnings before interest and income taxes (EBIT) and earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA) are widely used measures of operating performance. They are presented as supplemental information that management of Arbitron believes is useful to investors to evaluate the Company's results because they exclude certain items that are not directly related to the Company's core operating performance. EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income taxes, depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered as substitutes either for net income, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
 
(1) Prior to the spin-off from Ceridian Corporation in March 2001, Arbitron distributed its earnings to Ceridian. Those distributions, together with a $250 million distribution made to Ceridian on the date of the spin-off, gave rise to the stockholders' deficit. Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt were used by Arbitron to make the $250 million distribution.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20040625163656.txt.gz
TIME:20040625163656
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:
(212) 887-1300          
 
Item 5. Other Events.
     On June 24, 2004, Arbitron Inc. acknowledged that Infinity Broadcasting Corporation, a division of Viacom Inc., had issued a press release stating that Infinity had elected not to renew its agreements with Arbitron for radio ratings and other services effective with the release of the Spring 2004 survey.
     Taking into account the non-renewal by Infinity Broadcasting to Arbitron ratings and other services as current agreements expire, Arbitron expects that its 2004 revenues will be approximately $11.7 million lower than previously anticipated.
     The non-renewal does not affect second quarter revenues.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20040722084951.txt.gz
TIME:20040722084951
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
     The following information is being furnished pursuant to Item 12 of Form 8-K.
     On July 22, 2004, we issued a press release reporting 2004 second quarter financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. The information furnished in this Item 12, including Exhibit 99.1, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to liabilities of that Section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, whether made before or after the date hereof, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

 
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2004.
NEW YORK, July 22, 2004 
For the second quarter 2004, the Company reported revenue of $65.1 million, an increase of 5.9% over revenue of $61.4 million during the second quarter of 2003. Costs and expenses for the second quarter increased by 8.8%, from $48.8 million in 2003 to $53.1 million in 2004. Earnings before interest and taxes (EBIT) for the quarter were $15.9 million, compared with EBIT of $16.1 million during the comparable period last year.
Interest expense for the second quarter declined 39.3%, from $3.2 million in 2003 to $1.9 million in 2004, due to reductions in debt between the two periods.
Net income for the quarter was $8.6 million, compared with $8.0 million for the second quarter of 2003.
Net income per share for the second quarter 2004 increased to $0.27 (diluted), compared with $0.26 (diluted) during the comparable period last year.
In the second quarter 2004, Arbitron reduced its long-term debt by $10.0 million to $75.0 million.
Arbitron Inc.  -  142 West 57 Street  -  New York, New York 10019  -  www.arbitron.com
th
 
For the six months ended June 30, 2004, revenue was $141.7 million, an increase of 6.7% over the same period last year. EBIT was $47.8 million, compared to $46.0 million in 2003. Net income for the six months was $26.7 million or $0.85 per share (diluted), compared with $24.1 million or $0.80 per share (diluted) during the comparable period last year.
Commenting on the results for the second quarter, Stephen Morris, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron, said: "In the second quarter of 2004, we met our goal for profitability in an environment that remained challenging for our customers and for our company. At the same time, we were able to continue our planned investments in the quality of our core services and in our initiatives for long-term growth."
"Our efforts to commercialize the Portable People Meter (PPM) system made progress this quarter," said Mr. Morris. "Arbitron and Nielsen recently completed a critical milestone in the PPM research program: developing two methods of improving the rate at which U.S. consumers participate in the PPM survey. Arbitron will use one of these methods when we begin recruiting consumers for our demonstration of the PPM in Houston."
"On the international front, BBM Canada, the industry consortium for audience ratings, yesterday adopted the Arbitron Portable People Meter as the official ratings system for buying and selling commercial airtime on French-language television in Quebec and Montreal. Starting September 2004, BBM will use Arbitron PPMs in place of push-button people meters to measure audiences for French-language television in the province of Quebec."
"I'm also encouraged by the progress we are seeing behind the scenes in the remaining PPM research studies with Nielsen, and in our pilot tests for the National Marketing Panel," said Mr. Morris.
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. ET on July 22nd to discuss its second quarter results and other relevant matters. To listen to the call, dial the following telephone number: 877-780-2271. The conference call can also be accessed from outside the United States by dialing 973-582-2737. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor
www.arbitron.com
 
advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audiences and marketing information. The Company is developing the PPM, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1700 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
PPM
SM
is a mark of Arbitron Inc.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
www.arbitron.com
 
www.arbitron.com
 
www.arbitron.com
 
Note: Earnings before interest and income taxes (EBIT) and earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA) are widely used measures of operating performance. They are presented as supplemental information that management of Arbitron believes is useful to investors to evaluate the Company's results because they exclude certain items that are not directly related to the Company's core operating performance. EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income taxes, depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered as substitutes either for net income, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
www.arbitron.com
 
(1) Pursuant to an IRS Revenue Procedure issued during the second quarter of 2004, Arbitron has changed its tax method of accounting for advanced payments. As a result of the method change, income taxes of approximately $22.2 million paid in 2003 are being applied toward the Company's 2004 tax liability. The deferred tax assets no longer include a temporary difference for deferred revenue. The remaining balance of recoverable income taxes is approximately $10.6 million as of June 30, 2004.
(2) Prior to the spin-off from Ceridian Corporation, Arbitron distributed its earnings to Ceridian. Those distributions, together with a $250 million distribution made to Ceridian on the date of the spin-off, gave rise to the stockholders' deficit. Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt were used by Arbitron to make the $250 million distribution.
www.arbitron.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20040819141304.txt.gz
TIME:20040819141304
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:
(212) 887-1300
 
Item 5. Other Events.
               On August 17, 2004, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release announcing that Arbitron and Infinity Broadcasting Corporation, a division of Viacom Inc. reached an agreement for a multi-year contract including radio ratings and other related services for Infinity Broadcasting's 185 stations.
               This agreement, which is effective immediately, gives Infinity Broadcasting access to Arbitron quarterly radio ratings in 42 markets including the Spring 2004 survey.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20041019093400.txt.gz
TIME:20041019093400
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
     Date of report (Date of earliest event reported)
October 19, 2004
     Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition
     On October 19, 2004, we issued a press release reporting 2004 third quarter financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

 
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2004.
NEW YORK, October 19, 2004 
For the third quarter 2004, the Company reported revenue of $82.0 million, an increase of 8.8% over revenue of $75.3 million during the third quarter of 2003. Costs and expenses for the third quarter increased by 7.0%, from $44.1 million in 2003 to $47.1 million in 2004. Earnings before interest and taxes (EBIT) for the quarter were $33.7 million, compared with EBIT of $30.6 million during the comparable period last year.
Interest expense for the third quarter declined 36.7%, from $2.9 million in 2003 to $1.8 million in 2004, due to reductions in debt between the two periods.
Income tax expense was lower in the third quarter primarily because reserves for tax contingencies were reversed during the quarter due to guidance in a recent IRS notice. Also, the valuation allowance on deferred tax assets related to state net operating loss carryforwards was reduced due to higher actual and projected taxable income in the applicable states. The net benefit of these changes during the quarter was $4.2 million. Finally, the effective tax rate for 2004, exclusive of these discrete events, has been reduced from 39.0% to 38.5% to reflect a reduction in the expected state tax rate.
Net income for the quarter, which includes the $4.2 million impact of the tax adjustments, was $24.2 million, compared with $17.0 million for the third quarter of 2003 and net
Arbitron Inc.  -  142 West 57 Street  -  New York, New York 10019  -  www.arbitron.com
th
 
income per share for the third quarter 2004 increased to $0.77 (diluted), compared with $0.55 (diluted) during the comparable period last year.
In the third quarter 2004, Arbitron paid the final $25 million outstanding on its revolving credit facility and reduced its long-term debt to $50 million.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2004, revenue was $223.6 million, an increase of 7.5% over the same period last year. EBIT was $81.5 million, compared to $76.6 million in 2003. Net income for the nine months was $50.9 million or $1.62 per share (diluted), compared with $41.1 million or $1.35 per share (diluted) during the comparable period last year.
Commenting on the results for the third quarter, Stephen Morris, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron, said: "In the third quarter of 2004, we achieved our profit targets while continuing planned investments in our core business and in our long-term growth initiatives."
"In the third quarter, we reached an agreement with Infinity Broadcasting Corporation for a multi-year contract including radio ratings and other related services for its 185 stations. We continued to enhance our RADAR radio network ratings service and saw our customers announce several new RADAR-rated networks."
"We also reported on the positive outcomes of the three collaborative tests of the Portable People Meter (PPM) that we conducted with Nielsen Media Research and we began recruiting consumers for our 2005-2006 demonstration of the enhanced PPM system in Houston."
"We are particularly excited about the agreement we announced with VNU to jointly explore the possible development of a new, national marketing research service that would collect multi-media and purchase information from a common sample of consumers."
"Procter & Gamble is already cooperating with Arbitron and VNU so that the proposed service would properly address the needs of marketers. At the annual conference of the Association of National Advertisers earlier this month, Procter and Gamble said that they looking to this proposed marketing panel to provide a better understanding of consumer exposure to advertising on multiple media and the link to shopping/purchase behavior."
"As we explore this opportunity, our three companies are seeking the support of a broad cross section of marketers including other package goods providers, retailers, automotive
Arbitron Inc.  -  142 West 57 Street  -  New York, New York 10019  -  www.arbitron.com
th
 
marketers, telecommunications providers, financial services firms, as well as many other companies," said Mr. Morris.
Arbitron will host a conference call on October 19th at 10:00 a.m. ET to discuss its third quarter results and other relevant matters. The Company invites you to listen to the call by dialing 877-780-2271. The conference call can also be accessed from outside the United States by dialing 973-582-2737. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
A replay of the call will be available from 12:00 p.m. on October 19, 2004 through 11:59 p.m. on October 26, 2004. To access the replay, please call 877-519-4471 in the United States or 973-341-3080 outside the United States. To access the replay, users will need to enter the following code: 5229030
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has developed the Portable People Meter (PPM), a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by its research and technology organization, located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1,700 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
RADAR is a registered trademark of Arbitron Inc.
PPM is a service mark of Arbitron Inc.
SM
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this document that are not
Arbitron Inc.  -  142 West 57 Street  -  New York, New York 10019  -  www.arbitron.com
th
 
historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on Form 10-K.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
Arbitron Inc.  -  142 West 57 Street  -  New York, New York 10019  -  www.arbitron.com
th
 
Arbitron Inc.  -  142 West 57 Street  -  New York, New York 10019  -  www.arbitron.com
th
 
Arbitron Inc.  -  142 West 57 Street  -  New York, New York 10019  -  www.arbitron.com
th
 
Arbitron Inc.  -  142 West 57 Street  -  New York, New York 10019  -  www.arbitron.com
th
 
Arbitron Inc.  -  142 West 57 Street  -  New York, New York 10019  -  www.arbitron.com
th


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20041122120851.txt.gz
TIME:20041122120851
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
Mr. Kenneth F. Gorman, a member of the Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company"), has informed the Company that he does not intend to stand for re-election when his term expires at the Companys annual stockholders meeting in May 2005. To the Companys knowledge, Mr. Gormans decision is not the result of any disagreement with the Company on any matter relating to the Companys operations, policies or practices. Mr. Gorman has served as a director of the Company since its spin-off from Ceridian Corporation in March 2001. Mr. Gorman indicated that he was informing the Company of his decision at this time so that the Company would have adequate time to identify and nominate a replacement director to fill the vacancy that would otherwise be created as a result of his retirement.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20041229155237.txt.gz
TIME:20041229155237
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On December 27, 2004, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") entered into new multi-year license agreements with Clear Channel Communications, Inc. ("Clear Channel") to provide radio ratings and software services for Clear Channels radio stations through the Companys Fall 2008 survey. Clear Channel is the Companys largest ratio ratings subscriber and represented approximately 21% of the Companys revenue in 2003. Clear Channels existing licensing agreements with the Company were scheduled to expire on December 31, 2004. Under the terms of the new agreements, the Company will provide its Radio Market Report Service, including the Companys Radio Market Report, Maximi$er, Arbitrends, PD Advantage, National Regional Database, Sample Surcharge, Retail Direct and Tapscan Software services, to Clear Channel. These services will be provided under this agreement through December 31, 2008. The annual payment for these services is expected to be approximately $56.1 milli on in 2005, based on the number of radio stations currently owned by Clear Channel. In addition, Clear Channel renewed its existing contracts for the Scarborough service and other local market consumer information services through December 31, 2008. The annual payment for these services is expected to be approximately $3.3 million in 2005, based on the number of radio stations currently owned by Clear Channel. Clear Channel also renewed its existing agreements with the Company for Premiere Radio Networks, including Radar, Nationwide and Radio Market Report, Maximi$er, Arbitrends and PD Advantage services, which were scheduled to expire on December 31, 2005 (or December 31, 2006 in the case of Radar), through December 31, 2008. The annual payment for these services is expected to be approximately $3.7 million in 2006, based on the number of stations currently owned by Clear Channel. A copy of the press release announcing the contracts is filed herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated b y reference herein. Copies of the contracts entered into between the Company and Clear Channel will be filed as exhibits to the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ending December 31, 2004.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated December 27, 2004.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

PRESS INFORMATION
Contact: Thom Mocarshy
Arbitron Inc. 212-887-1314 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK, DECEMBER 27, 2004 Arbitron Inc. (NYSE:ARB) announced today that it has signed a four-year license agreement with Clear Channel Radio to provide the company with radio ratings and software services through the Fall 2008 survey.
The agreement also renews existing contracts for Scarborough and other local market consumer information services. Clear Channel also renewed its agreements with Arbitron for Premiere Radio Networks, KMG Consolidated Radio Sales and Clear Channel Traffic.
Clear Channel is Arbitron's largest radio ratings subscriber and represented approximately 21% of Arbitron's revenue in 2003.
"We are pleased that Clear Channel has renewed its agreements with Arbitron. We look forward to continuing to provide our largest customer with the information services that will help it grow its revenue and manage its radio business," said Steve Morris, president and CEO, Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has also developed the Portable People Meter (PPM), a new technology for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by its research and technology organization, located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1,700 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
PPM
SM
is a service mark of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron and Clear Channel reach ratings agreement
Page of 2
December 27, 2004
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
 - 
renew all or part of contracts with large customers as they expire;
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
Arbitron Inc.
 - 
142 West 57 Street
th
 - 
New York, New York 10019
 - 
www.arbitron.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20050107172449.txt.gz
TIME:20050107172449
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
EXPLANATORY NOTE This Form 8-K/A amends the Current Report on Form 8-K filed by Arbitron Inc. ("Arbitron" or the "Company") on December 27, 2004 to correct computational errors that were made in the calculation of the annual payments expected to be made by Clear Channel Communications, Inc. ("Clear Channel") under new agreements for various Arbitron services in 2005 and for radio networks in 2006, and to clarify the aggregate amount of payments expected to be made by Clear Channel to Arbitron under all agreements (including existing contracts that remain in place) in 2005. Clear Channel is the Companys largest subscriber and represented approximately 21% of the Companys revenue in 2003. Certain of Clear Channels existing licensing agreements with the Company were scheduled to expire on December 31, 2004. On December 27, 2004, the Company entered into new multi-year license agreements with Clear Channel to provide radio ratings and software services for Clear Channe ls radio stations and networks through the Companys Fall 2008 survey. Under the terms of the new agreements, the Company will provide its Radio Market Report Service, including the Companys Radio Market Report, Maximi$er, Arbitrends, PD Advantage, National Regional Database, Sample Surcharge, Retail Direct and Tapscan Software services, to Clear Channel. These services, which include new services as well as renewals of existing services, will be provided under agreements that generally expire on December 31, 2008. The annual payment for these services under the new agreements is expected to be approximately $54.0 million in 2005, based on the radio stations currently owned by Clear Channel. Clear Channel also renewed its existing contracts for the Scarborough services. These services, which include new services as well as renewals of existing services, will be provided under agreements that expire on December 31, 2008. The annual payment for these services under the new agreements is expected to be approximately $3.4 million in 2005, based on the radio stations and networks currently owned by Clear Channel. In addition, Clear Channel has existing contracts for other services described in this Form 8-K/A that remain in place. The annual payment for these services under these existing contracts is expected to be approximately $4.5 million in 2005. As a result, the aggregate amount of all payments to be made by Clear Channel to Arbitron under all agreements is expected to be approximately $61.9 million in 2005, based on the radio stations, networks and national radio representative firm currently owned by Clear Channel. In addition, Clear Channel also renewed its existing agreements with the Company for its radio networks and national radio representative firm, including Radar, Nationwide and Radio Market Report, Maximi$er, Arbitrends and PD Advantage services, which were generally scheduled to expire on December 31, 2005 (or December 31, 2006, in the c ase of Radar). These services will be provided under agreements that generally expire on December 31, 2008. The annual payment for these services is expected to be approximately $4.1 million in 2006, based on the radio networks and national radio representative firm currently owned by Clear Channel. A copy of the press release announcing the contracts is filed herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein. Copies of the contracts entered into between the Company and Clear Channel will be filed as exhibits to the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ending December 31, 2004.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated December 27, 2004 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 99.1 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 27, 2004).
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20050125084215.txt.gz
TIME:20050125084215
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On January 25, 2005, we issued a press release reporting 2004 fourth quarter and year end financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated January 25, 2005.
This Form 8-K and the attached Exhibit are furnished to comply with Item 2.02 and Item 9.01 of Form 8-K. Neither this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit are to be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 (except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing).
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press Release
Arbitron Inc. Phone: 212-887-1408 bill.walsh@arbitron.com
Company Contact: Bill Walsh, CFO
KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215 todd@kcsa.com
Investor Relations Contact: Todd Fromer
Arbitron Inc. 212-887-1314 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Media contact: Thom Mocarsky
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2004.
NEW YORK, January 25, 2005 
For the fourth quarter 2004, the Company reported revenue of $72.9 million, an increase of 11.4% over revenue of $65.4 million during the fourth quarter of 2003. Costs and expenses for the fourth quarter increased by 13.9%, from $54.5 million in 2003 to $62.1 million in 2004. Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for the quarter were $16.9 million, compared with EBIT of $16.1 million during the comparable period last year. Interest expense for the quarter declined 35.1%, from $2.6 million in 2003 to $1.7 million in 2004, due to reductions in the Company's long-term debt.
Net income for the quarter was $9.6 million, compared with $8.7 million for the fourth quarter of 2003. Net income per share for the fourth quarter 2004 increased to $0.31 (diluted), compared with $0.28 (diluted) during the comparable period last year.
For the year ended December 31, 2004, revenue was $296.6 million, an increase of 8.4% over revenue of $273.6 million for 2003. EBIT for 2004 increased 6.2% to $98.4 million compared with $92.7 million in 2003. Net income for 2004 increased 21.4% to $60.6 million compared with $49.9 million in 2003. Net income per share (diluted) in 2004 was $1.92 per share (diluted), compared with $1.63 per share (diluted) last year.
The effective tax rate of 33.9 percent was lower in 2004 than the effective tax rate of 38.5 percent in 2003 because certain reserves for tax contingencies were reversed in third quarter of 2004 due to guidance in an IRS notice. Also in the third quarter of 2004, the valuation allowance on the deferred tax assets related to state net operating loss carryforwards was reduced due to higher actual and projected taxable income in the applicable states. The net benefit of these changes was $4.2 million or $0.13 per diluted share in 2004.
During 2004, Arbitron reduced its long-term debt by $55 million from $105 million as of December 31, 2003 to $50 million as of December 31, 2004.
Management comment on 2004 results
Stephen Morris, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron, made the following comments on 2004 results:
"2004 was yet another challenging year for Arbitron and for the industries we serve. Nevertheless, we were able to increase our revenue and our earnings.
"We signed long term contracts with a number of companies, including our two largest customers. This will allow us to focus our energies on helping our customers take advantage of the opportunities that we believe the advertising environment will present in 2005."
"In 2004, we completed the first two waves of recruitment in our demonstration of the Portable People Meter (PPM) in Houston. As of the first of the new year, we have outfitted more than 1,000 persons in Houston with the most advanced media ratings technology available today. We are recruiting a high-quality, representative panel of consumers for this demonstration of a PPM ratings service. To date, our recruiting success has also been consistent across key ethnic and racial groups. We are confident that the completed PPM panel will reflect the diversity of the Houston marketplace when we begin reporting demonstration data in the second half of 2005."
"Along with VNU, we have also been aggressively canvassing the advertiser marketplace on behalf of Project Apollo,' our joint exploration of a new, national marketing research service that would use the PPM to collect media exposure and AC Nielsen Homescan technology to track purchase information from a common sample of consumersWe are also putting the finishing touches on a five-month pilot test of the methodology that underlies the Project Apollo' concept. To date, the pilot is yielding promising results in terms of the success criteria we laid out for the program," said Mr. Morris.
.
"Given the current state of the radio advertising economy and the continued stability of our core ratings business, we believe that Arbitron is in a good position to deliver continued growth in revenue and profitability in 2005. At the same time, we are able to continue our investments in current services and in new services that have long-term growth potential for our company and for our customers," Mr. Morris concluded.
Company Outlook for 2005
Arbitron is also providing guidance on its earnings outlook for the full year and first quarter 2005.
Arbitron expects year-end 2005 revenue to increase between 5 percent and 7 percent over year-end 2004 revenues. Earnings Before Interest & Taxes (EBIT) for 2005 is expected to increase between 1.5 percent and 3.5 percent. Net Income is expected to be unchanged to 2 percent higher in 2005. Earnings Per Share (diluted) for the year ending December 31, 2005 is expected to be between $1.93 and $1.97 based on the Company's estimate of the average number of diluted shares outstanding in 2005.
Commenting on the 2005 outlook, William Walsh, chief financial officer, said: "There are two factors that should be considered when evaluating our 2005 earnings per share outlook in light of our 2004 performance. The year end 2005 outlook takes into account the requirement to expense stock options which is scheduled to take effect in July. We estimate that requirement will reduce our 2005 earnings per share by $0.08 per diluted share. Arbitron's 2004 results were improved by $0.13 per share (diluted) due to a reversal of reserves for tax contingencies and a change in the valuation allowance on the deferred tax assets related to state net operating loss carryforwards that took place in the third quarter 2004."
For the first quarter 2005, Arbitron expects revenue to increase between 2.5 percent and 4 percent compared to the first quarter of last year. Earnings Per Share (diluted) for the first quarter 2005 is expected to be between $0.59 and $0.61 versus $0.57 in the first quarter 2004.
Earnings conference call: schedule and access
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. ET on January 25th to discuss its fourth quarter results and other relevant matters. To listen to the call, dial the following telephone number: 877-780-2271.
The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: , and
www.arbitron.com
www.ccbn.com
www.streetevents.com
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies, online radio and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has also developed the Portable People Meter (PPM), a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by its research and technology organization, located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1,700 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date of this release, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
(1) The effective tax rate was lower in 2004 than 2003 because of certain reserves for tax contingencies were reversed in third quarter of 2004 due to guidance in a recent IRS notice. Also in the third quarter of 2004, the valuation allowance on the deferred tax assets related to state net operating loss carryforwards was reduced due to higher actual and projected taxable income in the applicable states. The net benefit of these changes was $4.2 million. The effective tax rate for 2004, exclusive of the these discrete events, has been reduced from 39.0% to 38.5% to reflect a reduction in the expected state tax rate.
Note: Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) and earnings before interest, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA) are widely used measures of operating performance. They are presented as supplemental information that management of Arbitron believes is useful to investors to evaluate the Company's results because they exclude certain items that are not directly related to the Company's core operating performance. EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered as substitutes either for net income, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
(2) Pursuant to an IRS Revenue Procedure issued during the second quarter of 2004, Arbitron changed its tax method of accounting for advanced payments. As a result of the method change, income taxes of approximately $22 million paid in 2003 were applied toward the Company's 2004 tax liability. The deferred tax assets no longer include a temporary difference for deferred revenue.
(3) Prior to the spin-off from Ceridian Corporation in March 2001, Arbitron distributed its earnings to Ceridian. Those distributions, together with a $250 million distribution made to Ceridian on the date of the spin-off, gave rise to the stockholders' deficit. Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt were used by Arbitron to make the $250 million distribution.
Note: Earnings before interest and income taxes (EBIT) is a widely used measure of operating performance. EBIT guidance was given in the Arbitron fourth quarter 2004 earnings press release because the management of Arbitron believes it is useful to investors to evaluate the Company's projected results because it excludes certain items that are not directly related to the Company's core operating performance. EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBIT should not be considered as a substitute either for net income, as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20050202160410.txt.gz
TIME:20050202160410
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
Executive Officer Bonuses On January 27, 2005, the Compensation and Human Resources Committee (the "Committee") of the Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") met and made certain determinations that affect the bonuses for executive officers for 2004. The Committee previously established certain parameters for determining bonuses for executive officers for 2004. These parameters included achievement of various objective and subjective Company performance goals, as well as individual performance goals in certain circumstances. As a result of the Committees review and determination of the Companys 2004 performance in comparison to the goals established by the Committee, Mr. Steve Morris, the Companys chief executive officer, will be entitled to a bonus for 2004 in an amount equal to approximately 77% of his 2004 base salary, and Mr. Bill Walsh, the Companys chief financial officer, will be entitled to a bonus for 2004 in an amount equal to approximate ly 44% of his 2004 base salary. Bonuses for Mr. Owen Charlebois and Ms. Janice Giannini, two of the Companys other named executive officers, were established based on an assessment of their individual performance and the determination by the Committee of the Companys performance based on the goals previously established by the Committee, and as a result Mr. Charlebois will be entitled to a bonus for 2004 in an amount equal to approximately 51% of his 2004 base salary, and Ms. Giannini will be entitled to a bonus for 2004 in an amount equal to approximately 37% of her 2004 base salary. The bonus for Mr. Pierre Bouvard, the Companys other named executive officer, has not yet been determined. Appointment of New Chief Information Officer The Company announced that Scott Henry has been hired as the Companys new chief information officer. He replaces Janice Giannini, who left the Company effective December 31, 2004. Under the terms of Mr. Henrys off er letter, Mr. Henry will be paid an annual base salary of $225,000, plus an additional $15,000 per year in lieu of perquisites, and will be eligible to participate in the Companys long-term incentive compensation programs that are generally available to the Companys executive officers. He is guaranteed a target annual bonus payment for 2005 in an amount equal to 40% of his base salary. Mr. Henry also will receive a signing bonus in the amount of $30,000. It is anticipated that Mr. Henry will receive an initial grant of options to purchase at least 10,000 shares of common stock of the Company, although this grant is subject to approval by the Executive Compensation and Human Resources Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company. We may terminate Mr. Henrys employment at any time, with or without cause, but if the Company terminates Mr. Henrys employment within the first 18 months of employment for reasons other than for cause (such as in the case of fraud, mis representation, theft or embezzlement of company assets), death or disability, Mr. Henry will be entitled to receive severance in the amount of his annual base salary.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20050223094351.txt.gz
TIME:20050223094351
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
Arbitron Inc. is filing copies of the current forms of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreements to be used for grants under its 1999 Stock Incentive Plan. Copies of the current forms of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement, Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement for Annual Non-Employee Director Stock Option Grants, Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement for Initial Non-Employee Director Stock Option Grants and Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement for Non-Employee Director Stock Options in Lieu of Fees Grants are filed as Exhibit 10.1, Exhibit 10.2, Exhibit 10.3 and Exhibit 10.4, respectively, to this Current Report on Form 8-K and are incorporated herein by reference. In addition, a copy of the form of Deferred Stock Unit Agreement to be used for grants of deferred stock units under the 1999 Stock Incentive Plan is filed as Exhibit 10.5 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(a) Not applicable. (b) Not applicable. (c) Exhibits 10.1 Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement 10.2 Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement for Annual Non-Employee Director Stock Option Grants 10.3 Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement for Initial Non-Employee Director Stock Option Grants 10.4 Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement in Lieu of Fees Grants 10.5 Form of Deferred Stock Unit Agreement
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Exhibit 10.1
THIS AGREEMENT is entered into and effective as of (the "Date of Grant"), by and between Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") and (the "Optionee").
     
     
, 20
     
[Name]
A. The Company has adopted the Arbitron Inc. 1999 Stock Incentive Plan (as may be amended or supplemented, the "Plan") authorizing the Board of Directors of the Company, or a committee as provided for in the Plan (the Board or such a committee to be referred to as the "Committee"), to grant stock options to employees of the Company and its Subsidiaries (as defined in the Plan).
B. The Company desires to give the Optionee an inducement to acquire a proprietary interest in the Company and an added incentive to advance the interests of the Company by granting to the Optionee an option to purchase shares of common stock of the Company pursuant to the Plan.
Accordingly, the parties agree as follows:
1. .
Grant of Option
The Company hereby grants to the Optionee the right, privilege and option (the "Option") to purchase shares (the "Option Shares") of the Company's common stock, $0.50 par value (the "Common Stock"), according to the terms and subject to the conditions hereinafter set forth and as set forth in the Plan. The Option granted hereunder shall not be an incentive stock option within the meaning of Section 422 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code").
[Shares]
2. .
Option Exercise Price
The per share price to be paid by Optionee in the event of an exercise of the Option will be .
$
     
3. .
Duration of Option and Time of Exercise
3.1 . Except as provided in Sections 3.2 and 3.3 hereof, the Option shall become exercisable with respect to one-third of the Option Shares on each of the first, second and third anniversaries of the Date of Grant. The foregoing rights to exercise the Option will be cumulative with respect to the Option Shares becoming exercisable on each such date, but in no event will the Option be exercisable after, and the Option will become void and expire as to all unexercised Option Shares at, 5:00 p.m. (Eastern Standard Time) on the anniversary of the Date of Grant (the "Time of Option Termination").
Initial Period of Exercisability
tenth
3.2 .
Termination of Employment
(a) . In the event the Optionee's employment with the Company and all Subsidiaries is terminated by reason of death, Disability (as defined in the Plan) or Retirement (as defined in the Plan), the Option will become immediately exercisable in full and remain exercisable until the Time of Option Termination.
Termination Due to Death, Disability or Retirement
(b) . In the event that the Optionee's employment with the Company and all Subsidiaries is terminated for any reason other than death, Disability or Retirement, or the Optionee is in the employ of a Subsidiary and the Subsidiary ceases to be a Subsidiary of the Company (unless the Optionee continues in the employ of the Company or another Subsidiary), all rights of the Optionee under the Plan and this Agreement will immediately terminate without notice of any kind, and the Option will no longer be exercisable; provided, however, that, if such termination is due to any reason other than termination by the Company or any Subsidiary for Cause (as defined in Section 9 of this Agreement), the Option will remain exercisable to the extent exercisable as of such termination for a period of three months after such termination (but in no event after the Time of Option Termination).
Termination for Reasons Other Than Death, Disability or Retirement
3.3 .
Change in Control
(a) . If a Change in Control (as defined in Section 9 of this Agreement) of the Company occurs, and the Option has been outstanding for at least two months, the Option will become immediately exercisable in full and will remain exercisable until the Time of Option Termination, regardless of whether the Optionee remains in the employ of the Company or any Subsidiary. In addition, if a Change in Control of the Company occurs, the Committee, in its sole discretion and without the consent of the Optionee, may determine that the Optionee will receive, with respect to some or all of the Option Shares, as of the effective date of any such Change in Control of the Company, cash in an amount equal to the excess of the Fair Market Value (as defined in the Plan) of such Option Shares immediately prior to the effective date of such Change in Control of the Company over the option exercise price per share of the Option.
Impact of Change in Control
(b) . Prior to a Change of Control, the Optionee will have no rights under this Section 3.3, and the Committee will have the authority, in its sole discretion, to rescind, modify or amend this Section 3.3 without the consent of the Optionee.
Authority to Modify Change of Control Provisions
4. .
Manner of Option Exercise
4.1 . This Option may be exercised by the Optionee in whole or in part from time to time, subject to the conditions contained in the Plan and in this Agreement, by delivery, in person, by facsimile or electronic transmission or through the mail, to the Company at its principal executive office in New York, New York (Attention: Corporate Secretary), of a written notice of exercise. Such notice must be in a form satisfactory to the Committee, must identify the Option, must specify the number of Option Shares with respect to which the Option is being exercised, and must be signed by the person or persons so exercising the Option. Such notice must be accompanied by payment in full of the total exercise price for the Option Shares to be purchased. In the event that the Option is being exercised, as provided by the Plan and Section 3.2 of this Agreement, by any person or persons other than the Optionee, the notice must be accompanied by appropriate proof of right of such person or persons to exercise the Option. If the Optionee retains the Option Shares purchased, as soon as practicable after the effective exercise of the Option, the Optionee will be recorded on the stock transfer books of the Company as the owner of the Option Shares purchased, and the Company will deliver to the Optionee one or more duly issued stock certificates evidencing such ownership.
Notice
4.2 . At the time of exercise of the Option, the Optionee must pay the total exercise price of the Option Shares to be purchased entirely in cash (including a check, bank draft or money order, payable to the order of the Company); provided, however, that the Committee, in its sole discretion and upon terms and conditions established by the Committee, may allow such payment to be made, in whole or in part, by tender of a full recourse promissory note or a Broker Exercise Notice (as such terms are defined in the Plan), or by a combination of such methods.
Payment
5. .
Rights and Restrictions of Optionee; Transferability
5.1 . Nothing in this Agreement will interfere with or limit in any way the right of the Company or any Subsidiary to terminate the employment of the Optionee at any time, nor confer upon the Optionee any right to continue in the employ of the Company or any Subsidiary at any particular position or rate of pay or for any particular period of time.
Employment
5.2 . The Optionee will have no rights as a stockholder unless and until all conditions to the effective exercise of the Option (including, without limitation, the conditions set forth in Sections 4 and 6 of this Agreement) have been satisfied and the Optionee has become the holder of record of such shares. No adjustment will be made for dividends or distributions with respect to the Option Shares as to which there is a record date preceding the date the Optionee becomes the holder of record of such Option Shares, except as may otherwise be provided in the Plan or determined by the Committee in its sole discretion.
Rights as a Stockholder
5.3 . Except pursuant to testamentary will or the laws of descent and distribution or as otherwise expressly permitted by the Plan, no right or interest of the Optionee in the Option prior to exercise may be assigned or transferred, or subjected to any lien, during the lifetime of the Optionee, either voluntarily or involuntarily, directly or indirectly, by operation of law or otherwise. The Optionee will, however, subject to applicable laws be entitled to designate a beneficiary to receive the Option upon such Optionee's death in the manner provided by the Plan, and, in the event of the Optionee's death, exercise of the Option (to the extent permitted pursuant to Section 3.2(a) of this Agreement) may be made by the Optionee's designated beneficiary.
Restrictions on Transfer
5.4 .
Restrictions Regarding Employment
(a) The Optionee agrees that he or she will not take any Adverse Actions (as defined below) against the Company or any Subsidiary at any time during the period that the Option is or may yet become exercisable in whole or in part or at any time before one year following the Optionee's termination of employment with the Company or any Subsidiary, whichever is later (the "Restricted Period"). The Optionee acknowledges that damages which may arise from a breach of this Section 5.4 may be impossible to ascertain or prove with certainty. Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement or the Plan to the contrary, in the event that the Company determines in its sole discretion that the Optionee has taken Adverse Actions against the Company or any Subsidiary at any time during the Restricted Period, in addition to other legal remedies which may be available, (i) the Company will be entitled to an immediate injunction from a court of competent jurisdiction to end such Adverse Action, without further proof of damage, (ii) the Committee will have the authority in its sole discretion to terminate immediately all rights of the Optionee under the Plan and this Agreement without notice of any kind, and (iii) the Committee will have the authority in its sole discretion to rescind the exercise of all or any portion of the Option to the extent that such exercise occurred within six months prior to the date the Optionee first commences any such Adverse Actions and require the Optionee to disgorge any profits (however defined by the Committee) realized by the Optionee relating to such exercised portion of the Option or any Option Shares issued or issuable upon such exercise. Such disgorged profits paid to the Company must be made in cash (including check, bank draft or money order) or, with the Committee's consent, shares of Common Stock with a Fair Market Value on the date of payment equal to the amount of such payment. The Company will be entitled to withhold and deduct from future wages of the Optionee (or from other amounts that may be due and owing to the Optionee from the Company or a Subsidiary) or make other arrangements for the collection of all amounts necessary to satisfy such payment obligation.
(b) For purposes of this Agreement, an "Adverse Action" will mean any of the following: (i) engaging in any commercial activity in competition with any part of the business of the Company or any Subsidiary as conducted during the Restricted Period for which the Optionee has or had access to trade secrets and/or confidential information; (ii) diverting or attempting to divert from the Company or any Subsidiary any business of any kind, including, without limitation, interference with any business relationships with suppliers, customers, licensees, licensors, clients or contractors; (iii) participate in the ownership, operation or control of, be employed by, or connected in any manner with any person or entity which solicits, offers or provides any services or products similar to those which the Company or any Subsidiary offers to its customers or prospective customers, (iv) making, or causing or attempting to cause any other person or entity to make, any statement, either written or oral, or convey any information about the Company or any Subsidiary that is disparaging or that in any way reflects negatively on the Company or any Subsidiary; or (v) engaging in any other activity that is hostile, contrary or harmful to the interests of the Company or any Subsidiary, including, without limitation, influencing or advising any person who is employed by or in the service of the Company or any Subsidiary to leave such employment or service to compete with the Company or any Subsidiary or to enter into the employment or service of any actual or prospective competitor of the Company or any Subsidiary, influencing or advising any competitor of the Company or any Subsidiary to employ to otherwise engage the services of any person who is employed by or in the service of the Company or any Subsidiary, or improperly disclosing or otherwise misusing any trade secrets or confidential information regarding the Company or any Subsidiary.
(c) Should any provision of this Section 5.4 of the Agreement be held invalid or illegal, such illegality shall not invalidate the whole of this Section 5.4 of the Agreement, but, rather, the Agreement shall be construed as if it did not contain the illegal part or narrowed to permit its enforcement, and the rights and obligations of the parties shall be construed and enforced accordingly. In furtherance of and not in limitation of the foregoing, the Optionee expressly agrees that should the duration of or geographical extent of, or business activities covered by, any provision of this Agreement be in excess of that which is valid or enforceable under applicable law, then such provision shall be construed to cover only that duration, extent or activities that may validly or enforceably be covered. The Optionee acknowledges the uncertainty of the law in this respect and expressly stipulates that this Agreement shall be construed in a manner that renders its provisions valid and enforceable to the maximum extent (not exceeding its express terms) possible under applicable law. This Section 5.4 of the Agreement does not replace and is in addition to any other agreements the Optionee may have with the Company or any of its Subsidiaries on the matters addressed herein.
6. .
Securities Law and Other Restrictions
Notwithstanding any other provision of the Plan or this Agreement, the Company will not be required to issue, and the Optionee may not sell, assign, transfer or otherwise dispose of, any Option Shares, unless (a) there is in effect with respect to the Option Shares a registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and any applicable state or foreign securities laws or an exemption from such registration, and (b) there has been obtained any other consent, approval or permit from any other regulatory body which the Committee, in its sole discretion, deems necessary or advisable. The Company may condition such issuance, sale or transfer upon the receipt of any representations or agreements from the parties involved, and the placement of any legends on certificates representing Option Shares, as may be deemed necessary or advisable by the Company in order to comply with such securities law or other restrictions.
7. .
Withholding Taxes
The Company is entitled to (a) withhold and deduct from future wages of the Optionee (or from other amounts that may be due and owing to the Optionee from the Company), or make other arrangements for the collection of, all legally required amounts necessary to satisfy any federal or provincial withholding tax requirements attributable to the Option, or (b) require the Optionee promptly to remit the amount of such withholding to the Company before acting on the Optionee's notice of exercise of the Option. In the event that the Company is unable to withhold such amounts, for whatever reason, the Optionee agrees to pay to the Company an amount equal to the amount the Company would otherwise be required to withhold under federal, state or local law.
8. .
Adjustments
In the event of any reorganization, merger, consolidation, recapitalization, liquidation, reclassification, stock dividend, stock split, combination of shares, rights offering, divestiture or extraordinary dividend (including a spin-off), or any other change in the corporate structure or shares of the Company, the Committee (or, if the Company is not the surviving corporation in any such transaction, the board of directors of the surviving corporation), in order to prevent dilution or enlargement of the rights of the Optionee, will make appropriate adjustment (which determination will be conclusive) as to the number and kind of securities or other property (including cash) subject to, and the exercise price of, the Option.
9. . For purposes of this Agreement, the following additional definitions will apply:
Certain Definitions
(a) "Benefit Plan" means any formal or informal plan, program or other arrangement heretofore or hereafter adopted by the Company or any Subsidiary for the direct or indirect provision of compensation to the Optionee (including groups or classes of participants or beneficiaries of which the Optionee is a member), whether or not such compensation is deferred, is in the form of cash or other property or rights, or is in the form of a benefit to or for the Optionee.
(b) "Cause" will have the meaning set forth in any employment or other agreement or policy applicable to the Optionee or, if no such agreement or policy exists, will mean (i) dishonesty, fraud, misrepresentation, theft, embezzlement or injury or attempted injury, in each case related to the Company or any Subsidiary, (ii) any unlawful or criminal activity of a serious nature, (iii) any breach of duty, habitual neglect of duty or unreasonable job performance, or (iv) any material breach of any employment, service, confidentiality or noncompete agreement entered into with the Company or any Subsidiary.
(c) "Change of Control" will have the meaning set forth in the Plan plus such other event or transaction as the Board shall determine constitutes a Change of Control, or such other meaning as may be adopted by the Committee from time to time in its sole discretion.
10. .
Subject to Plan
The Option and the Option Shares granted and issued pursuant to this Agreement have been granted and issued under, and are subject to the terms of, the Plan. The terms of the Plan are incorporated by reference in this Agreement in their entirety, and the Optionee, by execution of this Agreement, acknowledges having received a copy of the Plan. The provisions of this Agreement will be interpreted as to be consistent with the Plan, and any ambiguities in this Agreement will be interpreted by reference to the Plan. In the event that any provision of this Agreement is inconsistent with the terms of the Plan, the terms of the Plan will prevail.
11. .
Miscellaneous
11.1 . This Agreement will be binding upon the heirs, executors, administrators and successors of the parties to this Agreement.
Binding Effect
11.2 . This Agreement and all rights and obligations under this Agreement will be construed in accordance with the Plan and governed by the laws of the State of Delaware, without regard to conflicts or choice of law rule or principle that might otherwise refer construction or interpretation of this Agreement to the substantive laws of another jurisdiction.
Governing Law
11.3 . This Agreement and the Plan set forth the entire agreement and understanding of the parties to this Agreement with respect to the grant and exercise of the Option and the administration of the Plan and supersede all prior agreements, arrangements, plans and understandings relating to the grant and exercise of the Option and the administration of the Plan.
Entire Agreement
11.4 . Other than as provided in the Plan, this Agreement may be amended, waived, modified or canceled only by a written instrument executed by the parties to this Agreement or, in the case of a waiver, by the party waiving compliance.
Amendment and Waiver
The parties to this Agreement have executed this Agreement effective the day and year first above written.
ARBITRON INC.
By Name Title
Social Security Number:

Exhibit 10.2
THIS AGREEMENT is entered into and effective as of (the "Date of Grant"), by and between Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") and (the "Optionee").
     
     
A. The Company has adopted the Arbitron Inc. 1999 Stock Incentive Plan (as may be amended or supplemented, the "Plan") authorizing a committee of the Board of Directors of the Company (the "Committee"), to grant stock options to non-employee directors of the Company.
B. Pursuant to the Company's director compensation program, the Company desires to give the Optionee an inducement to acquire a proprietary interest in the Company and an added incentive to advance the interests of the Company by granting to the Optionee an option to purchase shares of common stock of the Company pursuant to the Plan.
Accordingly, the parties agree as follows:
1. Grant of Option.
The Company hereby grants to the Optionee the right, privilege and option (the "Option") to purchase (the "Option Shares") of the Company's common stock, $0.50 par value (the "Common Stock"), according to the terms and subject to the conditions hereinafter set forth and as set forth in the Plan.
     
(
     
)
2. .
Option Exercise Price
The per share price to be paid by Optionee in the event of an exercise of the Option will be
$
     
.
3. .
Duration of Option and Time of Exercise
3.1 . Except as provided in Section 3.2 hereof, the Option shall become fully vested as of the Date of Grant and shall become exercisable six (6) months after the Date of Grant. In no event will the Option be exercisable after, and the Option will become void and expire as to all unexercised Option Shares at, 5:00 p.m. (Eastern Standard Time) on the tenth anniversary of the Date of Grant (the "Time of Option Termination").
Initial Period of Exercisability
3.2 . If the Optionee's service as a director of the Company ceases by any reason other than Cause (as defined in Section 8 of this Agreement), the Option shall become immediately exercisable in full and remain exercisable until the Time of Option Termination. If the Optionee's service as a director of the Company ceases by reason of Cause, all rights of the Optionee under the Plan and this Agreement will immediately terminate without notice of any kind, and the Option will no longer be exercisable.
Termination of Service
4. .
Manner of Option Exercise
4.1 . This Option may be exercised by the Optionee in whole or in part from time to time, subject to the conditions contained in the Plan and in this Agreement, by delivery, in person, by facsimile or electronic transmission or through the mail, to the Company at its office in Columbia, Maryland (Attention: Treasury Department), of a written notice of exercise. Such notice must be in a form satisfactory to the Committee, must identify the Option, must specify the number of Option Shares with respect to which the Option is being exercised, and must be signed by the person or persons so exercising the Option. In the event that the Option is being exercised, as provided by the Plan and Section 3.2 of this Agreement, by any person or persons other than the Optionee, the notice must be accompanied by appropriate proof of right of such person or persons to exercise the Option. To the extent the Optionee retains the Option Shares purchased, as soon as practicable after the effective exercise of the Option, the Optionee will be recorded on the stock transfer books of the Company as the owner of the Option Shares purchased, and the Company will deliver to the Optionee one or more duly issued stock certificates evidencing such ownership.
Notice
4.2 . At the time of exercise of the Option, the Optionee must pay the total exercise price of the Option Shares to be purchased entirely in cash (including a check, bank draft or money order, payable to the order of the Company) or a Broker Exercise Notice.
Payment
5. .
Rights and Restrictions of Optionee; Transferability
5.1 . The Optionee will have no rights as a stockholder unless and until all conditions to the effective exercise of the Option (including, without limitation, the conditions set forth in Sections 4 and 6 of this Agreement) have been satisfied.
Rights as a Stockholder
5.2 . Except pursuant to testamentary will or the laws of descent and distribution or as otherwise expressly permitted by the Plan, no right or interest of the Optionee in the Option prior to exercise may be assigned or transferred, or subjected to any lien, during the lifetime of the Optionee, either voluntarily or involuntarily, directly or indirectly, by operation of law or otherwise. The Optionee will, however, be entitled to designate a beneficiary to receive the Option upon such Optionee's death in the manner provided by the Plan, and, in the event of the Optionee's death, exercise of the Option (to the extent permitted pursuant to Section 3.2 of this Agreement) may be made by the Optionee's designated beneficiary.
Restrictions on Transfer
6. .
Securities Law and Other Restrictions
Notwithstanding any other provision of the Plan or this Agreement, the Company will not be required to issue, and the Optionee may not sell, assign, transfer or otherwise dispose of, any Option Shares, unless (a) there is in effect with respect to the Option Shares a registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and any applicable state or foreign securities laws or an exemption from such registration, and (b) there has been obtained any other consent, approval or permit from any other regulatory body which the Committee, in its sole discretion, deems necessary or advisable. The Company may condition such issuance, sale or transfer upon the receipt of any representations or agreements from the parties involved, and the placement of any legends on certificates representing Option Shares, as may be deemed necessary or advisable by the Company in order to comply with such securities law or other restrictions.
7. .
Change of Control
Within 15 days following consummation of a Change of Control (as defined in the Plan plus such other event or transaction as the Board shall determine constitutes a Change of Control), the Company shall make a cash payment to the Optionee equal to the sum of (i) the in-the-money value of this Option (i.e., the number of unexercised option shares multiplied by the difference between the value per share of the consideration received in the Change of Control and the exercise price per share), and (ii) the Black-Scholes Termination Value of this Option. Upon making such cash payment, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement or the Plan, this Option shall expire, and no longer shall be exercisable.
(a) "Black-Scholes Termination Value" means the difference between (i) the Black-Scholes value of this Option had it continued for its entire term, such value determined as of the date of the Change of Control, using (A) a share price equal to the value per share of the consideration received in the Change of Control transaction, (B) a volatility input equal to the measured daily volatility for the 180 days ending on the Determination Date, and (C) an interest rate equal to the rate on 10-year Treasury constant maturities (zero coupon bonds) for the date of consummation of the Change of Control, as published by the Federal Reserve, and (ii) the in-the-money amount of this Option (i.e., the number of unexercised option shares multiplied by the difference between the value per share of the consideration received in the Change of Control and the exercise price per share).
(b) "Cause" means (i) dishonesty, fraud, misrepresentation, theft, embezzlement or injury or attempted injury, in each case related to the Company or any Subsidiary, (ii) any unlawful or criminal activity of a serious nature, or (iii) any breach of duty or habitual neglect of duty.
(c) "Determination Date" means the earlier of the date one week after the date on which the Company or the entity effecting the Change of Control first announces to the public the existence of a definitive agreement leading to the Change of Control or the date of commencement of a tender offer leading to the Change of Control.
9. .
Shares Subject to Plan
The Option and the Option Shares granted and issued pursuant to this Agreement have been granted and issued under, and are subject to the terms of the Plan. The terms of the Plan are incorporated by reference in this Agreement in their entirety, and the Optionee, by execution of this Agreement, acknowledges having received a copy of the Plan. The provisions of this Agreement will be interpreted as to be consistent with the Plan, and any ambiguities in this Agreement will be interpreted by reference to the Plan. Except as set forth in Sections 7 and 8, in the event that any provision of this Agreement is inconsistent with the terms of the Plan, the terms of the Plan will prevail.
10. .
Miscellaneous
10.1 . This Agreement will be binding upon the heirs, executors, administrators and successors of the parties to this Agreement.
Binding Effect
10.2 . This Agreement and all rights and obligations under this Agreement will be construed in accordance with the Plan and governed by the laws of the State of Delaware, without regard to conflicts or choice of law rule or principle that might otherwise refer construction or interpretation of this Agreement to the substantive laws of another jurisdiction.
Governing Law
10.3 . This Agreement and the Plan set forth the entire agreement and understanding of the parties to this Agreement with respect to the grant and exercise of the Option and the administration of the Plan and supersede all prior agreements, arrangements, plans and understandings relating to the grant and exercise of the Option and the administration of the Plan.
Entire Agreement
10.4 . Other than as provided in the Plan, this Agreement may be amended, waived, modified or canceled only by a written instrument executed by the parties to this Agreement or, in the case of a waiver, by the party waiving compliance.
Amendment and Waiver
The parties to this Agreement have executed this Agreement effective the day and year first above written.
ARBITRON INC.
By
Its
(Name and Address)
Social Security Number:

Exhibit 10.3
THIS AGREEMENT is entered into and effective as of , 20(the "Date of Grant"), by and between Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") and (the "Optionee").
     
     
     
A. The Company has adopted the Arbitron Inc. 1999 Stock Incentive Plan (as may be amended or supplemented, the "Plan") authorizing a committee of the Board of Directors of the Company (the "Committee"), to grant stock options to non-employee directors of the Company.
B. The Company desires to give the Optionee an inducement to acquire a proprietary interest in the Company and an added incentive to advance the interests of the Company by granting to the Optionee an option to purchase shares of common stock of the Company pursuant to the Plan.
Accordingly, the parties agree as follows:
1. .
Grant of Option
The Company hereby grants to the Optionee the right, privilege and option (the "Option") to purchase () shares (the "Option Shares") of the Company's common stock, $0.50 par value (the "Common Stock"), according to the terms and subject to the conditions hereinafter set forth and as set forth in the Plan.
     
     
2. .
Option Exercise Price
The per share price to be paid by Optionee in the event of an exercise of the Option will be $..
     
     
3. .
Duration of Option and Time of Exercise
3.1 . Except as provided in Sections 3.2 and 3.3 hereof, the Option shall become exercisable with respect to one-third of the Option Shares on each of the first, second and third anniversaries of the Date of Grant. The foregoing rights to exercise the Option will be cumulative with respect to the Option Shares becoming exercisable on each such date, but in no event will the Option be exercisable after, and the Option will become void and expire as to all unexercised Option Shares at, 5:00 p.m. (Eastern Standard Time) on tenth anniversary of the Date of Grant (the "Time of Option Termination").
Initial Period of Exercisability
3.2 . If the Optionee's service as a director of the Company ceases by any reason other than Cause (as defined in Section 7 of this Agreement), the Option shall remain exercisable until the Time of Option Termination, but only to the extent that the Optionee was entitled to exercise it as of the date of Termination of Service. If the Optionee's service as a director of the Company ceases by reason of Cause, all rights of the Optionee under the Plan and this Agreement will immediately terminate without notice of any kind, and the Option will no longer be exercisable.
Termination of Service
3.3 .
Change in Control
Within 15 days following consummation of a Change of Control (as defined in the Plan plus such other event or transaction as the Board shall determine constitutes a Change of Control), the Company shall make a cash payment to the Optionee equal to the sum of (i) the in-the-money value of this Option (i.e., the number of unexercised option shares multiplied by the difference between the value per share of the consideration received in the Change of Control and the exercise price per share), and (ii) the Black-Scholes Termination Value of this Option. Upon making such cash payment, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement or the Plan, this Option shall expire, and no longer shall be exercisable.
4. .
Manner of Option Exercise
4.1 . This Option may be exercised by the Optionee in whole or in part from time to time, subject to the conditions contained in the Plan and in this Agreement, by delivery, in person, by facsimile or electronic transmission or through the mail, to the Company at its office in Columbia, Maryland (Attention: Treasury Department), of a written notice of exercise. Such notice must be in a form satisfactory to the Committee, must identify the Option, must specify the number of Option Shares with respect to which the Option is being exercised, and must be signed by the person or persons so exercising the Option. In the event that the Option is being exercised, as provided by the Plan and Section 3.2 of this Agreement, by any person or persons other than the Optionee, the notice must be accompanied by appropriate proof of right of such person or persons to exercise the Option. To the extent the Optionee retains the Option Shares purchased, as soon as practicable after the effective exercise of the Option, the Optionee will be recorded on the stock transfer books of the Company as the owner of the Option Shares purchased, and the Company will deliver to the Optionee one or more duly issued stock certificates evidencing such ownership.
Notice
4.2 . At the time of exercise of the Option, the Optionee must pay the total exercise price of the Option Shares to be purchased entirely in cash (including a check, bank draft or money order, payable to the order of the Company) or a Broker Exercise Notice.
Payment
5. .
Rights and Restrictions of Optionee; Transferability
5.1 . The Optionee will have no rights as a stockholder unless and until all conditions to the effective exercise of the Option (including, without limitation, the conditions set forth in Sections 4 and 6 of this Agreement) have been satisfied.
Rights as a Stockholder
5.2 . Except pursuant to testamentary will or the laws of descent and distribution or as otherwise expressly permitted by the Plan, no right or interest of the Optionee in the Option prior to exercise may be assigned or transferred, or subjected to any lien, during the lifetime of the Optionee, either voluntarily or involuntarily, directly or indirectly, by operation of law or otherwise. The Optionee will, however, be entitled to designate a beneficiary to receive the Option upon such Optionee's death in the manner provided by the Plan, and, in the event of the Optionee's death, exercise of the Option (to the extent permitted pursuant to Section 3.2 of this Agreement) may be made by the Optionee's designated beneficiary.
Restrictions on Transfer
6. .
Securities Law and Other Restrictions
Notwithstanding any other provision of the Plan or this Agreement, the Company will not be required to issue, and the Optionee may not sell, assign, transfer or otherwise dispose of, any Option Shares, unless (a) there is in effect with respect to the Option Shares a registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and any applicable state or foreign securities laws or an exemption from such registration, and (b) there has been obtained any other consent, approval or permit from any other regulatory body which the Committee, in its sole discretion, deems necessary or advisable. The Company may condition such issuance, sale or transfer upon the receipt of any representations or agreements from the parties involved, and the placement of any legends on certificates representing Option Shares, as may be deemed necessary or advisable by the Company in order to comply with such securities law or other restrictions.
(a) "Black-Scholes Termination Value" means the difference between (i) the Black-Scholes value of this Option had it continued for its entire term, such value determined as of the date of the Change of Control, using (A) a share price equal to the value per share of the consideration received in the Change of Control transaction, (B) a volatility input equal to the measured daily volatility for the 180 days ending on the Determination Date, and (C) an interest rate equal to the rate on 10-year Treasury constant maturities (zero coupon bonds) for the date of consummation of the Change of Control, as published by the Federal Reserve, and (ii) the in-the-money amount of this Option (i.e., the number of unexercised option shares multiplied by the difference between the value per share of the consideration received in the Change of Control and the exercise price per share).
(b) "Cause" " means: (i) dishonesty, fraud, misrepresentation, theft, embezzlement or injury or attempted injury, in each case related to the Company or any Subsidiary, (ii) any unlawful or criminal activity of a serious nature, or (iii) any breach of duty or habitual neglect of duty.
(c) "Determination Date" means the earlier of the date one week after the date on which the Company or the entity effecting the Change of Control first announces to the public the existence of a definitive agreement leading to the Change of Control or the date of commencement of a tender offer leading to the Change of Control.
8. .
Shares Subject to Plan
The Option and the Option Shares granted and issued pursuant to this Agreement have been granted and issued under, and are subject to the terms of the Plan. The terms of the Plan are incorporated by reference in this Agreement in their entirety, and the Optionee, by execution of this Agreement, acknowledges having received a copy of the Plan. The provisions of this Agreement will be interpreted as to be consistent with the Plan, and any ambiguities in this Agreement will be interpreted by reference to the Plan. Except as set forth in Sections 3.3 and 7, in the event that any provision of this Agreement is inconsistent with the terms of the Plan, the terms of the Plan will prevail.
9. .
Miscellaneous
9.1 . This Agreement will be binding upon the heirs, executors, administrators and successors of the parties to this Agreement.
Binding Effect
9.2 . This Agreement and all rights and obligations under this Agreement will be construed in accordance with the Plan and governed by the laws of the State of Delaware, without regard to conflicts or choice of law rule or principle that might otherwise refer construction or interpretation of this Agreement to the substantive laws of another jurisdiction.
Governing Law
9.3 . This Agreement and the Plan set forth the entire agreement and understanding of the parties to this Agreement with respect to the grant and exercise of the Option and the administration of the Plan and supersede all prior agreements, arrangements, plans and understandings relating to the grant and exercise of the Option and the administration of the Plan.
Entire Agreement
9.4 . Other than as provided in the Plan, this Agreement may be amended, waived, modified or canceled only by a written instrument executed by the parties to this Agreement or, in the case of a waiver, by the party waiving compliance.
Amendment and Waiver
The parties to this Agreement have executed this Agreement effective the day and year first above written.
ARBITRON INC.
By
Its
(Name and Address)
Social Security Number:

Exhibit 10.4
THIS AGREEMENT is entered into and effective as of (the "Date of Grant"), by and between Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") and (the "Optionee").
     
     
A. The Company has adopted the Arbitron Inc. 1999 Stock Incentive Plan (as may be amended or supplemented, the "Plan") authorizing a committee of the Board of Directors of the Company (the "Committee"), to grant stock options to non-employee directors of the Company.
B. Pursuant to the Company's director compensation program, the Company desires to give the Optionee an inducement to acquire a proprietary interest in the Company and an added incentive to advance the interests of the Company by granting to the Optionee an option to purchase shares of common stock of the Company pursuant to the Plan.
Accordingly, the parties agree as follows:
1. Grant of Option.
The Company hereby grants to the Optionee the right, privilege and option (the "Option") to purchase (the "Option Shares") of the Company's common stock, $0.50 par value (the "Common Stock"), according to the terms and subject to the conditions hereinafter set forth and as set forth in the Plan.
     
(
     
)
2. .
Option Exercise Price
The per share price to be paid by Optionee in the event of an exercise of the Option will be
$
     
.
3. .
Duration of Option and Time of Exercise
3.1 . Except as provided in Section 3.2 hereof, the Option shall become fully vested and exercisable as of the Date of Grant. In no event will the Option be exercisable after, and the Option will become void and expire as to all unexercised Option Shares at, 5:00 p.m. (Eastern Standard Time) on the tenth anniversary of the Date of Grant (the "Time of Option Termination").
Initial Period of Exercisability
3.2 . If the Optionee's service as a director of the Company ceases by any reason other than Cause (as defined in Section 8 of this Agreement), the Option shall become immediately exercisable in full and remain exercisable until the Time of Option Termination. If the Optionee's service as a director of the Company ceases by reason of Cause, all rights of the Optionee under the Plan and this Agreement will immediately terminate without notice of any kind, and the Option will no longer be exercisable.
Termination of Service
4. .
Manner of Option Exercise
4.1 . This Option may be exercised by the Optionee in whole or in part from time to time, subject to the conditions contained in the Plan and in this Agreement, by delivery, in person, by facsimile or electronic transmission or through the mail, to the Company at its office in Columbia, Maryland (Attention: Treasury Department), of a written notice of exercise. Such notice must be in a form satisfactory to the Committee, must identify the Option, must specify the number of Option Shares with respect to which the Option is being exercised, and must be signed by the person or persons so exercising the Option. In the event that the Option is being exercised, as provided by the Plan and Section 3.2 of this Agreement, by any person or persons other than the Optionee, the notice must be accompanied by appropriate proof of right of such person or persons to exercise the Option. To the extent the Optionee retains the Option Shares purchased, as soon as practicable after the effective exercise of the Option, the Optionee will be recorded on the stock transfer books of the Company as the owner of the Option Shares purchased, and the Company will deliver to the Optionee one or more duly issued stock certificates evidencing such ownership.
Notice
4.2 . At the time of exercise of the Option, the Optionee must pay the total exercise price of the Option Shares to be purchased entirely in cash (including a check, bank draft or money order, payable to the order of the Company) or a Broker Exercise Notice.
Payment
5. .
Rights and Restrictions of Optionee; Transferability
5.1 . The Optionee will have no rights as a stockholder unless and until all conditions to the effective exercise of the Option (including, without limitation, the conditions set forth in Sections 4 and 6 of this Agreement) have been satisfied.
Rights as a Stockholder
5.2 . Except pursuant to testamentary will or the laws of descent and distribution or as otherwise expressly permitted by the Plan, no right or interest of the Optionee in the Option prior to exercise may be assigned or transferred, or subjected to any lien, during the lifetime of the Optionee, either voluntarily or involuntarily, directly or indirectly, by operation of law or otherwise. The Optionee will, however, be entitled to designate a beneficiary to receive the Option upon such Optionee's death in the manner provided by the Plan, and, in the event of the Optionee's death, exercise of the Option (to the extent permitted pursuant to Section 3.2 of this Agreement) may be made by the Optionee's designated beneficiary.
Restrictions on Transfer
6. .
Securities Law and Other Restrictions
Notwithstanding any other provision of the Plan or this Agreement, the Company will not be required to issue, and the Optionee may not sell, assign, transfer or otherwise dispose of, any Option Shares, unless (a) there is in effect with respect to the Option Shares a registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and any applicable state or foreign securities laws or an exemption from such registration, and (b) there has been obtained any other consent, approval or permit from any other regulatory body which the Committee, in its sole discretion, deems necessary or advisable. The Company may condition such issuance, sale or transfer upon the receipt of any representations or agreements from the parties involved, and the placement of any legends on certificates representing Option Shares, as may be deemed necessary or advisable by the Company in order to comply with such securities law or other restrictions.
7. .
Change of Control
Within 15 days following consummation of a Change of Control (as defined in the Plan plus such other event or transaction as the Board shall determine constitutes a Change of Control), the Company shall make a cash payment to the Optionee equal to the sum of (i) the in-the-money value of this Option (i.e., the number of unexercised option shares multiplied by the difference between the value per share of the consideration received in the Change of Control and the exercise price per share), and (ii) the Black-Scholes Termination Value of this Option. Upon making such cash payment, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement or the Plan, this Option shall expire, and no longer shall be exercisable.
(a) "Black-Scholes Termination Value" means the difference between (i) the Black-Scholes value of this Option had it continued for its entire term, such value determined as of the date of the Change of Control, using (A) a share price equal to the value per share of the consideration received in the Change of Control transaction, (B) a volatility input equal to the measured daily volatility for the 180 days ending on the Determination Date, and (C) an interest rate equal to the rate on 10-year Treasury constant maturities (zero coupon bonds) for the date of consummation of the Change of Control, as published by the Federal Reserve, and (ii) the in-the-money amount of this Option (i.e., the number of unexercised option shares multiplied by the difference between the value per share of the consideration received in the Change of Control and the exercise price per share).
(b) "Cause" means (i) dishonesty, fraud, misrepresentation, theft, embezzlement or injury or attempted injury, in each case related to the Company or any Subsidiary, (ii) any unlawful or criminal activity of a serious nature, or (iii) any breach of duty or habitual neglect of duty.
(c) "Determination Date" means the earlier of the date one week after the date on which the Company or the entity effecting the Change of Control first announces to the public the existence of a definitive agreement leading to the Change of Control or the date of commencement of a tender offer leading to the Change of Control.
9. .
Shares Subject to Plan
The Option and the Option Shares granted and issued pursuant to this Agreement have been granted and issued under, and are subject to the terms of the Plan. The terms of the Plan are incorporated by reference in this Agreement in their entirety, and the Optionee, by execution of this Agreement, acknowledges having received a copy of the Plan. The provisions of this Agreement will be interpreted as to be consistent with the Plan, and any ambiguities in this Agreement will be interpreted by reference to the Plan. Except as set forth in Sections 7 and 8, in the event that any provision of this Agreement is inconsistent with the terms of the Plan, the terms of the Plan will prevail.
10. .
Miscellaneous
10.1 . This Agreement will be binding upon the heirs, executors, administrators and successors of the parties to this Agreement.
Binding Effect
10.2 . This Agreement and all rights and obligations under this Agreement will be construed in accordance with the Plan and governed by the laws of the State of Delaware, without regard to conflicts or choice of law rule or principle that might otherwise refer construction or interpretation of this Agreement to the substantive laws of another jurisdiction.
Governing Law
10.3 . This Agreement and the Plan set forth the entire agreement and understanding of the parties to this Agreement with respect to the grant and exercise of the Option and the administration of the Plan and supersede all prior agreements, arrangements, plans and understandings relating to the grant and exercise of the Option and the administration of the Plan.
Entire Agreement
10.4 . Other than as provided in the Plan, this Agreement may be amended, waived, modified or canceled only by a written instrument executed by the parties to this Agreement or, in the case of a waiver, by the party waiving compliance.
Amendment and Waiver
The parties to this Agreement have executed this Agreement effective the day and year first above written.
ARBITRON INC.
By
Its
(Name and Address)
Social Security Number:

Exhibit 10.5
THIS AGREEMENT is entered into and effective as of , by and between Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") and (the "Participant").
     
     
A. The Company has adopted the Arbitron Inc. 1999 Stock Incentive Plan (as may be amended or supplemented, the "Plan") authorizing the Board of Directors of the Company, or a committee as provided for in the Plan (the Board or such a committee to be referred to as the "Committee"), to award deferred stock units to non-employee directors of the Company.
B. Pursuant to the Company's program permitting directors to receive deferred stock units under the Plan in lieu of director's fees, the Company hereby awards to the Participant on , stock units representing shares of the Company's common stock, and payable following termination of the Participant's Board service as further described herein.
     
Accordingly, the parties agree as follows:
1. .
Deferred Stock Units
The Company hereby awards the Participant stock units representing the same number of shares of the Company's common stock, $0.50 par value (the "Deferred Stock Units"), according to the terms and subject to the conditions hereinafter set forth, as set forth in the Plan, and the policies and procedures concerning the award of deferred stock units set forth in the Arbitron, Inc. Director Deferred Compensation Plan (the "Policy"). The number of deferred stock units subject to this Agreement may increase based on Dividend Equivalent credits made pursuant to Section 4. Any such additional Deferred Stock Units (or fraction thereof) resulting from Dividend Equivalent credits shall be treated as Deferred Stock Units and shall be subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Plan and the Policy. Payment of the Deferred Stock Units shall be made as described below in Section 2.
     
2. .
Vesting and Payment of Deferred Stock Units
2.1 . The Deferred Stock Units are fully vested.
Vesting
2.2 . Payment of the Deferred Stock Units shall not be made until following the Participant's termination of service as a director of the Company. If the Participant's service as a director of the Company ceases for any reason, payment shall be made as previously elected by the Participant as follows:
Termination of Service
(The Company has checked the box that applies to the Participant under this Agreement.)
By execution of this Agreement, the Participant acknowledges that the payment form reflected above in this Agreement also applies to any Deferred Stock Units accrued to the Participant's account under a prior deferred stock unit agreement and supercedes any previously elected payment form. However, to the extent, the payment form reflected above represents a change of form from the prior year(s), the Participant's election shall be subject to the conditions of Section 3.
3. .
Election to Change Payment Form
A Participant may change the form of his or her payment election in effect under Section 2 of this Agreement, contingent on the following requirements having been satisfied: (a) the change must be made in writing and in the form designated by the Company; (b) the change must be made at a time when the Participant is still a director for the Company, and must be consistent with Section 2 of this Agreement; and (c) the Participant recognizes that the change will be voided and of no effect if made less than one year prior to the date that the director terminates service on the Board of Directors.
4. .
Rights and Restrictions of Participant; Transferability
4.1 . The Participant will have no rights as a stockholder unless and until the Participant has become the holder of record of shares of Common Stock following payment in Common Stock after terminating service as a director of the Company. Notwithstanding the preceding, the Participant shall be credited with Dividend Equivalents on deferred stock units credited for his or her benefit to the extent of dividends issued on Common Stock, provided the record date for such dividend is on or after the end of the quarter as of which the stock units are credited to the Participant.
Rights as a Stockholder
4.2 . Except pursuant to testamentary will or the laws of descent and distribution or as otherwise expressly permitted by the Plan, no right or interest of the Participant to payment of the Deferred Stock Units may be assigned or transferred, or subjected to any lien, during the lifetime of the Participant, either voluntarily or involuntarily, directly or indirectly, by operation of law or otherwise. The Participant will, however, be entitled to designate a beneficiary to receive the payment of the Deferred Stock Units after such Participant's death in the manner provided by the Policy.
Restrictions on Transfer
5. .
Securities Law and Other Restrictions
Notwithstanding any other provision of the Plan or this Agreement, the Company will not be required to issue, and the Participant may not sell, assign, transfer or otherwise dispose of, any shares of Common Stock received as payment of the Deferred Stock Units, unless (a) there is in effect with respect to the shares of Common Stock received as payment of the Deferred Stock Units a registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and any applicable state or foreign securities laws or an exemption from such registration, and (b) there has been obtained any other consent, approval or permit from any other regulatory body which the Committee, in its sole discretion, deems necessary or advisable. The Company may condition such issuance, sale or transfer upon the receipt of any representations or agreements from the parties involved, and the placement of any legends on certificates representing Common Stock received as payment of the Deferred Stock Units, as may be deemed necessary or advisable by the Company in order to comply with such securities law or other restrictions.
6. .
Change of Control
If there is a Change of Control, then, upon consummation of the Change of Control, but in no event more than 15 days following the Change of Control, the Company shall provide the Participant with a cash payment equal to the value per share of the consideration received in the Change of Control multiplied by the number of Deferred Stock Units. Upon payment of the cash amount just described, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this agreement, the Plan or the Policy, this agreement shall expire, and no further payment shall be due to the Participant in respect of the Deferred Stock Units.
7. .
Adjustments
In the event of any reorganization, merger, consolidation, recapitalization, liquidation, reclassification, stock dividend, stock split, combination of shares, rights offering, divestiture or extraordinary dividend (including a spin-off), or any other change in the corporate structure or shares of the Company that does not result in a Change of Control, the Committee (or, if the Company is not the surviving corporation in any such transaction, the board of directors of the surviving corporation), in order to prevent dilution or enlargement of the rights of the Participant, will make appropriate adjustment (which determination will be conclusive) as to the number and kind of securities represented by the stock units making up the Deferred Stock Units.
8. . For purposes of this Agreement, the following additional definitions will apply:
Certain Definitions
(a) "Change of Control" means any of the following events:
(b) "Dividend Equivalent" means a credit to the account of a Participant, based on the number of Deferred Stock Units subject to this Agreement, equivalent to the cash, stock or other property dividends on shares of Common Stock. Dividend Equivalent credits shall be deemed reinvested in additional shares of Deferred Stock Units (or fractions thereof) and shall be added to the number of Deferred Stock Units subject to this Agreement.
9. .
Subject to Plan
The Deferred Stock Units issued under this Agreement have been issued subject to the terms of the Plan, as supplemented by the Policy. The terms of the Plan and the Policy are incorporated by reference in this Agreement in their entirety, and the Participant, by execution of this Agreement, acknowledges having received a copy of the Plan and the Policy. The provisions of this Agreement will be interpreted as to be consistent with the Plan and the Policy, and any ambiguities in this Agreement will be interpreted by reference to the Plan. Except as set forth in Sections 6 and 8, in the event that any provision of this Agreement is inconsistent with the terms of the Plan, the terms of the Plan will prevail.
10. .
Miscellaneous
10.1 . This Agreement shall create a contractual obligation on the part of Company to make payment of the Deferred Stock Units credited to the account of the Participant at the time provided for hereinabove. Neither the Participant nor any other party claiming an interest in deferred compensation hereunder shall have any interest whatsoever in any specific assets of Company. The Participant's right to receive payments hereunder shall be that of an unsecured general creditor of Company.
Director as Unsecured Creditor
10.2 . The rights and interests of the Participant and any beneficiary of the Participant under this Agreement may not be sold, pledged, hypothecated, assigned or transferred in any manner, either voluntarily or involuntarily by operation of law, other than by the Participant pursuant to a beneficiary designation in accordance with the Policy.
Payment Rights Nontransferable
10.3 . This Agreement will be binding upon the heirs, executors, administrators and successors of the parties to this Agreement.
Binding Effect
10.4 . This Agreement and all rights and obligations under this Agreement will be construed in accordance with the Plan and governed by the laws of the State of Delaware, without regard to conflicts or choice of law rule or principle that might otherwise refer construction or interpretation of this Agreement to the substantive laws of another jurisdiction.
Governing Law
10.5 . This Agreement, the Plan, and the Policy set forth the entire agreement and understanding of the parties to this Agreement with respect to the terms and conditions applicable to the Deferred Stock Units and supersede all prior agreements, arrangements, plans, and understandings relating to the Deferred Stock Units and the administration of the Plan and the Policy.
Entire Agreement
10.6 . Other than as provided in the Plan, this Agreement may be amended, waived, modified or canceled only by a written instrument executed by the parties to this Agreement or, in the case of a waiver, by the party waiving compliance.
Amendment and Waiver
The parties to this Agreement have executed this Agreement effective the day and year first above written.
ARBITRON INC.
By
Its
(Name and Address)
Social Security Number:


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20050301160314.txt.gz
TIME:20050301160314
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On February 23, 2005, the Compensation and Human Resources Committee (the "Committee") of the Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") met and approved the establishment of certain parameters for determining bonuses for executive officers for 2005, which would be payable in early 2006. The Committee set various objective and subjective Company goals in terms of earnings per share, revenue and implementation of certain non-financial initiatives, with certain weightings attributable to achievement of each of these goals. The Committee then established various criteria for achieving "threshold", "target" and "superior" performance in relation to these goals. Under the bonus arrangements currently in place, each executive officers bonus can be weighted to take into account achievement of both Company goals and individual goals. As a general matter, the bulk of an executive officers bonus for 2005 will be determined as a result of achievement of Company goals, with the remaini ng portion based on achievement of individual goals, except in the case of Mr. Steve Morris, the Companys President and Chief Executive Officer, and Bill Walsh, the Companys Executive Vice President, Finance and Planning and Chief Financial Officer, whose bonuses will be determined entirely on the basis of achievement of Company goals. Taking into account the foregoing, the Committee established a "target" bonus for each executive officer, expressed as a percentage of base salary. The target bonuses for the executive officers who are expected to be "named executive officers" in 2005 are: Mr. Morris, 75% of base salary; Owen Charlebois, the Companys President, U.S. Media Services, 50% of base salary; and Pierre Bouvard, the Companys President, Portable People Meters and International, Mr. Walsh and Scott Henry, the Companys Executive Vice President and Chief Information Officer, 40% of base salary. In addition, the Committee approved a supplementary bonu s opportunity based on achievement of certain additional non-financial goals in 2005. Under this opportunity, executive officers may be eligible to receive an additional bonus equal to up to 100% of their "target" bonus if these non-financial goals are achieved. The Committee has the discretion to award bonuses in excess of the percentages set forth above.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20050405153619.txt.gz
TIME:20050405153619
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
Executive Officer Bonuses The Compensation and Human Resources Committee (the "Committee") of the Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company) previously established certain parameters for determining bonuses for executive officers for 2004. These parameters included achievement of various objective and subjective Company performance goals, as well as individual performance goals in certain circumstances. The bonus for Mr. Pierre Bouvard, one of the Company's named executive officers, was established based on an assessment of his individual performance and the determination by the Committee of the Company's performance based on the goals previously established by the Committee, and as a result Mr. Bouvard will be entitled to a bonus for 2004 in an amount equal to approximately 41% of his 2004 base salary. In addition, it is expected that Ms. Linda Dupree will be one of the Company's named executive officers for 2004. Ms. Dupree's bonus was established based on an assessment of her indi vidual performance and the determination by the Committee of the Company's performance based on the goals previously established by the Committee, and as a result Ms. Dupree will be entitled to a bonus for 2004 in an amount equal to approximately 49% of her 2004 base salary. Information regarding the bonuses for the Company's other named executive officers was filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on a Form 8-K on February 2, 2005.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20050421083343.txt.gz
TIME:20050421083343
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 21, 2005, we issued a press release reporting 2005 first quarter financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated April 21, 2005.
This Form 8-K and the attached Exhibit are furnished to comply with Item 2.02 and Item 9.01 of Form 8-K. Neither this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit are to be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 (except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing).
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press Release
Arbitron Inc. Phone: 212-887-1408 bill.walsh@arbitron.com
Company Contact: Bill Walsh, CFO
KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215 todd@kcsa.com
Investor Relations Contact: Todd Fromer
Arbitron Inc. 212-887-1314 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Media contact: Thom Mocarsky
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the quarter ended March 31, 2005.
NEW YORK, April 21, 2005 
For the first quarter of 2005, the Company reported revenue of $79.2 million, an increase of 3.4 percent over revenue of $76.6 million during the first quarter of 2004. Costs and expenses for the first quarter increased by 2.4 percent, from $43.4 million in 2004 to $44.4 million in 2005. Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for the quarter were $32.7 million, an increase of 2.5 percent over EBIT of $31.9 million during the comparable period last year. Interest expense for the quarter declined 56.7 percent, from $2.4 million in 2004 to $1.1 million in 2005, due to reductions in the Company's long-term debt.
Net income for the quarter was $19.8 million, an increase of 9.6 percent over $18.1 million for the first quarter of 2004. Net income per share for the first quarter of 2005 increased to $0.63 (diluted), compared with $0.57 (diluted) during the comparable period last year, an increase of 10.5 percent.
Management comment on first quarter 2005 results
Stephen Morris, president and chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc., made the following comments on the first quarter 2005 results: "We are starting the year on track despite a continued challenging economic environment for our largest customer segments  radio and advertising agencies."
"This quarter, we were able to announce, for the first time, a quarterly dividend of $0.10 per share, giving our shareholders the opportunity to reap the benefits of our continuing solid cash flow."
Company Outlook for 2005
Arbitron is also providing guidance on its earnings outlook for the second quarter 2005 and for the full year 2005.
For the second quarter 2005, Arbitron expects revenue to increase between 5.5 percent and 7.5 percent compared to the second quarter of last year. Earnings Per Share (diluted) for the second quarter 2005 is expected to be between $0.31 and $0.33 versus $0.27 in the second quarter 2004.
On April 14, 2005, the Securities and Exchange Commission adopted a new rule that amends the compliance date for expensing stock options. As a calendar year-end company, Arbitron is now required to expense stock options beginning with the first quarter of 2006, instead of beginning with the third quarter 2005. As a result of this ruling, Arbitron is updating its financial guidance for the full year 2005.
Arbitron expects year-end 2005 revenue to increase between 5 percent and 7 percent over year-end 2004 revenue, as previously stated on January 25, 2005. Due to the postponement until January 1, 2006 of the requirement to expense stock options, Earnings Before Interest & Taxes (EBIT) for 2005 is now expected to increase between 5.5 percent and 7.5 percent. Net Income is expected to be 4 percent to 6 percent higher in 2005. Earnings Per Share (diluted) for the year ending December 31, 2005 is expected to be between $2.01 and $2.05 based on the Company's estimate of the average number of diluted shares outstanding in 2005. This guidance does not reflect the costs that would be associated with any future rollout of a PPM-based local market ratings service or with the proposed PPM-based national marketing research service.
Earnings conference call: schedule and access
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. ET on April 21 to discuss its first quarter results and other relevant matters. To listen to the call, dial the following telephone number: 877-780-2271.
The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: , and
www.ccbn.com
www.streetevents.com
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies, online radio and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has also developed the Portable People Meter (PPM), a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by its research and technology organization, located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1,700 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date of this release, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
Note: Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) and earnings before interest, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA) are widely used measures of operating performance. They are presented as supplemental information that management of Arbitron believes may be useful to investors to evaluate the Company's results because they exclude certain items that are not directly related to the Company's core operating performance. EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered as substitutes either for net income, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures reported by other companies.
Note: EBIT guidance was given in the Arbitron first quarter 2005 earnings conference call because the management of Arbitron believes it is useful to investors to evaluate the Company's projected results because it excludes certain items that are not directly related to the Company's core operating performance. EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBIT should not be considered as a substitute either for net income, as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20050506145226.txt.gz
TIME:20050506145226
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On May 2, 2005, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") announced that it has reached an agreement with VNU, Inc. to develop and deploy, by year end 2005, a national test marketing pilot panel of more than 6,000 U.S. households for the measurement of media return on investment to advertisers. As a result of this pilot panel test, the Company expects to incur up to approximately $11.3 million of additional expenditures in 2005, approximately $4.3 million of which would constitute expenses that have a direct impact on the Companys net income and approximately $7.0 million of which would be capitalizable.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20050511102446.txt.gz
TIME:20050511102446
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure
      On May 11, 2005, the attached presentation was given at the Baird Growth Stock Conference. A copy of the presentation is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, and is incorporated herein by reference.
      The information contained in this report on Form 8-K, including Exhibit 99.1, shall not be deemed "filed" with the Securities and Exchange Commission nor incorporated by reference in any registration statement filed by the Company under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
 
      Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20050606104338.txt.gz
TIME:20050606104338
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
On June 1, 2005, Mr. William J. Walsh, Executive Vice President, Finance and Planning and Chief Financial Officer of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company"), informed the Board of Directors of the Company of his intention to retire from the Company, and in connection therewith to relinquish such positions. Mr. Walsh indicated that he intends to continue with the Company in his current capacity until a suitable successor is identified and the orderly transition of such successor has occurred. Mr. Walsh has been with the Company for over 40 years, most recently serving as the Companys Executive Vice President, Finance and Planning and Chief Financial Officer since its spin-off from Ceridian Corporation in March 2001. The Company has initiated a search for a new Chief Financial Officer, and in connection therewith, has retained an executive search firm to assist it in such process. A copy of the press release issued by the Company on June 6, 2005 announcing Mr. Walshs pending retirement from the Company is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this current report on Form 8-K.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(a) Not applicable. (b) Not applicable. (c) Exhibits 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated June 6, 2005
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press Release
Company Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 212-887-1314 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor Relations Contact: Todd Fromer KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215
tfromer@kcsa.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced that Bill Walsh, executive vice president, Finance and Planning & chief financial officer of the company, has indicated his intention to retire.
NEW YORK, June 6, 2005 
Mr. Walsh, who has been with the company for more than 40 years, has agreed to continue in his current role until a new CFO is in place.
Stephen Morris, president and chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc., made the following comments on Mr. Walsh's retirement, "We extend our most sincere gratitude to Bill for his long and dedicated service to Arbitron, and are especially grateful for his counsel during our spin-off from Ceridian in March of 2001. Under his leadership, we established the necessary systems and financial controls to effectively manage the business and meet the stringent requirements associated with being a public company. Through his diligence and foresight, we have successfully managed our growth and are well positioned to execute on our strategic initiatives going forward."
Arbitron has retained a leading executive search firm to conduct a search for a new chief financial officer.
Arbitron will host a brief conference call at 9:00 a.m. ET today, June 6, to entertain any questions from the investment community related to this announcement. Management will not address issues beyond the scope of this announcement on today's conference call.
Conference Call: Schedule and Access
To listen to the call, dial the following telephone number: 877-780-2271 (Domestic) and 973-582-2737 (International).
The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: , and .
www.arbitron.com
www.ccbn.com
www.streetevents.com
There will be a replay available from 12 p.m. on June 6, 2005, through 11:59 p.m. on June 13, 2005. Please call: 877-519-4471 (Domestic); 973-341-3080 (International); ID Code for Replay: 6141698.
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies, outdoor advertising companies and the online radio ratings industry in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has also developed the Portable People Meter (PPM), a new technology for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by its research and technology organization, located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1,700 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
PPM
SM
is a service mark of Arbitron Inc.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20050616172433.txt.gz
TIME:20050616172433
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On June 10, 2005, the Third Amendment to Note Purchase Agreement (the "Amendment") was entered into among Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") and John Hancock Life Insurance Company, John Hancock Variable Life Insurance Company, Signature 4 Limited and Signature 5 L.P., each one of the Note Holders party thereto (the "Note Holders"), effective as of June 2, 2005. The Amendment amends various provisions of the Note Purchase Agreement dated as of January 31, 2001, as amended. The Amendment: (i) deletes certain requirements to make mandatory offers to prepay, (ii) amends certain notice requirements applicable to the Company, (iii) deletes interest rate hedging obligations, (iv) eliminates or loosens the restrictions applicable under various negative covenants, including those relating to liens, acquisitions, indebtedness, the creation of joint ventures, contingent obligations, investments, the payment of dividends and distributions, certain financial covenants, dispositions of and investments in any foreign s ubsidiary, capital expenditures and sale and leasebacks and (v) amends and adds certain definitions in connection with the foregoing. The foregoing description of the Amendment is qualified in its entirety by reference to the actual Amendment which is filed as an Exhibit hereto, and is incorporated by reference hereto.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Third Amendment to Note Purchase Agreement
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

THIS THIRD AMENDMENT TO NOTE PURCHASE AGREEMENT (""), dated as of June 2, 2005, is entered into by and among ARBITRON INC. (f/k/a Ceridian Corporation), a Delaware corporation (the "), and each of the Note Holders party to the Note Agreement referred to below (collectively, the "").
Amendment
Company"
Note Holders
A. The Company and the Note Holders are parties to a Note Purchase Agreement dated as of January 31, 2001, as amended on March 29, 2001 and June 10, 2002 (collectively, the ") pursuant to which the Company has issued certain Senior Secured Notes to the Note Holders.
Note Agreement
B. The Company has requested that the Note Holders agree to certain amendments of the Note Agreement and the schedules thereto.
C. The Note Holders are willing to amend the Note Agreement and the schedules thereto, subject to the terms and conditions of this Amendment.
NOW, THEREFORE, for valuable consideration, the receipt and adequacy of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
(a) .
Definitions
The definition of "" in Section 1.01 of the Note Agreement is hereby amended in its entirety to provide as follows:
Aggregate Distributable Income
"" means an amount equal to 50% of Consolidated Net Income (positive or negative) calculated on a cumulative basis through December 31, 2004, an amount equal to 75% of Consolidated Net Income (positive or negative) calculated on a cumulative basis from and after January 1, 2005, based on the year-end financial statements delivered to the Note Holders pursuant to ,; that any and all amounts paid out of Aggregate Distributable Income pursuant to , or pursuant to any equivalent provision in the Loan Documents shall reduce the amount of Aggregate Distributable Income on a dollar for dollar basis.
Aggregate Distributable Income
plus
Section 6.01(a)
provided
Section 7.07(a)(ii)
Section 7.07(a)(iv)
The definition of "" shall hereby be added to Section 1.01 of the Note Agreement to provide as follows:
Compensation Equity Issuance Proceeds
"" means all proceeds received by the Company or its Subsidiaries from the sale or issuance of any of its respective capital stock, to the extent in connection with or arising out of any stock-based employee compensation plan (including without limitation, stock option and restricted stock plans) operated by the Company or a Subsidiary since the Spin-Off Consummation Date.
Compensation Equity Issuance Proceeds
The definition of "" is hereby amended by inserting the following at the end of thereof:
Contingent Obligation
subparagraph (a)
and without duplication with respect to any other obligation hereunder and to the extent not otherwise Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary, any obligation, whether, direct or indirect, or primary or secondary, to maintain the financial condition of any Permitted Joint Venture or to pay any obligation of any Permitted Joint Venture or to pay any obligation incurred in connection with exiting or terminating a Permitted Joint Venture
The definition of "" is hereby amended in its entirety to provide as follows:
Foreign Permitted Joint Venture
"" means any Permitted Joint Venture organized and existing under the laws of any jurisdiction other than the United States or any state thereof."
Foreign Permitted Joint Venture
The definition of "" is hereby amended in its entirety to provide as follows:
Leverage Ratio
"" means, as of any date of determination, for Company and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, the ratio of () Consolidated Funded Indebtedness, plus Contingent Obligations described in , as of such date plus, without duplication with any of the foregoing, the amount of any unfunded or unperformed commitment by the Company or any Subsidiary to provide funding to or make an investment in a Permitted Joint Venture to () Consolidated EBITDA for the period of the four fiscal quarters ending on such date.
Leverage Ratio
a
Sections 7.05(h) and 7.05(i)
b
The definition of "" in is hereby amended in its entirety to provide as follows:
Note Documents
Section 1.01
"" means the New Credit Facility, the Intercreditor Agreement and each note, security agreement, pledge agreement, control agreement, borrowing request, fee letter, certificate and other agreement, document or instrument executed or delivered in connection therewith.
Loan Documents
The definition of "" in of the Note Agreement is hereby amended in its entirety to provide as follows:
Permitted Acquisition
Section 1.01
"" means any Acquisition as to which all of the following conditions are satisfied: () (i) total cash and non-cash consideration (including any deferred payment) paid or required to be paid by the Company and its Subsidiaries in connection with such Acquisition does not exceed $30,000,000 after giving effect to such Acquisition, total cash and non-cash consideration (including any deferred payment) paid or required to be paid by the Company and its Subsidiaries in connection with all such Acquisitions in any fiscal year does not exceed $50,000,000, or (ii) with respect to any Acquisition which does not satisfy the conditions set forth in subsection (a)(i) above, on or before the consummation thereof, the Company shall have provided Note Holders a certificate executed by a Responsible Officer of the Company presenting calculations showing compliance with the covenants set forth in for the Test Period then most recently ended, on a basis, as if such Acquisition had occurred on the first day of such Test Period (including giving effect on such date to any new Indebtedness incurred in connection with such Acquisition); () after giving effect to such Acquisition, the Person, or business or division of such Person, so acquired shall be a Wholly Owned Subsidiary of the Company or one of its Subsidiaries; and () immediately after giving effect to such Acquisition, there shall exist no Default or Event of Default.
Permitted Acquisition
a
and
Sections 7.10 and 7.11
pro forma
b
c
The definition of "" shall hereby be added to of the Note Agreement to provide as follows:
Permitted Joint Ventures
Section 1.01
"" means (A) any joint venture between (x) the Company and/or one or more of its Subsidiaries and (y) any Person involving any Intellectual Property or Proprietary Information of the Company or any Subsidiary; provided the following conditions are at all times satisfied: () such Person is an entity duly formed and existing under the Laws of its jurisdiction of incorporation or organization; () the assets and property of such joint venture consisting of Intellectual Property or Proprietary Information made available by the Company or any Subsidiary to the joint venture may be licensed to the joint venture pursuant to license agreements that provide such license and the right of the joint venture or such Person to use such Intellectual Property or Proprietary Information (I) is revocable or non-revocable and/or (II) is exclusive or non-exclusive; and () the amount of any Investment made by the Company or Subsidiary in, or the value of any assets and property of such Person not consisting of Intellectual Property or Proprietary Information contributed by such Person to, such joint venture does not cause a breach of or any other Default or Event of Default and (B) any Permitted Nielsen JV.
Permitted Joint Ventures
i
ii
iii
Section 7.11
The definition of "" is hereby amended by deleting everything following the word "Agreement" in clause (iv) thereof and replacing it with a period, and inserting the word "and" immediately prior to clause (iv).
Permitted Nielsen JV
The definition of "" shall hereby be added to of the Note Agreement to provide as follows:
Priority Debt
Section 1.01
"" means at any time, without duplication, the sum of () all Indebtedness of the Company and of any Subsidiaries secured by Liens other than by Liens permitted by Sections 7.01 (b), (g), (h), (k) and (l), and () all unsecured Indebtedness of Subsidiaries; , that there shall be excluded from the definition of Priority Debt () any Indebtedness of a Wholly Owned Subsidiary to the Company or a Wholly Owned Subsidiary, and () the Guaranties by Subsidiaries of the Notes and guaranties of any other Indebtedness incurred after the date hereof if the holders of the Guaranties and such other guaranties execute and deliver an intercreditor agreement providing for the pro rata sharing of payments made pursuant to such Guaranties and guaranties, on terms reasonably satisfactory to the Required Note Holders.
Priority Debt
a
b
provided
i
ii
(b) . of the Note Agreement shall be hereby amended by deleting in its entirety, and all references to or any subsection of appearing elsewhere in the Note Agreement are hereby also deleted.
Mandatory Offers to Make Prepayments
Section 2.05
Section 2.05
Section 2.05
Section 2.05
(c) .
Affirmative Covenants
(i) . of the Note Agreement is hereby amended in its entirety to provide as follows:
Forecasts
Section 6.01(d)
(d) on or before January 31 of each fiscal year, a consolidated financial forecast for the Company and its Subsidiaries for such fiscal year, including forecasted consolidated balance sheets, consolidated statements of income, shareholders' equity and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries, which forecast shall () state the assumptions used in the preparation thereof, () contain such other information as reasonably requested by any Note Holder and () be in form reasonably satisfactory to the Required Note Holders.
A
B
C
(ii) . of the Note Agreement is hereby amended in its entirety to provide as follows:
Notice of Material Litigation
Section 6.03(c)
(c) of the commencement of, or any material development in, any litigation or proceeding affecting the Company or any Subsidiary which would reasonably be expected to: () have a Material Adverse Effect (and taking into account the reasonable likelihood of an adverse decision), () if adversely resolved against such Person, result in the imposition of an injunction or other stay of the performance of this Agreement or any Note Document or the consummation of the Spin-Off Transaction, or () involve an aggregate liability of $2,000,000 (or its equivalent in another currency) or more.
i
ii
iii
(iii) . of the Note Agreement is hereby amended in its entirety to provide as follows:
JV Notices
Section 6.03(k)
(k) of () the exercise or termination of any option under the Nielsen JV Option Agreement or any other joint venture involving the Company or any Subsidiary, () the formation of the Nielsen JV or any other joint venture involving the Company or any Subsidiary, () any decision by the Company not to commercially deploy the PPM Technology, and () the occurrence of any material breach or default under the terms of the Nielsen JV Option Agreement, the Scarborough Partnership Agreement or any other Permitted Joint Venture.
i
ii
iii
iv
(iv) . of the Note Agreement is hereby amended in its entirety to provide as follows:
Notice of Loss or Disposition
Section 6.03(m)
(m) of the occurrence of any Event of Loss or Disposition with respect to any assets of the Company or any Material Subsidiary (other than New Ceridian), where the fair value of the assets exceed on an aggregate basis, for each such occurrence, $1,000,000.
(v) . of the Note Agreement is hereby amended in its entirety to provide as follows:
Interest Rate Protection
Section 6.10
[Intentionally Omitted]
6.10 Interest Rate Protection.
(d) .
Negative Covenants
of the Note Agreement is hereby amended in its entirety to provide as follows:
Article VII
The Company hereby covenants and agrees that, so long as any of the Notes shall remain outstanding, or any other Obligation shall remain unpaid or unsatisfied, unless the Required Note Holders waive compliance in writing.
Article VII
.
Negative Covenants
.
(a) any Lien created under any Note Document;
7.02 Mergers and Consolidations.
(b) shall not prohibit:
Section 7.02(a)
(i) Permitted Acquisitions;
7.03 Indebtedness.
(i) the Obligations;
7.04 Disposition of Assets.
(b) shall not apply to or restrict:
Section 7.04(a)
(e) Contingent Obligations incurred pursuant to the Loan Documents;
(d) Investments resulting in Permitted Acquisitions;
(g) Contingent Obligations permitted by ;
Section 7.05
(h) Investments permitted by ;
Section 7.02
(j) Investments consisting of PPM Expenditures;
7.07 Dividends and Payments.
Intentionally omitted.]
7.09 Hostile Acquisition. [
7.15 Certain Contracts.
7.16 Transactions with Affiliates.
[Intentionally omitted.]
7.17 Capital Expenditures.
[Intentionally omitted.]
7.18 Sales and Leasebacks.
(a) No Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing.
5. .
Miscellaneous
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have executed and delivered this Amendment as of the date first above written.
ARBITRON INC. (f/k/a Ceridian Corporation)
By:
/s/ William J. Walsh
Title:
EVP Finance & Planning & CFO
JOHN HANCOCK LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY
By:
/s/ Gary M. Pelletier
Title:
Managing Director
JOHN HANCOCK VARIABLE LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY
By:
/s/ Gary M. Pelletier
Title:
MS Signatory
SIGNATURE 4 LIMITED
By John Hancock Life Insurance Company, as Portfolio Advisor
By:
/s/ Gary M. Pelletier
Title:
MS Signatory
SIGNATURE 5 L.P.
By John Hancock Life Insurance Company, as Portfolio Advisor
By:
/s/ Gary M. Pelletier
Title:
MS Signatory
The undersigned, each a Guarantor with respect to Company's Obligations to the Note Holders under the terms of the Note Agreement, each hereby (i) acknowledge and consent to the execution, delivery and performance by Company of the foregoing Amendment to Note Purchase Agreement dated as of June 2, 2005 (the ""), and (ii) reaffirm and agree that the respective Guaranty as to which each of the undersigned is party, and all other Note Documents and agreements executed and delivered by the undersigned to the Note Holders in connection with the Note Agreement, are in full force and effect without defense, offset or counterclaim.
Amendment
All capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined shall have the meanings assigned to them in the Note Agreement.
This Guarantor Acknowledgment and Consent may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original, but all such counterparts together shall constitute but one instrument.
ARBITRON HOLDINGS INC.
By:
/s/ William J. Walsh


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20050721083106.txt.gz
TIME:20050721083106
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 21, 2005, we issued a press release reporting 2005 second quarter financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated July 21, 2005.
This Form 8-K and the attached Exhibit are furnished to comply with Item 2.02 and Item 9.01 of Form 8-K. Neither this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit are to be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 (except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing).
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press Release
Arbitron Inc. Phone: 212-887-1408 bill.walsh@arbitron.com
Company Contact: Bill Walsh, CFO
KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215 tfromer@kcsa.com
Investor Relations Contact: Todd Fromer
Arbitron Inc. 212-887-1314 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Media contact: Thom Mocarsky
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2005.
NEW YORK, July 21, 2005 
For the second quarter 2005, the Company reported revenue of $69.8 million, an increase of 7.3 percent over revenue of $65.1 million during the second quarter of 2004. Costs and expenses for the second quarter increased by 4.5 percent, from $53.1 million in 2004 to $55.4 million in 2005. Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for the quarter were $18.6 million, an increase of 17.2 percent over EBIT of $15.9 million during the comparable period last year.
Income tax expense for the second quarter declined 45.1 percent, from $ 5.5 million in 2004 to $3.0 million in 2005 due in part to the previously announced reversal of certain tax liabilities for contingencies related to prior periods.
Net income for the second quarter increased by 78.7 percent from $8.6 million in 2004 to $15.4 million in 2005.
Net income per share for the second quarter 2005 increased to $0.48 (diluted), compared with $0.27 (diluted) during the comparable period last year.
For the six months ended June 30, 2005, revenue was $149.0 million, an increase of 5.2 percent over the same period last year. EBIT was $51.3 million, compared to $47.8 million in 2004. Net income for the six months was $35.2 million or $1.11 per share (diluted), compared with $26.7 million or $0.85 per share (diluted) during the comparable period last year.
Commenting on the results for the second quarter, Stephen Morris, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron, said: "We made steady progress on our two key growth initiativesthe Houston market demonstration of the Portable People Meter and the pilot panel for Project Apollo, the national marketing research service which would collect multi-media and purchase information from a common sample of consumers At the same time, we continued to invest in the quality of our core services in order to enhance the value that we provide our customers."
"Arbitron went to Houston to demonstrate our ability to recruit a PPM panel in an ethnically diverse market, and to show that consumers will participate in a PPM ratings panel. As of June 30, when we completed as planned the recruitment of 2,100 consumers for the Houston PPM demonstration market, key ethnic and racial groups are well represented in the installed panel."
"We will use the Houston PPM demonstration to maintain our leadership role in the effort to bring electronic measurement to radio. Just yesterday, the Radio Advertising Bureau released a comprehensive study by Forrester Research on the economic effects that the PPM would have on the radio business. The radio industry is now seriously considering how to make the transition from diaries to electronic measures. We believe that no other company has the infrastructure, the experience, and the resolve to see an initiative of this magnitude through in the rapid timeframe that the radio industry is likely to demand."
"For Project Apollo, Arbitron and VNU are working diligently on the launch of the pilot market research panel that we announced in early May. While Project Apollo costs and expenses for the second quarter were less than we anticipated, we expect that the pilot panel of nearly 15,000 persons will be up and running as planned by the end of the year. We also expect that we will be on target with our planned total-year spending for this venture at that time."
Company Outlook for 2005
Arbitron is also providing guidance on its earnings outlook for the third quarter 2005 and is reaffirming its guidance for the full year 2005.
For the third quarter 2005, Arbitron expects revenue to increase between 4.5 percent and 6.5 percent compared to the third quarter of last year. Earnings Per Share (diluted) for the third quarter 2005 is expected to be between $0.59 and $0.61 versus $0.77 in the third quarter 2004.
Arbitron's year end guidance remains unchanged. Arbitron expects year-end 2005 revenue to increase between 5 percent and 7 percent over year-end 2004 revenue. Earnings Before Interest & Taxes (EBIT) for 2005 is expected to be between $97.0 million and $98.9 million. Net Income is expected to be between $62.7 million and $64.0 million in 2005. Earnings Per Share (diluted) for the year ending December 31, 2005 is expected to be between $1.99 and $2.03 based on the Company's estimate of the average number of diluted shares outstanding in 2005.
Earnings conference call: schedule and access
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. EDT on July 21 to discuss its second quarter results and other relevant matters. To listen to the call, dial the following telephone number: 877-780-2271. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audiences and marketing information. The Company is developing the PPM, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1700 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
PPM
SM
is a mark of Arbitron Inc.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
Note: Earnings before interest and income taxes (EBIT) and earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA) are widely used measures of operating performance. They are presented as supplemental information that management of Arbitron believes is useful to investors to evaluate the Company's results because they exclude certain items that are not directly related to the Company's core operating performance. EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income taxes, depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered as substitutes either for net income, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
Note: EBIT guidance was given in the Arbitron first quarter 2005 earnings conference call because the management of Arbitron believes it is useful to investors to evaluate the Company's projected results because it excludes certain items that are not directly related to the Company's core operating performance. EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBIT should not be considered as a substitute either for net income, as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20050801154529.txt.gz
TIME:20050801154529
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On August 1, 2005, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") announced that it had selected Sean R. Creamer to serve as its new Executive Vice President, Finance and Planning, and Chief Financial Officer. Mr. Creamer will replace William Walsh, who is retiring at the end of the year. It is expected that Mr. Creamer will assume his position in September. For a summary description of the principal terms of his employment, see the disclosure set forth in Item 5.02 below, which disclosure is hereby incorporated by reference.
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
Mr. Creamer, 40, was previously Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Laureate Education, Inc., a NASDAQ-listed education services firm. Mr. Creamer worked at Laureate Education, Inc. for the past nine years and was responsible at various times for financial planning and analysis, accounting, budgeting, investor relations, real estate, risk management, tax and treasury functions at the company. Mr. Creamer will not enter into an employment agreement with the Company, but the Company has agreed to certain compensation arrangements as a condition to Mr. Creamer accepting his offer of employment. Mr. Creamer will receive an initial annual base salary of $350,000, plus a $50,000 signing bonus. He will be eligible to receive an annual bonus based on performance, which bonus may be up to 100% of his base salary (50% if target performance is achieved). Upon commencement of his employment, Mr. Creamer will receive 15,000 shares of restricted common stock that will vest over a 60-month perio d, and options to purchase 20,000 shares of common stock at a price equal to the current market price of the Companys common stock, which options will have a 10-year term and will be fully vested. The Company also has agreed that Mr. Creamer will receive options to purchase at least 30,000 shares of common stock in 2006. Future base salary, bonus and incentive compensation determinations for Mr. Creamer will be made by the Compensation and Human Resources Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company. It is expected that Mr. Creamer will enter into a retention agreement similar to that entered into by other executive officers of the Company that provides for severance payments under some circumstances. Under this agreement, if Mr. Creamer is terminated other than for cause, and the termination is not a change of control termination, he will receive a lump-sum cash payment in the amount of 12 months of base salary and bonus if he has fewer than 15 years of service, or 15 months of base salary and bonus if he has 15 or more years of service. The agreement will provide that following a change of control termination, he will be entitled to receive a lump-sum payment that is equal to 18 months of base salary and bonus if he has fewer than 15 years of service, or 21 months of base salary and bonus if he has 15 or more years of service. In addition, under this agreement, Mr. Creamer will be provided, for a period of between 12 and 21 months following termination without cause or a change of control termination, or, if sooner, until reemployment with equivalent benefit, with the same or equivalent health, dental, accidental death and dismemberment, short-term and long-term disability, life insurance coverage, and all other insurance and other health and welfare benefits programs he or she was entitled to on the day before the termination. Upon a change of control, the vesting and exercisability of stock options and the vesting of other awards under the Companys stock-based compensation plans will accelerate. For purposes of the agreement, a "change of control" is generally defined as any of the following: (i) a merger or consolidation involving the Company if less than 50% of its voting stock after the merger or consolidation is held by persons who were stockholders before the merger or consolidation; (ii) a sale of the assets of the Company substantially as an entirety; (iii) ownership by a person or group acting in concert of at least 51% of the Companys voting securities; (iv) ownership by a person or group acting in concert of between 25% and 50% of the Companys voting securities if such ownership was not approved the Companys Board of Directors; (v) approval by the Companys stockholders of a plan for the liquidation of the Company; (vi) specified changes in the composition of the Companys Board of Directors; or (vii) any other events or transactions the Companys Board of Directors determines constitute a change of control. If payments to Mr. Creamer under the retention agreement would result in imposition of an excise tax under Section 4999 of the Internal Revenue Code, he will also be entitled to be paid an amount to compensate for the imposition of the tax. The payment will be in an amount such that after payment of all taxes, income and excise, he will be in the same after-tax position as if no excise tax had been imposed. A copy of the press release issued by the Company on August 1, 2005 announcing the selection of Mr. Creamer for appointment as executive vice president, Finance and Planning, and Chief Financial Officer to the Company is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this current report on Form 8-K.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(a) Not applicable. (b) Not applicable. (c) Exhibits 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated August 1, 2005
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Company Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 212-887-1314 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor Relations Contact: Todd Fromer KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215 tfromer@kcsa.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced that it has selected Sean R. Creamer, 40, for the position of executive vice president, Finance and Planning, and chief financial officer. Mr. Creamer will replace Bill Walsh, who recently announced his intention to retire by the end of the year. It is expected that Mr. Creamer will assume the position in September.
NEW YORK, August 1, 2005 
Mr. Creamer was previously senior vice president and chief financial officer of Laureate Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: LAUR), an education services firm with projected 2005 revenues in excess of $800 million and current operations in 13 countries worldwide. During his nine-year tenure with the company, Mr. Creamer was responsible for financial planning and analysis, accounting, budgeting, investor relations, real estate, risk management, tax, and treasury functions.
While at Laureate Education, he was also involved in over $500 million of acquisitions, over $500 million in debt and equity transactions, and in divestitures which generated over $1 billion in proceeds. He was also a member of the company's Executive Committee, which was responsible for global corporate strategy and capital allocation decisions.
Previously, Mr. Creamer was a tax manager for Mobil Oil Corporation where he was responsible for overseeing tax consolidation and reporting for the company's domestic operations. He began his career in auditing and tax with Price Waterhouse.
Stephen Morris, president and chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc., made the following comments on Mr. Creamer's appointment: "Sean is a highly capable and experienced chief financial officer with a strong track record in difficult and complex business issues, as well as in Sarbanes-Oxley compliance. His financial expertise, as well as his experience in determining and driving overall corporate strategy, will be an asset to Arbitron. I am particularly gratified that, with Sean's expected arrival in September, there will be ample time for a smooth transition with Bill Walsh, our current CFO, who will be staying with Arbitron through the end of the year. We look forward to Sean's contributions and most sincerely welcome him to the company."
Mr. Creamer received a B.S. in Accounting, magna cum laude, from St. Joseph's University in Philadelphia, PA, and an M.S. in Taxation, with highest honors, from Georgetown University in Washington, DC.
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies, outdoor advertising companies and the online radio ratings industry in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has also developed the Portable People Meter (PPM), a new technology for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by its research and technology organization, located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1,700 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
PPM
SM
is a service mark of Arbitron Inc.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20051020073804.txt.gz
TIME:20051020073804
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 20, 2005, we issued a press release reporting 2005 third quarter financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated October 20, 2005.
This Form 8-K and the attached Exhibit are furnished to comply with Item 2.02 and Item 9.01 of Form 8-K. Neither this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit are to be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 (except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing).
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Release
Company Contact: Bill Walsh, CFO
Arbitron Inc. Phone: 212-887-1408 bill.walsh@arbitron.com
KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215 tfromer@kcsa.com
Investor Relations Contact: Todd Fromer
Arbitron Inc. 212-887-1314 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Media contact: Thom Mocarsky
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2005.
NEW YORK, October 20, 2005 
For the third quarter 2005, the Company reported revenue of $85.6 million, an increase of 4.5 percent over revenue of $82.0 million during the third quarter of 2004. A planned increase in expenses for the Houston Portable People Meter market demonstration and for the rollout of the Project Apollo pilot contributed to an increase in costs and expenses for the third quarter of 11.8 percent, from $47.1 million in 2004 to $52.7 million in 2005. Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for the quarter were $33.1 million, a decrease of 1.8 percent compared to EBIT of $33.7 million during the third quarter last year.
Income tax expense for the third quarter 2005 increased by $4.1 million over the same period last year due in part to a third quarter 2004 reversal of certain reserves for tax contingencies and a third quarter 2004 reduction in the valuation allowance on certain deferred tax assets which together amounted to a benefit of $4.2 million in the third quarter of 2004.
Net income for the third quarter decreased by 13.7 percent from $24.2 million in 2004 to $20.9 million in 2005.
Net income per share for the third quarter 2005 decreased to $0.66 (diluted), compared with $0.77 (diluted) during the comparable period last year.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2005, revenue was $234.6 million, an increase of 4.9 percent over the $223.6 million in the same period last year. EBIT was $84.4 million, compared to $81.5 million in 2004. Net income for the nine months was $56.1 million or $1.77 per share (diluted), compared with $50.9 million or $1.62 per share (diluted) during the comparable period last year.
Commenting on the results for the third quarter, Stephen Morris, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron, said: "We achieved our third quarter goals for revenue and for profitability. Our core business remains strong, and we continue to invest in new services that have growth potential for our company and for our customers."
"Two projects which are key to our growth initiativesthe Houston market demonstration of the Portable People Meter ratings system and the pilot panel for Project Apollo, the national marketing research service which would collect multi-media and purchase information from a common sample of consumers both achieved important milestones in the third quarter."
"In Houston, we delivered the first radio and television audience estimates, which confirmed the basic rating outcomes we saw in the Philadelphia trial of 2002-2003. We also showed that we could recruit and maintain a sample that is representative of the diverse Houston marketplace, particularly in terms of African-Americans and Spanish-speaking Hispanics, an important consideration for Arbitron and the media industry."
"For Project Apollo, the consumers who will participate in our proposed pilot panel have been successfully recruited and ACNielsen HomeScan has made all preparations necessary to begin installing the PPM equipment as it arrives. In addition to Procter and Gamble, we have recently signed an agreement with a second subscriber for the pilot panel data and are in final contract discussions with several others."
Company Updates Outlook for Year-End 2005
Arbitron is also providing guidance on its earnings outlook for the fourth quarter 2005 and is updating its guidance for the full year 2005.
For the fourth quarter 2005, Arbitron expects revenue to be between $75 million and $77 million, an increase between 2.9 percent and 5.6 percent compared to the fourth quarter of last year. Earnings Per Share (diluted) for the fourth quarter 2005 are expected to be between $0.29 and $0.33 versus $0.31 in the fourth quarter 2004.
Arbitron is updating its year-end guidance for 2005. Arbitron now expects year-end 2005 revenue to be between $309 million and $311 million, an increase of between 4.2 percent and 4.9 percent over year-end 2004 revenue. This compares to its previous estimate of an increase of 5 percent to 7 percent. Earnings Before Interest & Taxes (EBIT) for 2005 is now expected to be between $99.0 million and $101.0 million as compared to the previous estimated range of $97.0 million to $98.9 million. Net Income for 2005 is now expected to be between $64.9 million and $66.2 million as compared to the previous estimate of $62.7 million to $64.0 million. Earnings Per Share (diluted) for the year ending December 31, 2005 are now expected to be between $2.06 and $2.10 based on the Company's estimate of the average number of diluted shares outstanding in 2005. Previously, the 2005 Earnings Per Share (diluted) estimate was $1.99 to $2.03.
Earnings conference call: schedule and access
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. EDT on October 20 to discuss its third quarter results and other relevant matters. To listen to the call, dial the following telephone number: 877-780-2271. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audiences and marketing information. The Company is developing the PPM, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1700 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
PPM is a mark of Arbitron Inc.
SM
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
Note: Earnings before interest and income taxes (EBIT) and earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA) are widely used measures of operating performance. They are presented as supplemental information that management of Arbitron believes is useful to investors to evaluate the Company's results because they exclude certain items that are not directly related to the Company's core operating performance. EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered as substitutes either for net income, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
Note: EBIT guidance was given in the Arbitron third quarter 2005 earnings conference call because the management of Arbitron believes it is useful to investors to evaluate the Company's projected results because it excludes certain items that are not directly related to the Company's core operating performance. EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBIT should not be considered as a substitute either for net income, as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20051116113450.txt.gz
TIME:20051116113450
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
On November 15, 2005, the Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") elected Ms. Shellye L. Archambeau as a member of the Board of Directors of the Company and appointed her as a member of the Boards Technology Committee, both of which appointments were effective immediately. Ms. Archambeau has served as Chief Executive Officer of MetricStream Inc. (formerly Zaplet, Inc.), an enterprise software provider, since 2002. A copy of the press release issued by the Company on November 15, 2005 announcing Ms. Archambeaus nomination is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this current report on Form 8-K.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(a) Not applicable. (b) Not applicable. (c) Not applicable. (d) Exhibits. 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated November 15, 2005.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK; November 15, 2005  Shellye L. Archambeau, chief executive officer, MetricStream, Inc., has been named to the board of directors at Arbitron Inc. Ms. Archambeau brings nearly 20 years experience creating sales growth in enterprise software and technology firms that serve domestic and international markets.
"As Arbitron deploys a growing number high-tech solutions in our media and marketing research services, Ms. Archambeau's insight and experience will be a great benefit to Arbitron's senior executives as we invest in the initiatives that will help drive the company's future growth," said Steve Morris, president and chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc.
Since 2002, Ms. Archambeau has been the chief executive officer of MetricStream Inc. (formerly Zaplet, Inc.), a provider of enterprise software that allows corporations in diverse industries such as automotive, food, pharmaceuticals, manufacturing and electronics to manage quality processes, regulatory and industry-mandated compliance activities and corporate governance initiatives.
Prior to MetricStream, Ms. Archambeau was chief marketing officer and executive vice president of sales for Loudcloud, Inc., responsible for all global sales and marketing activities. At Loudcloud, she led the transformation into an enterprise-focused company while growing sales by 50 percent year-over-year. Previously, Ms. Archambeau served as chief marketing officer for NorthPoint Communications, where she led the design and implementation of all sales and marketing strategies. Ms. Archambeau also served as president of Blockbuster, Inc.'s e-commerce division and was recognized by Internet World as one of the Top 25 "Click and Mortar" executives in the country in June of 2000. Ms. Archambeau spent the prior 15 years at IBM, holding several domestic and international executive positions.
Ms. Archambeau is a current member of the Information Technology Senior Management Forum, the Forum of Women Entrepreneurs and the Women's Council to the Board of Trustees for the University of Pennsylvania. She has sat on the Council on Foreign Relations and has been inducted into the National Hall of Fame of the Negro Business and Professional Women's Club.
Ms. Archambeau earned a bachelor of science at the University of Pennsylvania, Wharton School of Business and attended the IBM Business Management Institute in Brazil.
With the addition of Ms. Archambeau, the Arbitron Inc. Board of Directors consists of: Lawrence Perlman, nonexecutive chairman, formerly chairman and chief executive officer of Ceridian Corporation; Shellye Archambeau, chief executive officer of MetricStream Inc.; Alan Aldworth, chairman, president and chief executive officer of ProQuest Company; Erica Farber, publisher and chief executive officer of Radio and Records, Inc.; Philip Guarascio, chairman and chief executive officer of PG Ventures LLC, formerly vice president and general manager of General Motors Corporation in charge of North America Advertising and Corporate Marketing; Larry E. Kittelberger, senior vice president, Administration, and chief information officer of Honeywell International Inc., formerly senior vice president and chief information officer of Lucent Technologies Inc.; Stephen B. Morris, president & chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc.; Luis G. Nogales, managing partner, Nogales Investors LLC; Richard A. Post, private investor; formerly managing partner of LoneTree Capital Partners.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has also developed the Portable People Meter (PPM), a new technology for media and marketing research.
SM
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by its research and technology organization, located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1,700 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
PPM
SM
is a service mark of Arbitron Inc.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20060124083410.txt.gz
TIME:20060124083410
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On January 24, 2006, we issued a press release reporting 2005 fourth quarter and year end financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated January 24, 2006.
This Form 8-K and the attached Exhibit are furnished to comply with Item 2.02 and Item 9.01 of Form 8-K. Neither this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit are to be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 (except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing).
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Release
Arbitron Inc. Phone: 410-312-8410 sean.creamer@arbitron.com
Company Contact: Sean Creamer, CFO
KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215 todd@kcsa.com
Investor Relations Contact: Todd Fromer
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Media contact: Thom Mocarsky
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2005.
NEW YORK, January 24, 2006 
For the fourth quarter 2005, the Company reported revenue of $75.3 million, an increase of 3.3 percent over revenue of $72.9 million during the fourth quarter of 2004. Costs and expenses for the fourth quarter increased by 2.7 percent, from $62.1 million in 2004 to $63.8 million in 2005. Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for the quarter were $17.0 million, an increase of 0.4 percent compared with EBIT of $16.9 million for the fourth quarter of 2004. Interest expense for the quarter declined 43.9 percent, from $1.7 million in 2004 to $0.9 million in 2005, due to reductions in the Company's long-term debt.
Net income for the quarter was $11.2 million, compared with $9.6 million for the fourth quarter of 2004, an increase of 16.2 percent. Net income per share for the fourth quarter 2005 increased to $0.36 (diluted), compared with $0.31 (diluted) during the comparable period last year.
For the year ended December 31, 2005, revenue was $310.0 million, an increase of 4.5 percent over revenue of $296.6 million for 2004.
A planned increase in expenses for the Houston Portable People Meter (PPM) market demonstration and for the rollout of the Project Apollo pilot contributed to an increase in costs and expenses for the year of 5.2 percent, from $205.7 million in 2004 to $216.3 million in 2005.
EBIT for 2005 increased 3.0 percent to $101.4 million compared with $98.4 million in 2004. Income tax expense for 2005 was $33.2 million, an increase of 7.0 percent over $31.1 million in 2004. Net income for 2005 increased 11.1 percent to $67.3 million compared with $60.6 million in 2004. Net income in 2005 was $2.14 per share (diluted), compared with $1.92 per share (diluted) last year. In 2005 and 2004, the Company recognized a tax benefit relating primarily to the reversal of certain liabilities for tax contingencies related to prior periods in the amounts of $4.7 million and $4.2 million, respectively.
Management comment on 2005 results
Stephen Morris, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron, made the following comments on 2005 results:
"Despite the continuing challenges that confront the industries we serve, Arbitron was able to increase our revenue and our earnings in 2005, all while investing in our Portable People Meter-based growth initiatives."
"These initiatives  deploying the PPM as a local market ratings system and developing the Project Apollo market research service  both made significant progress in terms of marketplace acceptance in 2005."
"To date, we've signed a number of national and regional advertising agencies to PPM contracts. These agencies account for nearly 70 percent of the national ad dollars spent on radio. It's a significant start in our effort to gain a critical mass of industry support for deploying the Portable People Meter as a local market radio ratings system. At the same time, we continue to work with Nielsen Media Research as they consider a potential joint venture with the Portable People Meter."
"For Project Apollo, we reached our goal of installing 5,000 households for the pilot panel in mid-January. This milestone marks the start of a trial period that will showcase the benefits of this unique single-source media and marketing research service. Six advertisers have signed or are in the process of signing agreements for the Project Apollo pilot panel data. These six advertisers, who spend more than $6.2 billion for advertising on measured media, see the opportunity to increase the effectiveness of their advertising in ROI terms with Project Apollo, " said Mr. Morris.
Company Outlook for 2006
Arbitron is also providing guidance on its earnings outlook for the full year and first quarter 2006.
For the full year 2006, Arbitron expects revenue to increase between 6 percent and 8 percent compared to last year. Earnings Per Share (diluted) for the full year 2006 is expected to be between $1.65 and $1.75 versus $2.14 in 2005. Excluding the $4.7 million tax benefit recognized in 2005, Earnings Per Share (diluted) for the year would have been $1.99. The Company's 2006 guidance includes the anticipated impact of the required expensing of stock options that commenced on January 1, 2006 of approximately $8.5 million or approximately $0.17 per share (diluted). The Company's outlook also takes into account the expected substantial expenditures in 2006 for the commercialization of the Portable People Meter and for Project Apollo.
For the first quarter 2006, Arbitron expects revenue to increase between 6 percent and 8 percent compared to the first quarter of last year. Earnings Per Share (diluted) for the first quarter 2006 is expected to be between $0.50 and $0.52 versus $0.63 in the first quarter 2005. The impact of stock option expense in the first quarter 2006 is estimated to be approximately $3.5 million, or approximately $0.07 per share (diluted).
Commenting on factors that would affect Arbitron's performance in 2006, Sean Creamer, chief financial officer, said: "As our 2005 results confirm, our core business remains solid. Looking forward, we will seek to build on this strong financial platform and strengthen our competitive advantage with the commercialization of the Portable People Meter beginning in 2006."
"Moving PPM from concept to commercialization will require that we invest incremental dollars to create the fixed cost infrastructure that will support a large-scale rollout of the Portable People Meter as a local market ratings system. In addition, we must also spend incremental dollars to lay the groundwork for Project Apollo, an additional avenue of growth for Arbitron that's based on the Portable People Meter system."
"We are encouraged by the traction that we are seeing for the PPM and for Project Apollo in the marketplace. The exact route these projects will take to commercialization, and the exact pace we will follow to get there will be determined, in part, by marketplace events in 2006," Mr. Creamer added.
"As we have previously disclosed in our public filings, the additional investments that our PPM business initiatives require, coupled with the required expensing of stock options in 2006, will negatively impact our financial results and will make year-over-year comparability difficult. However, our solid financial footing gives us great confidence as we move ahead on our well-established, long-range strategy around electronic measurement," said Mr. Creamer.
2006 Stock Repurchase Program announced
The company is also announcing that its Board of Directors has authorized a stock repurchase program under which the Company may buy back up to $70 million in shares of the Company's common stock. The Company expects that the shares may be purchased from time to time in either open market or private transactions at then-prevailing market prices through December 31, 2006.
The exact timing and amount of purchases will depend on market conditions. No assurance can be given as to when during the authorized period any shares will be repurchased or as to whether and to what extent any share repurchase will be consummated.
Arbitron previously affected a $40 million stock repurchase program for the year ending December 31, 2005 and a $25 million stock repurchase program for the year ending December 31, 2004.
Earnings conference call: schedule and access
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. ET on January 24th to discuss its fourth quarter results and other relevant matters. To listen to the call, dial the following telephone number: 877-780-2271. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has also developed the Portable People Meter (PPM), a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by its research and technology organization, located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1,700 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
PPM
SM
is a service mark of Arbitron Inc.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
Note: Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) and earnings before interest, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA) are widely used measures of operating performance. They are presented as supplemental information that management of Arbitron believes is useful to investors to evaluate the Company's results because they exclude certain items that are not directly related to the Company's core operating performance. EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered as substitutes either for net income, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20060227094441.txt.gz
TIME:20060227094441
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
     Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
Item 7.01      Regulation FD Disclosure
          Arbitron Inc. is scheduled to present at the Bear Stearns 19 Annual Media Conference to be held at The Breakers Hotel in Palm Beach, Florida on Monday, February 27, 2006. A copy of the slide show presentation to be made at the conference is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
th
          The information contained in this report on Form 8-K, including Exhibit 99.1, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of the Securities and Exchange Commission nor incorporated by reference in any registration statement filed by the Company under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
Item 9.01      Financial Statements and Exhibits
(c)                  Exhibits.
                       99.1      Slide Show Presentation of Arbitron Inc.
 
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20060228160341.txt.gz
TIME:20060228160341
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On February 22, 2006, the Compensation and Human Resources Committee (the "Committee") of the Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") met and approved certain actions relating to executive officer compensation as set forth below: Named Executive Officer Bonuses for 2005 The Committee previously established certain parameters for determining bonuses for executive officers for 2005, which were described in the Companys Current Report on Form 8-K filed on March 1, 2005. As a result of the Committees review and determination of the Companys 2004 performance in comparison to the goals established by the Committee, Mr. Steve Morris, the Companys chief executive officer, will be entitled to a bonus for 2005 in an amount equal to approximately 100% of his 2005 base salary, Mr. Bill Walsh, the Companys former chief financial officer, will be entitled to a bonus for 2005 in an amount equal to approximately 53% of his 2005 base salary, and Mr. Sean Crea mer, the Companys current chief financial officer, will be entitled to a bonus for 2005 in an amount equal to approximately 67% of his 2005 base salary (prorated for the time he was employed by the Company). Bonuses for the Companys other named executive officers include as a component an assessment of their individual performance by Mr. Morris, which assessment has not yet been completed. Stock Option and Restricted Stock Grants The Committee approved grants of stock options and restricted stock to the Companys named executive officers in the following amounts: Steve Morris received 48,500 shares of restricted stock; Pierre Bouvard was granted 35,000 options and 11,667 shares of restricted stock; Owen Charlebois was granted 35,000 options and 11,667 shares of restricted stock; Sean Creamer was granted 15,000 options and 5,000 shares of restricted stock; and Linda Dupree was granted 20,000 options and 6,667 shares of restricted stock. The foregoing grants will be effective as of March 1, 2006. The shares of restricted stock will vest ratably over 4 years, with the first 25% vesting on March 1, 2007 (or December 31, 2006, in the case of Mr. Morris), provided that the executive remains in service with the Company. If the executives service terminates for any reason other than death or disability, any unvested shares will be forfeited. Each of the named executive officers will enter into restricted stock agreements substantially similar to the form of restricted stock agreement filed as Exhibit 10.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, which agreement is incorporated herein by reference. With respect to the option grants, each of the named executive officers will enter into option agreements substantially similar to the form of option agreement previously filed by the Company as an exhibit to its Current Report on Form 8-K on February 23, 2005. Executive Officer Bonus Criteria for 2006 The Committee approved the establishmen t of certain parameters for determining bonuses for executive officers for 2006, which would be payable in early 2007. The Committee set various objective and subjective Company goals in terms of earnings per share, revenue and implementation of certain non-financial initiatives, with certain weightings attributable to achievement of each of these goals. The Committee then established various criteria for achieving "threshold," "target" and "superior" performance in relation to these goals. Under the bonus arrangements currently in place, each executive officers bonus can be weighted to take into account achievement of both Company goals and individual goals. As a general matter, the bulk of an executive officers bonus for 2005 will be determined as a result of achievement of Company goals, with the remaining portion based on achievement of individual goals, except in the case of Mr. Steve Morris, the Companys President and Chief Executive Officer, and Mr. Sean Creamer, the Companys Executive Vice President, Finance and Planning and Chief Financial Officer, whose bonuses will be determined entirely on the basis of achievement of Company goals. Taking into account the foregoing, the Company established a "target" and "superior" bonus for each executive officer, expressed as a percentage of base salary. The target bonuses for the executive officers who are expected to be named executive officers in 2006 are: Mr. Morris, 75% of base salary; Owen Charlebois, the Companys President, Operations, Technology, and Research & Development, 55% of base salary; Mr. Creamer, 50% of base salary; Pierre Bouvard, the Companys President, Sales and Marketing, 52% of base salary; and Linda Dupree, Senior Vice President, Portable People Meter New Product Development, 45% of base salary. The target bonuses for other executive officers range from 40-45% of base salary. If a "superior" bonus level is achieved, individuals are entitled to receive an additional bonus equal to 100% of their "target" bonus. The Committee has the discretion to award bonuses in excess of the percentages set forth above.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
10.1 Arbitron Inc. 1999 Stock Incentive Plan Form of Restricted Stock Agreement
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

THIS AGREEMENT is entered into and effective as of (the "Date of Grant"), by and between Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") and (the "Grantee").
March 1, 2006
     
A. The Company has adopted the Arbitron Inc. 1999 Stock Incentive Plan (as may be amended or supplemented, the "Plan") authorizing the Board of Directors of the Company, or a committee as provided for in the Plan (the Board or such a committee to be referred to as the "Committee"), which permits the grant restricted stock awards to employees of the Company and its Subsidiaries (as defined in the Plan).
B. The Company desires to give the Grantee an inducement to acquire a proprietary interest in the Company and an added incentive to advance the interests of the Company by granting to the Grantee shares of common stock of the Company subject to the vesting conditions set forth below.
Accordingly, the parties agree as follows:
1. .
Grant of Restricted Stock
The Company hereby grants to the Grantee of the Company's common stock, $0.50 par value, (the "Stock") subject to the terms and vesting conditions hereinafter set forth and as set forth in the Plan (the "Restricted Stock").
     
(
     
)
2. .
Issuance and Vesting
2.1 . The Company will issue the Restricted Stock in the name of the Grantee on the Date of Grant.
Issuance
2.2 . Except as provided in Section 3.1 and Section 3.2, the Grantee's right to the Stock under this Restricted Stock Agreement shall vest as to 1/4 of the total number of shares of Stock covered by this grant on March 1, 2007, March 1, 2008, March 1, 2009 and March 1, 2010 (each a "Vesting Date"), provided that Grantee remains in the continuous employ or service of the Company or a Subsidiary on the applicable Vesting Date. The resulting aggregate number of vested shares of Stock will be rounded down to the nearest whole number, and the Grantee cannot vest in more than the number of shares covered by this grant.
Vesting
th
3. .
Termination of Employment
3.1 .
Termination of Employment
(a) . In the event the Grantee's employment with the Company and all Subsidiaries is terminated by reason of death or Disability (as defined in the Plan), the unvested shares of the Grantee's Restricted Stock award will become immediately vested in full.
Termination Due to Death or Disability
(b) . In the event that the Grantee's employment with the Company and all Subsidiaries is terminated for any reason other than death or Disability, or the Grantee is in the employ of a Subsidiary and the Subsidiary ceases to be a Subsidiary of the Company (unless the Grantee continues in the employ of the Company or another Subsidiary), all rights of the Grantee under the Plan and this Agreement will immediately terminate without notice of any kind, and the Grantee will forfeit to the Company all of the shares of Stock subject to this grant that have not yet vested. Accordingly, if shares remain unvested at the time of the Grantee's Retirement (as defined in the Plan), the Grantee will forfeit such unvested shares to the Company at such Retirement.
Termination for Reasons Other Than Death or Disability
3.2 .
Change in Control
(a) . If a Change in Control (as defined in Section 10 of this Agreement) of the Company occurs, and the Restricted Stock has been outstanding for at least two months, the Restricted Stock will become immediately vested in full, regardless of whether the Grantee remains in the employ of the Company or any Subsidiary. In addition, if a Change in Control of the Company occurs, the Committee, in its sole discretion and without the consent of the Grantee, may determine that the Grantee will receive, with respect to some or all of the shares of Restricted Stock slated to become vested on account of any such Change in Control, cash in an amount equal to the excess of the Fair Market Value (as defined in the Plan) of such shares of Restricted Stock immediately prior to the effective date of such Change in Control of the Company over the purchase price per share of the Restricted Stock. Any such cash payment will be made as of the date of such Change in Control.
Impact of Change in Control
(b) . Prior to a Change of Control, the Grantee will have no rights under this Section 3.2, and the Committee will have the authority, in its sole discretion, to rescind, modify or amend this Section 3.2 without the consent of the Grantee.
Authority to Modify Change of Control Provisions
4. .
Escrow
The issuance of the Stock under this grant shall be evidenced in such a manner as the Committee, in its discretion, will deem appropriate, including, without limitation, book-entry, registration or issuance of one or more Stock certificates, with any unvested Restricted Stock bearing the appropriate restrictions imposed by this Agreement. As the Grantee's interest in the Stock vests as described above, the recordation of the number of shares of Restricted Stock attributable to the Grantee will be appropriately modified.
5. .
Rights and Restrictions of Grantee; Transferability
5.1 . Nothing in this Agreement will interfere with or limit in any way the right of the Company or any Subsidiary to terminate the employment of the Grantee at any time, nor confer upon the Grantee any right to continue in the employ of the Company or any Subsidiary at any particular position or rate of pay or for any particular period of time.
Employment
5.2 . The Grantee will have the right to vote the Restricted Stock and to receive any dividends declared or paid on such Stock. Should the Grantee receive a distribution on account of an adjustment under Section 9 (or the corresponding provision of the Plan), that distribution shall be deemed to be part of this Restricted Stock grant and subject to the same conditions and restrictions set forth in this agreement (including the vesting provision under Section 2.2). No adjustment will be made for dividends or distributions with respect to Stock subject hereto as to which there is a record date preceding the Date of Grant.
Rights as a Stockholder
5.3 . Except pursuant to testamentary will or the laws of descent and distribution or as otherwise expressly permitted by the Plan, no right or interest of the Grantee in the Restricted Stock prior to vesting may be assigned or transferred, or subjected to any lien, during the lifetime of the Grantee, either voluntarily or involuntarily, directly or indirectly, by operation of law or otherwise. The Grantee will, however, subject to applicable laws be entitled to designate a beneficiary to receive any Restricted Stock that becomes vested upon such Grantee's death.
Restrictions on Transfer
5.4 .
Restrictions Regarding Employment
(a) The Grantee agrees that he or she will not take any Adverse Actions (as defined below) against the Company or any Subsidiary at any time during the period that the Restricted Stock is or may yet become vested in whole or in part or at any time before one year following the Grantee's termination of employment with the Company or any Subsidiary, whichever is later (the "Restricted Period"). The Grantee acknowledges that damages which may arise from a breach of this Section 5.4 may be impossible to ascertain or prove with certainty. Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement or the Plan to the contrary, in the event that the Company determines in its sole discretion that the Grantee has taken Adverse Actions against the Company or any Subsidiary at any time during the Restricted Period, in addition to other legal remedies which may be available, (i) the Company will be entitled to an immediate injunction from a court of competent jurisdiction to end such Adverse Action, without further proof of damage, (ii) the Committee will have the authority in its sole discretion to terminate immediately all rights of the Grantee under the Plan and this Agreement without notice of any kind, and (iii) the Committee will have the authority in its sole discretion to cause a forfeiture of any Stock acquired by you upon the vesting of the Restricted Stock to the extent that such vesting occurred within six months prior to the date the Grantee first commences any such Adverse Actions and require the Grantee to disgorge any profits (however defined by the Committee) realized by the Grantee relating to such vested portion of the Restricted Stock. Such disgorged profits paid to the Company must be made in cash (including check, bank draft or money order) or, with the Committee's consent, shares of Common Stock with a Fair Market Value on the date of payment equal to the amount of such payment. The Company will be entitled to withhold and deduct from future wages of the Grantee (or from other amounts that may be due and owing to the Grantee from the Company or a Subsidiary) or make other arrangements for the collection of all amounts necessary to satisfy such payment obligation.
(b) For purposes of this Agreement, an "Adverse Action" will mean any of the following: (i) engaging in any commercial activity in competition with any part of the business of the Company or any Subsidiary as conducted during the Restricted Period for which the Grantee has or had access to trade secrets and/or confidential information; (ii) diverting or attempting to divert from the Company or any Subsidiary any business of any kind, including, without limitation, interference with any business relationships with suppliers, customers, licensees, licensors, clients or contractors; (iii) participate in the ownership, operation or control of, be employed by, or connected in any manner with any person or entity which solicits, offers or provides any services or products similar to those which the Company or any Subsidiary offers to its customers or prospective customers, (iv) making, or causing or attempting to cause any other person or entity to make, any statement, either written or oral, or convey any information about the Company or any Subsidiary that is disparaging or that in any way reflects negatively on the Company or any Subsidiary; or (v) engaging in any other activity that is hostile, contrary or harmful to the interests of the Company or any Subsidiary, including, without limitation, influencing or advising any person who is employed by or in the service of the Company or any Subsidiary to leave such employment or service to compete with the Company or any Subsidiary or to enter into the employment or service of any actual or prospective competitor of the Company or any Subsidiary, influencing or advising any competitor of the Company or any Subsidiary to employ to otherwise engage the services of any person who is employed by or in the service of the Company or any Subsidiary, or improperly disclosing or otherwise misusing any trade secrets or confidential information regarding the Company or any Subsidiary.
(c) Should any provision of this Section 5.4 of the Agreement be held invalid or illegal, such illegality shall not invalidate the whole of this Section 5.4 of the Agreement, but, rather, the Agreement shall be construed as if it did not contain the illegal part or narrowed to permit its enforcement, and the rights and obligations of the parties shall be construed and enforced accordingly. In furtherance of and not in limitation of the foregoing, the Grantee expressly agrees that should the duration of or geographical extent of, or business activities covered by, any provision of this Agreement be in excess of that which is valid or enforceable under applicable law, then such provision shall be construed to cover only that duration, extent or activities that may validly or enforceably be covered. The Grantee acknowledges the uncertainty of the law in this respect and expressly stipulates that this Agreement shall be construed in a manner that renders its provisions valid and enforceable to the maximum extent (not exceeding its express terms) possible under applicable law. This Section 5.4 of the Agreement does not replace and is in addition to any other agreements the Grantee may have with the Company or any of its Subsidiaries on the matters addressed herein.
6. .
Securities Law and Other Restrictions
Notwithstanding any other provision of the Plan or this Agreement, the Company will not be required to issue, and the Grantee may not sell, assign, transfer or otherwise dispose of, any shares of Restricted Stock, unless (a) there is in effect with respect to such shares a registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and any applicable state or foreign securities laws or an exemption from such registration, and (b) there has been obtained any other consent, approval or permit from any other regulatory body which the Committee, in its sole discretion, deems necessary or advisable. The Company may condition such issuance, sale or transfer upon the receipt of any representations or agreements from the parties involved, and the placement of any legends on certificates representing shares of Restricted Stock, as may be deemed necessary or advisable by the Company in order to comply with such securities law or other restrictions.
All certificates representing the Stock issued in connection with this grant shall, where applicable, have endorsed thereon the following legend:
"THE SHARES REPRESENTED BY THIS CERTIFICATE ARE SUBJECT TO CERTAIN RESTRICTIONS ON TRANSFER AND OPTIONS TO PURCHASE SUCH SHARES SET FORTH IN AN AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE COMPANY AND THE REGISTERED HOLDER, OR HIS OR HER PREDECESSOR IN INTEREST. A COPY OF SUCH AGREEMENT IS ON FILE AT THE PRINCIPAL OFFICE OF THE COMPANY AND WILL BE FURNISHED UPON WRITTEN REQUEST TO THE SECRETARY OF THE COMPANY BY THE HOLDER OF RECORD OF THE SHARES REPRESENTED BY THIS CERTIFICATE."
7. .
Withholding Taxes
The Company is entitled to (a) withhold and deduct from future wages of the Grantee (or from other amounts that may be due and owing to the Grantee from the Company), or make other arrangements for the collection of, all legally required amounts necessary to satisfy any federal, state, local or foreign tax or withholding tax requirements attributable to the payment of dividends or the vesting of Stock acquired under this grant, or (b) require the Grantee promptly to remit the amount of such withholding or other taxes to the Company before the payment of dividends or the vesting of Stock acquired under this grant. In the event that the Company is unable to withhold such amounts, for whatever reason, the Grantee agrees, as a condition of this grant, to pay to the Company an amount equal to the amount the Company would otherwise be required to withhold under federal, state or local law.
8. .
Section 83(b) Election
Under Section 83 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code"), the difference between the purchase price paid for the shares of Stock and their Fair Market Value (as defined in the Plan) on the date any forfeiture restrictions applicable to such shares lapse will be reportable as ordinary income at that time. For this purpose, "forfeiture restrictions" include the forfeiture as to unvested Stock described above. The Grantee may elect to be taxed at the time the shares are acquired, rather than when such shares cease to be subject to such forfeiture restrictions, by filing an election under Section 83(b) of the Code with the Internal Revenue Service within thirty (30) days after the Date of Grant. The Grantee will have to make a tax payment to the extent the purchase price is less than the fair market value of the shares on the Date of Grant. No tax payment will have to be made to the extent the purchase price is at least equal to the fair market value of the shares on the Date of Grant. The form for making this election is attached as hereto. Failure to make this filing within the thirty (30) day period will result in the recognition of ordinary income by the Grantee (in the event the fair market value of the shares as of the vesting date exceeds the purchase price) as the forfeiture restrictions lapse.
Exhibit A
THE GRANTEE ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT IS THE GRANTEE'S SOLE RESPONSIBILITY, AND NOT THE COMPANY'S, TO FILE A TIMELY ELECTION UNDER SECTION 83(b), EVEN IF THE GRANTEE REQUESTS THE COMPANY OR ITS REPRESENTATIVES TO MAKE THIS FILING ON THE GRANTEE'S BEHALF. THE GRANTEE IS RELYING SOLELY ON THE GRANTEE'S OWN ADVISORS WITH RESPECT TO THE DECISION AS TO WHETHER OR NOT TO FILE ANY 83(b) ELECTION.
9. .
Adjustments
In the event of any reorganization, merger, consolidation, recapitalization, liquidation, reclassification, stock dividend, stock split, combination of shares, rights offering, divestiture or extraordinary dividend (including a spin-off), or any other change in the corporate structure or shares of the Company, the Committee (or, if the Company is not the surviving corporation in any such transaction, the board of directors of the surviving corporation), in order to prevent dilution or enlargement of the rights of the Grantee, will make appropriate adjustment (which determination will be conclusive) as to the number and kind of securities or other property (including cash) covered by this grant of Restricted Stock.
10. . For purposes of this Agreement, the following additional definitions will apply:
Certain Definitions
(a) "Cause" will have the meaning set forth in any employment or other agreement or policy applicable to the Grantee or, if no such agreement or policy exists, will mean (i) dishonesty, fraud, misrepresentation, theft, embezzlement or injury or attempted injury, in each case related to the Company or any Subsidiary, (ii) any unlawful or criminal activity of a serious nature, (iii) any breach of duty, habitual neglect of duty or unreasonable job performance, or (iv) any material breach of any employment, service, confidentiality or noncompete agreement entered into with the Company or any Subsidiary.
(b) "Change of Control" will have the meaning set forth in the Plan plus such other event or transaction as the Board shall determine constitutes a Change of Control, or such other meaning as may be adopted by the Committee from time to time in its sole discretion.
11. .
Subject to Plan
The Restricted Stock and the shares granted and issued pursuant to this Agreement have been granted and issued under, and are subject to the terms of, the Plan. The terms of the Plan are incorporated by reference in this Agreement in their entirety, and the Grantee, by execution of this Agreement, acknowledges having received a copy of the Plan. The provisions of this Agreement will be interpreted as to be consistent with the Plan, and any ambiguities in this Agreement will be interpreted by reference to the Plan. In the event that any provision of this Agreement is inconsistent with the terms of the Plan, the terms of the Plan will prevail.
12. .
Miscellaneous
12.1 . This Agreement will be binding upon the heirs, executors, administrators and successors of the parties to this Agreement.
Binding Effect
12.2 . This Agreement and all rights and obligations under this Agreement will be construed in accordance with the Plan and governed by the laws of the State of Delaware, without regard to conflicts or choice of law rule or principle that might otherwise refer construction or interpretation of this Agreement to the substantive laws of another jurisdiction.
Governing Law
12.3 . This Agreement and the Plan set forth the entire agreement and understanding of the parties to this Agreement with respect to the grant and vesting of the Restricted Stock and the administration of the Plan and supersede all prior agreements, arrangements, plans and understandings relating to the grant and vesting of the Restricted Stock and the administration of the Plan.
Entire Agreement
12.4 . Other than as provided in the Plan, this Agreement may be amended, waived, modified or canceled only by a written instrument executed by the parties to this Agreement or, in the case of a waiver, by the party waiving compliance.
Amendment and Waiver
The parties to this Agreement have executed this Agreement effective the day and year first above written.
ARBITRON INC.
By: Name: Title:  
     
     
     
By execution of this Agreement, the Grantee acknowledges having received a copy of the Plan.
 
Name of Grantee: Address:
     
     
Social Security Number:
     
Grantee (signature):
     
 
The undersigned hereby makes an election pursuant to Section 83(b) of the Internal Revenue Code with respect to the property described below and supplies the following information in accordance with the regulations promulgated thereunder:
1. The name, address and social security number of the undersigned:
Name: Address:
Social Security No. :
2. Description of property with respect to which the election is being made:
shares of common stock, par value $.per share, Arbitron Inc., a Delaware corporation, (the "Company").
     
3. The date on which the property was transferred is  , 2005.
     
     
4. The taxable year to which this election relates is calendar year 2005.
5. Nature of restrictions to which the property is subject:
The shares of stock are subject to the provisions of a Restricted Stock Agreement between the undersigned and the Company. The shares of stock are subject to forfeiture under the terms of the Agreement.
7. The amount paid by taxpayer for the property was $.
     
8. A copy of this statement has been furnished to the Company.
Dated: , 2005
     
Taxpayer's Signature
Taxpayer's Printed Name
The following procedures be followed with respect to the attached form for making an election under Internal Revenue Code section 83(b) in order for the election to be effective:
must
1
1. You must file one copy of the completed election form with the IRS Service Center where you file your federal income tax returns within after the Date of Grant of your Restricted Stock.
30 days
2. At the same time you file the election form with the IRS, you must also give a copy of the election form to the Secretary of the Company.
3. You must file another copy of the election form with your federal income tax return (generally, Form 1040) for the taxable year in which the stock is transferred to you.
Whether or not to make the election is your decision and may create tax consequences for you. You are advised to consult your tax advisor if you are unsure whether or not to make the election.
1


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20060403152142.txt.gz
TIME:20060403152142
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On March 28, 2006, the Compensation and Human Resources Committee (the "Committee") of the Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") approved, by unanimous written consent, a program (the "Deferral Program") pursuant to which Stephen B. Morris, the Companys Chief Executive Officer, has been provided the opportunity to defer receipt of certain shares of restricted stock previously granted to him under the Arbitron Inc. 1999 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan") pursuant to the Restricted Stock Agreement, effective March 1, 2006, which shares of restricted stock are scheduled to vest ratably over 4 years, with the first 25% vesting on December 31, 2006. Pursuant to the Deferral Program, Mr. Morris is entitled to defer receipt of 50% of each separate 12,125 tranche of restricted stock that is scheduled to vest on each of December 31, 2007, December 31, 2008 and December 31, 2009 (the "Restricted Stock"). Any such Restricted Stock that Mr. Morris elects to defer will be converted, upon vesting, i nto deferred stock units. Any election by Mr. Morris to defer the Restricted Stock will be effected pursuant to the execution of the CEO Deferral Election Form for Restricted Stock, which form must be executed on or before March 31, 2006 in order to be effective, and the deferral election will be documented pursuant to a CEO Deferred Stock Unit Agreement between the Company and Mr. Morris. On March 31, 2006, Mr. Morris executed the CEO Deferral Election Form for Restricted Stock, pursuant to which he elected to defer payment of 50% of the Restricted Stock (rounded down to the next whole share), as such shares become vested. In connection with Mr. Morris election to defer such Restricted Stock, on March 31, 2006, the Company and Mr. Morris entered into the CEO Deferred Stock Unit Agreement, which agreement documents and sets forth the terms and conditions of the conversion of the Restricted Stock into deferred stock units and the payment provisions applicable to the deferred stock units. < br>The foregoing descriptions of the Deferral Program, the CEO Deferral Election Form for Restricted Stock and the CEO Deferred Stock Unit Agreement are qualified in their entirety by the full terms and conditions of the CEO Deferral Election Form for Restricted Stock and the CEO Deferred Stock Unit Agreement, copies of which have been filed as Exhibit 10.1 and 10.2 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, and are incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(a) Not applicable. (b) Not applicable. (c) Not applicable. (d) Exhibits 10.1 CEO Deferral Election Form for Restricted Stock, dated as of March 31, 2006. 10.2 CEO Deferred Stock Unit Agreement, entered into and effective as of March 31, 2006, by and between the Company and Stephen B. Morris.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Residence Address
Please complete and return the form to:
Arbitron, Inc. 142 West 57th Street New York, NY 10019-3300
[Attn: ]
ELECTION TO DEFER
My election relates to each separate 12,125 common stock share tranche awarded to me under the Arbitron Inc. 1999 Stock Incentive Plan (the "") as restricted stock pursuant to the Restricted Stock Agreement (the "") between Arbitron Inc. (the "") and me, effective March 1, 2006, that is scheduled to vest on each of December 31, 2007, December 31, 2008 and December 31, 2009 (the ""). The Restricted Stock I elect to defer, upon vesting, will be converted into deferred stock units, and any such deferred stock units will be documented pursuant to a Deferred Stock Unit Agreement between the Corporation and me (the "Agreement"). This election does not relate to the 12,125 shares of restricted stock awarded to me pursuant to the Agreement that are scheduled to vest on December 31, 2006.
Plan
Agreement
Corporation
Restricted Stock
Important: Any election to defer my Restricted Stock must be on file with the Corporation no later than the close of business on March 31, 2006.
Corporation Use: Rec'd: 3/31/06 By: /s/ Kathleen T. Ross

THIS AGREEMENT is entered into and effective as of March 31, 2006 (the "Effective Date"), by and between Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") and Stephen B. Morris (the "Executive").
A. The Company has adopted the Arbitron Inc. 1999 Stock Incentive Plan (as may be amended or supplemented, the "Plan") authorizing the Board of Directors of the Company, or a committee as provided for in the Plan (the Board or such a committee to be referred to as the "Committee"), to permit grantees to elect to defer Restricted Stock so as to convert such Restricted Stock into deferred stock units.
B. Pursuant to the Plan and the Executive's deferral election covering his March 1, 2006 Restricted Stock award (the "2006 Restricted Stock Award"), and subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement, the Company hereby documents the conversion of the 2006 Restricted Stock Award into awards to the Executive of stock units representing shares of the Company's common stock, and payable following termination of the Executive's employment as further described herein.
Accordingly, the parties agree as follows:
On each of December 31, 2007, December 31, 2008 and December 31, 2009 (each a "Crediting Date"), provided the Executive remains an employee of the Company or a Subsidiary on such date, the Company hereby awards the Executive 6,062 stock units representing the same number of shares of the Company's common stock, $0.50 par value (the "Deferred Stock Units"), according to the terms and subject to the conditions hereinafter set forth and as set forth in the Plan. Accordingly, no Deferred Stock Units shall be treated as credited to the Executive under this Agreement until December 31, 2007 and Deferred Stock Units may increase in accordance with execution of the provisions of the preceding sentence, up to a maximum of 18,186 shares. The number of shares credited under this Agreement as Deferred Stock Units shall reduce one-for-one the number of shares of the Company's common stock treated as vesting under the 2006 Restricted Stock Award, and the shares thus eliminated from the 2006 Restricted Stock Award shall cease to be treated as issued and outstanding to the Executive.
Once credited, the number of Deferred Stock Units subject to this Agreement may increase based on Dividend Equivalent credits made pursuant to Section 3. Any such additional Deferred Stock Units (or fraction thereof) resulting from Dividend Equivalent credits shall be treated as Deferred Stock Units and shall be subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the Plan.
Payment of the Deferred Stock Units shall be made as described below in Section 2 and Section 5.
2.1 . The Deferred Stock Units credited to the Executive under this Agreement shall be fully vested.
Vesting
2.2 . Payment of the Deferred Stock Units credited to the Executive under this Agreement shall not be made until following the Executive's termination of employment with the Company and all Subsidiaries. If the Executive's employment with the Company and all Subsidiaries ceases for any reason other than death, payment shall be made on the first day of the seventh (7) month following the Executive's termination of employment, as a lump sum in common stock of the Company with any fractional shares to be distributed in cash. In the event the Executive terminates employment with the Company and all Subsidiaries on account of death or if the Executive dies prior to payment under the preceding sentence, payment shall be made as soon as reasonably practicable following the Executive's death in accordance with the beneficiary designation form attached to the Executive's deferred stock unit election related to his 2006 Restricted Stock Award, as such beneficiary designation may be updated from time to time, and subject to the provisions of the Plan.
Termination of Service
th
3.1 . With respect to Deferred Stock Units credited under this Agreement, the Executive shall have no rights as a stockholder unless and until the Executive has become the holder of record of shares of Common Stock following payment in Common Stock after terminating employment with the Company and all Subsidiaries. Notwithstanding the preceding, the Executive shall be credited with Dividend Equivalents on Deferred Stock Units credited for his or her benefit to the extent of dividends issued on Common Stock, provided the record date for such dividend is on or after the Crediting Date applicable to such Deferred Stock Units.
Rights as a Stockholder
3.2 . Except pursuant to testamentary will or the laws of descent and distribution or as otherwise expressly permitted by the Plan, no right or interest of the Executive to payment of the Deferred Stock Units may be assigned or transferred, or subjected to any lien, during the lifetime of the Executive, either voluntarily or involuntarily, directly or indirectly, by operation of law or otherwise. As previously described in Section 2.2, the Executive will, however, be entitled to designate a beneficiary to receive the payment of the Deferred Stock Units credited to the Executive under this Agreement after such Executive's death in the manner provided by the Plan.
Restrictions on Transfer
Notwithstanding any other provision of the Plan or this Agreement, the Company will not be required to issue, and the Executive may not sell, assign, transfer or otherwise dispose of, any shares of Common Stock received as payment of the Deferred Stock Units, unless (a) there is in effect with respect to the shares of Common Stock received as payment of the Deferred Stock Units a registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and any applicable state or foreign securities laws or an exemption from such registration, and (b) there has been obtained any other consent, approval or permit from any other regulatory body which the Committee, in its sole discretion, deems necessary or advisable. The Company may condition such issuance, sale or transfer upon the receipt of any representations or agreements from the parties involved, and the placement of any legends on certificates representing Common Stock received as payment of the Deferred Stock Units, as may be deemed necessary or advisable by the Company in order to comply with such securities law or other restrictions.
If there is a Change of Control, then upon consummation of the Change of Control, but in no event more than 15 days following the Change of Control, the Company shall provide the Executive a cash payment equal to the value per share of the consideration received in the Change of Control multiplied by the number of Deferred Stock Units then credited to the Executive under this Agreement. Upon payment of the cash amount just described, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement or the Plan, this Agreement shall expire, and no further payment shall be due to the Executive in respect of the Deferred Stock Units.
In the event of any reorganization, merger, consolidation, recapitalization, liquidation, reclassification, stock dividend, stock split, combination of shares, rights offering, divestiture or extraordinary dividend (including a spin-off), or any other change in the corporate structure or shares of the Company that does not result in a Change of Control, the Committee (or, if the Company is not the surviving corporation in any such transaction, the board of directors of the surviving corporation), in order to prevent dilution or enlargement of the rights of the Executive, will make appropriate adjustment (which determination will be conclusive) as to the number and kind of securities represented by the stock units making up the Deferred Stock Units then credited to the Executive under this Agreement.
(a) "Change of Control" means any of the following events:
Capitalized terms not defined in this Agreement shall have the meanings set forth in the Plan.
The Deferred Stock Units issued under this Agreement shall be subject to the terms of the Plan. The terms of the Plan are incorporated by reference in this Agreement in their entirety, and the Executive, by execution of this Agreement, acknowledges having received a copy of the Plan. The provisions of this Agreement will be interpreted to be consistent with the Plan, and any ambiguities in this Agreement will be interpreted by reference to the Plan. Except as set forth in Sections 5 and 7, in the event that any provision of this Agreement is inconsistent with the terms of the Plan, the terms of the Plan will prevail.
9.1 . This Agreement shall create a contractual obligation on the part of Company to make payment of the Deferred Stock Units credited to the account of the Executive at the time provided for hereinabove. Neither the Executive nor any other party claiming an interest in deferred compensation hereunder shall have any interest whatsoever in any specific assets of the Company. The Executive's right to receive payments hereunder shall be that of an unsecured general creditor of Company.
Employee as Unsecured Creditor
9.2 . The rights and interests of the Executive and any beneficiary of the Executive under this Agreement may not be sold, pledged, hypothecated, assigned or transferred in any manner, either voluntarily or involuntarily by operation of law, other than by the Executive pursuant to a beneficiary designation.
Payment Rights Nontransferable
9.3 . This Agreement will be binding upon the heirs, executors, administrators and successors of the parties to this Agreement.
Binding Effect
9.4 . This Agreement and all rights and obligations under this Agreement will be construed in accordance with the Plan and governed by the laws of the State of Delaware, without regard to conflicts or choice of law rules or principles that might otherwise refer construction or interpretation of this Agreement to the substantive laws of another jurisdiction.
Governing Law
9.5 . This Agreement and the Plan set forth the entire agreement and understanding of the parties to this Agreement with respect to the terms and conditions applicable to the Deferred Stock Units and supersede all prior agreements, arrangements, plans, and understandings relating to the Deferred Stock Units and the administration of the Plan.
Entire Agreement
9.6 . Other than as provided in the Plan, this Agreement may be amended, waived, modified or canceled only by a written instrument executed by the parties to this Agreement or, in the case of a waiver, by the party waiving compliance. This Agreement shall be interpreted in a manner consistent with compliance under Section 409A of the Code, and the parties shall cooperate to amend this Agreement should it be determined that such amendment is necessary or desirable for compliance with Section 409A of the Code.
Amendment and Waiver
The parties to this Agreement have executed this Agreement effective as of the day and year first above written.
ARBITRON INC.
By
Kathleen T. Ross
Its
EVP & Chief Administrative Officer


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20060420072143.txt.gz
TIME:20060420072143
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 20, 2006, we issued a press release reporting 2006 first quarter financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated April 20, 2006.
This Form 8-K and the attached Exhibit are furnished to comply with Item 2.02 and Item 9.01 of Form 8-K. Neither this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit are to be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 (except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing).
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Release
Arbitron Inc. Phone: 410-312-8410 sean.creamer@arbitron.com
Company Contact: Sean Creamer, CFO
KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215 tfromer@kcsa.com
Investor Relations Contact: Todd Fromer
Arbitron Inc. 212-887-1314 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Media contact: Thom Mocarsky
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the quarter ended March 31, 2006.
NEW YORK, April 20, 2006 
For the first quarter of 2006, the Company reported revenue of $85.1 million, an increase of 7.4 percent over revenue of $79.2 million during the first quarter of 2005.
Planned spending on the Portable People Meter and Project Apollo initiatives and the required expensing of share-based compensation, effective January 1, 2006, increased costs and expenses for the first quarter by 20.9 percent, from $44.4 million in 2005 to $53.7 million in 2006.
Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for the quarter were $29.0 million, a decrease of 11.2 percent over EBIT of $32.7 million during the comparable period last year.
Net income for the quarter was $18.2 million, a decrease of 8.3 percent from $19.8 million for the first quarter of 2005. Net income per share for the first quarter of 2006 was $0.58 (diluted), compared with $0.63 (diluted) for the comparable period last year, a decrease of 7.9 percent.
Management comment on first quarter 2006 results
Stephen Morris, president and chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc., made the following comments on the first quarter 2006 results: "We met our revenue expectations in the first quarter. We also exceeded our earnings guidance by $0.06 per share (diluted). This was due, in large part, to lower than projected share-based compensation expensewhich was $0.04 per share (diluted) less than anticipated."
"In March, Arbitron made the commitment to roll out the Portable People Meter as our radio ratings service in the top 50 markets in the United States. Pending accreditation by the Media Rating Council, Houston will become the first radio market to be electronically measured, as early as July 2006. We continue to work with our radio customers to facilitate the adoption of electronic measurement by broadcasters as well as by advertisers and agencies."
"We are also working with VNU and the six advertisers who are the pilot subscribers to the Project Apollo pilot panel to demonstrate the value of our proposed service for media planning, media mix allocation and return on media investment. This collaboration between research providers and research users will help Project Apollo deliver on its potential to better elevate the role of media in the marketing mix."
Company Outlook for 2006
Arbitron also provided financial guidance on its earnings outlook for the second quarter 2006 and for the full year 2006.
For the second quarter 2006, Arbitron expects revenue to increase between 6 percent and 8 percent compared to the second quarter of last year. Earnings Per Share (diluted) for the second quarter 2006 is expected to be between $0.20 and $0.22 versus $0.48 in the second quarter 2005. The impact of share-based compensation expense in the second quarter of 2006 is estimated to be approximately $2.2 million, or $0.05 per share (diluted). In the second quarter of 2005, the Company recorded a $3.9 million tax benefit, or $0.12 per share (diluted), as a result of the reversal of certain liabilities for tax contingencies related to prior periods. The balance of the year-over-year reduction is attributable to anticipated incremental spending on PPM initiatives, including Project Apollo, as well as previously announced investment initiatives to improve research quality.
Arbitron's year-end 2006 revenue guidance is unchanged. As previously stated, 2006 revenue is expected to increase between 6 percent and 8 percent compared to 2005. Earnings Per Share (diluted) for the year ending December 31, 2006 is expected to be between $1.69 and $1.74. This is an increase from the previously issued Earnings Per Share (diluted) guidance of $1.65 to $1.70. The increase reflects the impact of lower share-based compensation expense.
Earnings conference call: schedule and access
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. ET on April 20 to discuss its first quarter results and other relevant matters. To listen to the call, dial the following telephone number: 877-780-2271.
The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: , and
www.arbitron.com
www.ccbn.com
www.streetevents.com
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies, online radio and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company is deploying the Portable People Meter (PPM), a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by its research and technology organization, located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1,700 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
Note: Earnings before interest and income taxes (EBIT) and earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA) are widely used measures of operating performance. They are presented as supplemental information that management of Arbitron believes is useful to investors to evaluate the Company's results because they exclude certain items that are not directly related to the Company's core operating performance. EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered as substitutes either for net income, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20060523121115.txt.gz
TIME:20060523121115
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On May 18, 2006, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") entered into new multi-year agreements with CBS Radio Inc. ("CBS Radio"), a division of CBS Corporation, to provide radio ratings and other related services for CBS Radios 179 radio stations in 41 markets through the Companys Fall 2013 survey. These agreements, which generally become effective on April 1, 2007, will at that time replace and supersede CBS Radios existing agreements with the Company, which generally were scheduled to expire March 31, 2008, with certain software licenses and other services scheduled to expire June 30, 2008. Pursuant to the terms of the new agreements, the Company will provide CBS Radio with Portable People Meter ("PPM") ratings services, as and when the new audience ratings technology is deployed, in the 36 CBS Radio markets encompassed in the Companys previously announced PPM roll-out plan. Until such time as the PPM ratings technology is deployed in a particular market, the Company will provide C BS Radio with its diary-based ratings services in those markets. As the PPM ratings technology is deployed in a particular market, the diary-based ratings contract will lapse and the PPM ratings contract will become applicable to such market. Under the terms of the new agreements, the Company will provide its PPM Market Report Service, including the Companys PPM Market Report, PPM Analysis Tool software, PPM Weekly Arbitrends reports, Tapscan software, Arbitron Integrated Radio Systems (IRS) software, Corporate Rollup and National Regional Database services and its Radio Market Report Service, including the Companys Radio Market Report, Maximi$er, Arbitrends, PD Advantage, Mapmaker, Corporate Roll-UP and National Regional Database services, Sample Surcharge, RetailDirect and Tapscan software, to CBS Radio, as applicable. These services, which include new services as well as renewals of existing services, will be provided under agreements that generally expire on March 31, 2014, wit h certain software licenses and other services scheduled to expire June 30, 2014 for the diary-based service and on December 31, 2013 for the PPM service. The aggregate amount of all payments to be made by CBS Radio for the Radio Market Report and related services during the term of the diary-based ratings contract (assuming the contract is not terminated prior to the expiration of the stated term) currently is expected to be approximately $59.9 million, based on the radio stations currently owned by CBS Radio and the anticipated roll-out of the PPM ratings services. The aggregate amount of all payments to be made by CBS Radio for the PPM Market Report and related services during the term of the PPM ratings contract (assuming the contract is not terminated prior to the expiration of the stated term) currently is expected to be approximately $221.2 million, based on the radio stations currently owned by CBS Radio and the anticipated roll-out of the PPM ratings services. A copy of the press release an nouncing the contracts is filed herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein. Copies of the contracts entered into between the Company and CBS Radio will be filed as exhibits to the Companys Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2006.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(a) Not applicable. (b) Not applicable. (c) Not applicable. (d) Exhibits 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated May 18, 2006.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Release
Contacts: Jessica Benbow Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239
jessica.benbow@arbitron.com
Karen Mateo CBS Radio 212-846-7638
karen.mateo@cbsradio.com
Henry Feintuch/Yin Chang KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1212 / 212-896-1228 /
hfeintuch@kcsa.com
ychang@kcsa.com
Investor Relations: Todd Fromer KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215
tfromer@kcsa.com
NEW YORK, May 18, 2006  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced that CBS RADIO, one of the largest major-market operators in the United States, has entered into a seven year agreement for Portable People Meter (PPM) radio ratings when the new audience ratings technology is deployed in the 35 CBS RADIO markets encompassed in Arbitron's previously announced PPM rollout plan.
SM
Arbitron plans to launch the Portable People Meter (PPM) system as its radio ratings service to the top 50 markets, beginning with Houston in July 2006 (pending Media Rating Council accreditation).
Joel Hollander, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of CBS RADIO commented, "CBS RADIO is counting on the PPM to enhance the value of both our programming and the audiences we reach in the eyes of our advertisers. We're pleased to be the first major broadcaster to embrace the future by signing a contract for Arbitron's next-generation electronic audience measurement system. Radio has been searching for a more accountable method to provide advertisers with valuable information about its listeners, and I'm confident that the PPM will be supported throughout the industry."
"We are pleased that CBS RADIO has signed a long-term agreement with Arbitron for PPM radio ratings.  We view this agreement as an endorsement of our electronic measurement technology from one of our largest and most sophisticated customers.  We look forward to continuing to provide CBS RADIO with the information services to help it grow and manage its business for years to come," said Steve Morris, president and CEO, Arbitron Inc.
The Portable People Meter, an electronic audience measurement technology that has been in U.S. market trials since 2001, is scheduled to be used in the top 50 markets in place of the current paper and pencil diary method that the company has employed to collect radio audience estimates since 1965.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by its research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1700 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU Media Measurement & Information, Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
About CBS RADIO
CBS RADIO is one of the largest major-market operators in the United States with stations covering news, alternative rock, country, FM talk, classic rock, oldies, JACK and urban formats, among others. A division of CBS Corporation, CBS RADIO operates 179 radio stations, the majority of which are in the nation's top 50 markets. CBS RADIO also has made aggressive moves to converge new and traditional media through creative programming and advanced delivery methods, including online streaming, HD Radio and podcasting. In May 2005, CBS RADIO launched the world's first podcast programmed radio station, KYOURADIO. Additionally, CBS Radio is home to 29 of the country's leading sports franchises amongst MLB, the NFL, the NBA, the WNBA and the NHL, including the New York Yankees, New York Mets, Chicago White Sox, New England Patriots, New York Giants, Chicago Bears and the Detroit Red Wings. For more information on CBS RADIO, please visit .
www.cbsradio.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
 -  renew all or part of contracts with large customers as they expire;
 -  successfully execute our business strategies, including implementation of our Portable People Meter services and to execute potential joint venture or third party agreements;
 -  effectively manage the impact of any further consolidation in the radio and advertising agency industries;
 -  keep up with rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprietary software systems and new customer products and services that meet these needs in a timely manner;
 -  successfully manage the impact on our business of any economic downturn generally and in the advertising market in particular; and
 -  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperation in surveys, privacy concerns, consumer trends, technology changes and/or government regulations.
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20060605135614.txt.gz
TIME:20060605135614
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On May 24, 2006, the Compensation and Human Resources Committee (the "Committee") of the Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") approved a new form of Executive Retention Agreement (the "Retention Agreement") that provides for severance payments under certain circumstances and for the vesting of awards under the Companys stock-based compensation plans upon a change of control. The form of Retention Agreement provides that if the executive officer is terminated other than for cause, and the termination is not a change of control termination, the executive will receive a lump-sum cash payment in the amount of 12 months of base salary and bonus if the executive has fewer than 15 years of service, or 15 months of base salary and bonus if the executive has 15 or more years of service. The agreement will provide that following a change of control termination, the executive will be entitled to receive a lump-sum payment that is equal to 18 months of base salary and bonus if the executiv e has fewer than 15 years of service, or 21 months of base salary and bonus if the executive has 15 or more years of service. In addition, pursuant to the terms of the Retention Agreement the executive shall be provided, for a period of between 12 and 21 months following termination without cause or a change of control termination, or, if sooner, until reemployment with equivalent benefit, with the same or equivalent health, dental, accidental death and dismemberment, short-term and long-term disability, life insurance coverage, and all other insurance and other health and welfare benefits programs he or she was entitled to on the day before the termination. Upon a change of control, the vesting and exercisability of stock options and the vesting of other awards under the Companys stock-based compensation plans will accelerate, and any unvested awards thus would become fully and immediately vested. For purposes of the agreement, a "change of control" is generally defined as any of the following: (i) a merger or consolidation involving the Company if less than 50% of its voting stock after the merger or consolidation is held by persons who were stockholders before the merger or consolidation; (ii) a sale of the assets of the Company substantially as an entirety; (iii) ownership by a person or group acting in concert of at least 51% of the Companys voting securities; (iv) ownership by a person or group acting in concert of between 25% and 50% of the Companys voting securities if such ownership was not approved the Companys Board of Directors; (v) approval by the Companys stockholders of a plan for the liquidation of the Company; (vi) specified changes in the composition of the Companys Board of Directors; or (vii) any other events or transactions the Companys Board of Directors determines constitute a change of control. If payments to an executive under such a Retention Agreement would result in imposition of an excise tax under Section 4999 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, the executive will also be entitled to be paid an amount to compensate for the imposition of the tax. The payment will be in an amount such that after payment of all taxes, income and excise, the executive will be in the same after-tax position as if no excise tax under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, had been imposed. In addition, notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in the agreement, in the event that the Company determines that any payment under the agreement is subject to Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, such payments under the agreement shall not be made until six months after the executive separates from service (or, if earlier, the date the executive dies) to the extent necessary to avoid the imposition of additional 20% tax under Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. Otherwise, the payment of any lump sum severance payment under the Retention Agree ment generally shall be made within 15 days of the executives date of employment termination. The Company expects to enter into a Retention Agreement with the following executive officers: Pierre C. Bouvard, President of Sales and Marketing; Owen Charlebois, President of Operations, Technology, and Research & Development; Linda Dupree, Senior Vice President, Portable People Meter New Product Development; Vaughn Scott Henry, Executive Vice President and Chief Information Officer; Claire L. Kummer, Executive Vice President of Operations, Integration and Manufacturing; and Kathleen T. Ross, Executive Vice President and Chief Administrative Officer. Upon execution by each executive, the Retention Agreement will amend and supersede any prior executive retention agreement entered into between the Company and such executive officer. In addition, as disclosed in a Current Report on Form 8-K, filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on August 1, 2005, the Company previously entered into a re tention agreement with Sean Creamer, the Companys Executive Vice President of Finance and Planning and Chief Financial Officer, which agreement is substantially identical to the form of Retention Agreement filed with this Current Report on Form 8-K. The foregoing summary of the Retention Agreement is qualified in its entirety by the full terms and conditions of the Retention Agreement, a copy of which has been filed as Exhibit 10.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(a) Not applicable. (b) Not applicable. (c) Not applicable. (d) Exhibits 10.1 Form of Executive Retention Agreement
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

THIS EXECUTIVE RETENTION AGREEMENT is entered into as of , 2006 (the ""), by and between Arbitron Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), and (the "").
     
Effective Date
Company
     
Executive
[This Agreement amends and supersedes the Executive Retention Agreement between the Company and the Executive dated November 9, 2001.]
WHEREAS, the Executive is currently employed by the Company and is an executive officer of the Company;
WHEREAS, the Company has implemented a severance program for executive officers and wishes to document under this Agreement the provisions applicable to the Executive in the event of his or her termination of employment;
WHEREAS, in addition, the Company recognizes that a Change of Control may result in material alteration or diminishment of the Executive's position and responsibilities and substantially frustrate the purpose of Executive's commitment to the Company and forbearance of career options, and has determined therefore to provide enhanced severance and other benefits in the event of a Change of Control;
WHEREAS, the parties wish to replace any and all prior agreements and undertakings with respect to the Executive's termination of employment and Change of Control occurrences and compensation, other than the agreements governing the Executive's equity participation in the Company (as the same are modified by Section 5 of this Agreement);
NOW THEREFORE, in consideration of the Executive's acceptance of and continuance in Executive's employment, the parties agree to be bound by the terms contained in this agreement as follows:
1. . The Company may terminate the Executive's employment at any time for any reason pursuant to a Notice of Termination. The Executive may terminate his or her employment with the Company at any time for any reason pursuant to a Notice of Termination. If the Executive dies while still an employee of the Company, the Executive's death shall be a termination of employment from the Company. Any termination of the Executive's employment by the Company or the Executive (other than because of the Executive's death) shall be communicated by written Notice of Termination to the other party hereto in accordance with below. For purposes of this Agreement, a "" shall mean a notice which shall indicate the specific termination provision in this Agreement relied upon, if any, and shall set forth in reasonable detail the facts and circumstances claimed to provide a basis for termination of the Executive's employment under the provision so indicated. The Company's notice shall be given in writing by the Chief Executive Officer. Termination of the Executive's employment shall take effect on the Date of Employment Termination, the setting of which shall require the minimum notice period described under the definition of "Date of Employment Termination."
"At-Will" Employment
Section 6.1
Notice of Termination
2. .
Compensation Upon Termination
2.1. . Except as provided in , if the Executive's employment is terminated as a result of the Executive's death, the Company shall pay to the Executive's estate, or as may be directed by the legal representatives of such estate, the Executive's then current base salary through the Date of Employment Termination and all other unpaid amounts, if any, to which Executive is entitled as of the Date of Employment Termination. The payments contemplated by this shall be paid at the time they are due, and the Company shall have no further obligations to the Executive or his or her estate under this Agreement.
Death
Section 2.5
Section 2.1
2.2. . Except as provided in , if the Company terminates the Executive's employment because of the Executive's Disability, the Company shall pay the Executive the Executive's then current base salary through the Date of Employment Termination and all other unpaid amounts, if any, to which Executive is entitled as of the Date of Employment Termination. The payments contemplated by this shall be paid at the time they are due, and the Company shall have no further obligations to the Executive under this Agreement; that the base salary shall be reduced by the amount of any disability benefit payments made to the Executive during a period of Disability from any insurance or other policies provided by the Company.
Disability
Section 2.5
Section 2.2
provided, however,
2.3. . Except as provided in , if the Executive's employment with the Company is terminated in accordance with this , the Company shall pay the Executive the Executive's then current base salary through the Date of Employment Termination and all other unpaid amounts, if any, to which Executive is entitled as of the Date of Employment Termination. The Executive's termination is covered by this , (i) if the Executive voluntarily terminates his or her employment other than during the Window Period as described in , or (ii) if the Company terminates the Executive's employment for Cause. The payments contemplated by this shall be paid at the time such payments are due, and the Company shall have no further obligations to the Executive under this Agreement.
By the Company for Cause or by the Executive
Section 2.5
Section 2.3
Section 2.3
Section 2.5
Section 2.3
2.4. . Except as provided in , if the Company terminates the Executive's employment other than for Cause, the Company shall pay the Executive the Executive's then current base salary through the Date of Employment Termination and all other unpaid amounts, if any, to which the Executive is entitled as of the Date of Employment Termination, plus the following amounts:
By the Company other than for Cause
Section 2.5
(a) . If the Executive has to his or her credit fewer than 15 Years of Service, the Executive shall receive a severance payment equal to 12 months of the Executive's Reference Compensation. If the Executive has to his or her credit 15 or more Years of Service, the Executive shall receive a severance payment equal to 15 months of the Executive's Reference Compensation. This severance payment amount shall be paid in a lump sum, following the Executive's Date of Employment Termination in accordance with ; that the severance payment amount shall not be paid prior to the Company's receipt of a duly executed Waiver and Release Agreement that is not revoked during the applicable regulatory revocation period.
Severance Amount
Section 6.2
provided, however,
(b) . Commencing on his or her Date of Employment Termination, and except as next provided, for the duration of the Benefits Continuation Period, the Executive shall be entitled to receive from the Company the same or equivalent health, dental, accidental death and dismemberment, short and long-term disability, life insurance coverages, and all other insurance policies and health and welfare benefits programs, policies or arrangements, at the same levels and coverages as Executive was receiving on the day immediately prior to his or her Date of Employment Termination. The Executive shall be required to pay no more for the above-mentioned benefits than he or she paid as an active employee, or if provided by the Company at no cost to the employee on the date immediately prior to the Executive's Date of Employment Termination, the benefits shall continue to be made available to the Executive on this basis. In addition, the Company shall provide or make available arrangements for reasonable outplacement services for the Executive based on his or her level within the Company. With respect to any particular benefit, the benefit's continuation described in this paragraph shall end earlier than the end of the Benefits Continuation Period as of the date the Executive (or in the case of dependent coverage, the Executive's dependent), is eligible for the benefit under a plan, program or arrangement of a subsequent employer which provides a benefit that is substantially equivalent to the benefit being terminated.
Health and Welfare Benefits Continuation; Outplacement
2.5. . If the Executive's employment with the Company terminates following a Change of Control during the Window Period, other than by a termination by the Company for Cause, the Executive shall be entitled to payment of the Executive's then current base salary through the Date of Employment Termination and all other unpaid amounts, if any, to which the Executive is entitled as of the Date of Employment Termination, plus the following amounts:
Termination During Window Following a Change of Control Other than by the Company for Cause
(a) . If the Executive has to his or her credit fewer than 15 Years of Service, the Executive shall receive a severance payment equal to 18 months of the Executive's Reference Compensation. If the Executive has to his or her credit 15 or more Years of Service, the Executive shall receive a severance payment equal to 21 months of the Executive's Reference Compensation. This severance payment amount shall be paid in a lump sum, following the Executive's Date of Employment Termination in accordance with ; that the severance payment amount shall not be paid prior to the Company's receipt of a duly executed Waiver and Release Agreement that is not revoked during the applicable regulatory revocation period.
Severance Amount
Section 6.2
provided, however,
(b) . Commencing on his or her Date of Employment Termination, and except as next provided, for the duration of the Benefits Continuation Period, the Executive shall be entitled to receive from the Company the same or equivalent health, dental, accidental death and dismemberment, short and long-term disability, life insurance coverages, and all other insurance policies and health and welfare benefits programs, policies or arrangements, at the same levels and coverages as Executive was receiving on the day immediately prior to his or her Date of Employment Termination. The Executive shall be required to pay no more for the above-mentioned benefits than he or she paid as an active employee, or if provided by the Company at no cost to the employee on the date immediately prior to the Executive's Date of Employment Termination, the benefits shall continue to be made available to the Executive on this basis. In addition, the Company shall provide or make available arrangements for reasonable outplacement services for the Executive based on his or her level within the Company. With respect to any particular benefit, the benefit's continuation described in this paragraph shall end earlier than the end of the Benefits Continuation Period as of the date the Executive (or in the case of dependent coverage, the Executive's dependent), is eligible for the benefit under a plan, program or arrangement of a subsequent employer which provides a benefit that is substantially equivalent to the benefit being terminated.
Health and Welfare Benefits Continuation; Outplacement
3. . In consideration of the severance payments described in or , to which severance payments the Executive would otherwise not be entitled, and as a pre-condition to the Executive becoming entitled to such severance payments under this Agreement, the Executive agrees to execute at the time of Executive's termination a Waiver and Release Agreement in exactly the form provided to the Executive by the Company without alteration or addition (the ""), attached hereto as , the terms and conditions of which are specifically incorporated herein by reference.
Waiver and Release Agreement
Section 2.4
Section 2.5
Waiver and Release Agreement
Exhibit A
4. .
Certain Additional Payments by the Company
(a) Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary and except as set forth in this , in the event it shall be determined that any payment or distribution by the Company to or for the benefit of the Executive (whether paid or payable or distributed or distributable pursuant to the terms of this Agreement or otherwise, but determined without regard to any additional payments required under this ) (a "") would be subject to the excise tax imposed by Section 4999 of the Code or any interest or penalties are incurred by the Executive with respect to such excise tax (such excise tax, together with any such interest and penalties, are hereinafter collectively referred to as the ""), then the Executive shall be entitled to receive an additional payment (a "") in an amount such that after payment by the Executive of all taxes, including, without limitation, any income taxes (and any interest and penalties imposed with respect thereto) and Excise Tax imposed upon the Gross-Up Payment, the Executive retains an amount of the Gross-Up Payment equal to the Excise Tax (including any interest or penalties imposed with respect to such taxes) imposed upon the Payments.
Section 4
Section 4
Payment
Excise Tax
Gross-Up Payment
(b) Subject to the provisions of all determinations required to be made under this , including whether and when a Gross-Up Payment is required and the amount of such Gross-Up Payment and the assumptions to be utilized in arriving at such determination, shall be made by the Company's external auditors (the ""), which shall provide detailed supporting calculations both to the Company and the Executive within 15 business days of the receipt of notice from the Executive that there has been a Payment, or such earlier time as is requested by the Company. In the event that the Accounting Firm is serving as accountant or auditor for the individual, entity or group effecting the Change of Control, the Executive shall appoint another nationally recognized accounting firm to make the determinations required hereunder (which accounting firm shall then be referred to as the Accounting Firm hereunder). All fees and expenses of the Accounting Firm shall be borne solely by the Company. Any Gross-Up Payment, as determined pursuant to this , shall be paid by the Company to the Executive within five business days of the receipt of the Accounting Firm's determination. Any determination by the Accounting Firm shall be binding upon the Company and the Executive. As a result of the uncertainty in the application of Section 4999 of the Code at the time of the initial determination by the Accounting Firm hereunder, it is possible that Gross-Up Payments which will not have been made by the Company should have been made (""), consistent with the calculations required to be made hereunder. In the event that the Company exhausts its remedies pursuant to and the Executive thereafter is required to make a payment of any Excise Tax, the Accounting Firm shall determine the amount of the Underpayment that has occurred and any such Underpayment shall be promptly paid by the Company to or for the benefit of the Executive.
Section 4(c),
Section 4
Accounting Firm
Section 4
Underpayment
Section 4(c)
(c) The Executive shall notify the Company in writing of any claim by the Internal Revenue Service that, if successful, would require the payment by the Company of the Gross-Up Payment. Such notification shall be given as soon as practicable but no later than ten business days after the Executive is informed in writing of such claim and shall apprise the Company of the nature of such claim and the date on which such claim is requested to be paid. The Executive shall not pay such claim prior to the expiration of the 30-day period following the date on which he or she gives such notice to the Company (or such shorter period ending on the date that any payment of taxes with respect to such claim is due). If the Company notifies the Executive in writing prior to the expiration of such period that it desires to contest such claim, the Executive shall:
(i) give the Company any information reasonably requested by the Company relating to such claim,
(ii) take such action in connection with contesting such claim as the Company shall reasonably request in writing from time to time, including, without limitation, accepting legal representation with respect to such claim by attorneys reasonably selected by the Company,
(iii) cooperate with the Company in good faith in order effectively to contest such claim, and
(iv) permit the Company to participate in any proceedings relating to such claim;
, that the Company shall bear and pay directly all costs and expenses (including additional interest and penalties) incurred in connection with such contest and shall indemnify and hold the Executive harmless, on an after-tax basis, for any Excise Tax or income tax (including interest and penalties with respect thereto) imposed as a result of such representation and payment of costs and expenses. Without limitation on the foregoing provisions of this , the Company shall control all proceedings taken in connection with such contest and, at its sole option, may pursue or forgo any and all administrative appeals, proceedings, hearings and conferences with the taxing authority in respect of such claim and may, at its sole option, either direct the Executive to pay the tax claimed and sue for a refund or contest the claim in any permissible manner, and the Executive agrees to prosecute such contest to a determination before any administrative tribunal, in a court of initial jurisdiction and in one or more appellate courts, as the Company shall determine; , that if the Company directs the Executive to pay such claim and sue for a refund, the Company shall advance the amount of such payment to the Executive, on an interest-free basis, and shall indemnify and hold the Executive harmless, on an after-tax basis, from any Excise Tax or income tax (including interest or penalties with respect thereto) imposed with respect to such advance or with respect to any imputed income with respect to such advance; and, , that any extension of the statute of limitations relating to payment of taxes for the taxable year of the Executive with respect to which such contested amount is claimed to be due is limited solely to such contested amount. Furthermore, the Company's control of the contest shall be limited to issues with respect to which a Gross-Up Payment would be payable hereunder and the Executive shall be entitled to settle or contest, as the case may be, any other issue raised by the Internal Revenue Service or any other taxing authority.
provided, however
Section 4(c)
further provided,
further provided
(d) If, after the receipt by the Executive of an amount advanced by the Company pursuant to , the Executive becomes entitled to receive any refund with respect to such claim, the Executive shall (subject to the Company's complying with the requirements of ) promptly pay to the Company the amount of such refund (together with any interest paid or credited thereon after taxes applicable thereto). If, after the receipt by the Executive of an amount advanced by the Company pursuant to , a determination is made that the Executive shall not be entitled to any refund with respect to such claim and the Company does not notify the Executive in writing of its intent to contest such denial of refund prior to the expiration of 30 days after such determination, then such advance shall be forgiven and shall not be required to be repaid and the amount of such advance shall offset, to the extent thereof, the amount of Gross-Up Payment required to be paid.
Section 4(c)
Section 4(c)
Section 4(c)
5. If there is a Change of Control, then, notwithstanding any contrary provision of the Arbitron Inc. 1999 Stock Incentive Plan (the "") and notwithstanding any contrary provision in an award agreement under the Plan pursuant to which Executive has received an equity incentive grant, the Executive's awards under the Plan (including, but not limited to, the Executive's stock option and restricted stock awards, if any) shall fully and immediately vest upon the consummation of the Change of Control. This shall not be changed or otherwise modified without the written consent of the Executive.
Special Vesting Rules for Stock Incentives
.
Plan
Section 5
6. .
Miscellaneous
6.1. . All notices, demands, requests or other communications required or permitted to be given or made hereunder shall be in writing and shall be delivered, telecopied or mailed by first class registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed as follows:
Notices
If to the Executive:
     
     
     
or to such other address as may be designated by either party in a notice to the other. Each notice, demand, request or other communication that shall be given or made in the manner described above shall be deemed sufficiently given or made for all purposes three days after it is deposited in the U.S. mail, postage prepaid, or at such time as it is delivered to the addressee (with the return receipt, the delivery receipt, the answer back or the affidavit of messenger being deemed conclusive evidence of such delivery) or at such time as delivery is refused by the addressee upon presentation.
6.2.
Section 409A Compliance
.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, in the event that the Company determines that any payment under this Agreement is subject to Section 409A of the Code, such payments under this Agreement shall not be made until six months after the Executive separates from service (or, if earlier, the date Executive dies) to the extent necessary to avoid the imposition of the additional 20% tax under Section 409A of the Code. Otherwise, payment of any lump sum severance payment generally shall be made within 15 days of the Executive's Date of Employment Termination.
6.3. . The Executive agrees to execute any proper oath or verify any proper document required to carry out the terms of this Agreement. The Executive represents that performance of all the terms of this Agreement and the Waiver and Release Agreement will not breach any similar agreement. Executive has not entered into, and Executive agrees not to enter into, any oral or written agreement in conflict herewith.
Representations
6.4. . The invalidity or unenforceability of any one or more provisions of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of the other provisions of this Agreement, which shall remain in full force and effect.
Severability
6.5. . It is the express intention and agreement of the parties hereto that the provisions of hereof shall survive the termination of employment of the Executive. In addition, all obligations of the Company to make payments hereunder shall survive any termination of this Agreement on the terms and conditions set forth herein.
Survival
Section 2
6.6. . The rights and obligations of the parties to this Agreement shall not be assignable or delegable, except that (i) in the event of the Executive's death, the personal representative or legatees or distributees of the Executive's estate, as the case may be, shall have the right to receive any amount owing and unpaid to the Executive hereunder and (ii) the rights and obligations of the Company hereunder shall be assignable and delegable in connection with any subsequent merger, consolidation, sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company or similar reorganization to a successor entity. In connection with a transaction described in item (ii) of the preceding sentence under which the Executive's employment is transferred to a successor in the transaction, the Company's failure to obtain the agreement of its successor to perform the Company's obligations under this Agreement shall be treated as a termination by the Company without Cause and during the Window Period following a Change of Control under Section 2.5 of this Agreement and under the Executive's Company equity agreements.
Assignment
6.7. . Subject to any provisions hereof restricting assignment, this Agreement shall be binding upon the parties hereto and shall inure to the benefit of the parties and their respective heirs, devisees, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns.
Binding Effect
6.8. . This Agreement shall not be amended, altered or modified except by an instrument in writing duly executed by the parties hereto. Neither the waiver by either of the parties hereto of a breach of or a default under any of the provisions of this Agreement, nor the failure of either of the parties, on one or more occasions, to enforce any of the provisions of this Agreement or to exercise any right or privilege hereunder, shall thereafter be construed as a waiver of any subsequent breach or default of a similar nature, or as a waiver of any such provisions, rights or privileges hereunder.
Amendment; Waiver
6.9. . Section and subsection headings contained in this Agreement are inserted for convenience of reference only, shall not be deemed to be a part of this Agreement for any purpose, and shall not in any way define or affect the meaning, construction or scope of any of the provisions hereof.
Headings
6.10. . This Agreement, the rights and obligations of the parties hereto, and any claims or disputes relating thereto, shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Maryland (but not including the choice of law rules thereof).
Governing Law
6.11. . This Agreement, the Waiver and Release Agreement, and any agreements entered into in connection with the Executive's equity participation in the Company (as modified by Section 5 of this Agreement) constitute the entire agreement between the parties respecting the employment of Executive, there being no representations, warranties or commitments except as set forth herein.
Entire Agreement
6.12. . This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be an original and all of which shall be deemed to constitute one and the same instrument.
Counterparts
6.13. . Nothing in this Agreement shall be deemed to give the Executive the right to be retained in the employ of the Company, or to interfere with the right of the Company to discharge the Executive at any time and for any lawful reason, subject in all cases to the terms of this Agreement.
No Right to Continued Employment
6.14. .
Definitions
"" means the applicable 12, 15, 18 or 21 month period upon which the Executive's severance payment under Section 2.4 or 2.5 is based, treating the period as though it runs from the Date of Employment Termination.
Benefit Continuation Period
"" means (i) fraud; (ii) misrepresentation; (iii) theft or embezzlement of assets of the Company; (iv) intentional violations of law involving moral turpitude; (v) failure to follow the Company's conduct and ethics policies; and/or (vi) the continued failure by the Executive to attempt in good faith to perform his or her duties as reasonably assigned by the Chief Executive Officer to the Executive for a period of 60 days after a written demand for such performance which specifically identifies the manner in which it is alleged the Executive has not attempted in good faith to perform such duties.
Cause
"" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time.
Code
"" means any of the following events:
Change of Control
"" means (i) if the Executive's employment is terminated by the Executive's death, the date of the Executive's death; (ii) if the Executive's employment is terminated because of the Executive's Disability, 30 days after Notice of Termination, provided that the Executive shall not have returned to the performance of the Executive's duties on a full-time basis during such 30-day period; (iii) if the Executive's employment is terminated by the Company for Cause, the date immediately following the Notice of Termination; (iv) if the Executive's employment is terminated by the Company, 30 days after the Notice of Termination; or (v) if the Executive voluntarily terminates his or her employment, the date 21 days after the Notice of Termination.
Date of Employment Termination
"" means the earlier of the date one week after the date on which Arbitron or the entity effecting the Change of Control first announces to the public the existence of a definitive agreement leading to the Change of Control or the date of commencement of a tender offer leading to the Change of Control.
Determination Date
"" means the Executive's inability to perform all of the Executive's duties hereunder by reason of illness, physical or mental disability or other similar incapacity, as determined by the Chief Executive Officer in his or her sole discretion, which inability shall continue for more than three consecutive months; provided, however, that the Executive does not hereby waive any rights under the Americans with Disabilities Act or other applicable law.
Disability
"" means the sum of the Executive's annual salary and annual bonus divided by twelve. For purposes of this definition, the Executive's annual salary is the greater of the annual rate of his or her base salary from the Company and its subsidiaries in effect immediately prior to the Date of Employment Termination, or the annual rate of the Executive's base salary from the Company and its subsidiaries in effect immediately prior to the date of consummation of the Change of Control. For purposes of this definition, annual bonus shall mean the greatest of (i) the average of the three annual bonuses paid to the Executive prior to his or her Date of Employment Termination, (ii) the average of the three annual bonuses paid to the Executive prior to the date of consummation of the Change of Control (if applicable, because termination occurs during a Window Period), or the Executive's target annual bonus under the Company's annual incentive compensation plan for the year that include his or her Date of Employment Termination. If the Executive received fewer than three bonuses prior to his or her Date of Employment Termination or the date of consummation of the Change of Control, as applicable, the amounts described in Clauses (i) and (ii) shall be calculated using the average of such lesser number of annual bonuses. The term annual bonus does not include any special or sign-on bonus that is not part of the Company's regular and recurring program of annual incentive compensation.
Reference Compensation
"" means the one-year period commencing on the date of consummation of a Change of Control. Furthermore, only the first Change of Control shall be counted in determining whether there is a Window Period, and, as a result, there shall not be multiple Window Periods under this Agreement.
Window Period
"" means the number of whole years, i.e., completed consecutive 12-month periods, in the period beginning on the date the Executive first performed services as an employee of the Company (or its predecessor) and ending on his or her Date of Employment Termination.
Years of Service
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned have duly executed this Agreement, or have caused this Agreement to be duly executed on their behalf, as of the day and year first herein above written.
ARBITRON INC.
By: Name: Title:
EXECUTIVE:
THIS WAIVER AND RELEASE AGREEMENT is entered into as of , 20(the ""), by (the "") in consideration of the severance pay provided to the Executive by Arbitron Inc. ("") pursuant to the Executive Retention Agreement by and between the Employer and the Executive (the "").
     
     
Effective Date
     
Executive
Employer
Severance Payment
1. The Executive, on his own behalf and on behalf of his heirs, executors, administrators, attorneys and assigns, hereby unconditionally and irrevocably releases, waives and forever discharges Employer and each of its affiliates, parents, successors, predecessors, and the subsidiaries, directors, owners, members, shareholders, officers, agents, and employees of the Employer and its affiliates, parents, successors, predecessors, and subsidiaries (collectively, all of the foregoing are referred to as the ""), from any and all causes of action, claims and damages, including attorneys' fees, whether known or unknown, foreseen or unforeseen, presently asserted or otherwise arising through the date of his signing of the Waiver and Release Agreement, concerning his employment or separation from employment. This release includes, but is not limited to, any claim or entitlement to salary, bonuses, any other payments, benefits or damages arising under any federal law (including, but not limited to, Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act, the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, the Americans with Disabilities Act, Executive Order 11246, the Family and Medical Leave Act, and the Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act, each as amended); any claim arising under any state or local laws, ordinances or regulations (including, but not limited to, any state or local laws, ordinances or regulations requiring that advance notice be given of certain workforce reductions); and any claim arising under any common law principle or public policy, including, but not limited to, all suits in tort or contract, such as wrongful termination, defamation, emotional distress, invasion of privacy or loss of consortium.
Waiver and Release
.
Company
The Executive understands that by signing this Waiver and Release Agreement he is not waiving any claims or administrative charges which cannot be waived by law. He is waiving, however, any right to monetary recovery or individual relief should any federal, state or local agency (including the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission) pursue any claim on his behalf arising out of or related to his employment with and/or separation from employment with the Employer.
The Executive further agrees without any reservation whatsoever, never to sue the Company or become a party to a lawsuit on the basis of any and all claims of any type lawfully and validly released in this Waiver and Release Agreement.
2. The Executive is signing this Waiver and Release Agreement knowingly and voluntarily. He acknowledges that:
Acknowledgments
.
3. This Waiver and Release Agreement does not constitute an admission of liability or wrongdoing on the part of the Company, the Company does not admit there has been any wrongdoing whatsoever against the Executive, and the Company expressly denies that any wrongdoing has occurred.
No Admission of Liability
.
4. There are no other agreements of any nature between the Company and the Executive with respect to the matters discussed in this Waiver and Release Agreement, except as expressly stated herein, and that in signing this Waiver and Release Agreement, he is not relying on any agreements or representations, except those expressly contained in this Waiver and Release Agreement.
Entire Agreement
.
5. It is not necessary that the Company sign this Waiver and Release Agreement following the Executive's full and complete execution of it for it to become fully effective and enforceable.
Execution
.
6. If any provision of this Waiver and Release Agreement is found, held or deemed by a court of competent jurisdiction to be void, unlawful or unenforceable under any applicable statute or controlling law, the remainder of this Waiver and Release Agreement shall continue in full force and effect.
Severability
.
7. This Waiver and Release Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the State of Maryland except for the provisions of Maryland law that would refer jurisdiction to another state.
Governing Law
.
8. Section and subsection headings contained in this Waiver and Release Agreement are inserted for the convenience of reference only. Section and subsection headings shall not be deemed to be a part of this Waiver and Release Agreement for any purpose, and they shall not in any way define or affect the meaning, construction or scope of any of the provisions hereof.
Headings
.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has duly executed this Agreement as of the day and year first herein above written.
EXECUTIVE:


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20060705101717.txt.gz
TIME:20060705101717
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On July 3, 2006, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") and Stephen B. Morris, the Companys President and Chief Executive Officer (the "Executive"), entered into an agreement (the "Amendment") amending the Employment Agreement, dated as of April 1, 2001, by and between the Company and the Executive, as amended (the "Original Agreement"). Pursuant to the Amendment, the term of the Executives employment will continue until December 31, 2009. The Companys board of directors has reserved the right to appoint the Executives successor during such term, and if such appointment is made the Executive will remain an employee and will be available to provide transition assistance, consultation and advice through December 31, 2009. Additionally, pursuant to the Amendment, the Company will retain the Executive as an independent consultant for three years commencing January 1, 2010 (the "Consulting Term") unless, prior to January 1, 2010, either (i) the Executives employment was te rminated by the Company for cause, by the Executive for any reason, or by reason of the Executives death or disability, or (ii) a change of control has occurred. During the Consulting Term, the Executive has agreed to provide consulting services and other assistance as the Companys Chief Executive Officer or board of directors may reasonably request. Additionally, during the term of the Amendment and the Consulting Term, the Executive has agreed to serve as a member of the Companys board of directors if he is nominated and elected. The Executives minimum base salary under the Amendment is $593,208 for 2006, and thereafter will be increased by 5% annually during the term of the Amendment. The Amendment also provides that the Executives target bonus will be 75% of his base salary for the respective year. During the Consulting Term, the Company has agreed to pay the Executive a quarterly consulting fee of $83,333, as well as reasonable costs and expenses incurre d by the Executive in providing the consulting services. Additionally, during the term of the Amendment, the Company has agreed to grant the Executive restricted stock awards under the Companys 1999 Stock Incentive Plan as follows: (i) 48,500 shares in 2006; and (ii) 43,333 shares in each of 2007, 2008 and 2009, all of which will vest in full by December 31, 2009. Pursuant to the Amendment, the Executive waived any rights to accelerate the vesting of restricted stock awards or stock options upon his retirement. Additionally, the Executive agreed not to dispose of shares of common stock during any 12 month period that exceeds an amount equal to 25% of the aggregate number of shares of common stock represented by the restricted stock award granted, or to be granted, pursuant to the Amendment, provided that this restriction will terminate upon the Executives death or a change of control. In the event that the Amendment is terminated due to the Executives death or disability o r upon a change of control, the restricted stock awards granted under the Amendment prior to termination will be vested in full but no further grants will be made. In the event of the death or disability of the Executive prior to January 1, 2010, or a change of control after December 31, 2008 but prior to January 1, 2010, the Company will pay the Executive or his estate $1,000,000. In the event of the death or disability of the Executive or a change of control during the Consulting Term, the Consulting Term will terminate and the Company will pay the Executive or his estate a lump sum equal to the remaining quarterly consulting payments scheduled to be paid to the Executive for the balance of the Consulting Term as if the Consulting Term had not ended. The Amendment also amends the change of control provisions in the Original Agreement. Under the new arrangement, in the event of a change of control termination, the Company will make a lump sum payment to the Executive in an amount initially e qual to three times the sum of the following:  12 months of base salary at the rate in effect at the time of termination;  the bonus that the Executive would have received under all applicable bonus plans of the Company for the year in which the termination occurs at the target award level applicable for the year in which the termination occurs; and  the annual perquisite cash adder the Executive would have received in the year in which the termination occurs. Beginning February 1, 2007, the multiplier reduces ratably on a monthly basis (for example, on July 1, 2007 the multiplier will become 2.5 and on January 1, 2008 the multiplier will become 2.0) through January 1, 2010, at which time the change of control provisions of the Original Agreement will terminate. Under the terms of the Amendment, the non-compete period for the Executive was increased to 36 months following the termination of the Executives employment for any reason. The Amendment also provides that the Executive agrees to comply with the confidentiality and non-compete provisions of the Original Agreement during the Consulting Term. The foregoing summary of the Amendment is qualified in its entirety by the full terms and conditions of the Amendment, a copy of which has been filed as Exhibit 10.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(a) Not applicable. (b) Not applicable. (c) Not applicable. (d) Exhibits 10.1 Arbitron Inc. Amendment No. 3 to the Executive Employment Agreement between Arbitron Inc. and Stephen B. Morris
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

THIS AMENDMENT NO. 3 TO THE EXECUTIVE EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT (this "Amendment") is made and entered into as of July 3, 2006 by and between ARBITRON INC. ("Arbitron") and STEPHEN B. MORRIS ("Executive") for the purpose of amending the Executive Employment Agreement dated April 1, 2001 as amended, by and between Arbitron and Executive (the "Agreement"). All capitalized terms in this Amendment shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Agreement unless otherwise defined in this Amendment.
WHEREAS, Arbitron desires to provide for an orderly transition of its chief executive officer and desires to retain Executive as its President and Chief Executive Officer until Executive's successor has been approved and appointed by the Board but no later than December 31, 2009;
WHEREAS, Executive is willing to continue to serve as the President and Chief Executive Officer of Arbitron until his successor has been approved and appointed by the Board but no later than December 31, 2009, to assist the Board in connection with its search for his replacement and to assist his replacement in the transition of management of Arbitron after his replacement is appointed; and
WHEREAS, Arbitron has requested that Executive serve as a consultant to Arbitron for three years after his employment by Arbitron ceases to assure the availability of Executive to assist in such strategic planning as the Board may request and to assist in any material matters in which Executive has participated in during the term of his employment with Arbitron and Executive is willing to provide such consulting services.
NOW, THEREFOR, in consideration of these premises, Executive's acceptance of and continuance in Executive's employment for the term of the Agreement and the agreement and intent of the parties to be bound by the terms of the Agreement as modified by this Amendment, the parties agree as follows:
1. . Section 2.03 of the Agreement is hereby amended in its entirety to read as follows:
Term of Employment
2. . Section 3.01 of the Agreement is hereby amended in its entirety to read as follows:
Base Salary
3. . Section 3.02 of the Agreement is hereby amended to add the following sentence at the end thereof:
Bonus
"For the purposes of this Section 3.02 of the Agreement, Executive's target bonus or incentive compensation shall be 75% of his Base Salary under Section 3.01 for the respective year."
4. . In consideration of Executive's services under the Agreement and Executive's willingness to continue to serve as President and Chief Executive Officer and as an inducement to retain Executive, Arbitron agrees to grant Executive the following Restricted Stock Awards under and as defined in Arbitron's 1999 Stock Incentive Plan or its successor (the "Stock Incentive Plan") whether in the form of shares of Common Stock or Stock Units as defined in the Stock Incentive Plan as the Committee administering the Stock Incentive Plan may determine:
Grants of Restricted Stock Awards
(a) For calendar year 2006, Executive has received a grant of 48,500 shares of restricted Common Stock which shares vest in four equal annual installments on December 31 commencing on December 31, 2006;
st
(b) For calendar year 2007, Executive shall receive a Restricted Stock Award for 43,333 shares which award shall vest in three equal annual installments on December 31 commencing on December 31, 2007;
st
(c) For calendar year 2008, Executive shall receive a Restricted Stock Award for 43,333 shares which award shall vest in two equal annual installments on December 31 commencing on December 31, 2008; and
st
(d) For calendar year 2009, Executive shall receive a Restricted Stock Award for 43,333 shares which award shall vest in full on December 31, 2009.
All of the grants made or to be made under clauses (a)  (d) above shall be subject to appropriate adjustment pursuant to Section 4.4 of the Stock Incentive Plan as a result of any of the events described in Section 4.4 of the Stock Incentive Plan occur after the date hereof. In consideration of the Restricted Stock Awards made or to be made under clauses (a)  (d) of this Paragraph 4 and the other consideration provided to Executive under this Amendment, Executive hereby (i) waives any rights that Executive has or may have to accelerate the vesting of any Restricted Stock Awards or any stock option (whether heretofore granted or to be granted under this Paragraph) upon the Executive's retirement, and (ii) agrees that Executive will not sell, transfer or otherwise dispose the shares of Common Stock during any consecutive twelve (12) month period that exceeds an amount equal to of twenty-five percent (25%) of the aggregate number of shares of Common Stock represented by the Restricted Stock Award granted or to be granted under this Paragraph 4; provided that the restriction in clause (ii) shall terminate upon the death of Executive or a Change of Control. In the event the term of this Agreement is terminated due to the death or Disability of Executive or upon a Change of Control (as defined in the Stock Incentive Plan), the Restricted Stock Award granted under this Paragraph 4 prior to such termination shall be vested in full in accordance with the provisions of the Stock Incentive Plan but no further grants under this paragraph will be made thereafter.
5. . Section 6.02(a) of the Agreement is hereby amended to substitute the phrase "for a period of 36 months following the termination of employment for any reason ("Non-Compete Period")" for the phrase "for a period of 18 months following the termination of employment for any reason ("Non-Compete Period")" in the first sentence of Section 6.02(a). Accordingly, the Non-Compete Period under Section 6.02 shall be increased from 18 months to 36 months following the termination of Executive's employment for any reason.
Non-Competition
6. .
Change of Control Provisions
(a) Section 7.01 of the Agreement is hereby amended to add the following definition at the end of such section numbered as subsection (h):
"(h) means a period of time equal to the lesser of (i) thirty-six months or (ii) the number of months remaining between the end of the month immediately preceding a Change of Control Termination and January 1, 2010."
"Continuation Period"
(b) Section 7.02 of the Agreement is hereby amended to insert "but in no event later than December 31, 2009" after the phrase "during the term of this Agreement" and before the comma thereafter in the first sentence of said Section 7.02.
(c) Section 7.03(a) of the Agreement is hereby amended to insert "a factor, the numerator of which is the number of months in the Continuation Period and the denominator of which is 12, multiplied by" in lieu of the phrase "three times" in said Section 7.03.
(d) Section 7.03(b) of the Agreement is hereby amended to insert "(i) the monthly benefits to which Executive would have been entitled under the defined benefit plan or plans in which Executive participates immediately prior to the Change of Control Termination which includes an additional period of age and service for the Continuation Period;" in lieu of clause (i) of said Section 7.03(b).
(d) Section 7.03(c) of the Agreement is hereby amended to insert "(1) An additional period of age and Years of Service equal to the Continuation Period shall be added to Executive's actual age and Years of Service (the additional Years of Service shall not be limited by the final sentence of Section 3.05(i)(9));" in lieu of subsection (1) of said Section 7.03(c).
(e) Section 7.07 of the Agreement is hereby amended to insert "for the Continuation Period" in lieu of the phrase "for a period of three (3) years" therein.
7. . In consideration of the knowledge and experience of Executive in Arbitron and its business and the desire of Arbitron to have Executive available to provide his advice and assistance to Arbitron after the termination of his employment with Arbitron, Arbitron and the Executive desire to enter a consulting arrangement on the following terms:
Consulting Arrangement
(a) Arbitron hereby retains Executive as an independent consultant for the three (3) years commencing January 1, 2010 and ending December 31, 2012 (the "Consulting Term") unless prior to January 1, 2010 either (a) the employment of Executive under the Agreement was terminated by Arbitron with Cause, by Executive for any reason, or by reason of the death or Disability (as defined in the Agreement) of Executive or (b) a Change of Control (as defined in the Agreement) has occurred, in which case Executive will not be retained as a consultant by Arbitron pursuant to this Paragraph 6. During the Consulting Term, Executive agrees to provide such consulting services and other assistance as Arbitron's Chief Executive Officer or Board may from time to time reasonably request; provided that such requests shall not unreasonably interfere with the other activities of Executive. In consideration for Executive's consulting services, Arbitron agrees to pay Executive a quarterly consulting fee in the amount of $83,333.33 payable on the first day of January, April, July and October month during the Consulting term commencing on January 1, 2010. In addition, Arbitron shall pay all reasonable costs and expenses, including travel, incurred by Executive in providing the consulting services to Arbitron during the Consulting Term. During the Consulting Term, Executive shall be an independent contractor, shall not be considered an employee of Arbitron and shall not be entitled to any employee benefits as a result of his services as a consultant. During the Consulting Term, Executive agrees, if nominated and elected, to serve as a director on the Board. Effective as of January 1, 2010 and continuing during the Consulting Period, the provisions of Articles V and VI of the Agreement shall continue to apply to Executive and Executive agrees to comply with the provisions of Articles V and VI during the Consulting Term, and the phrase "following termination of employment for any reason" in the first sentence of Section 6.02(a) and in the first sentence of Section 6.03 shall be replaced by the phrase "following the end of the Consulting Term" in each instance effective upon the commencement of the Consulting Term.
(b) In the event the death or Disability of Executive prior to January 1, 2010 or a Change of Control after December 31, 2008 but prior to January 1, 2010, Arbitron shall pay Executive or his estate the sum of $1,000,000 within five days after the termination of Executive's employment by Executive's death or disability or in the case of a change of control the earlier of (i) six months after the termination of Executive's employment following the Change of Control or (ii) July 1, 2010. In the event of the death or Disability of Executive or a Change of Control during the Consulting Term, then the Consulting Term shall terminate upon the date of Executive's death or Disability or such Change of Control and Arbitron shall pay Executive or his estate in a lump sum, within five (5) days after such termination of the Consulting Term or such later date to the extent required by Section 409A(a)(2)(B)(i) of the Code but in no event later than on the date which is six months and one day after the termination of the Consulting Term, a lump sum amount equal to the remaining quarterly consulting payments scheduled to be paid to Executive for the balance of the Consulting Term as if the Consulting Term had not ended.
(c) Notwithstanding the consulting arrangement under this Paragraph 6, upon the termination of Executive's employment under the Agreement, Executive shall be entitled to such retirement and other post-employment benefits as provided under the Agreement or under the benefits plans of Arbitron as then in effect. Effective January 1, 2010, the provisions of Article VII of the Agreement shall terminate and no longer be effective with respect to any Change of Control occurring on or after January 1, 2010.
8. . The arrangements described in this Amendment and the Agreement are intended to comply with Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, to the extent such arrangements are subject to that law. The parties agree that they will negotiate in good faith regarding any amendments necessary to bring this Amendment or the Agreement into compliance with the terms of Section 409A or an exemption therefrom as interpreted by guidance issued by the Internal Revenue Service. The parties further agree that, to the extent any part of this Amendment or the Agreement fails to qualify for an exemption from or satisfy the requirements of Section 409A, the affected arrangement shall be operated in compliance with Section 409A pending such an amendment to the extent authorized by the Internal Revenue Service. In such circumstances, Arbitron will administer this Agreement in a manner which adheres as closely as possible to the existing terms and intent of the Agreement as amended hereby while complying with Section 409A. This Section does not restrict the rights of Arbitron with respect to the Agreement as amended hereby to the extent such rights are reserved to Arbitron under the Agreement (including the right to terminate).
Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code
9. . The reference to Article IX at the end of Section 4.01 is here by amended to refer to Article VIII.
Correction to Section 4.01
10. . The Agreement shall be read together with this Amendment and shall have the same force and effect as if the provisions of the Agreement and this Amendment were contained in one document. Except as expressly amended by this Amendment, the Agreement shall remain in full force and effect in accordance with its terms.
Construction of the Agreement
11. . This Amendment may be executed in one or more counterparts, all of which shall be considered one and the same agreement, and shall be come effective when one or more such counterparts have been signed by each of the parties and delivered to the other party.
Counterparts
12. . This Amendment and the Agreement as heretofore and hereby amended constitutes the entire understanding of the parties hereto and supersedes all prior understandings, whether written or oral, between the parties with respect to the subject matter of this Amendment and the Agreement. No amendment, modification or alteration of the terms of this Amendment or the Agreement shall be binding unless in writing, dated subsequent to the date of this Amendment and duly executed by all parties.
Integration
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have caused this Amendment to be duly executed as of the day and year first written above.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20060719132020.txt.gz
TIME:20060719132020
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
(b) On July 18, 2006, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") received written notice dated July 14, 2006 of the resignation of Erica Farber as a director of the Company, effective immediately. Ms. Farber is Publisher and Chief Executive Officer of Radio & Records. In anticipation of the impending acquisition of Radio & Records by VNU, Ms. Farber indicated to the Company that she believes it is in the best interest of both companies for her to relinquish her seat on the Arbitron board. Ms. Farbers resignation was not the result of any disagreement with the Company related to its operations, policies or practices.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
17.1 Resignation Letter of Erica Farber dated July 14, 2006
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Erica Farber
Publisher/CEO
July 14, 2006
Mr. Lawrence Perlman 818 W. 46 Street Suite 201 Minneapolis, Minnesota 55419-4841
th
Dear Lawrence,
Please accept this letter as my formal resignation as a board of director of Arbitron effective immediately. Due to the upcoming ownership change of my company it would be a conflict of interest for me to remain on the board.
I wish you and the company much continued success.
Sincerely,
/s/ Erica Farber
Erica Farber
Radio & Records, Inc.
2049 Century Park East, 41
st
Floor, Los Angeles, CA 90067
(310) 788-1616 Fax (310) 203-8754
efarber@radioandrecords.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20060720084923.txt.gz
TIME:20060720084923
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 20, 2006, we issued a press release reporting 2006 second quarter financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated July 20, 2006.
This Form 8-K and the attached Exhibit are furnished to comply with Item 2.02 and Item 9.01 of Form 8-K. Neither this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit are to be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 (except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing).
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Arbitron Inc. Phone: 410-312-8410 sean.creamer@arbitron.com
Company Contact: Sean Creamer, CFO
KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215 tfromer@kcsa.com
Investor Relations Contact: Todd Fromer
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Media contact: Thom Mocarsky
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2006.
NEW YORK, July 20, 2006 
For the second quarter 2006, the Company reported revenue of $74.2 million, an increase of 6.2 percent over revenue of $69.8 million during the second quarter of 2005.
Planned spending on the Portable People Meter and Project Apollo initiatives and the required expensing of share-based compensation contributed to increased costs and expenses for the second quarter of 21.4 percent, from $55.4 million in 2005 to $67.3 million in 2006.
Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for the quarter were $11.9 million, a decrease of 35.8 percent over EBIT of $18.6 million during the comparable period last year.
Income tax expense for the second quarter increased 48.2 percent, from $3.0 million in 2005 to $4.5 million in 2006. The year-to-year difference is due primarily to the $3.9 million reversal of certain reserves for tax contingencies that were recorded during the second quarter of 2005.
Net income for the second quarter decreased by 52.2 percent from $15.4 million in 2005 to $7.4 million in 2006.
Net income per share for the second quarter 2006 was $0.24 (diluted) compared with $0.48 (diluted) for the second quarter 2005.
For the six months ended June 30, 2006, revenue was $159.3 million, an increase of 6.9 percent over the same period last year. EBIT was $41.0 million, compared to $51.3 million in 2005. Net income for the six months was $25.5 million or $0.83 per share (diluted), compared with $35.2 million or $1.11 per share (diluted) during the comparable period last year.
Commenting on the results for the second quarter, Stephen Morris, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron, said: "The radio industry is making continued progress in its transition from diaries to electronic measurement. In the second quarter, we announced a number of Portable People Meter ratings contracts with key radio broadcasters."
"The broadcasters and agencies who have signed for PPM recognize that no other company has the infrastructure, the experience, and the financial wherewithal to deliver a proven electronic radio measurement system in the rapid timeframe that the radio industry is demanding."
"In June, at two key industry conferences, we released the first tangible evidence that Project Apollo has the power to reveal the significant consumer targeting capabilities of new and traditional media. The advertisers who sit on the Project Apollo Steering Committee continue to help Arbitron and VNU refine the value proposition of our proposed single-source market research service that would use the Arbitron PPM as its primary media measurement system."
"Also in the second quarter, we demonstrated our commitment to returning capital to our shareholders as we completed the $70 million stock repurchase program that the Board authorized for 2006," said Mr. Morris.
Company Outlook for 2006
Arbitron is also providing guidance on its earnings outlook for the third quarter 2006 and is reaffirming its guidance for the full year 2006.
For the third quarter 2006, Arbitron expects revenue to increase between 6 percent and 8 percent compared to the third quarter of last year. Earnings Per Share (diluted) for the third quarter 2006 is expected to be between $0.59 and $0.62 versus $0.66 in the third quarter 2005. The impact of share-based compensation expense in the third quarter of 2006 is estimated to be approximately $1.4 million, or $0.03 per share (diluted). The balance of the year-over-year reduction is attributable to anticipated incremental spending on PPM initiatives, including Project Apollo, as well as previously announced initiatives to improve research quality.
Arbitron's year-end 2006 guidance is unchanged. As previously stated, 2006 revenue is expected to increase between 6 percent and 8 percent compared to 2005. Earnings Per Share (diluted) for the year ending December 31, 2006 is expected to be between $1.69 and $1.74.
Earnings conference call: schedule and access
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. EDT on July 20 to discuss its second quarter results and other relevant matters. To listen to the call, dial the following telephone number: 877-780-2271. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audiences and marketing information. The Company has developed the PPM, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1800 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
PPM
SM
is a mark of Arbitron Inc.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
(1): The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(2): The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(3): Earnings before interest and income taxes (EBIT) and earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA) are widely used non-GAAP financial measures of operating performance. They are presented as supplemental information that management of Arbitron believes is useful to investors to evaluate the Company's results because they exclude certain items that are not directly related to the Company's core operating performance. EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered as substitutes either for net income, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20060925152142.txt.gz
TIME:20060925152142
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
(b) On September 20, 2006, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") received written notice dated September 20, 2006 of the resignation of Lawrence Perlman as Chairman of the Board of Directors of the Company, effective at the 2007 annual meeting of stockholders. Mr. Perlman indicated to the Company that his decision to retire is the result of his desire to devote additional time to his family and to the pursuit of other personal interests. Mr. Perlmans resignation was not the result of any disagreement with the Company related to its operations, policies or practices.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
17.1 Resignation Letter of Lawrence Perlman dated September 20, 2006 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated September 22, 2006
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

xhibit
E
17.1
As you may remember, in connection with previous succession planning discussions, I indicated that I would retire from the Arbitron Board in the spring of 2008. I have decided to move my retirement date from the Board forward to the spring of 2007 and, accordingly, I will not be on the proxy for the 2007 annual meeting as a candidate for the Board. I have decided to cut back on my commitments to spend more time with my family and to pursue personal interests and I am in the process of withdrawing in an orderly way from the various boards upon which I sit. This decision as to Arbitron is a particularly difficult one for me, because I have had a long association with the organization and have a deep respect for Steve and the other members of Arbitron's management. I also find it difficult to leave this Board of Directors which would grace any company; however, one cannot weigh the interests of an organization and an individual on the same scale and I need to take this step.
I will continue to be involved with Arbitron Board matters until I retire in the spring of 2007 and look forward to working with all of you over the next several months. While Arbitron faces challenging times (it always has), I am confident that it has the skill and strength to move forward in a way that benefits all of its constituencies.
I have previously informed Steve and Phil, in his capacity as Chair of the Nominating Committee, of my decision.
/s/ Larry

Exhibit 99.1
Press
Information
Company Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 212-887-1314 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor Relations Contact: Todd Fromer KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215 tfromer@kcsa.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK, September 22, 2006  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB)
announced today that Mr. Lawrence Perlman has informed the Company's management and Board of Directors of his decision to retire as Nonexecutive Chairman of the Board of Directors and Director in the spring of 2007, following the conclusion of his current term. As such, Mr. Perlman will not seek re-election at the Company's 2007 annual meeting of shareholders. In a letter to the Board, Mr. Perlman indicated that his decision to retire is the result of his desire to devote additional time to his family and to the pursuit of other personal interests. The Nominating and Governance Committee of Arbitron's Board of Directors will begin a search for a nominee to replace Mr. Perlman.
Lawrence Perlman, nonexecutive chairman, Arbitron Inc. said, "It is with regret that I am announcing my planned retirement from the Arbitron Board. However, following many years in the corporate world, I feel that the time is right to take a step back and focus more on my personal and family obligations. I have had a long and satisfying association with Arbitron and through that time, have developed a deep respect for Steve Morris and the other members of the management team, as well as for my fellow directors. I look forward to working with the Board until my retirement and have the utmost confidence that this talented team has the skill and strength necessary to move forward in a way that benefits all of its constituencies."
Steve Morris, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron, added, "On behalf of the entire Arbitron team, I would like to thank Larry for the countless contributions he has made during his time as Chairman. We will miss his valuable insight and guidance, but we understand and appreciate his need to take such a step and wish him the best as he moves on to this next phase in his life. Arbitron has been and continues to be a leader in sound corporate governance practices, and we will carefully review our options to ensure the best, most responsible Board structure going forward. As Larry was gracious enough to inform us of this decision well in advance of his planned retirement, we have sufficient time to ensure a smooth transition."
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies, outdoor advertising companies and the online radio ratings industry in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has also developed the Portable People Meter (PPM), a new technology for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by its research and technology organization, located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1,800 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
PPM
SM
is a service mark of Arbitron Inc.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
 -  renew all or part of contracts with large customers as they expire;
 -  successfully execute our business strategies, including implementation of our Portable People Meter services and to execute potential joint venture or third party agreements;
 -  effectively manage the impact of any further consolidation in the radio and advertising agency industries;
 -  keep up with rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprietary software systems and new customer products and services that meet these needs in a timely manner;
 -  successfully manage the impact on our business of any economic downturn generally and in the advertising market in particular; and
 -  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperation in surveys, privacy concerns, technology changes and/or government regulations.
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1. BUSINESS  Business Risks" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20061019082225.txt.gz
TIME:20061019082225
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 19, 2006, we issued a press release reporting 2006 third quarter financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated October 19, 2006.
This Form 8-K and the attached Exhibit are furnished to comply with Item 2.02 and Item 9.01 of Form 8-K. Neither this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit are to be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 (except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing).
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Arbitron Inc. Phone: 410-312-8410 sean.creamer@arbitron.com
Company Contact: Sean Creamer, CFO
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Media and Investor Relations Contact: Thom Mocarsky
KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215 tfromer@kcsa.com
Additional Investor Relations Contact: Todd Fromer
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2006.
NEW YORK, October 19, 2006 
For the third quarter 2006, the Company reported revenue of $90.7 million, an increase of 6.0 percent over revenue of $85.6 million during the third quarter of 2005.
Planned spending on the Portable People Meter and Project Apollo initiatives along with the required expensing of share-based compensation contributed to increased costs and expenses for the third quarter of 7.8 percent, from $52.7 million in 2005 to $56.8 million in 2006.
Arbitron's equity in the net income (loss) of its affiliate, Scarborough Research, declined from $193 thousand in the third quarter 2005 to a loss of $1.8 million in the third quarter of 2006. This decline is due primarily to changes in the delivery schedule for Scarborough market reports.
Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for the quarter were $32.1 million, a decrease of 3.0 percent over EBIT of $33.1 million during the comparable period last year.
Net income for the third quarter decreased by 3.4 percent from $20.9 million in 2005 to $20.2 million in 2006.
Net income per share for the third quarter 2006 was $0.68 (diluted) compared with $0.66 (diluted) for the third quarter 2005.
The increase in net income per share for the third quarter relative to the decrease in net income for the quarter is attributable to a reduction in shares outstanding due to the company's repurchase of its shares in the first half of 2006.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2006, revenue was $250.0 million, an increase of 6.5 percent over the same period last year. EBIT was $73.1 million, compared to $84.4 million in 2005. Net income for the nine months was $45.7 million or $1.51 per share (diluted), compared with $56.1 million or $1.77 per share (diluted) during the comparable period last year.
Commenting on the company's accomplishments in the third quarter, Stephen Morris, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron, noted: "We continued to push forward on Project Apollo as a new marketing research service for advertisers and on the Portable People Meter System as the new radio ratings service in the top 50 markets.
SM
"On the Apollo front, the World Federation of Advertisers  a network of 55 National Advertiser Associations and of over 40 of the world's top 100 advertisers  officially endorsed the development of Project Apollo in the United States. And we continue to gather positive feedback and direction from the advertisers who are participating in the pilot panel for Project Apollo.
"Focusing on PPM ratings, we began recruiting consumers for the Philadelphia Portable People Meter-based radio ratings service, continue to work toward Media Rating Council accreditation for the PPM in Houston and have signed additional major market broadcasters to PPM ratings agreements.
SM
"Our efforts have not been confined to Portable People Meter initiatives. We unveiled a new service that helps advertisers, agencies and radio stations easily define whether a particular radio station meets the beer industry's audience guidelines.
"Our Scarborough Research was fully accredited by the Media Rating Council, giving that service a significant competitive advantage in its marketplace.
"And we were the first national research firm to resume regular surveys in the Katrina-impacted markets of New Orleans and Biloxi."
Company Outlook for 2006
Arbitron is also providing guidance on its earnings outlook for the fourth quarter 2006 and for the full year 2006.
For the fourth quarter 2006, Arbitron expects revenue to increase approximately 5 percent compared to the fourth quarter of last year. Arbitron's year-end 2006 revenue guidance is unchanged. As previously stated, 2006 revenue is expected to increase between 6 percent and 8 percent compared to 2005.
Earnings Per Share (diluted) for the fourth quarter 2006 is expected to be between $0.12 and $0.17 versus $0.36 in the fourth quarter 2005.
Arbitron's fourth quarter 2006 Earnings Per Share guidance takes into account several factors.
In October 2006, Arbitron repaid its $50 million note, which had an above market interest rate and a number of terms that potentially limited the company's financial flexibility. The pre-payment required the company to pay a "make-whole" interest payment to the note holders and also necessitated a write-off of the remaining balance of unamortized deferred financing costs. These two expenses will amount to approximately $2.9 million (pre-tax) or $0.06 per share (diluted) in the fourth quarter.
The impact of share-based compensation expense in the fourth quarter of 2006 is estimated to be approximately $1.3 million, or $0.03 per share (diluted).
The balance of the year-over-year reduction for the quarter is attributable to planned incremental spending on the PPM rollout in Philadelphia, New York and Los Angeles, as well as on some information technology spending that was previously planned to be spent in the third quarter 2006.
As a result of the previously noted $0.06 per share (diluted) expense related to the pre-payment of the $50 million note, Earnings Per Share (diluted) for the year ending December 31, 2006 is now expected to be between $1.63 and $1.68 versus the previously issued year-end guidance of $1.69 to $1.74 per diluted share, which did not contemplate the debt pre-payment.
Earnings conference call: schedule and access
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. EDT on October 19 to discuss its third quarter results and other relevant matters. To listen to the call, dial the following telephone number: 888-858-4756. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audiences and marketing information. The Company has developed the PPM System, a new technology for media and marketing research.
SM
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1,800 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
Portable People Meter
SM
and PPM
SM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause forward-looking statements to turn out to be incorrect are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including, in particular, the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in Arbitron's Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2005.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
2) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(3) Earnings before interest and income taxes (EBIT) and earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA) are widely used non-GAAP measures of operating performance. They are presented as supplemental information that management of Arbitron believes is useful to investors to evaluate the Company's results because they exclude certain items that are not directly related to the Company's core operating performance. EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered as substitutes either for net income, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20061221155834.txt.gz
TIME:20061221155834
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On December 20, 2006, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") entered into a $150 million senior unsecured credit facility with JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association as Administrative Agent, Citizens Bank of Pennsylvania as Documentation Agent, Citibank, N.A. and Wachovia Bank, National Association as Co-Syndication Agents, J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. as Sole Bookrunner and Sole Lead Arranger, and a syndicate of lenders from time to time party thereto. The Credit Agreement expires on December 20, 2011. The description of the Credit Agreement (the "Credit Agreement") set forth below is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Credit Agreement, a copy of which is attached as Exhibit 10.1 hereto and is incorporated by reference herein. The Credit Agreement also provides access to up to an additional $50 million of financing through an expansion feature under which the aggregate commitment of the lenders may be increased up to $200 million, subject to the availability of additional commi tments. The credit facility includes a $15 million swing line commitment and a $15 million commitment for issuance of letters of credit. Borrowings under the credit facility bear interest at one of the two following rates, at the Companys option: (1) the Alternate Base Rate (the "ABR") plus the Applicable Rate, or (2) the Adjusted LIBO Rate plus the Applicable Rate; provided that all Swing Line Loans (as defined in the Credit Agreement) bear interest at the ABR plus the Applicable Rate. The ABR is equal to the greater of: (i) the rate of interest publicly announced by JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as its prime rate in effect at its principal office in New York, and (ii) the federal funds rate effective from time to time plus 0.5%. The Adjusted LIBO Rate is equal to the rate at which Eurodollar deposits in the London interbank market for the applicable borrowing period are quoted on the Dow Jones Market Service, as adjusted to give effect to statutory reserve requirements for Eurocurrency liabilities established by the Board of Governors of Federal Reserve System of the United States. The Applicable Rate varies between 0.575% and 1.25% for Eurodollar Borrowings (as defined in the Credit Agreement), and between 0% and 0.25% for ABR Borrowings (as defined in the Credit Agreement), based upon a ratio, determined as of the end of each of the Companys fiscal quarters ending on and after December 31. 2006 of (i) Consolidated Total Indebtedness (as defined in the Credit Agreement) minus the amount by which the sum of cash and Permitted Investments (as defined in the Credit Agreement) maintained by the Company as of the end of such fiscal quarter exceeds $30 million, if at all, to (ii) Consolidated EBITDA (as defined in the Credit Agreement) for the trailing four fiscal quarters. The Credit Agreement contains customary representations, warranties, conditions precedent, events of default, indemnities and affirmative and negative covenants, including covenants that, among other things, require the Company to maintain certain leverage and interest coverage ratios, and restrict the ability of the Company to: incur indebtedness; incur liens; sell or otherwise dispose of assets, including capital stock of subsidiaries; enter into mergers or consolidations; enter into transactions with affiliates; and use proceeds of borrowings under the Credit Agreement for other than permitted uses. These covenants are subject to a number of important exceptions and qualifications. Certain changes in control of the Company would constitute an event of default under the Credit Agreement. The proceeds from the credit facility will be used for general corporate purposes, which may include working capital requirements, strategic acquisitions and authorized share repurchases. A copy of a press release announcing the signing of the Credit Agreement is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 2.03 Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
The information set forth in Item 1.01 of this Current Report on Form 8-K, "Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement," is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits See Exhibit Index attached hereto.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Conformed Copy
Exhibit 10.1
Page
ARTICLE I Definitions
CREDIT AGREEMENT (this "") dated as of December 20, 2006 among ARBITRON INC., the LENDERS party hereto, CITIZENS BANK OF PENNSYLVANIA, as Documentation Agent, CITIBANK, N.A. and WACHOVIA BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as Co-Syndication Agents and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as Administrative Agent.
Agreement
The parties hereto agree as follows:
SECTION 1.01. . As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
Defined Terms
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Alternate Base Rate.
ABR
"" means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, an interest rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) equal to (a) the LIBO Rate for such Interest Period multiplied by (b) the Statutory Reserve Rate.
Adjusted LIBO Rate
"" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association, in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders hereunder.
Administrative Agent
"" means an Administrative Questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
"" means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
Affiliate
"" means, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the greater of (a) the Prime Rate in effect on such day and (b) the Federal Funds Effective Rate in effect on such day plus of 1%. Any change in the Alternate Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate or the Federal Funds Effective Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate or the Federal Funds Effective Rate, respectively.
Alternate Base Rate
1/2
"" means, with respect to any Lender, the percentage of the total Commitments represented by such Lender's Commitment. If the Commitments have terminated or expired, the Applicable Percentages shall be determined based upon the Commitments most recently in effect, giving effect to any assignments.
Applicable Percentage
"" means, for any day, with respect to any Eurodollar Revolving Loan or ABR Revolving Loan, or with respect to the facility fees payable hereunder, as the case may be, the applicable rate per annum set forth below under the caption "Eurodollar Spread", "ABR Spread" or "Facility Fee Rate", as the case may be, based upon the Pricing Ratio applicable on such date:
Applicable Rate
For purposes of the foregoing,
(i) if at any time the Borrower fails to deliver the Financials on or before the date the Financials are due pursuant to Section 5.01, Category 4 shall be deemed applicable for the period commencing five (5) Business Days after such required date of delivery and ending on the date which is five (5) Business Days after the Financials are actually delivered, after which the Category shall be determined in accordance with the table above as applicable;
(ii) adjustments, if any, to the Category then in effect shall be effective five (5) Business Days after the Administrative Agent has received the applicable Financials (it being understood and agreed that each change in Category shall apply during the period commencing on the effective date of such change and ending on the date immediately preceding the effective date of the next such change); and
(iii) notwithstanding the foregoing, Category 1 shall be deemed to be applicable until the Administrative Agent's receipt of the applicable Financials for the Borrower's fiscal quarter ending on or about December 31, 2006 (unless such Financials demonstrate that Category 2, 3 or 4 should have been applicable during such period, in which case such other Category shall be deemed to be applicable during such period) and adjustments to the Category then in effect shall thereafter be effected in accordance with the preceding paragraphs.
In the event that, at any time during which the Commitments are in effect or any of the Obligations remain unpaid (other than contingent indemnity obligations expressly surviving termination hereof), any Financial or Compliance Certificate delivered pursuant to Section 5.01 is shown to be inaccurate and such inaccuracy, if corrected, would have caused the application of a higher Applicable Rate for any period than the Applicable Rate actually applied for such period, then (i) the Borrower shall within five (5) Business Days thereof deliver to the Administrative Agent (for distribution to the Lenders) a corrected Compliance Certificate for such period, (ii) the Applicable Rate for such period shall be recalculated and applied as if the higher Applicable Rate were applicable and (iii) the Borrower shall within five (5) Business Days pay to the Administrative Agent the additional amount of interest and fees owing as a result of such increased Applicable Rate for such period to the extent accrued through the last Interest Payment Date (and any subsequent payments required to be made on any subsequent Interest Payment Date shall also be adjusted accordingly). Nothing contained in this paragraph shall limit or otherwise prejudice the rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders under Section 2.13(c) and Article VII.
"" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 9.04.
Approved Fund
"" means an assignment and assumption agreement entered into by a Lender and an assignee (with the consent of any party whose consent is required by Section 9.04), and accepted by the Administrative Agent, in the form of or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Assignment and Assumption
Exhibit A
"" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 2.20.
Augmenting Lender
"" means the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the earlier of the Maturity Date and the date of termination of the Commitments.
Availability Period
"" means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States of America.
Board
"" means Arbitron Inc., a Delaware corporation.
Borrower
"" means (a) Revolving Loans of the same Type, made, converted or continued on the same date and, in the case of Eurodollar Loans, as to which a single Interest Period is in effect or (b) a Swingline Loan.
Borrowing
"" means a request by the Borrower for a Revolving Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.03.
Borrowing Request
"" means any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized or required by law to remain closed; provided that, when used in connection with a Eurodollar Loan, the term "" shall also exclude any day on which banks are not open for dealings in the London interbank market.
Business Day
Business Day
"" of any Person means the obligations of such Person to pay rent or other amounts under any lease of (or other arrangement conveying the right to use) real or personal property, or a combination thereof, which obligations are required to be classified and accounted for as capital leases on a balance sheet of such Person under GAAP, and the amount of such obligations shall be the capitalized amount thereof determined in accordance with GAAP.
Capital Lease Obligations
"" means (a) the acquisition of ownership, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, by any Person or group (within the meaning of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and the rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission thereunder as in effect on the date hereof), of Equity Interests representing more than 33% of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by the issued and outstanding Equity Interests of the Borrower; or (b) occupation of a majority of the seats (other than vacant seats) on the board of directors of the Borrower by Persons who were neither (i) nominated by the board of directors of the Borrower nor (ii) appointed by directors so nominated.
Change in Control
"" means (a) the adoption of any law, rule or regulation after the date of this Agreement, (b) any change in any law, rule or regulation or in the interpretation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority after the date of this Agreement or (c) compliance by any Lender or the Issuing Bank (or, for purposes of Section 2.15(b), by any lending office of such Lender or by such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's holding company, if any) with any request, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any Governmental Authority made or issued after the date of this Agreement.
Change in Law
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are Revolving Loans or Swingline Loans.
Class
"" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time.
Code
"" means each of Citibank, N.A. and Wachovia Bank, National Association in its capacity as co-syndication agent for the credit facility evidenced by this Agreement.
Co-Syndication Agent
"" means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment of such Lender to make Revolving Loans and to acquire participations in Letters of Credit and Swingline Loans hereunder, expressed as an amount representing the maximum aggregate amount of such Lender's Revolving Credit Exposure hereunder, as such commitment may be (a) reduced or terminated from time to time pursuant to Section 2.09, (b) increased from time to time pursuant to Section 2.20 and (c) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to Section 9.04. The initial amount of each Lender's Commitment is set forth on , or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed its Commitment, as applicable. The initial aggregate amount of the Lenders' Commitments is $150,000,000.
Commitment
Schedule 2.01
"" means a certificate of a Financial Officer in the form of Exhibit G.
Compliance Certificate
"" means Consolidated Net Income , to the extent deducted from revenues in determining Consolidated Net Income, (i) Consolidated Interest Expense, (ii) expense for taxes paid or accrued, (iii) depreciation, (iv) amortization, (v) extraordinary non-cash losses, (vi) non-cash losses, charges or expenses arising from director and employee stock-based compensation , (a) to the extent included in Consolidated Net Income, extraordinary non-cash gains and (b) the amount of any subsequent cash payments in respect of any non-cash losses, charges or expenses described in the foregoing clause (v) or (vi), all calculated for the Borrower and its Subsidiaries in accordance with GAAP on a consolidated basis; provided that Consolidated EBITDA shall not include or give effect to the income (or loss) of any Person that is not a Subsidiary (i) in which any Person other than the Borrower or any of the Borrower's Subsidiaries has a joint interest or a partnership interest or other ownership interest or (ii) to the extent the Borrower or any of the Borrower's Subsidiaries does not control the Board of Directors or other governing body of such Person or otherwise does not control the declaration of a dividend or other distribution by such Person, except Consolidated EBITDA shall include the income of such Person in each case to the extent of the amount of cash dividends or other cash distributions actually paid to the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries by such Person during such period. For purposes of the computation of the Leverage Ratio or the Pricing Ratio for any period during which a Permitted Acquisition occurred, EBITDA shall be calculated on a pro forma basis reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent as if such Permitted Acquisition had occurred (and any related Indebtedness incurred) on the first day of such computation period.
Consolidated EBITDA
plus
minus
"" means, with reference to any period, total interest expense (including that attributable to Capital Lease Obligations) of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries for such period with respect to all outstanding Indebtedness of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries (including all commissions, discounts and other fees and charges owed with respect to letters of credit and bankers' acceptance financing and net costs under Swap Agreements in respect of interest rates to the extent such net costs are allocable to such period in accordance with GAAP), calculated on a consolidated basis for the Borrower and its Subsidiaries for such period in accordance with GAAP.
Consolidated Interest Expense
"" means, with reference to any period, the net income (or loss) of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries calculated in accordance with GAAP on a consolidated basis (without duplication) for such period.
Consolidated Net Income
"" means Consolidated Total Assets minus the aggregate amount, for the Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, of all assets classified as intangible assets under GAAP, including, without limitation, goodwill, trademarks, patents, copyrights, organization expenses, franchises, licenses, trade names, brand names, mailing lists, catalogs, excess of cost over book value of assets acquired, and bond discount and underwriting expenses.
Consolidated Tangible Assets
"" means, as of the date of any determination thereof, total assets of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries calculated in accordance with GAAP on a consolidated basis as of such date.
Consolidated Total Assets
"" means at any time the sum, without duplication, of the aggregate Indebtedness of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries calculated on a consolidated basis as of such time in accordance with GAAP.
Consolidated Total Indebtedness
"" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise. "" and "" have meanings correlative thereto.
Control
Controlling
Controlled
"" means a Borrowing, the issuance of a Letter of Credit, an LC Disbursement or any of the foregoing.
Credit Event
"" means any event or condition which constitutes an Event of Default or which upon notice, lapse of time or both would, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
Default
"" means the actions, suits and proceedings and the environmental matters disclosed in Schedule 3.06.
Disclosed Matters
"" means Citizens Bank of Pennsylvania, in its capacity as documentation agent for the credit facility evidenced by this Agreement.
Documentation Agent
"" or "" refers to lawful money of the United States of America.
Dollars
$
"" means a Subsidiary organized under the laws of a jurisdiction located in the United States of America.
Domestic Subsidiary
"" means the date on which the conditions specified in Section 4.01 are satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 9.02).
Effective Date
"" means all laws, rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, orders, decrees, judgments, injunctions, notices or binding agreements issued, promulgated or entered into by any Governmental Authority, relating in any way to the environment, preservation or reclamation of natural resources, the management, release or threatened release of any Hazardous Material or to health and safety matters.
Environmental Laws
"" means any liability, contingent or otherwise (including any liability for damages, costs of environmental remediation, fines, penalties or indemnities), of the Borrower or any Subsidiary directly or indirectly resulting from or based upon (a) violation of any Environmental Law, (b) the generation, use, handling, transportation, storage, treatment or disposal of any Hazardous Materials, (c) exposure to any Hazardous Materials, (d) the release or threatened release of any Hazardous Materials into the environment or (e) any contract, agreement or other consensual arrangement pursuant to which liability is assumed or imposed with respect to any of the foregoing.
Environmental Liability
"" means shares of capital stock, partnership interests, membership interests in a limited liability company, beneficial interests in a trust or other equity ownership interests in a Person, and any warrants, options or other rights entitling the holder thereof to purchase or acquire any such equity interest.
Equity Interests
"" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time.
ERISA
"" means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that, together with the Borrower, is treated as a single employer under Section 414(b) or (c) of the Code or, solely for purposes of Section 302 of ERISA and Section 412 of the Code, is treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
"" means (a) any "reportable event", as defined in Section 4043 of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder with respect to a Plan (other than an event for which the 30-day notice period is waived); (b) the existence with respect to any Plan of an "accumulated funding deficiency" (as defined in Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA), whether or not waived; (c) the filing pursuant to Section 412(d) of the Code or Section 303(d) of ERISA of an application for a waiver of the minimum funding standard with respect to any Plan; (d) the incurrence by the Borrower or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan; (e) the receipt by the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate from the PBGC or a plan administrator of any notice relating to an intention to terminate any Plan or Plans or to appoint a trustee to administer any Plan; (f) the incurrence by the Borrower or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability with respect to the withdrawal or partial withdrawal from any Plan or Multiemployer Plan; or (g) the receipt by the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, or the receipt by any Multiemployer Plan from the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent or in reorganization, within the meaning of Title IV of ERISA.
ERISA Event
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate.
Eurodollar
"" has the meaning assigned to such term in Article VII.
Event of Default
"" means a Letter of Credit which includes a provision which automatically extends the expiry date thereof for a specified period unless, within some period of time in advance of the then applicable expiry date thereof, the Administrative Agent gives notice to the beneficiary to the effect that such Letter of Credit will not be so extended.
Evergreen LC
"" means, with respect to the Administrative Agent, any Lender, the Issuing Bank or any other recipient of any payment to be made by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder, (a) income excise, stamp or franchise taxes and other similar taxes, fees, duties, withholdings or other charges imposed on (or measured by) its net income by the United States of America, or by the jurisdiction under the laws of which such recipient is organized or in which its principal office is located or, in the case of any Lender, in which its applicable lending office is located or otherwise as a result of a present or former connection between the applicable lending office and the jurisdiction of the Governmental Authority imposing such tax, (b) any branch profits taxes imposed by the United States of America or any similar tax imposed by any other jurisdiction in which the Borrower is located or in which its principal office is located and (c) in the case of a Foreign Lender (other than an assignee pursuant to a request by the Borrower under Section 2.19(b)), any withholding tax that is imposed on amounts payable to such Foreign Lender at the time such Foreign Lender becomes a party to this Agreement (or designates a new lending office) or is attributable to such Foreign Lender's failure to comply with Section 2.17(e), except to the extent that such Foreign Lender (or its assignor, if any) was entitled, at the time of designation of a new lending office (or assignment), to receive additional amounts from the Borrower with respect to such withholding tax pursuant to Section 2.17(a).
Excluded Taxes
"" means, for any day, the weighted average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published on the next succeeding Business Day by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day that is a Business Day, the average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the quotations for such day for such transactions received by the Administrative Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Effective Rate
"" means the chief financial officer, principal accounting officer, treasurer, controller, Vice President Accounting Services or Treasury Manager of the Borrower.
Financial Officer
"" means the annual or quarterly financial statements, and accompanying certificates and other documents, of the Borrower required to be delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or 5.01(b).
Financials
"" means any Lender that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than that in which the Borrower is located. For purposes of this definition, the United States of America, each State thereof and the District of Columbia shall be deemed to constitute a single jurisdiction.
Foreign Lender
"" means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America.
GAAP
"" means the government of the United States of America, any other nation or any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government.
Governmental Authority
"" of or by any Person (the "") means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness or other obligation of any other Person (the "") in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or other obligation or to purchase (or to advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or other obligation of the payment thereof, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor so as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or other obligation or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty issued to support such Indebtedness or obligation; , that the term Guarantee shall not include endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business. The amount of any Guarantee made by any guarantor shall be deemed to be the lower of (a) an amount equal to the stated or determinable amount of the primary obligation in respect of which such Guarantee is made and (b) the maximum amount for which such guarantor may be liable pursuant to the terms of the instrument embodying such Guarantee, unless (in the case of a primary obligation that is not Indebtedness) such primary obligation and the maximum amount for which such guarantor may be liable are not stated or determinable, in which case the amount of such Guarantee shall be such guarantor's maximum reasonably anticipated liability in respect thereof as reasonably determined by the Borrower in good faith.
Guarantee
guarantor
primary obligor
provided
"" means all explosive or radioactive substances or wastes and all hazardous or toxic substances, wastes or other pollutants, including petroleum or petroleum distillates, asbestos or asbestos containing materials, polychlorinated biphenyls, radon gas, infectious or medical wastes and all other substances or wastes of any nature regulated pursuant to any Environmental Law.
Hazardous Materials
"" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 2.20.
Increasing Lender
"" of any Person means, without duplication, (a) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money or with respect to deposits or advances of any kind, (b) all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments, (c) all obligations of such Person upon which interest charges are customarily paid, (d) all obligations of such Person under conditional sale or other title retention agreements relating to property acquired by such Person, (e) all obligations of such Person in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (excluding current accounts payable incurred in the ordinary course of business), (f) all Indebtedness of others secured by (or for which the holder of such Indebtedness has an existing right, contingent or otherwise, to be secured by) any Lien on property owned or acquired by such Person, whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby has been assumed, (g) all Guarantees by such Person of Indebtedness of others, (h) all Capital Lease Obligations of such Person, (i) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person as an account party in respect of letters of credit and letters of guaranty, (j) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person in respect of bankers' acceptances and (k) all Swap Obligations of such Person. The Indebtedness of any Person shall include the Indebtedness of any other entity (including any partnership in which such Person is a general partner) to the extent such Person is liable therefor as a result of such Person's ownership interest in or other relationship with such entity, except to the extent the terms of such Indebtedness provide that such Person is not liable therefor.
Indebtedness
"" means Taxes other than Excluded Taxes.
Indemnified Taxes
"" means the Confidential Information Memorandum dated November 2006 relating to the Borrower and the Transactions.
Information Memorandum
"" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 6.11(b).
Interest Coverage Ratio
"" means a request by the Borrower to convert or continue a Revolving Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.08.
Interest Election Request
"" means (a) with respect to any ABR Loan (other than a Swingline Loan), the last day of each March, June, September and December, (b) with respect to any Eurodollar Loan, the last day of the Interest Period applicable to the Borrowing of which such Loan is a part and, in the case of a Eurodollar Loan with an Interest Period of more than three months' duration, each day prior to the last day of such Interest Period that occurs at intervals of three months' duration after the first day of such Interest Period and (c) with respect to any Swingline Loan, the day that such Loan is required to be repaid.
Interest Payment Date
"" means with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Borrowing and ending on the numerically corresponding day in the calendar month that is one, two, three or six months thereafter (or with the consent of each Lender, nine or twelve months), as the Borrower may elect; , that (i) if any Interest Period would end on a day other than a Business Day, such Interest Period shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing only, such next succeeding Business Day would fall in the next calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day and (ii) any Interest Period pertaining to a Eurodollar Borrowing that commences on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the last calendar month of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the last calendar month of such Interest Period. For purposes hereof, the date of a Borrowing initially shall be the date on which such Borrowing is made and, in the case of a Revolving Borrowing, thereafter shall be the effective date of the most recent conversion or continuation of such Borrowing.
Interest Period
provided
"" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association, in its capacity as the issuer of Letters of Credit hereunder, and its successors in such capacity as provided in Section 2.06(i). The Issuing Bank may, in its discretion, arrange for one or more Letters of Credit to be issued by Affiliates of the Issuing Bank, in which case the term "Issuing Bank" shall include any such Affiliate with respect to Letters of Credit issued by such Affiliate.
Issuing Bank
"" means a payment made by the Issuing Bank pursuant to a Letter of Credit.
LC Disbursement
"" means, at any time, the sum of (a) the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit at such time plus (b) the aggregate amount of all LC Disbursements that have not yet been reimbursed by or on behalf of the Borrower at such time. The LC Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total LC Exposure at such time.
LC Exposure
"" means the Persons listed on and any other Person that shall have become a Lender hereunder pursuant to Section 2.20 or pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption, other than any such Person that ceases to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption. Unless the context otherwise requires, the term "Lenders" includes the Swingline Lender.
Lenders
Schedule 2.01
"" means any letter of credit issued pursuant to this Agreement.
Letter of Credit
"" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 6.11(a).
Leverage Ratio
"" means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, the rate appearing on Page 3750 of the Dow Jones Market Service (or on any successor or substitute page of such Service, or any successor to or substitute for such Service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such page of such Service, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to deposits in Dollars in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two (2) Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period, as the rate for deposits in Dollars with a maturity comparable to such Interest Period. In the event that such rate is not available at such time for any reason, then the "" with respect to such Eurodollar Borrowing for such Interest Period shall be the rate at which deposits in Dollars of $5,000,000 and for a maturity comparable to such Interest Period are offered by the principal London office of the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds in the London interbank market at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two (2) Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period.
LIBO Rate
LIBO Rate
"" means, with respect to any asset, (a) any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, hypothecation, encumbrance, charge or security interest in, on or of such asset, (b) the interest of a vendor or a lessor under any conditional sale agreement, capital lease or title retention agreement (or any financing lease having substantially the same economic effect as any of the foregoing) relating to such asset and (c) in the case of securities, any purchase option, call or similar right of a third party with respect to such securities.
Lien
"" means the loans made by the Lenders to the Borrower pursuant to this Agreement.
Loans
"" means this Agreement, the Subsidiary Guaranty, any promissory notes executed and delivered pursuant to Section 2.10(e) and any and all other instruments and documents executed and delivered in connection with any of the foregoing.
Loan Documents
"" means, collectively, the Borrower and the Subsidiary Guarantors.
Loan Parties
"" means a material adverse effect on (a) the business, assets, property, condition (financial or otherwise) or prospects of the Borrower and the Subsidiaries taken as a whole or (b) the validity or enforceability of this Agreement any or any and all other Loan Documents or the rights or remedies of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders thereunder.
Material Adverse Effect
"" means each Domestic Subsidiary (i) which, as of the most recent fiscal quarter of the Borrower, for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters then ended, for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01, contributed greater than ten percent (10%) of the Borrower's Consolidated EBITDA for such period or (ii) which contributed greater than ten percent (10%) of the Borrower's Consolidated Total Assets as of such date; provided that, if at any time the aggregate amount of the EBITDA or consolidated total assets of all Domestic Subsidiaries that are not Material Domestic Subsidiaries exceeds ten percent (10%) of the Borrower's Consolidated EBITDA for any such period or ten percent (10%) of the Borrower's Consolidated Total Assets as of the end of any such fiscal quarter, the Borrower (or, in the event the Borrower has failed to do so within ten (10) days, the Administrative Agent) shall designate sufficient Domestic Subsidiaries as "Material Domestic Subsidiaries" to eliminate such excess, and such designated Subsidiaries shall for all purposes of this Agreement constitute Material Domestic Subsidiaries.
Material Domestic Subsidiaries
"" means Indebtedness (other than the Loans and Letters of Credit), or obligations in respect of one or more Swap Agreements, of any one or more of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $10,000,000. For purposes of determining Material Indebtedness, the "principal amount" of the obligations of the Borrower or any Subsidiary in respect of any Swap Agreement at any time shall be the maximum aggregate amount (giving effect to any netting agreements) that the Borrower or such Subsidiary would be required to pay if such Swap Agreement were terminated at such time.
Material Indebtedness
"" means December 20, 2011.
Maturity Date
"" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc.
Moody's
"" means a multiemployer plan as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA.
Multiemployer Plan
"" means, with respect to any Evergreen LC, the date by which the Issuing Bank must give notice to the beneficiary thereof of the non-renewal of such Evergreen LC in order to avoid the automatic extension of the expiry date thereof.
Non-Extension Date
"" means all indebtedness (including interest accruing during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding), obligations and liabilities of any of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries to any of the Lenders and the Administrative Agent, individually or collectively, existing on the Effective Date or arising thereafter, direct or indirect, joint or several, absolute or contingent, matured or unmatured, liquidated or unliquidated, secured or unsecured, arising by contract, operation of law or otherwise, arising or incurred under this Credit Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents or any Swap Agreement or in respect of any of the Loans made or reimbursement or other obligations incurred or any of the Letters of Credit or other instruments at any time evidencing any thereof.
Obligations
"" means any and all present or future stamp or documentary taxes or any other excise or property taxes, charges or similar levies (other than Excluded Taxes) arising from any payment made hereunder or from the execution, delivery or enforcement of, or otherwise with respect to, this Agreement.
Other Taxes
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04.
Participant
"" means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA and any successor entity performing similar functions.
PBGC
"" means any acquisition (whether by purchase, merger, consolidation or otherwise) or series of related acquisitions by the Borrower or any Subsidiary of (i) all or substantially all the assets of, (ii) all the Equity Interests in, a Person or division or line of business of a Person or (iii) if clauses (i) and (ii) above are inapplicable, the rights of any licensee (including by means of the termination of such licensee's rights under such license) under a trademark license to such licensee from the Borrower or any Subsidiary, if, at the time of and immediately after giving effect thereto, (a) no Default has occurred and is continuing or would arise after giving effect thereto, (b) such Person or division or line of business is engaged in the same or a similar line of business as the Borrower and the Subsidiaries or business reasonably related thereto, (c) the Borrower and the Subsidiaries are in compliance, on a pro forma basis reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent after giving effect to such acquisition (without giving effect to any cost savings), with the covenants contained in Section 6.11 recomputed as of the last day of the most recently ended fiscal quarter of the Borrower for which financial statements are available, as if such acquisition had occurred on the first day of each relevant period for testing such compliance and (d) in the case of an acquisition or merger involving the Borrower or a Subsidiary, the Borrower or such Subsidiary is the surviving entity of such merger and/or consolidation.
Permitted Acquisition
"" means:
Permitted Encumbrances
(a) Liens imposed by law for taxes that are not yet due or are being contested in compliance with Section 5.04;
(b) carriers', warehousemen's, mechanics', materialmen's, repairmen's and other like Liens imposed by law, arising in the ordinary course of business and securing obligations that are not overdue by more than thirty (30) days or are being contested in compliance with Section 5.04;
(c) pledges and deposits made in the ordinary course of business in compliance with workers' compensation, unemployment insurance and other social security laws or regulations;
(d) deposits to secure the performance of bids, trade contracts, leases, statutory obligations, surety and appeal bonds, performance bonds and other obligations of a like nature, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
(e) judgment liens in respect of judgments that do not constitute an Event of Default under clause (k) of Article VII;
(f) easements, zoning restrictions, rights-of-way and similar encumbrances on real property imposed by law or arising in the ordinary course of business that do not secure any monetary obligations and do not materially detract from the value of the affected property or interfere with the ordinary conduct of business of the Borrower or any Subsidiary; and
(g) Liens arising by virtue of any statutory or common law provision relating to banker's liens, rights of set-off or similar rights and remedies as to deposit accounts or other funds maintained with a creditor depository institution; , that (i) such deposit account is not a dedicated cash collateral account and is not subject to restrictions against access by the Borrower in excess of those set forth by regulations promulgated by the Board and (ii) such deposit account is not intended by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries to provide collateral to the depository institution;
provided
that the term "Permitted Encumbrances" shall not include any Lien securing Indebtedness.
provided
"" means:
Permitted Investments
(a) direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America, in each case maturing within 36 months from the date of acquisition thereof;
(b) obligations issued by any Federal agency of the United States of America, in each case maturing within 36 months from the date of acquisition thereof;
(c) municipal investments and direct obligations of any State of the United States of America, in each case with a rating of A or higher by S&P and/or A2 or higher by Moody's and a maximum maturity of 36 months (for securities where the interest rate is adjusted periodically (e.g. floating rate securities), the reset date will be used to determine the maturity date);
(d) investments in commercial paper maturing within 270 days from the date of acquisition thereof and having, at such date of acquisition, a rating of A-2 from S&P or P-2 from Moody's;
(e) investments in certificates of deposit, banker's acceptances and time deposits maturing within 36 months from the date of acquisition thereof issued or guaranteed by or placed with, and money market deposit accounts issued or offered by, any domestic office of any commercial bank organized under the laws of the United States of America or any State thereof which has a combined capital and surplus and undivided profits of not less than $500,000,000;
(f) fully collateralized repurchase agreements with a term of not more than 30 days for securities described in clause (a) above and entered into with a financial institution satisfying the criteria described in clause (e) above;
(g) money market funds that (i) comply with the criteria set forth in Securities and Exchange Commission Rule 2a-7 under the Investment Company Act of 1940, (ii) are rated AAA by S&P or Aaa by Moody's and (iii) have portfolio assets of at least $5,000,000,000;
(h) investments in auction rate securities with a rating of A or higher by S&P and/or A2 or higher by Moody's and a maximum maturity of one year, for which the reset date will be used to determine the maturity date;
(i) investments in variable rate demand notes with a rating of A or higher by S&P and/or A2 or higher by Moody's and a maximum maturity of one year, for which the reset date will be used to determine the maturity date;
(j) investments in corporate and bank debt including, but not limited to, corporate bonds and loan participations. The minimum rating for such investments must be rated "A-2" and/or "P-2" or have a long term rating of BBB by S&P and/or Baa2 by Moody's respectively; and
(k) other investments made in accordance with the Borrower's investment policy as in effect on the Effective Date in the form previously provided to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders and other immaterial changes thereto.
"" means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
"" means any employee pension benefit plan (other than a Multiemployer Plan) subject to the provisions of Title IV of ERISA or Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA, and in respect of which the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate is (or, if such plan were terminated, would under Section 4069 of ERISA be deemed to be) an "employer" as defined in Section 3(5) of ERISA.
Plan
"" means the ratio, determined as of the end of each of the Borrower's fiscal quarters ending on and after December 31, 2006, of (i) Consolidated Total Indebtedness to the extent the sum of cash, cash equivalents (as reflected in the Borrower's then most recent consolidated balance sheet) and Permitted Investments maintained by the Borrower as of the end of such fiscal quarter exceeds $30,000,000, the amount of such excess to (ii) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of four (4) consecutive fiscal quarters ending with the end of such fiscal quarter, all calculated for the Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis.
Pricing Ratio
minus,
"" means the rate of interest per annum publicly announced from time to time by JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association as its prime rate in effect at its principal office in New York City; each change in the Prime Rate shall be effective from and including the date such change is publicly announced as being effective.
Prime Rate
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04.
Register
"" means, with respect to any specified Person, such Person's Affiliates and the respective directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of such Person and such Person's Affiliates.
Related Parties
"" means, at any time, Lenders having Revolving Credit Exposures and unused Commitments representing more than 50% of the sum of the total Revolving Credit Exposures and unused Commitments at such time.
Required Lenders
"" any dividend or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) with respect to any Equity Interests in the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or any payment (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, cancellation or termination of any such Equity Interests in the Borrower or any option, warrant or other right to acquire any such Equity Interests in the Borrower.
Restricted Payment
"" means, with respect to any Lender at any time, the sum of the outstanding principal amount of such Lender's Revolving Loans and its LC Exposure and Swingline Exposure at such time.
Revolving Credit Exposure
"" means a Loan made pursuant to Section 2.03.
Revolving Loan
"" means Standard & Poor's.
S&P
"" means any sale or other transfer of any property or asset by any Person with the intent to lease such property or asset as lessee.
Sale and Leaseback Transaction
"" means a fraction (expressed as a decimal), the numerator of which is the number one and the denominator of which is the number one minus the aggregate of the maximum reserve percentages (including any marginal, special, emergency or supplemental reserves) expressed as a decimal established by the Board to which the Administrative Agent is subject for eurocurrency funding (currently referred to as "Eurocurrency Liabilities" in Regulation D of the Board). Such reserve percentages shall include those imposed pursuant to such Regulation D. Eurodollar Loans shall be deemed to constitute eurocurrency funding and to be subject to such reserve requirements without benefit of or credit for proration, exemptions or offsets that may be available from time to time to any Lender under such Regulation D or any comparable regulation. The Statutory Reserve Rate shall be adjusted automatically on and as of the effective date of any change in any reserve percentage.
Statutory Reserve Rate
"" of the Borrower or Subsidiary means any Indebtedness of such Person the payment of which is subordinated to payment of the obligations under the Loan Documents to the written satisfaction of, and the terms and conditions of which are otherwise satisfactory to, the Administrative Agent.
Subordinated Indebtedness
"" means any document, agreement or instrument evidencing any Subordinated Indebtedness or entered into in connection with any Subordinated Indebtedness.
Subordinated Indebtedness Documents
"" means, with respect to any Person (the "") at any date, any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity the accounts of which would be consolidated with those of the parent in the parent's consolidated financial statements if such financial statements were prepared in accordance with GAAP as of such date, as well as any other corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity of which securities or other ownership interests representing more than 50.5% of the equity or more than 50.5% of the ordinary voting power or, in the case of a partnership, more than 50.5% of the general partnership interests are, as of such date, owned, controlled or held.
subsidiary
parent
"" means any subsidiary of the Borrower.
Subsidiary
"" means each Material Domestic Subsidiary. The Subsidiary Guarantors on the Effective Date are identified as such in hereto.
Subsidiary Guarantor
Schedule 3.01
"" means that certain Guaranty in the form of (including any and all supplements thereto) and executed by each Subsidiary Guarantor, as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time.
Subsidiary Guaranty
Exhibit F
"" means any agreement with respect to any swap, forward, future or derivative transaction or option or similar agreement involving, or settled by reference to, one or more rates, currencies, commodities, equity or debt instruments or securities, or economic, financial or pricing indices or measures of economic, financial or pricing risk or value or any similar transaction or any combination of these transactions; that no phantom stock or similar plan providing for payments only on account of services provided by current or former directors, officers, employees or consultants of the Borrower or the Subsidiaries shall be a Swap Agreement.
Swap Agreement
provided
"" means any and all obligations of the Borrower or any Subsidiary, whether absolute or contingent and howsoever and whensoever created, arising, evidenced or acquired (including all renewals, extensions and modifications thereof and substitutions therefor), under (a) any and all Swap Agreements with a Lender or an affiliate of a Lender, and (b) any and all cancellations, buy backs, reversals, terminations or assignments of any such Swap Agreement transaction.
Swap Obligations
"" means, at any time, the aggregate principal amount of all Swingline Loans outstanding at such time. The Swingline Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Swingline Exposure at such time.
Swingline Exposure
"" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association, in its capacity as lender of Swingline Loans hereunder.
Swingline Lender
"" means a Loan made pursuant to Section 2.05.
Swingline Loan
"" means any and all present or future taxes, levies, imposts, duties, deductions, charges or withholdings imposed by any Governmental Authority.
Taxes
"" means the execution, delivery and performance by the Loan Parties of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, the borrowing of Loans, the use of the proceeds thereof and the issuance of Letters of Credit hereunder.
Transactions
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether the rate of interest on such Loan, or on the Loans comprising such Borrowing, is determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the Alternate Base Rate.
Type
"" means liability to a Multiemployer Plan as a result of a complete or partial withdrawal from such Multiemployer Plan, as such terms are defined in Part I of Subtitle E of Title IV of ERISA.
Withdrawal Liability
SECTION 1.02. . For purposes of this Agreement, Loans may be classified and referred to by Class (, a "Revolving Loan") or by Type (, a "Eurodollar Loan") or by Class and Type (, a "Eurodollar Revolving Loan"). Borrowings also may be classified and referred to by Class (, a "Revolving Borrowing") or by Type (, a "Eurodollar Borrowing") or by Class and Type (, a "Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing").
Classification of Loans and Borrowings
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
SECTION 1.03. . The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined. Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms. The words "include", "includes" and "including" shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase "without limitation". The word "will" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word "shall". Unless the context requires otherwise (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document herein shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified (subject to any restrictions on such amendments, restatements supplements or modifications set forth herein), (b) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Person's successors and assigns, (c) the words "herein", "hereof" and "hereunder", and words of similar import, shall be construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof, (d) all references herein to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, this Agreement and (e) the words "asset" and "property" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights.
Terms Generally
SECTION 1.04. . Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature shall be construed in accordance with GAAP, as in effect from time to time; that, if the Borrower notifies the Administrative Agent that the Borrower requests an amendment to any provision hereof to eliminate the effect of any change occurring after the date hereof in GAAP or in the application thereof on the operation of such provision (or if the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower that the Required Lenders request an amendment to any provision hereof for such purpose), regardless of whether any such notice is given before or after such change in GAAP or in the application thereof, then such provision shall be interpreted on the basis of GAAP as in effect and applied immediately before such change shall have become effective until such notice shall have been withdrawn or such provision amended in accordance herewith.
Accounting Terms; GAAP
provided
SECTION 2.01. Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Lender agrees to make Revolving Loans to the Borrower in Dollars from time to time during the Availability Period in an aggregate principal amount that will not result in (a) such Lender's Revolving Credit Exposure exceeding such Lender's Commitment or (b) the sum of the total Revolving Credit Exposures exceeding the total Commitments. Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may borrow, prepay and reborrow Revolving Loans.
Commitments.
SECTION 2.02. . (a) Each Revolving Loan shall be made as part of a Borrowing consisting of Revolving Loans made by the Lenders ratably in accordance with their respective Commitments. The failure of any Lender to make any Loan required to be made by it shall not relieve any other Lender of its obligations hereunder; that the Commitments of the Lenders are several and no Lender shall be responsible for any other Lender's failure to make Loans as required.
Loans and Borrowings
provided
(b) Subject to Section 2.14, each Revolving Borrowing shall be comprised entirely of ABR Loans or Eurodollar Loans as the Borrower may request in accordance herewith. Each Swingline Loan shall be an ABR Loan. Each Lender at its option may make any Eurodollar Loan by causing any domestic or foreign branch or Affiliate of such Lender to make such Loan; that any exercise of such option shall not affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay such Loan in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
provided
(c) At the commencement of each Interest Period for any Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $500,000 and not less than $5,000,000. At the time that each ABR Revolving Borrowing is made, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $250,000 and not less than $1,000,000; that an ABR Revolving Borrowing may be in an aggregate amount that is equal to the entire unused balance of the total Commitments or that is required to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by Section 2.06(e). Each Swingline Loan shall be in an amount that is an integral multiple of $250,000 and not less than $500,000. Borrowings of more than one Type and Class may be outstanding at the same time; that there shall not at any time be more than a total of six (6) Eurodollar Revolving Borrowings outstanding.
provided
provided
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, the Borrower shall not be entitled to request, or to elect to convert or continue, any Borrowing if the Interest Period requested with respect thereto would end after the Maturity Date.
SECTION 2.03. . To request a Revolving Borrowing, the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request by telephone (a) in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 1:00 p.m., New York City time, three (3) Business Days before the date of the proposed Borrowing or (b) in the case of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 1:00 p.m., New York City time, one Business Day before the date of the proposed Borrowing; that any such notice of an ABR Revolving Borrowing to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by Section 2.06(e) may be given not later than 1:00 p.m., New York City time, on the date of the proposed Borrowing. Each such telephonic Borrowing Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or telecopy to the Administrative Agent of a written Borrowing Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Borrower. Each such telephonic and written Borrowing Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02:
Requests for Revolving Borrowings
provided
(i) the aggregate amount of the requested Borrowing;
(ii) the date of such Borrowing, which shall be a Business Day;
(iii) whether such Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing;
(iv) in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, the initial Interest Period to be applicable thereto, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term "Interest Period"; and
(v) the location and number of the Borrower's account to which funds are to be disbursed, which shall comply with the requirements of Section 2.07.
If no election as to the Type of Revolving Borrowing is specified, then the requested Revolving Borrowing shall be an ABR Borrowing. If no Interest Period is specified with respect to any requested Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one month's duration. Promptly following receipt of a Borrowing Request in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of the amount of such Lender's Loan to be made as part of the requested Borrowing.
SECTION 2.04. .
Intentionally Omitted
SECTION 2.05. . (a) Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Swingline Lender agrees to make Swingline Loans in Dollars to the Borrower from time to time during the Availability Period, in an aggregate principal amount at any time outstanding that will not result in (i) the aggregate principal amount of outstanding Swingline Loans exceeding $15,000,000 or (ii) the sum of the total Revolving Credit Exposures exceeding the total Commitments; that the Swingline Lender shall not be required to make a Swingline Loan to refinance an outstanding Swingline Loan. Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may borrow, prepay and reborrow Swingline Loans.
Swingline Loans
provided
(b) To request a Swingline Loan, the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request by telephone (confirmed by telecopy), not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the day of a proposed Swingline Loan. Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the requested date (which shall be a Business Day) and amount of the requested Swingline Loan. The Administrative Agent will promptly advise the Swingline Lender of any such notice received from the Borrower. The Swingline Lender shall make each Swingline Loan available to the Borrower by means of a disbursement by wire transfer to a deposit account of the Borrower at such financial institution as is designated by the Borrower in its request for such Swingline Loan (or, in the case of a Swingline Loan made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.06(e), by remittance to the Issuing Bank) by 3:00 p.m., New York City time, on the requested date of such Swingline Loan.
(c) The Swingline Lender may by written notice given to the Administrative Agent not later than 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on any Business Day require the Lenders to acquire participations on such Business Day in all or a portion of the Swingline Loans outstanding. Such notice shall specify the aggregate amount of Swingline Loans in which Lenders will participate. Promptly upon receipt of such notice, the Administrative Agent will give notice thereof to each Lender, specifying in such notice such Lender's Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Loans. Each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees, upon receipt of notice as provided above, to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the Swingline Lender, such Lender's Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Loans. Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations in Swingline Loans pursuant to this paragraph is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever. Each Lender shall comply with its obligation under this paragraph by wire transfer of immediately available funds, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.07 with respect to Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.07 shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to the Swingline Lender the amounts so received by it from the Lenders. The Administrative Agent shall notify the Borrower of any participations in any Swingline Loan acquired pursuant to this paragraph, and thereafter payments in respect of such Swingline Loan shall be made to the Administrative Agent and not to the Swingline Lender. Any amounts received by the Swingline Lender from the Borrower (or other party on behalf of the Borrower) in respect of a Swingline Loan after receipt by the Swingline Lender of the proceeds of a sale of participations therein shall be promptly remitted to the Administrative Agent; any such amounts received by the Administrative Agent shall be promptly remitted by the Administrative Agent to the Lenders that shall have made their payments pursuant to this paragraph and to the Swingline Lender, as their interests may appear; provided that any such payment so remitted shall be repaid to the Swingline Lender or to the Administrative Agent, as applicable, if and to the extent such payment is required to be refunded to the Borrower for any reason. The purchase of participations in a Swingline Loan pursuant to this paragraph shall not relieve the Borrower of any default in the payment thereof.
mutatis
mutandis
SECTION 2.06. . (a) . Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may request the issuance of Letters of Credit denominated in Dollars for its own account, in a form reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Bank, at any time and from time to time during the Availability Period. In the event of any inconsistency between the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the terms and conditions of any form of letter of credit application or other agreement submitted by the Borrower to, or entered into by the Borrower with, the Issuing Bank relating to any Letter of Credit, the terms and conditions of this Agreement shall control. The letters of credit identified on shall be deemed to be "Letters of Credit" issued on the Effective Date for all purposes of the Loan Documents.
Letters of Credit
General
Schedule 2.06
(b) . To request the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or the amendment, renewal or extension of an outstanding Letter of Credit), the Borrower shall hand deliver or telecopy (or transmit by electronic communication, if arrangements for doing so have been approved by the Issuing Bank) to the Issuing Bank and the Administrative Agent (reasonably in advance of the requested date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension but in any case, notice given not later than 1:00 p.m. New York City time, three Business Days prior to such date shall be deemed sufficient) a notice requesting the issuance of a Letter of Credit, or identifying the Letter of Credit to be amended, renewed or extended, and specifying the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (which shall be a Business Day), the date on which such Letter of Credit is to expire (which shall comply with paragraph (c) of this Section), the amount of such Letter of Credit, the name and address of the beneficiary thereof and such other information as shall be necessary to prepare, amend, renew or extend such Letter of Credit. If requested by the Issuing Bank, the Borrower also shall submit a letter of credit application on the Issuing Bank's standard form in connection with any request for a Letter of Credit. A Letter of Credit shall be issued, amended, renewed or extended only if (and upon issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of each Letter of Credit the Borrower shall be deemed to represent and warrant that), after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (i) the LC Exposure shall not exceed $15,000,000 and (ii) the total Revolving Credit Exposures shall not exceed the total Commitments.
Notice of Issuance, Amendment, Renewal, Extension; Certain Conditions
(c) . Each Letter of Credit shall expire at or prior to the close of business on the earlier of (i) the date one year after the date of the issuance of such Letter of Credit (or, in the case of any renewal or extension thereof, one year after such renewal or extension) and (ii) the date that is five (5) Business Days prior to the Maturity Date; that with the prior consent of the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Bank, such Issuing Bank may issue or extend Evergreen Letters of Credit with a later expiration date so long as on the Maturity Date, whether or not an Event of Default exists, the Borrower shall deposit in an account with the Administrative Agent, in the name of the Administrative Agent and for the benefit of the Lenders, an amount in cash equal to 105% of the undrawn amount of all outstanding Evergreen Letters of Credit with an expiration date later than five Business Days prior to the Maturity Date. If the Borrower is required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder as a result of an approaching Maturity Date, such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned (net of any fees and other customary charges and expenses) to the Borrower within three (3) Business Days after all Letters of Credit have expired and all related reimbursement and payment obligations satisfied in full.
Expiration Date
provided
(d) . By the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or an amendment to a Letter of Credit increasing the amount thereof) and without any further action on the part of the Issuing Bank or the Lenders, the Issuing Bank hereby grants to each Lender, and each Lender hereby acquires from the Issuing Bank, a participation in such Letter of Credit equal to such Lender's Applicable Percentage of the aggregate amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit. In consideration and in furtherance of the foregoing, each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the Issuing Bank, such Lender's Applicable Percentage of each LC Disbursement made by the Issuing Bank and not reimbursed by the Borrower on the date due as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section, or of any reimbursement payment required to be refunded to the Borrower for any reason. Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations pursuant to this paragraph in respect of Letters of Credit is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including any amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever.
Participations
(e) . If the Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement in respect of a Letter of Credit, the Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement by paying to the Administrative Agent in Dollars the amount equal to such LC Disbursement, calculated as of the date the Issuing Bank made such LC Disbursement not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the date that such LC Disbursement is made, if the Borrower shall have received notice of such LC Disbursement prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on such date, or, if such notice has not been received by the Borrower prior to such time on such date, then not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on (i) the Business Day that the Borrower receives such notice, if such notice is received prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the day of receipt, or (ii) the Business Day immediately following the day that the Borrower receives such notice, if such notice is not received prior to such time on the day of receipt; that, if such LC Disbursement is not less than $500,000, the Borrower may, subject to the conditions to borrowing set forth herein, request in accordance with Section 2.03 or 2.05 that such payment be financed with an ABR Revolving Borrowing or Swingline Loan in an equivalent amount of such LC Disbursement and, to the extent so financed, the Borrower's obligation to make such payment shall be discharged and replaced by the resulting ABR Revolving Borrowing or Swingline Loan. If the Borrower fails to make such payment when due, the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the applicable LC Disbursement, the payment then due from the Borrower in respect thereof and such Lender's Applicable Percentage thereof. Promptly following receipt of such notice, each Lender shall pay to the Administrative Agent its Applicable Percentage of the payment then due from the Borrower, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.07 with respect to Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.07 shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to the Issuing Bank the amounts so received by it from the Lenders. Promptly following receipt by the Administrative Agent of any payment from the Borrower pursuant to this paragraph, the Administrative Agent shall distribute such payment to the Issuing Bank or, to the extent that Lenders have made payments pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse the Issuing Bank, then to such Lenders and the Issuing Bank as their interests may appear. Any payment made by a Lender pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse the Issuing Bank for any LC Disbursement (other than the funding of ABR Revolving Loans or a Swingline Loan as contemplated above) shall not constitute a Loan and shall not relieve the Borrower of its obligation to reimburse such LC Disbursement.
Reimbursement
provided
mutatis
mutandis
(f) . The Borrower's obligation to reimburse LC Disbursements as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be performed strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement under any and all circumstances whatsoever and irrespective of (i) any lack of validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit or this Agreement, or any term or provision therein, (ii) any draft or other document presented under a Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent or invalid in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect, (iii) payment by the Issuing Bank under a Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or other document that does not comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit, or (iv) any other event or circumstance whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, that might, but for the provisions of this Section, constitute a legal or equitable discharge of, or provide a right of setoff against, the Borrower's obligations hereunder. Neither the Administrative Agent, the Lenders nor the Issuing Bank, nor any of their Related Parties, shall have any liability or responsibility by reason of or in connection with the issuance or transfer of any Letter of Credit or any payment or failure to make any payment thereunder (irrespective of any of the circumstances referred to in the preceding sentence), or any error, omission, interruption, loss or delay in transmission or delivery of any draft, notice or other communication under or relating to any Letter of Credit (including any document required to make a drawing thereunder), any error in interpretation of technical terms or any consequence arising from causes beyond the control of the Issuing Bank; that the foregoing shall not be construed to excuse the Issuing Bank from liability to the Borrower to the extent of any direct damages (as opposed to consequential damages, claims in respect of which are hereby waived by the Borrower to the extent permitted by applicable law) suffered by the Borrower that are caused by the Issuing Bank's failure to exercise care when determining whether drafts and other documents presented under a Letter of Credit comply with the terms thereof. The parties hereto expressly agree that, in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct on the part of the Issuing Bank (as finally determined by a court of competent jurisdiction), the Issuing Bank shall be deemed to have exercised care in each such determination. In furtherance of the foregoing and without limiting the generality thereof, the parties agree that, with respect to documents presented which appear on their face to be in substantial compliance with the terms of a Letter of Credit, the Issuing Bank may, in its sole discretion, either accept and make payment upon such documents without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, or refuse to accept and make payment upon such documents if such documents are not in strict compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit.
Obligations Absolute
provided
(g) . The Issuing Bank shall, promptly following its receipt thereof, examine all documents purporting to represent a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit. The Issuing Bank shall promptly notify the Administrative Agent and the Borrower by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) of such demand for payment and whether the Issuing Bank has made or will make an LC Disbursement thereunder; that any failure to give or delay in giving such notice shall not relieve the Borrower of its obligation to reimburse the Issuing Bank and the Lenders with respect to any such LC Disbursement.
Disbursement Procedures
provided
(h) . If the Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement, then, unless the Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement in full on the date such LC Disbursement is made, the unpaid amount thereof shall bear interest, for each day from and including the date such LC Disbursement is made to but excluding the date that the Borrower reimburses such LC Disbursement, at the rate per annum then applicable to ABR Revolving Loans; that, if the Borrower fails to reimburse such LC Disbursement when due pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section, then Section 2.13(c) shall apply. Interest accrued pursuant to this paragraph shall be for the account of the Issuing Bank, except that interest accrued on and after the date of payment by any Lender pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section to reimburse the Issuing Bank shall be for the account of such Lender to the extent of such payment.
Interim Interest
provided
(i) . The Issuing Bank may be replaced at any time by written agreement among the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the replaced Issuing Bank and the successor Issuing Bank. The Administrative Agent shall notify the Lenders of any such replacement of the Issuing Bank. At the time any such replacement shall become effective, the Borrower shall pay all unpaid fees accrued for the account of the replaced Issuing Bank pursuant to Section 2.12(b). From and after the effective date of any such replacement, (i) the successor Issuing Bank shall have all the rights and obligations of the Issuing Bank under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit to be issued thereafter and (ii) references herein to the term "Issuing Bank" shall be deemed to refer to such successor or to any previous Issuing Bank, or to such successor and all previous Issuing Banks, as the context shall require. After the replacement of an Issuing Bank hereunder, the replaced Issuing Bank shall remain a party hereto and shall continue to have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Bank under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit then outstanding and issued by it prior to such replacement, but shall not be required to issue additional Letters of Credit.
Replacement of Issuing Bank
(j) . If any Event of Default shall occur and be continuing, on the Business Day that the Borrower receives notice from the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders (or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated, Lenders with LC Exposure representing greater than 50% of the total LC Exposure) demanding the deposit of cash collateral pursuant to this paragraph, the Borrower shall deposit in an account with the Administrative Agent, in the name of the Administrative Agent and for the benefit of the Lenders, an amount in cash equal to the amount of the LC Exposure as of such date plus any accrued and unpaid interest thereon; that the obligation to deposit such cash collateral shall become effective immediately, and such deposit shall become immediately due and payable, without demand or other notice of any kind, upon the occurrence of any Event of Default with respect to the Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of Article VII. Such deposit shall be held by the Administrative Agent as collateral for the payment and performance of the obligations of the Borrower under this Agreement. The Administrative Agent shall have exclusive dominion and control, including the exclusive right of withdrawal, over such account. Other than any interest earned on the investment of such deposits, which investments shall be made at the option and sole discretion of the Administrative Agent and at the Borrower's risk and expense, such deposits shall not bear interest. Interest or profits, if any, on such investments shall accumulate in such account. Moneys in such account shall be applied by the Administrative Agent to reimburse the Issuing Bank for LC Disbursements for which it has not been reimbursed and, to the extent not so applied, shall be held for the satisfaction of the reimbursement obligations of the Borrower for the LC Exposure at such time or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated (but subject to the consent of Lenders with LC Exposure representing greater than 50% of the total LC Exposure), be applied to satisfy other obligations of the Borrower under this Agreement. If the Borrower is required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder as a result of the occurrence of an Event of Default, such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to the Borrower within three (3) Business Days after all Events of Default have been cured or waived.
Cash Collateralization
provided
(k) . The Lenders agree that, while an Evergreen LC is outstanding and prior to the Maturity Date, at the option of the Borrower and upon the written request of the Borrower received by the Issuing Bank (with a copy to the Administrative Agent) no more than fifty (50) days and at least twenty (20) days (or such shorter time as the Issuing Bank may agree in a particular instance) prior to the effective Non-Extension Date thereof, the Issuing Bank shall be entitled to authorize or permit the automatic extension of such Evergreen LC. Each such request from the Borrower for extension of an Evergreen LC shall be in writing and shall specify: (i) the Evergreen LC to be extended; (ii) the proposed effective date of extension of the Evergreen LC (which shall be a Business Day except to the extent it is the expiry date of the applicable Evergreen LC and no action of the Issuing Bank is required on such date); (iii) the revised expiry date of the Evergreen LC (which, subject to Section 2.06(c), shall not be later than the earlier of (A) the date that is one year after the then effective expiry date of such Evergreen LC and (B) the date that is five Business Days prior to the Maturity Date); and (iv) such other matters as the Issuing Bank may reasonably require. The Issuing Bank shall be under no obligation to so extend or permit the extension of any Evergreen LC if the Issuing Bank would have no obligation as of the proposed effective date of extension to issue or amend such Evergreen LC in its extended form under the terms of this Agreement (including Section 4.02). If as of the date twenty (20) days prior to the Non-Extension Date of any Evergreen LC the Issuing Bank would be entitled to authorize the extension of such Evergreen LC in accordance with this Section 2.06(k) upon the request of the Borrower but the Issuing Bank shall not have received a request from the Borrower to cause or permit such extension or a written direction from the Borrower to not cause or permit such extension, the Borrower shall be deemed to have delivered a request to cause the extension of such Letter of Credit. In addition, upon the direction of the Borrower for any Evergreen LC, the Issuing Bank shall give such notice as is necessary to prevent an automatic extension of the expiry date of such Evergreen LC; , , that in no event shall the Issuing Bank have liability to any party thereto for its failure to give such notice if written direction to give such notice is received by the Issuing Bank less than twenty (20) days prior to the Non-Extension Date for such Evergreen LC. The Issuing Bank will provide to the Administrative Agent and the Borrower a copy of any notice of non-extension given to an Evergreen LC beneficiary pursuant to this Section.
Evergreen Letters of Credit
provided
however
SECTION 2.07. . (a) Each Lender shall make each Loan to be made by it hereunder on the proposed date thereof by wire transfer of immediately available funds by 12:00 noon, New York City time, to the account of the Administrative Agent most recently designated by it for such purpose by notice to the Lenders; that Swingline Loans shall be made as provided in Section 2.05. The Administrative Agent will make such Loans available to the Borrower by promptly making a disbursement by wire transfer to a deposit account of the Borrower at such financial institution as is designated by the Borrower in the applicable Borrowing Request; that ABR Revolving Loans made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.06(e) shall be remitted by the Administrative Agent to the Issuing Bank.
Funding of Borrowings
provided
provided
(b) Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the proposed date of any Borrowing that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent such Lender's share of such Borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with paragraph (a) of this Section and may, in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the Borrower a corresponding amount. In such event, if a Lender has not in fact made its share of the applicable Borrowing available to the Administrative Agent, then the applicable Lender and the Borrower severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is made available to the Borrower to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at (i) in the case of such Lender, the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation or (ii) in the case of the Borrower, the interest rate applicable to ABR Loans; , that any payment made by the Borrower shall be made without prejudice to any claim the Borrower may have against the Lender failing to make such payment to the Administrative Agent. If such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent, then such amount shall constitute such Lender's Loan included in such Borrowing.
provided
SECTION 2.08. . (a) Each Revolving Borrowing initially shall be of the Type specified in the applicable Borrowing Request and, in the case of a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, shall have an initial Interest Period as specified in such Borrowing Request. Thereafter, the Borrower may elect to convert such Borrowing to a different Type or to continue such Borrowing and, in the case of a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, may elect Interest Periods therefor, all as provided in this Section. The Borrower may elect different options with respect to different portions of the affected Borrowing, in which case each such portion shall be allocated ratably among the Lenders holding the Loans comprising such Borrowing, and the Loans comprising each such portion shall be considered a separate Borrowing. This Section shall not apply to Swingline Borrowings, which may not be converted or continued.
Interest Elections
(b) To make an election pursuant to this Section, the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such election by telephone by the time that a Borrowing Request would be required under Section 2.03 if the Borrower were requesting a Revolving Borrowing of the Type resulting from such election to be made on the effective date of such election. Each such telephonic Interest Election Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or telecopy to the Administrative Agent of a written Interest Election Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Borrower. Notwithstanding any contrary provision herein, this Section shall not be construed to permit the Borrower to elect an Interest Period for Eurodollar Loans that does not comply with Section 2.02(d).
(c) Each telephonic and written Interest Election Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02:
(i) the Borrowing to which such Interest Election Request applies and, if different options are being elected with respect to different portions thereof, the portions thereof to be allocated to each resulting Borrowing (in which case the information to be specified pursuant to clauses (iii) and (iv) below shall be specified for each resulting Borrowing);
(ii) the effective date of the election made pursuant to such Interest Election Request, which shall be a Business Day;
(iii) whether the resulting Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing; and
(iv) if the resulting Borrowing is a Eurodollar Borrowing, the Interest Period to be applicable thereto after giving effect to such election, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term "Interest Period".
If any such Interest Election Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing but does not specify an Interest Period, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one month's duration.
(d) Promptly following receipt of an Interest Election Request, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of such Lender's portion of each resulting Borrowing.
(e) If the Borrower fails to deliver a timely Interest Election Request with respect to a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing prior to the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto, then, unless such Borrowing is repaid as provided herein, at the end of such Interest Period such Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing. Notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent, at the request of the Required Lenders, so notifies the Borrower, then, so long as an Event of Default is continuing (i) no outstanding Revolving Borrowing may be converted to or continued as a Eurodollar Borrowing and (ii) unless repaid, each Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing at the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto.
SECTION 2.09. . (a) Unless previously terminated, the Commitments shall terminate on the Maturity Date.
Termination and Reduction of Commitments
(b) The Borrower may at any time terminate, or from time to time reduce, the Commitments; that (i) each reduction of the Commitments shall be in an amount that is an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $5,000,000 and (ii) the Borrower shall not terminate or reduce the Commitments if, after giving effect to any concurrent prepayment of the Loans in accordance with Section 2.11, the sum of the Revolving Credit Exposures would exceed the total Commitments.
provided
(c) The Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of any election to terminate or reduce the Commitments under paragraph (b) of this Section at least three (3) Business Days prior to the effective date of such termination or reduction, specifying such election and the effective date thereof. Promptly following receipt of any notice, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each notice delivered by the Borrower pursuant to this Section shall be irrevocable; that a notice of termination of the Commitments delivered by the Borrower may state that such notice is conditioned upon the effectiveness of other credit facilities or other receipt of funds, in which case such notice may be revoked by the Borrower (by notice to the Administrative Agent on or prior to the specified effective date) if such condition is not satisfied. Any termination or reduction of the Commitments shall be permanent. Each reduction of the Commitments shall be made ratably among the Lenders in accordance with their respective Commitments.
provided
SECTION 2.10. . (a) The Borrower hereby unconditionally promises to pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Revolving Loan on the Maturity Date and (ii) to the Swingline Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Swingline Loan on the earlier of the Maturity Date and the first date after such Swingline Loan is made that is the 15th or last day of a calendar month and is at least two (2) Business Days after such Swingline Loan is made; that on each date that a Revolving Borrowing is made, the Borrower shall repay all Swingline Loans then outstanding.
Repayment of Loans; Evidence of Debt
provided
(b) Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice an account or accounts evidencing the indebtedness of the Borrower to such Lender resulting from each Loan made by such Lender, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
(c) The Administrative Agent shall maintain accounts in which it shall record (i) the amount of each Loan made hereunder, the Class and Type thereof and the Interest Period applicable thereto, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from the Borrower to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Administrative Agent hereunder for the account of the Lenders and each Lender's share thereof.
(d) The entries made in the accounts maintained pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) of this Section shall be evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded therein; that the failure of any Lender or the Administrative Agent to maintain such accounts or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay the Loans in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
prima
facie
provided
(e) Any Lender may request that Loans made by it be evidenced by a promissory note. In such event, the Borrower shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a promissory note payable to the order of such Lender (or, if requested by such Lender, to such Lender and its registered assigns) and in a form approved by the Administrative Agent. Thereafter, the Loans evidenced by such promissory note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after assignment pursuant to Section 9.04) be represented by one or more promissory notes in such form payable to the order of the payee named therein (or, if such promissory note is a registered note, to such payee and its registered assigns).
SECTION 2.11. .
Prepayment of Loans
(a) The Borrower shall have the right at any time and from time to time to prepay any Borrowing in whole or in part, subject to prior notice in accordance with paragraph (b) of this Section.
(b) The Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent (and, in the case of prepayment of a Swingline Loan, the Swingline Lender) by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) of any prepayment hereunder (i) in the case of prepayment of a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, not later than 1:00 p.m., New York City time, three (3) Business Days before the date of prepayment, (ii) in the case of prepayment of an ABR Revolving Borrowing, not later than 1:00 p.m., New York City time, one Business Day before the date of prepayment or (iii) in the case of prepayment of a Swingline Loan, not later than 1:00 p.m., New York City time, on the date of prepayment. Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the prepayment date and the principal amount of each Borrowing or portion thereof to be prepaid; that, if a notice of prepayment is given in connection with a conditional notice of termination of the Commitments as contemplated by Section 2.09, then such notice of prepayment may be revoked if such notice of termination is revoked in accordance with Section 2.09. Promptly following receipt of any such notice relating to a Revolving Borrowing, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each partial prepayment of any Revolving Borrowing shall be in an amount that would be permitted in the case of an advance of a Revolving Borrowing of the same Type as provided in Section 2.02. Each prepayment of a Revolving Borrowing shall be applied ratably to the Loans included in such prepaid Borrowing. Prepayments shall be accompanied by (i) accrued interest to the extent required by Section 2.13 and (ii) break funding payments pursuant to Section 2.16.
provided
SECTION 2.12. . (a) The Borrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a facility fee, which shall accrue at the Applicable Rate on the daily amount of the Commitment of such Lender (whether used or unused) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the date on which such Commitment terminates; that, if such Lender continues to have any Revolving Credit Exposure after its Commitment terminates, then such facility fee shall continue to accrue on the daily amount of such Lender's Revolving Credit Exposure from and including the date on which its Commitment terminates to but excluding the date on which such Lender ceases to have any Revolving Credit Exposure. Accrued facility fees shall be payable in arrears on the last day of March, June, September and December of each year and on the date on which the Commitments terminate, commencing on the first such date to occur after the date hereof; that any facility fees accruing after the date on which the Commitments terminate shall be payable on demand. All facility fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
Fees
provided
provided
(b) The Borrower agrees to pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a participation fee with respect to its participations in Letters of Credit, which shall accrue at the same Applicable Rate used to determine the interest rate applicable to Eurodollar Revolving Loans on the average daily amount of such Lender's LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date on which such Lender's Commitment terminates and the date on which such Lender ceases to have any LC Exposure and (ii) to the Issuing Bank a fronting fee, which shall accrue at the rate of 0.125% per annum on the average daily amount of the LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) attributable to Letters of Credit issued by the Issuing Bank during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date of termination of the Commitments and the date on which there ceases to be any LC Exposure, as well as the Issuing Bank's standard fees and commissions with respect to the issuance, amendment, cancellation, negotiation, transfer, presentment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or processing of drawings thereunder. Unless otherwise specified above, participation fees and fronting fees accrued through and including the last day of March, June, September and December of each year shall be payable on the third (3) Business Day following such last day, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date; that all such fees shall be payable on the date on which the Commitments terminate and any such fees accruing after the date on which the Commitments terminate shall be payable on demand. Any other fees payable to the Issuing Bank pursuant to this paragraph shall be payable within ten (10) days after demand. All participation fees and fronting fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
rd
provided
(c) The Borrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for its own account, fees payable in the amounts and at the times separately agreed upon between the Borrower and the Administrative Agent.
(d) All fees payable hereunder shall be paid on the dates due, in immediately available funds, to the Administrative Agent (or to the Issuing Bank, in the case of fees payable to it) for distribution, in the case of facility fees and participation fees, to the Lenders. Fees paid shall not be refundable under any circumstances.
SECTION 2.13. . (a) The Loans comprising each ABR Borrowing (including each Swingline Loan) shall bear interest at the Alternate Base Rate plus the Applicable Rate.
Interest
(b) The Loans comprising each Eurodollar Borrowing shall bear interest at the Adjusted LIBO Rate for the Interest Period in effect for such Borrowing plus the Applicable Rate.
(c) Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any principal of or interest on any Loan or any fee or other amount payable by the Borrower hereunder is not paid when due, whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise, such overdue amount shall bear interest, after as well as before judgment, at a rate per annum equal to (i) in the case of overdue principal of any Loan, 2% plus the rate otherwise applicable to such Loan as provided in the preceding paragraphs of this Section or (ii) in the case of any other amount, 2% plus the rate applicable to ABR Loans as provided in paragraph (a) of this Section.
(d) Accrued interest on each Loan shall be payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date for such Loan and, in the case of Revolving Loans, upon termination of the Commitments; that (i) interest accrued pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section shall be payable on demand, (ii) in the event of any repayment or prepayment of any Loan (other than a prepayment of an ABR Revolving Loan prior to the end of the Availability Period), accrued interest on the principal amount repaid or prepaid shall be payable on the date of such repayment or prepayment and (iii) in the event of any conversion of any Eurodollar Revolving Loan prior to the end of the current Interest Period therefor, accrued interest on such Loan shall be payable on the effective date of such conversion.
provided
(e) All interest hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days, except that interest computed by reference to the Alternate Base Rate at times when the Alternate Base Rate is based on the Prime Rate shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year). The applicable Alternate Base Rate, Adjusted LIBO Rate or LIBO Rate shall be determined by the Administrative Agent, and such determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
SECTION 2.14. . If prior to the commencement of any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Borrowing:
Alternate Rate of Interest
(a) the Administrative Agent determines (which determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error and shall not be based on an arbitrary or capricious determination) that adequate and reasonable means do not exist for ascertaining the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the LIBO Rate, as applicable, for such Interest Period; or
(b) the Administrative Agent is reasonably advised by the Required Lenders that the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the LIBO Rate, as applicable, for such Interest Period will not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to such Lenders (or Lender) of making or maintaining their Loans (or its Loan) included in such Borrowing for such Interest Period;
then the Administrative Agent shall give notice thereof to the Borrower and the Lenders by telephone or telecopy as promptly as practicable thereafter and, until the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower and the Lenders that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer exist, (i) any Interest Election Request that requests the conversion of any Revolving Borrowing to, or continuation of any Revolving Borrowing as, a Eurodollar Borrowing shall be ineffective and (ii) if any Borrowing Request requests a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be made as an ABR Borrowing. The Administrative Agent shall promptly advise the Borrower of any such alternate interest rate and shall provide a calculation and explanation of the circumstances described in the foregoing clauses (a) and (b).
SECTION 2.15. . (a) If any Change in Law shall:
Increased Costs
(i) impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended by, any Lender (except any such reserve requirement reflected in the Adjusted LIBO Rate) or the Issuing Bank; or
(ii) impose on any Lender or the Issuing Bank or the London interbank market any other condition affecting this Agreement or Eurodollar Loans made by such Lender or any Letter of Credit or participation therein;
and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Lender of making or maintaining any Eurodollar Loan or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan or to increase the cost to such Lender or the Issuing Bank of participating in, issuing or maintaining any Letter of Credit or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender or the Issuing Bank hereunder, whether of principal, interest or otherwise, then the Borrower will pay to such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
(b) If any Lender or the Issuing Bank determines that any Change in Law regarding capital requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's capital or on the capital of such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement or the Loans made by, or participations in Letters of Credit held by, such Lender, or the Letters of Credit issued by the Issuing Bank, to a level below that which such Lender or the Issuing Bank or such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's policies and the policies of such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time the Borrower will pay to such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or the Issuing Bank or such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's holding company for any such reduction suffered.
(c) A certificate of a Lender or the Issuing Bank setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Lender or the Issuing Bank or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Borrower shall pay such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, the amount shown as due on any such certificate within ten (10) days after receipt thereof.
(d) Failure or delay on the part of any Lender or the Issuing Bank to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's right to demand such compensation; that the Borrower shall not be required to compensate a Lender or the Issuing Bank pursuant to this Section for any increased costs or reductions incurred more than 180 days prior to the date that such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, notifies the Borrower of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's intention to claim compensation therefor; that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the 180-day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof.
provided
provided
further
SECTION 2.16. . In the event of (a) the payment of any principal of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto (including as a result of an Event of Default or as a result of any prepayment pursuant to Section 2.11), (b) the conversion of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto, (c) the failure to borrow, convert, continue or prepay any Eurodollar Loan on the date specified in any notice delivered pursuant hereto (regardless of whether such notice may be revoked under Section 2.11(b) and is revoked in accordance therewith) or (d) the assignment of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto as a result of a request by the Borrower pursuant to Section 2.19, then, in any such event, the Borrower shall compensate each Lender for the loss, cost and expense attributable to such event. Such loss, cost or expense to any Lender shall be deemed to include an amount determined by such Lender to be the excess, if any, of (i) the amount of interest which would have accrued on the principal amount of such Loan had such event not occurred, at the Adjusted LIBO Rate that would have been applicable to such Loan, for the period from the date of such event to the last day of the then current Interest Period therefor (or, in the case of a failure to borrow, convert or continue, for the period that would have been the Interest Period for such Loan), over (ii) the amount of interest which would accrue on such principal amount for such period at the interest rate which such Lender would bid were it to bid, at the commencement of such period, for deposits in Dollars of a comparable amount and period from other banks in the eurodollar market. A certificate of any Lender setting forth any amount or amounts that such Lender is entitled to receive pursuant to this Section shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Borrower shall pay such Lender the amount shown as due on any such certificate within ten (10) days after receipt thereof.
Break Funding Payments
SECTION 2.17. . (a) Any and all payments by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder shall be made free and clear of and without deduction for any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes; that if the Borrower shall be required to deduct any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes from such payments, then (i) the sum payable shall be increased as necessary so that after making all required deductions (including deductions applicable to additional sums payable under this Section) the Administrative Agent, Lender or Issuing Bank (as the case may be) receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deductions been made, (ii) the Borrower shall make such deductions and (iii) the Borrower shall pay the full amount deducted to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
Taxes
provided
(b) In addition, the Borrower shall pay any Other Taxes to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
(c) The Borrower shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, each Lender and the Issuing Bank, within ten (10) days after written demand therefor, for the full amount of any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes paid by the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, on or with respect to any payment by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder (including Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to amounts payable under this Section) and any penalties, interest and reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority. A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to the Borrower by a Lender or the Issuing Bank, or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender or the Issuing Bank, shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
(d) As soon as practicable after any payment of Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes by the Borrower to a Governmental Authority, the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent the original or a certified copy of a receipt issued by such Governmental Authority evidencing such payment, a copy of the return reporting such payment or other evidence of such payment reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
(e) Any Foreign Lender that is entitled to an exemption from or reduction of withholding tax under the law of the jurisdiction in which the Borrower is located, or any treaty to which such jurisdiction is a party, with respect to payments under this Agreement shall deliver to the Borrower (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), at the time or times prescribed by applicable law, such properly completed and executed documentation prescribed by applicable law or reasonably requested by the Borrower as will permit such payments to be made without withholding or at a reduced rate.
(f) If the Administrative Agent or a Lender determines, in its sole discretion, that it has received a refund of any Taxes or Other Taxes as to which it has been indemnified by the Borrower or with respect to which the Borrower has paid additional amounts pursuant to this Section 2.17, it shall pay over such refund to the Borrower (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made, or additional amounts paid, by the Borrower under this Section 2.17 with respect to the Taxes or Other Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses of the Administrative Agent or such Lender and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund); provided, that the Borrower, upon the request of the Administrative Agent or such Lender, agrees to repay the amount paid over to the Borrower (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) to the Administrative Agent or such Lender in the event the Administrative Agent or such Lender is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority. This Section shall not be construed to require the Administrative Agent or any Lender to make available its tax returns (or any other information relating to its taxes which it deems confidential) to the Borrower or any other Person.
SECTION 2.18. .
Payments Generally; Pro Rata Treatment; Sharing of Set-offs
(a) The Borrower shall make each payment required to be made by it hereunder (whether of principal, interest, fees or reimbursement of LC Disbursements, or of amounts payable under Section 2.15, 2.16 or 2.17, or otherwise) prior to 1:00 p.m., New York City time on the date when due, in immediately available funds, without set-off or counterclaim. Any amounts received after such time on any date may, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day for purposes of calculating interest thereon. All such payments shall be made to the Administrative Agent at its offices at 270 Park Avenue, New York, New York 10017, except payments to be made directly to the Issuing Bank or Swingline Lender as expressly provided herein and except that payments pursuant to Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03 shall be made directly to the Persons entitled thereto. The Administrative Agent shall distribute any such payments received by it for the account of any other Person to the appropriate recipient promptly following receipt thereof. If any payment hereunder shall be due on a day that is not a Business Day, the date for payment shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day, and, in the case of any payment accruing interest, interest thereon shall be payable for the period of such extension. All payments hereunder shall be made in Dollars.
(b) If at any time insufficient funds are received by and available to the Administrative Agent to pay fully all amounts of principal, unreimbursed LC Disbursements, interest and fees then due hereunder, such funds shall be applied (i) first, towards payment of interest and fees then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of interest and fees then due to such parties, and (ii) second, towards payment of principal and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of principal and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due to such parties.
(c) If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of or interest on any of its Revolving Loans or participations in LC Disbursements or Swingline Loans resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Revolving Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans and accrued interest thereon than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Revolving Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of principal of and accrued interest on their respective Revolving Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans; provided that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by the Borrower pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans to any assignee or participant, other than to the Borrower or any Subsidiary or Affiliate thereof (as to which the provisions of this paragraph shall apply). The Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against the Borrower rights of set-off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of the Borrower in the amount of such participation.
(d) Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from the Borrower prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lenders or the Issuing Bank hereunder that the Borrower will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that the Borrower has made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may, in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to the Lenders or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, the amount due. In such event, if the Borrower has not in fact made such payment, then each of the Lenders or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand the amount so distributed to such Lender or Issuing Bank with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation.
(e) If any Lender shall fail to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to Section 2.05(c), 2.06(d) or (e), 2.07(b), 2.18(d) or 9.03(c), then the Administrative Agent may, in its discretion (notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof), apply any amounts thereafter received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Lender to satisfy such Lender's obligations under such Sections until all such unsatisfied obligations are fully paid.
SECTION 2.19. . (a) If any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.15, or if the Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.17, then such Lender shall use reasonable efforts to designate a different lending office for funding or booking its Loans hereunder or to assign its rights and obligations hereunder to another of its offices, branches or affiliates, if, in the judgment of such Lender, such designation or assignment (i) would eliminate or reduce amounts payable pursuant to Section 2.15 or 2.17, as the case may be, in the future and (ii) would not subject such Lender to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to such Lender. Each Lender also agrees to use its commercially reasonable efforts to make such designation or assignment prior to the occurrence of any circumstance described in Section 2.15 or 2.17 in the event it has knowledge of such circumstance prior to its occurrence or as soon thereafter as it becomes aware thereof. The Borrower hereby agrees to pay all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by any Lender in connection with any such designation or assignment.
Mitigation Obligations; Replacement of Lenders
(b) If any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.15, or if the Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.17, or if any Lender defaults in its obligation to fund Loans hereunder, then the Borrower may, at its sole expense and effort, upon notice to such Lender and the Administrative Agent, require such Lender to assign and delegate, without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in Section 9.04), all its interests, rights and obligations under the Loan Documents to an assignee that shall assume such obligations (which assignee may be another Lender, if a Lender accepts such assignment); that (i) the Borrower shall have received the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, which consent shall not unreasonably be withheld, (ii) such Lender shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans, accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder, from the assignee (to the extent of such outstanding principal and accrued interest and fees) or the Borrower (in the case of all other amounts) and (iii) in the case of any such assignment resulting from a claim for compensation under Section 2.15 or payments required to be made pursuant to Section 2.17, such assignment will result in a reduction in such compensation or payments. A Lender shall not be required to make any such assignment and delegation if, prior thereto, as a result of a waiver by such Lender or otherwise, the circumstances entitling the Borrower to require such assignment and delegation cease to apply.
provided
SECTION 2.20. . The Borrower may from time to time elect to increase the Commitments in minimum increments of $10,000,000 so long as, after giving effect thereto, the aggregate amount of the Commitments does not exceed $200,000,000. The Borrower may arrange for any such increase to be provided by one or more Lenders (each Lender so agreeing to an increase in its Commitment, an ""), or by one or more new banks, financial institutions or other entities (each such new bank, financial institution or other entity, an ""), to increase their existing Commitments, or extend Commitments, as the case may be; that (i) each Augmenting Lender, shall be subject to the approval of the Borrower and the Administrative Agent and (ii) (x) in the case of an Increasing Lender, the Borrower and such Increasing Lender execute an agreement substantially in the form of hereto, and (y) in the case of an Augmenting Lender, the Borrower and such Augmenting Lender execute an agreement substantially in the form of hereto. Increases and new Commitments created pursuant to this Section 2.20 shall become effective on the date agreed by the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and the relevant Increasing Lenders or Augmenting Lenders and the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender thereof. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no increase in the Commitments (or in the Commitment of any Lender), shall become effective under this paragraph unless, (i) on the proposed date of the effectiveness of such increase, the conditions set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of Section 4.02 shall be satisfied or waived by the Required Lenders and the Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate to that effect dated such date and executed by a Financial Officer of the Borrower and (ii) the Administrative Agent shall have received documents consistent with those delivered on the Effective Date as to the corporate power and authority of the Borrower to borrow hereunder after giving effect to such increase. On the effective date of any increase in the Commitments, (i) each relevant Increasing Lender and Augmenting Lender shall make available to the Administrative Agent such amounts in immediately available funds as the Administrative Agent shall determine, for the benefit of the other Lenders, as being required in order to cause, after giving effect to such increase and the use of such amounts to make payments to such other Lenders, each Lender's portion of the outstanding Revolving Loans of all the Lenders to equal its Applicable Percentage of such outstanding Revolving Loans, and (ii) the Borrower shall be deemed to have repaid and reborrowed all outstanding Revolving Loans as of the date of any increase in the Commitments (with such reborrowing to consist of the Types of Revolving Loans, with related Interest Periods if applicable, specified in a notice delivered by the Borrower in accordance with the requirements of Section 2.03). The deemed payments made pursuant to clause (ii) of the immediately preceding sentence shall be accompanied by payment of all accrued interest on the amount prepaid and, in respect of each Eurodollar Loan, shall be subject to indemnification by the Borrower pursuant to the provisions of Section 2.16 if the deemed payment occurs other than on the last day of the related Interest Periods.
Expansion Option
Increasing Lender
Augmenting Lender
provided
Exhibit C
Exhibit D
The Borrower represents and warrants to the Lenders that:
SECTION 3.01. . Each of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries is duly organized, validly existing and, to the extent such concept applies to such entity, in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization, has all requisite power and authority to carry on its business as now conducted and, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, is qualified to do business in, and is in good standing in, every jurisdiction where such qualification is required. hereto (as supplemented from time to time) identifies each Subsidiary, the jurisdiction of its incorporation or organization, as the case may be, the percentage of issued and outstanding shares of each class of its capital stock or other equity interests owned by the Borrower and the other Subsidiaries and, if such percentage is not 100% (excluding directors' qualifying shares as required by law), a description of each class issued and outstanding. All of the outstanding shares of capital stock and other equity interests of each Subsidiary are validly issued and outstanding and fully paid and nonassessable and all such shares and other equity interests indicated on as owned by the Borrower or another Subsidiary are owned, beneficially and of record, by the Borrower or any Subsidiary free and clear of all Liens.
Organization; Powers; Subsidiaries
Schedule 3.01
Schedule 3.01
SECTION 3.02. . The Transactions are within the Borrower's corporate powers and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate and, if required, stockholder action. This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by the Borrower and constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of the Borrower, enforceable in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer or conveyance, reorganization, moratorium or other laws affecting creditors' rights generally and subject to general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law.
Authorization; Enforceability
SECTION 3.03. . The Transactions (a) do not require any consent or approval of, registration or filing with, or any other action by, any Governmental Authority, except such as have been obtained or made and are in full force and effect, (b) will not violate any applicable law or regulation or the charter, by-laws or other organizational documents of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries or any order of any Governmental Authority, (c) will not violate or result in a default under any indenture, agreement or other instrument binding upon the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries or its assets, or give rise to a right thereunder to require any payment to be made by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, and (d) will not result in the creation or imposition of any Lien on any asset of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries.
Governmental Approvals; No Conflicts
SECTION 3.04. . (a) The Borrower has heretofore furnished to the Lenders its consolidated balance sheet and statements of income, stockholders equity and cash flows (i) as of and for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2005 reported on by KPMG LLP, independent public accountants, and (ii) as of and for the fiscal quarter and the portion of the fiscal year ended September 30, 2006, certified by its chief financial officer. Such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position and results of operations and cash flows of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of such dates and for such periods in accordance with GAAP, subject to year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes in the case of the statements referred to in clause (ii) above.
Financial Condition; No Material Adverse Change
(b) Since December 31, 2005, there has been no material adverse change in the business, assets, operations or condition, financial or otherwise, of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
SECTION 3.05. . (a) Each of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries has good title to, or valid leasehold interests in, all its real and personal property material to its business, except for minor defects in title that do not interfere with its ability to conduct its business as currently conducted or to utilize such properties for their intended purposes. There are no Liens on any of the real or personal properties of the Borrower or any Subsidiary except for Liens permitted by Section 6.02.
Properties
(b) Each of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries owns, or is licensed to use, all trademarks, tradenames, copyrights, patents and other intellectual property material to its business, and the use thereof by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries does not infringe upon the rights of any other Person, except for any such infringements that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
SECTION 3.06. . (a) There are no actions, suits, proceedings or investigations by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority pending against or, to the knowledge of the Borrower, threatened against or affecting the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries (i) as to which there is a reasonable possibility of an adverse determination and that, if adversely determined, could reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material Adverse Effect (other than the Disclosed Matters) or (ii) that involve this Agreement or the Transactions. There are no labor controversies pending against or, to the knowledge of the Borrower, threatened against or affecting the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries (i) which could reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material Adverse Effect, or (ii) that involve this Agreement or the Transactions.
Litigation and Environmental Matters
(b) Except for the Disclosed Matters and except with respect to any other matters that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, neither the Borrower nor any of its Subsidiaries (i) has failed to comply with any Environmental Law or to obtain, maintain or comply with any permit, license or other approval required under any Environmental Law, (ii) has become subject to any Environmental Liability, (iii) has received notice of any claim with respect to any Environmental Liability or (iv) knows of any basis for any Environmental Liability.
(c) Since the date of this Agreement, there has been no change in the status of the Disclosed Matters that, individually or in the aggregate, has resulted in, or could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Borrower nor any Subsidiary is party or subject to any law, regulation, rule or order, or any obligation under any agreement or instrument, that has a Material Adverse Effect.
SECTION 3.07. . Each of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries is in compliance with all laws, regulations and orders of any Governmental Authority applicable to it or its property and all indentures, agreements and other instruments binding upon it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. The parties hereto acknowledge and agree that any failure to file financial statements with the Securities and Exchange Commission when required under applicable law and regulation will not, by itself, be deemed to be a breach of this Section 3.07 if the Borrower files such financial statements within the time periods described in Sections 5.01 and 5.01 (b), as applicable.
Compliance with Laws and Agreements
SECTION 3.08. . Neither the Borrower nor any of its Subsidiaries is an "investment company" as defined in, or subject to regulation under, the Investment Company Act of 1940.
Investment and Holding Company Status
SECTION 3.09. . Each of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries has timely filed or caused to be filed all Tax returns and reports required to have been filed and has paid or caused to be paid all Taxes required to have been paid by it, except (a) Taxes that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as applicable, has set aside on its books adequate reserves or (b) to the extent that the failure to do so could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Taxes
SECTION 3.10. . No ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that, when taken together with all other such ERISA Events for which liability is reasonably expected to occur, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
ERISA
SECTION 3.11. . The Borrower has disclosed to the Lenders all agreements, instruments and corporate or other restrictions to which it or any of its Subsidiaries is subject, and all other matters known to it, that, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Information Memorandum nor any of the other reports, financial statements, certificates or other information furnished by or on behalf of the Borrower to the Administrative Agent or any Lender in connection with the negotiation of this Agreement or delivered hereunder (as modified or supplemented by other information so furnished) contains any material misstatement of fact or omits to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; that, with respect to projected financial information, the Borrower represents only that such information was prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed to be reasonable at the time.
Disclosure
provided
SECTION 3.12. . No part of the proceeds of any Loan have been used or will be used, whether directly or indirectly, for any purpose that entails a violation of any of the Regulations of the Board, including Regulations T, U and X.
Federal Reserve Regulations
SECTION 3.13. . The Borrower is in compliance with this Agreement and no Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing.
No Default
SECTION 4.01. . The obligations of the Lenders to make Loans and of the Issuing Bank to issue Letters of Credit hereunder shall not become effective until the date on which each of the following conditions is satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 9.02):
Effective Date
(a) The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received from each party hereto either (i) a counterpart of this Agreement signed on behalf of such party or (ii) written evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include telecopy or electronic transmission of a signed signature page of this Agreement) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Agreement.
(b) The Administrative Agent shall have received favorable written opinions (addressed to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders and dated the Effective Date) of Timothy T. Smith, Executive Vice President and Chief Legal Officer of the Borrower, and Oppenheimer Wolff & Donnelly LLP, counsels for the Borrower, substantially in the forms of respectively, and covering such other matters relating to the Loan Parties, the Loan Documents or the Transactions as the Required Lenders shall reasonably request. The Borrower hereby requests such counsels to deliver such opinion.
Exhibits B-1 and B-2
(c) The Lenders shall have received (i) satisfactory audited consolidated financial statements of the Borrower for the two most recent fiscal years ended prior to the Effective Date as to which such financial statements are available, (ii) satisfactory unaudited interim consolidated financial statements of the Borrower for each quarterly period ended subsequent to the date of the latest financial statements delivered pursuant to clause (i) of this paragraph as to which such financial statements are publicly available and (iii) satisfactory financial statement projections through and including the Borrower's 2011 fiscal year, together with such information as the Administrative Agent and the Lenders shall reasonably request (including, without limitation, a detailed description of the assumptions used in preparing such projections).
(d) The Administrative Agent shall have received such documents and certificates as the Administrative Agent or its counsel may reasonably request relating to the organization, existence and good standing of the initial Loan Parties, the authorization of the Transactions and any other legal matters relating to such Loan Parties, the Loan Documents or the Transactions, all in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel and as further described in the list of closing documents attached as .
Exhibit E
(e) The Administrative Agent shall have received all fees and other amounts due and payable on or prior to the Effective Date, including, to the extent invoiced, reimbursement or payment of all expenses required to be reimbursed or paid by the Borrower hereunder.
The Administrative Agent shall notify the Borrower and the Lenders of the Effective Date, and such notice shall be conclusive and binding. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the obligations of the Lenders to make Loans and of the Issuing Bank to issue Letters of Credit hereunder shall not become effective unless each of the foregoing conditions is satisfied (or waived pursuant to Section 9.02) at or prior to 3:00 p.m., New York City time, on December 20, 2006 (and, in the event such conditions are not so satisfied or waived, the Commitments shall terminate at such time).
SECTION 4.02. . The obligation of each Lender to make a Loan on the occasion of any Borrowing (other than the conversion or continuation of any Loan), and of the Issuing Bank to issue, amend, renew or extend any Letter of Credit, is subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
Each Credit Event
(a) The representations and warranties of the Borrower set forth in this Agreement shall be true and correct on and as of the date of such Borrowing or the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable (except any such representation or warranty that expressly relates to or is made expressly as of a specific earlier date, in which case such representation or warranty shall be true and correct with respect to or as of such specific earlier date).
(b) At the time of and immediately after giving effect to such Borrowing or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
Each Borrowing (other than the conversion or continuation of any Loan) and each issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of a Letter of Credit shall be deemed to constitute a representation and warranty by the Borrower on the date thereof as to the matters specified in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this Section.
Until the Commitments have expired or been terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder shall have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit shall have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
SECTION 5.01. . The Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
Financial Statements and Other Information
(a) within the earlier of (x) the date on which such financial statements are delivered by the Borrower to the Securities and Exchange Commission and (y) one hundred twenty (120) days after the end of each fiscal year of the Borrower, its audited consolidated balance sheet and related statements of operations, stockholders' equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all reported on by KPMG LLP or other independent public accountants of recognized national standing (without a "going concern" or like qualification or exception and without any qualification or exception as to the scope of such audit) to the effect that such consolidated financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied;
(b) within the earlier of (x) the date on which such financial statements are delivered by the Borrower to the Securities and Exchange Commission and (y) sixty (60) days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year of the Borrower, its consolidated balance sheet and related statements of operations, stockholders' equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such fiscal quarter and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year;
(c) (x) with respect to any delivery of financial statements under clause (a) above, on the earlier of (i) 15 days following the date on which the Borrower delivers such financial statements to the Securities and Exchange Commission and (ii) one hundred twenty (120) days after the end of each fiscal year of the Borrower and (y) with respect to any delivery of financial statements under clause (b) above, on the earlier of (i) 15 days following the date on which the Borrower delivers such financial statements to the Securities and Exchange Commission and (ii) sixty (60) days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year of the Borrower, a Compliance Certificate: (A) certifying (1) such quarterly financial statements as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes and (2) as to whether a Default has occurred and, if a Default has occurred, specifying the details thereof and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto, (B) setting forth reasonably detailed calculations demonstrating compliance with Sections 6.01, 6.02 and 6.11 and (C) stating whether any change in GAAP or in the application thereof has occurred since the date of the audited financial statements referred to in Section 3.04 and, if any such change has occurred, specifying the effect of such change on the financial statements accompanying such certificate;
(d) promptly after the same become publicly available, copies of all periodic and other reports, proxy statements and other materials filed by the Borrower or any Subsidiary with the Securities and Exchange Commission, or any Governmental Authority succeeding to any or all of the functions of said Commission other than Forms 3 and 4 and responses to inquiries of said commission, or with any national securities exchange, or distributed by the Borrower to its shareholders generally, as the case may be;
(e) as soon as available, but in any event not more than thirty (30) days after the end of each fiscal year of the Borrower, a copy of a budget (including a projected consolidated balance sheet, income statement and statement of cash flows) of the Borrower for the upcoming fiscal year in form reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent; and
(f) promptly following any request therefor, such other information regarding the operations, business affairs and financial condition of the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or compliance with the terms of this Agreement, as the Administrative Agent or any Lender may reasonably request.
The parties hereto acknowledge and agree that the forms of the financial statements filed by the Borrower with the Securities and Exchange Commission as part of its annual 10-K or quarterly 10-Q filings shall be satisfactory forms for purposes of complying with financial statement delivery requirements under Sections 5.01(a) and 5.01(b) respectively.
Documents required to be delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or (b) may be delivered electronically and if so delivered, shall be deemed to have been delivered on the date (i) on which the Borrower posts such documents, or provides a link thereto on the Borrower's website on the Internet; or (ii) on which such documents are posted on the Borrower's behalf on an Internet or intranet website, if any, to which each Lender and the Administrative Agent have access (whether a commercial, third-party website or whether sponsored by the Administrative Agent); that: (i) the Borrower shall deliver paper copies of such documents to the Administrative Agent or any Lender that requests the Borrower to deliver such paper copies until a written request to cease delivering paper copies is given by the Administrative Agent or such Lender and (ii) the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent and each Lender (by telecopier or electronic mail) of the posting of any such documents and, to the extent requested by the Administrative Agent, provide to the Administrative Agent by electronic mail electronic versions (, soft copies) of such documents. Notwithstanding anything contained herein, in every instance the Borrower shall be required to provide paper copies of the certificates required by Section 5.01(c) to the Administrative Agent. Except for such certificates, the Administrative Agent shall have no obligation to request the delivery or to maintain copies of the documents referred to above, and in any event shall have no responsibility to monitor compliance by the Borrower with any such request for delivery, and each Lender shall be solely responsible for requesting delivery to it or maintaining its copies of such documents.
provided
i.e.
SECTION 5.02. . The Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent for distribution to each Lender prompt written notice of the following:
Notices of Material Events
(a) the occurrence of any Default;
(b) the filing or commencement of any action, suit or proceeding by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority against or affecting the Borrower or any Affiliate thereof that, if adversely determined, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect;
(c) the occurrence of any ERISA Event that, alone or together with any other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect; and
(d) any other development that results in, or could reasonably be expected to result in, a Material Adverse Effect.
Each notice delivered under this Section shall be accompanied by a statement of a Financial Officer or other executive officer of the Borrower setting forth the details of the event or development requiring such notice and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
SECTION 5.03. . The Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, do or cause to be done all things necessary to preserve, renew and keep in full force and effect its legal existence and the rights, licenses, permits, privileges and franchises material to the conduct of its business; that the foregoing shall not prohibit any merger, consolidation, liquidation or dissolution permitted under Section 6.03.
Existence; Conduct of Business
provided
SECTION 5.04. . The Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, pay its obligations, including Tax liabilities, that, if not paid, could result in a Material Adverse Effect before the same shall become delinquent or in default, except where (a) the validity or amount thereof is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings, (b) the Borrower or such Subsidiary has set aside on its books adequate reserves with respect thereto in accordance with GAAP and (c) the failure to make payment pending such contest could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Payment of Obligations
SECTION 5.05. . The Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, (a) keep and maintain all property material to the conduct of its business in good working order and condition, ordinary wear and tear excepted, and (b) maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurance companies, insurance in such amounts and against such risks as are customarily maintained by companies engaged in the same or similar businesses operating in the same or similar locations.
Maintenance of Properties; Insurance
SECTION 5.06. . The Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, keep proper books of record and account in which full, true and correct entries are made of all dealings and transactions in relation to its business and activities. The Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, permit any representatives designated by the Administrative Agent or any Lender, upon reasonable prior notice, to visit and inspect its properties, to examine and make extracts from its books and records, and to discuss its affairs, finances and condition with its officers and independent accountants, all at such reasonable times and as often as reasonably requested; , that as long as no Event of Default is then in effect and notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, all of the Lenders and the Administrative Agent shall be limited to one (1) such on-site inspection in the aggregate among all of them, and so long as no Event of Default is then in effect, the Borrower will have no obligations to reimburse any expense incurred in connection with any of the foregoing.
Books and Records; Inspection Rights
provided
SECTION 5.07. . The Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, (i) comply with all laws, rules, regulations and orders of any Governmental Authority applicable to it or its property (including without limitation Environmental Laws) and (ii) perform in all material respects its obligations under material agreements to which it is a party, in each case except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. The parties hereto acknowledge and agree that any failure to file financial statements with the Securities and Exchange Commission when required under applicable law and regulation will not, by itself, be deemed to be a breach of this Section 5.07 if the Borrower files such financial statements within the time periods described in Sections 5.01 and 5.01 (b), as applicable.
Compliance with Laws; Compliance with Agreements
SECTION 5.08. . The proceeds of the Loans will be used only to finance the working capital needs, and for general corporate purposes, including Permitted Acquisitions of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries. No part of the proceeds of any Loan will be used, whether directly or indirectly, for any purpose that entails a violation of any of the regulations of the Board, including Regulations T, U and X.
Use of Proceeds and Letters of Credit
SECTION 5.09. . As promptly as possible but in any event within thirty (30) days (or such later date as may be agreed upon by the Administrative Agent) after any Person becomes a Subsidiary or any Subsidiary qualifies independently as, or is designated by the Borrower or the Administrative Agent as, a Subsidiary Guarantor pursuant to the definitions of "Material Domestic Subsidiary" and "Subsidiary Guarantor", the Borrower shall provide the Administrative Agent with written notice thereof setting forth information in reasonable detail describing the material assets of such Person and shall cause each such Subsidiary which also qualifies as a Subsidiary Guarantor to deliver to the Administrative Agent the Subsidiary Guaranty pursuant to which such Subsidiary agrees to be bound by the terms and provisions of thereof, such Subsidiary Guaranty to be accompanied by appropriate corporate resolutions, other corporate documentation and legal opinions in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel. If any Domestic Subsidiary acting as a Subsidiary Guarantor ceases to be a Material Subsidiary and/or is no longer required to act as a Subsidiary Guarantor pursuant to paragraph (b) above (as demonstrated in each case to the reasonable satisfaction of the Administrative Agent), then such Subsidiary shall be released from the Subsidiary Guaranty promptly following the request of the Borrower.
Subsidiary Guaranty
Until the Commitments have expired or terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
SECTION 6.01. . The Borrower will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Indebtedness, except:
Indebtedness
(a) Indebtedness created under the Loan Documents;
(b) Indebtedness existing on the date hereof and set forth in and extensions, renewals and replacements of any such Indebtedness with Indebtedness of a similar type that does not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
Schedule 6.01
(c) Indebtedness of (i) any Loan Party to any other Loan Party, (ii) any Subsidiary to any Loan Party and (iii) any Subsidiary this is not a Loan Party to any other Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party;
(d) Guarantees by the Borrower of Indebtedness of any Subsidiary and by any Subsidiary of Indebtedness of the Borrower or any other Subsidiary;
(e) Indebtedness of the Borrower or any Subsidiary incurred to finance the acquisition, construction or improvement of any fixed or capital assets, including Capital Lease Obligations and any Indebtedness assumed in connection with the acquisition of any such assets or secured by a Lien on any such assets prior to the acquisition thereof (including the acquisition of such assets through the purchase of capital stock or other equity interests of a Person holding such assets), and extensions, renewals and replacements of any such Indebtedness that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof; that (i) such Indebtedness is incurred prior to or within ninety (90) days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement and (ii) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (e) shall not exceed $20,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
(f) Indebtedness of the Borrower or any Subsidiary as an account party in respect of trade letters of credit;
(g) Indebtedness of the Borrower or any Subsidiary Guarantor secured by a Lien on any asset of the Borrower or any Subsidiary; that the aggregate outstanding principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (g) shall not in the aggregate exceed $15,000,000 at any time;
provided
(h) Swap Obligations of the Borrower or any Subsidiary arising under any Swap Agreement permitted under Section 6.05.
(i) Indebtedness of any Subsidiary of the Borrower which is not a Subsidiary Guarantor; that the aggregate outstanding principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (i) shall not in the aggregate exceed $10,000,000 at any time; and
provided
(j) other unsecured Indebtedness (including unsecured Subordinated Indebtedness) of the Borrower or any Subsidiary Guarantor not otherwise permitted by this Section 6.01 so long as the Borrower is in compliance, on a pro forma basis acceptable to the Administrative Agent after giving effect to the incurrence of such Indebtedness, with the financial covenants contained in Section 6.11.
SECTION 6.02. . The Borrower will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any property or asset now owned or hereafter acquired by it, or assign or sell any income or revenues (including accounts receivable) or rights in respect of any thereof, except:
Liens
(a) Permitted Encumbrances;
(b) any Lien on any property or asset of the Borrower or any Subsidiary existing on the date hereof and set forth in ; provided that (i) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or asset of the Borrower or any Subsidiary and (ii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the date hereof and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
Schedule 6.02
(c) any Lien existing on any property or asset prior to the acquisition thereof by the Borrower or any Subsidiary or existing on any property or asset of any Person that becomes a Subsidiary after the date hereof prior to the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary; provided that (i) such Lien is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such acquisition or such Person becoming a Subsidiary, as the case may be, (ii) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or assets of the Borrower or any Subsidiary and (iii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the date of such acquisition or the date such Person becomes a Subsidiary, as the case may be, and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
(d) Liens on fixed or capital assets acquired, constructed or improved by the Borrower or any Subsidiary; that (i) such security interests secure Indebtedness permitted by clause (e) of Section 6.01, (ii) such security interests and the Indebtedness secured thereby are incurred prior to or within ninety (90) days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement and (iii) such security interests shall not apply to any other property or assets of the Borrower or any Subsidiary;
provided
(e) Liens in connection with Indebtedness permitted by clauses (g) or (i) of Section 6.01;
(f) Liens securing Indebtedness owed to the Borrower or any Subsidiary Guarantor by any Subsidiary that is not a Domestic Subsidiary;
(g) rights of holders of notes or debentures issued by the Borrower or any Subsidiary in deposits placed in trust to legally or "in substance" defease such notes or debentures; and
(h) Liens consisting of pledges of cash collateral or government securities to secure, on a mark-to-market basis, obligations under Swap Agreements, so long as the aggregate value of such collateral does not exceed $5,000,000 at any one time outstanding.
SECTION 6.03. . (a) The Borrower will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, merge into or consolidate with any other Person, or permit any other Person to merge into or consolidate with it, or sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of (in one transaction or in a series of transactions) all or any of its assets, or any of the Equity Interests of any of its Subsidiaries (in each case, whether now owned or hereafter acquired), or liquidate or dissolve, except that, if at the time thereof and immediately after giving effect thereto no Default shall have occurred and be continuing:
Fundamental Changes
(i) any Subsidiary or other Person may merge into the Borrower in a transaction in which the Borrower is the surviving corporation;
(ii) any Subsidiary or Person may merge into any Subsidiary in a transaction in which the surviving entity is a Subsidiary (provided that any such merger involving a Subsidiary Guarantor must result in a Subsidiary Guarantor as the surviving entity); that any such merger involving a Person that is not a wholly owned Subsidiary immediately prior to such merger shall not be permitted unless also permitted by Section 6.04;
provided
(iii) the Borrower or any Subsidiary may sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of its assets to the Borrower or to another Loan Party;
(iv) any Subsidiary may liquidate or dissolve if the Borrower determines in good faith that such liquidation or dissolution is in the best interests of the Borrower and is not materially disadvantageous to the Lenders;
(v) the Borrower and its Subsidiaries may (A) sell inventory and excess damaged, obsolete or worn out assets, in each case in the ordinary course of business (B) make payments for property and services used by the Borrower or any Subsidiary in the ordinary course of business, (C) sell Permitted Investments, (D) make any disposition resulting from a casualty or condemnation of property or assets and (E) make any disposition of overdue accounts receivable in the ordinary course of business in connection with the compromise or collection thereof;
(vi) the Borrower and its Subsidiaries may enter into Sale and Leaseback Transactions permitted under Section 6.10;
(vii) the Borrower or any Subsidiary may sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of its assets so long as the assets sold or disposed of pursuant to this clause (vii) in any fiscal year of the Borrower do not exceed, in the aggregate, ten percent (10%) of Consolidated Tangible Assets as of the beginning of such fiscal year;
(viii) loans, advances, guarantees and investments in joint ventures to the extent any such joint venture is engaged in a business satisfying the requirements of Section 6.03(b); and
(ix) dispositions of assets expressly permitted by Sections 6.02, 6.04, 6.06 or 6.07.
(b) The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, engage to any material extent in any business other than businesses of the type conducted by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries on the date of execution of this Agreement and businesses reasonably related thereto.
SECTION 6.04. . The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, purchase, hold or acquire (including pursuant to any merger with any Person that was not a wholly owned Subsidiary prior to such merger) any evidences of indebtedness of, make or permit to exist any loans or advances to, Guarantee any obligations of, or purchase or otherwise acquire (in one transaction or a series of transactions) any assets of any other Person constituting a business unit, except
Loans, Advances, Guarantees and Acquisitions
(a) Permitted Acquisitions;
(b) loans or advances made by the Borrower to any Subsidiary Guarantor and made by any Subsidiary Guarantor to the Borrower or any other Subsidiary Guarantor;
(c) Guarantees constituting Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01;
(d) loans and advances made by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries to their officers and employees for moving, relocation and travel expenses and other similar expenditures, in each case in the ordinary course of business, so long as the aggregate outstanding principal amount thereof does not exceed $1,000,000 at any time;
(e) Swap Obligations arising under Swap Agreements permitted under Section 6.05;
(f) Permitted Investments;
(g) investments (including debt obligations) received in connection with (i) the bankruptcy or reorganization of suppliers and customers and in good faith settlement of delinquent obligations of, and other disputes with, customers and suppliers arising in the ordinary course of business and (ii) the disposition of assets permitted under Section 6.03;
(h) loans by the Borrower to officers, directors and employees of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries in connection with their purchase of capital stock of the Borrower, so long as no cash is paid by the Borrower to any such Persons in connection with such purchase;
(i) transactions permitted under Section 6.03(viii);
(j) so long as no Default exists or would occur after giving effect thereto, other investments not otherwise permitted by clauses (a) through (i) above in an aggregate outstanding principal amount not to exceed $25,000,000 at any time;
(k) other loans, advances and guarantees not otherwise permitted by this Section 6.04 so long as the aggregate outstanding principal amount thereof does not exceed $25,000,000 at any time.
SECTION 6.05. . The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, enter into any Swap Agreement, except (a) Swap Agreements entered into to hedge or mitigate risks to which the Borrower or any Subsidiary has actual exposure (other than those in respect of Equity Interests of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries), and (b) Swap Agreements entered into in order to effectively cap, collar or exchange interest rates (from fixed to floating rates, from one floating rate to another floating rate or otherwise) with respect to any interest-bearing liability or investment of the Borrower or any Subsidiary.
Swap Agreements
SECTION 6.06. . The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, sell, lease or otherwise transfer any property or assets to, or purchase, lease or otherwise acquire any property or assets from, or otherwise engage in any other transactions with, any of its Affiliates, except (a) in the ordinary course of business at prices and on terms and conditions not less favorable to the Borrower or such Subsidiary than could be obtained on an arm's-length basis from unrelated third parties, (b) transactions between or among the Borrower and its wholly owned Subsidiaries not involving any other Affiliate, (c) transactions permitted under Sections 6.01, 6.02 and 6.04, (d) any transaction with any joint venture described in Section 6.03(viii) to the extent the Borrower or Subsidiary in good faith believes that such transaction is reasonably advisable to facilitate the operations of such joint venture and the financial returns to the Borrower and its Subsidiaries and (e) any Restricted Payment permitted by Section 6.07.
Transactions with Affiliates
SECTION 6.07. . The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, declare or make, or agree to pay or make, directly or indirectly, any Restricted Payment, except (a) the Borrower may declare and pay dividends with respect to its Equity Interests payable solely in additional shares of its common stock, (b) Subsidiaries may declare and pay dividends ratably with respect to their Equity Interests, (c) the Borrower may make Restricted Payments pursuant to and in accordance with stock option plans or other benefit plans for management or employees of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries and (d) the Borrower and its Subsidiaries may make any other Restricted Payment so long as (i) no Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing or would arise after giving effect thereto and (ii) the Borrower and the Subsidiaries are in compliance on a pro forma basis, both before and immediately after giving effect to such Restricted Payment, with the covenants contained in Section 6.11.
Restricted Payments
SECTION 6.08. . The Borrower will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly voluntarily prepay, defease or in substance defease, purchase, redeem, retire or otherwise acquire, any Subordinated Indebtedness, or any Indebtedness from time to time outstanding under the Subordinated Indebtedness Documents, at any time prior to the Maturity Date. Furthermore, the Borrower will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, amend the Subordinated Indebtedness Documents or any document, agreement or instrument evidencing any Indebtedness incurred pursuant to the Subordinated Indebtedness Documents (or any replacements, substitutions, extensions or renewals thereof) or pursuant to which such Indebtedness is issued, without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent.
Subordinated Indebtedness and Amendments to Subordinated Indebtedness Documents
SECTION 6.09. . The Borrower will not, nor will it permit any of its Subsidiaries to, change its fiscal year from the basis in effect on the Effective Date.
Changes in Fiscal Year
SECTION 6.10. . The Borrower shall not, nor shall it permit any Subsidiary to, enter into any Sale and Leaseback Transaction, other than Sale and Leaseback Transactions (a) in respect of which the net cash proceeds received in connection therewith does not exceed $15,000,000 in the aggregate during any fiscal year of the Borrower, determined on a consolidated basis for the Borrower and its Subsidiaries or (b) relating to property (i) owned by the Borrower or a Subsidiary for less then 180 days prior to the consummation of such Sale and Leaseback Transaction or (ii) otherwise acquired with the intention of making it subject to a Sale and Leaseback Transaction.
Sale and Leaseback Transactions
SECTION 6.11. .
Financial Covenants
(a) . The Borrower will not permit the ratio (the ""), determined as of the end of each of its fiscal quarters ending on and after December 31, 2006, of (i) Consolidated Total Indebtedness to (ii) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of four (4) consecutive fiscal quarters ending with the end of such fiscal quarter, all calculated for the Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, to be greater than 3.0 to 1.0.
Maximum Leverage Ratio
Leverage Ratio
(b) . The Borrower will not permit the ratio (the ""), determined as of the end of each of its fiscal quarters ending on and after December 31, 2006, of (i) Consolidated EBITDA to (ii) Consolidated Interest Expense for the period of four (4) consecutive fiscal quarters ending with the end of such fiscal quarter, all calculated for the Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, to be less than 3.0 to 1.0.
Minimum Interest Coverage Ratio
Interest Coverage Ratio
If any of the following events ("") shall occur:
Events of Default
(a) the Borrower shall fail to pay any principal of any Loan or any reimbursement obligation in respect of any LC Disbursement when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at the due date thereof or at a date fixed for prepayment thereof or otherwise;
(b) the Borrower shall fail to pay any interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount (other than an amount referred to in clause (a) of this Article) payable under this Agreement, when and as the same shall become due and payable, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of three (3) Business Days;
(c) any representation or warranty made or deemed made by or on behalf of the Borrower or any Subsidiary in or in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any amendment or modification hereof or thereof or waiver hereunder or thereunder, or in any report, certificate, financial statement or other document furnished pursuant to or in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any amendment or modification thereof or waiver thereunder, shall prove to have been incorrect in any material respect when made or deemed made;
(d) (i) the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in Section 5.02, 5.03 (with respect to the Borrower's existence), 5.08 or 5.09 or in Article VI or (ii) any Loan Document shall for any reason not be or shall cease to be in full force and effect or is declared to be null and void, or any party thereto takes any action for the purpose of terminating, repudiating or rescinding any Loan Document or any of its obligations thereunder;
(e) the Borrower or any Subsidiary Guarantor, as applicable, shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in this Agreement (other than those specified in clause (a), (b) or (d) of this Article) or any other Loan Document, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of thirty (30) days after notice thereof from the Administrative Agent to the Borrower (which notice will be given at the request of any Lender);
(f) the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall fail to make any payment (whether of principal or interest and regardless of amount) in respect of any Material Indebtedness (other than Indebtedness incurred under this Agreement), when and as the same shall become due and payable, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of five (5) Business Days;
(g) any event or condition occurs that results in any Material Indebtedness becoming due prior to its scheduled maturity or that enables or permits (with or without the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both) the holder or holders of any Material Indebtedness or any trustee or agent on its or their behalf to cause any Material Indebtedness to become due, or to require the prepayment, repurchase, redemption or defeasance thereof, prior to its scheduled maturity; that this clause (g) shall not apply to secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of the voluntary sale or transfer of the property or assets securing such Indebtedness;
provided
(h) an involuntary proceeding shall be commenced or an involuntary petition shall be filed seeking (i) liquidation, reorganization or other relief in respect of the Borrower or any Subsidiary or its debts, or of a substantial part of its assets, under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect or (ii) the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for the Borrower or any Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, and, in any such case, such proceeding or petition shall continue undismissed for sixty (60) days or an order or decree approving or ordering any of the foregoing shall be entered;
(i) the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall (i) voluntarily commence any proceeding or file any petition seeking liquidation, reorganization or other relief under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect, (ii) consent to the institution of, or fail to contest in a timely and appropriate manner, any proceeding or petition described in clause (h) of this Article, (iii) apply for or consent to the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for the Borrower or any Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, (iv) file an answer admitting the material allegations of a petition filed against it in any such proceeding, (v) make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors or (vi) take any action for the purpose of effecting any of the foregoing;
(j) the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall become unable, admit in writing its inability or fail generally to pay its debts as they become due;
(k) one or more judgments for the payment of money in an aggregate amount in excess of $5,000,000 shall be rendered against the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any combination thereof and the same shall remain undischarged for a period of thirty (30) consecutive days during which execution shall not be effectively stayed, or any action shall be legally taken by a judgment creditor to attach or levy upon any assets of the Borrower or any Subsidiary to enforce any such judgment;
(l) an ERISA Event shall have occurred that, in the opinion of the Required Lenders, when taken together with all other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect; or
(m) a Change in Control shall occur;
then, and in every such event (other than an event with respect to the Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article), and at any time thereafter during the continuance of such event, the Administrative Agent may, and at the request of the Required Lenders shall, by notice to the Borrower, take either or both of the following actions, at the same or different times: (i) terminate the Commitments, and thereupon the Commitments shall terminate immediately, and (ii) declare the Loans then outstanding to be due and payable in whole (or in part, in which case any principal not so declared to be due and payable may thereafter be declared to be due and payable), and thereupon the principal of the Loans so declared to be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrower accrued hereunder and under the other Loan Documents, shall become due and payable immediately, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower; and in case of any event with respect to the Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article, the Commitments shall automatically terminate and the principal of the Loans then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other Obligations accrued hereunder and under the other Loan Documents, shall automatically become due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower.
Each of the Lenders and the Issuing Bank hereby irrevocably appoints the Administrative Agent as its agent and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions on its behalf and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms hereof, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.
The bank serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender as any other Lender and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent, and such bank and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to and generally engage in any kind of business with the Borrower or any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof as if it were not the Administrative Agent hereunder.
The Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth herein. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (a) the Administrative Agent shall not be subject to any fiduciary or other implied duties, regardless of whether a Default has occurred and is continuing, (b) the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or exercise any discretionary powers, except discretionary rights and powers expressly contemplated hereby that the Administrative Agent is required to exercise in writing as directed by the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 9.02), and (c) except as expressly set forth herein, the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to disclose, and shall not be liable for the failure to disclose, any information relating to the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries that is communicated to or obtained by the bank serving as Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates in any capacity. The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 9.02) or in the absence of its own gross negligence or willful misconduct. The Administrative Agent shall be deemed not to have knowledge of any Default unless and until written notice thereof is given to the Administrative Agent by the Borrower or a Lender, and the Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in or in connection with this Agreement, (ii) the contents of any certificate, report or other document delivered hereunder or in connection herewith, (iii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth herein, (iv) the validity, enforceability, effectiveness or genuineness of this Agreement or any other agreement, instrument or document, or (v) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in Article IV or elsewhere herein, other than to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent.
The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely upon, and shall not incur any liability for relying upon, any notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or sent by the proper Person. The Administrative Agent also may rely upon any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to be made by the proper Person, and shall not incur any liability for relying thereon. The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Borrower), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts.
The Administrative Agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers by or through any one or more sub-agents appointed by the Administrative Agent. The Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers through their respective Related Parties. The exculpatory provisions of the preceding paragraphs shall apply to any such sub-agent and to the Related Parties of the Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent, and shall apply to their respective activities in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein as well as activities as Administrative Agent.
Subject to the appointment and acceptance of a successor Administrative Agent as provided in this paragraph, the Administrative Agent may resign at any time by notifying the Lenders, the Issuing Bank and the Borrower. Upon any such resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right subject, at any time at which no Default is in effect, to the prior written consent of the Borrower (which shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed), in consultation with the Borrower, to appoint a successor. If no successor shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within thirty (30) days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agent may, on behalf of the Lenders and the Issuing Bank, appoint a successor Administrative Agent which shall be a bank with an office in New York, New York, or an Affiliate of any such bank. Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder by a successor, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring Administrative Agent, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder. The fees payable by the Borrower to a successor Administrative Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed between the Borrower and such successor. After the Administrative Agent's resignation hereunder, the provisions of this Article and Section 9.03 shall continue in effect for the benefit of such retiring Administrative Agent, its sub-agents and their respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while it was acting as Administrative Agent.
Each Lender acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement. Each Lender also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking action under or based upon this Agreement, any related agreement or any document furnished hereunder or thereunder.
None of the Lenders, if any, identified in this Agreement as a Co-Syndication Agent or Documentation Agent shall have any right, power, obligation, liability, responsibility or duty under this Agreement other than those applicable to all Lenders as such. Without limiting the foregoing, none of such Lenders shall have or be deemed to have a fiduciary relationship with any Lender. Each Lender hereby makes the same acknowledgments with respect to the relevant Lenders in their respective capacities as Co-Syndication Agents or Documentation Agent, as applicable, as it makes with respect to the Administrative Agent in the preceding paragraph.
SECTION 9.01. . (a) Except in the case of notices and other communications expressly permitted to be given by telephone (and subject to paragraph (b) below), all notices and other communications provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or overnight courier service, mailed by certified or registered mail or sent by telecopy, as follows:
Notices
(i) if to the Borrower, to it at 9705 Patuxent Woods Drive, Columbia, Maryland 21046, Attention of Sean R. Creamer, Chief Financial Officer (Telecopy No. (410) 312-8613; Telephone No. (410) 312-8000);
(ii) if to the Administrative Agent, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association, Loan and Agency Services Group, 10 South Dearborn Street, Floor 19, Attention of Marlene Zanoria (Telecopy No. (312) 385-7096), with a copy to JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association, 277 Park Avenue, Floor 14, New York, New York 10017, Attention of Susan Atha (Telecopy No. (646) 534-3078);
(iii) if to the Issuing Bank, to it at JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association, Loan and Agency Services Group, 10 South Dearborn Street, Floor 19, Attention of Marlene Zanoria (Telecopy No. (312) 385-7096), with a copy to JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association, 277 Park Avenue, Floor 14, New York, New York 10017, Attention of Susan Atha (Telecopy No. (646) 534-3078);
(iv) if to the Swingline Lender, to it at JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association, Loan and Agency Services Group, 10 South Dearborn Street, Floor 19, Attention of Marlene Zanoria (Telecopy No. (312) 385-7096), with a copy to JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association, 277 Park Avenue, Floor 14, New York, New York 10017, Attention of Susan Atha (Telecopy No. (646) 534-3078); and
(v) if to any other Lender, to it at its address (or telecopy number) set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire.
(b) Notices and other communications to the Lenders hereunder may be delivered or furnished by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent; provided that the foregoing shall not apply to notices pursuant to Article II unless otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent and the applicable Lender. The Administrative Agent or the Borrower may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it; provided that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications.
(c) Any party hereto may change its address or telecopy number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other parties hereto. All notices and other communications given to any party hereto in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement shall be deemed to have been given on the date of receipt.
SECTION 9.02. . (a) No failure or delay by the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender in exercising any right or power hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power. The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and the Lenders hereunder and under the other Loan Documents are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have. No waiver of any provision of this Agreement or consent to any departure by the Borrower therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the making of a Loan or issuance of a Letter of Credit shall not be construed as a waiver of any Default, regardless of whether the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the Issuing Bank may have had notice or knowledge of such Default at the time.
Waivers; Amendments
(b) Neither this Agreement nor any provision hereof may be waived, amended or modified except pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Borrower and the Required Lenders or by the Borrower and the Administrative Agent with the consent of the Required Lenders; that no such agreement shall (i) increase the Commitment of any Lender without the written consent of such Lender, (ii) reduce the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement or reduce the rate of interest thereon, or reduce any fees payable hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby, (iii) postpone the scheduled date of payment of the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement, or any interest thereon, or any fees payable hereunder, or reduce the amount of, waive or excuse any such payment, or postpone the scheduled date of expiration of any Commitment, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby, (iv) change Section 2.18(b) or (c) in a manner that would alter the pro rata sharing of payments required thereby, without the written consent of each Lender, (v) change any of the provisions of this Section or the definition of "Required Lenders" or any other provision hereof specifying the number or percentage of Lenders required to waive, amend or modify any rights hereunder or make any determination or grant any consent hereunder or (vi) release all or substantially all of the Subsidiary Guarantors from their obligations under the Subsidiary Guaranty, without the written consent of each Lender; that no such agreement shall amend, modify or otherwise affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender hereunder without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, as the case may be.
provided
provided
further
(c) If, in connection with any proposed waiver, amendment or modification of any of the provisions of this Agreement as contemplated by clauses (i) through (vi) of Section 9.02(b), the consent of the Required Lenders is obtained but the consent of one or more of such other Lenders whose consent is required is not obtained, then the Borrower may, at its sole expense and effort, upon notice to such Lender and the Administrative Agent, require such Lender to assign and delegate, without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in ), all its interests, rights and obligations under this Agreement to an assignee that shall assume such obligations (which assignee may be another Lender, if a Lender accepts such assignment) and shall grant its consent to the proposed waiver, amendment or modification; , that (i) the Borrower shall have received the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent (and if a Commitment is being assigned, the Issuing Bank), which consent shall not unreasonably be withheld, and (ii) such Lender shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans, accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder, from the assignee (to the extent of such outstanding principal and accrued interest and fees) or the Borrower (in the case of all other amounts).
Section 9.04
provided
SECTION 9.03. . (a) The Borrower shall pay (i) all reasonable and documented out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent and its Affiliates, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel for the Administrative Agent, in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein, the preparation and administration of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions hereof or thereof (whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby shall be consummated), (ii) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Issuing Bank in connection with the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any demand for payment thereunder and (iii) all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender, in connection with the enforcement or protection of its rights in connection with this Agreement, including its rights under this Section, or in connection with the Loans made or Letters of Credit issued hereunder, including all such out-of-pocket expenses incurred during any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans or Letters of Credit.
Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver
(b) The Borrower shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and each Lender, and each Related Party of any of the foregoing Persons (each such Person being called an "") against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related expenses, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee, incurred by or asserted against any Indemnitee arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the execution or delivery of this Agreement or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the performance by the parties hereto of their respective obligations hereunder or the consummation of the Transactions or any other transactions contemplated hereby, (ii) any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds therefrom (including any refusal by the Issuing Bank to honor a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit if the documents presented in connection with such demand do not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit), (iii) any actual or alleged presence or release of Hazardous Materials on or from any property owned or operated by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, or any Environmental Liability related in any way to the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto; that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by final and nonappealable judgment to have resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnitee.
Indemnitee
provided
(c) To the extent that the Borrower fails to pay any amount required to be paid by it to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender under paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section, each Lender severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, as the case may be, such Lender's Applicable Percentage (determined as of the time that the applicable unreimbursed expense or indemnity payment is sought) of such unpaid amount (it being understood that the Borrower's failure to pay any such amount shall not relieve the Borrower of any default in the payment thereof); that the unreimbursed expense or indemnified loss, claim, damage, liability or related expense, as the case may be, was incurred by or asserted against the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender in its capacity as such.
provided
(d) To the extent permitted by applicable law, the Borrower shall not assert, and hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby or thereby, the Transactions, any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof.
(e) All amounts due under this Section shall be payable not later than fifteen (15) days after written demand therefor.
SECTION 9.04. . (a) The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of the Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit), except that (i) the Borrower may not assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of each Lender (and any attempted assignment or transfer by the Borrower without such consent shall be null and void) and (ii) no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer its rights or obligations hereunder except in accordance with this Section. Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person (other than the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of the Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit), Participants (to the extent provided in paragraph (c) of this Section) and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the Related Parties of each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and the Lenders) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
Successors and Assigns
(b)(i) Subject to the conditions set forth in paragraph (b)(ii) below, any Lender may assign to one or more assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it) with the prior written consent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld, it being understood and agreed that it shall be reasonable for the Borrower to withhold consent for an assignment to an assignee if such assignee is a Foreign Lender which would require the Borrower to withhold amounts in respect of interest payments to such Foreign Lender) of:
(A) the Borrower, that no consent of the Borrower shall be required for an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender, an Approved Fund or, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, any other assignee;
provided
(B) the Administrative Agent; and
(C) the Issuing Bank.
(ii) Assignments shall be subject to the following additional conditions:
(A) except in the case of an assignment to a Lender or an Affiliate of a Lender or an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lender's Commitment or Loans of any Class, the amount of the Commitment or Loans of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent) shall not be less than $5,000,000 unless each of the Borrower and the Administrative Agent otherwise consent, that no such consent of the Borrower shall be required if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing;
provided
(B) each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement, provided that this clause shall not be construed to prohibit the assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lender's rights and obligations in respect of one Class of Commitments or Loans;
(C) the parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500 payable by either the assignee or assignor; and
(D) the assignee, if it shall not be a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire.
For the purposes of this Section 9.04(b), the term "" has the following meaning:
Approved Fund
"" means any Person (other than a natural person) that is engaged in making, purchasing, holding or investing in bank loans and similar extensions of credit in the ordinary course of its business and that is administered or managed by (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender or (c) an entity or an Affiliate of an entity that administers or manages a Lender.
Approved Fund
(iii) Subject to acceptance and recording thereof pursuant to paragraph (b)(iv) of this Section, from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption the assignee thereunder shall be a party hereto and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03). Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this Section 9.04 shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Section.
(iv) The Administrative Agent, acting for this purpose as an agent of the Borrower, shall maintain at one of its offices a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Commitment of, and principal amount of the Loans and LC Disbursements owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the ""). The entries in the Register shall be conclusive, and the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and the Lenders may treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary. The Register shall be available for inspection by the Borrower, the Issuing Bank and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
Register
(v) Upon its receipt of a duly completed Assignment and Assumption executed by an assigning Lender and an assignee, the assignee's completed Administrative Questionnaire (unless the assignee shall already be a Lender hereunder), the processing and recordation fee referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section and any written consent to such assignment required by paragraph (b) of this Section, the Administrative Agent shall accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information contained therein in the Register; that if either the assigning Lender or the assignee shall have failed to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to Section 2.05(c), 2.06(d) or (e), 2.07(b), 2.18(d) or 9.03(c), the Administrative Agent shall have no obligation to accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information therein in the Register unless and until such payment shall have been made in full, together with all accrued interest thereon. No assignment shall be effective for purposes of this Agreement unless it has been recorded in the Register as provided in this paragraph.
provided
(c) (i) Any Lender may, without the consent of the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, sell participations to one or more banks or other entities (a "") in all or a portion of such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans owing to it); provided that (A) such Lender's obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (B) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (C) the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and the other Lenders shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement. Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce this Agreement and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first proviso to Section 9.02(b) that affects such Participant. Subject to paragraph (c)(ii) of this Section, the Borrower agrees that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.15, 2.16 and 2.17 to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to paragraph (b) of this Section. To the extent permitted by law, each Participant also shall be entitled to the benefits of Section 9.08 as though it were a Lender, provided such Participant agrees to be subject to Section 2.18(c) as though it were a Lender.
Participant
provided
(ii) A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under Section 2.15 or 2.17 than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Borrower's prior written consent. A Participant that would be a Foreign Lender if it were a Lender shall not be entitled to the benefits of Section 2.17 unless the Borrower is notified of the participation sold to such Participant and such Participant agrees, for the benefit of the Borrower, to comply with Section 2.17(e) and be subject to Section 2.7(f) as though it were a Lender.
(d) Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including without limitation any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank, and this Section shall not apply to any such pledge or assignment of a security interest; provided that no such pledge or assignment of a security interest shall release a Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
SECTION 9.05. . All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Loan Parties in the Loan Documents and in the certificates or other instruments delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be considered to have been relied upon by the other parties hereto and shall survive the execution and delivery of the Loan Documents and the making of any Loans and issuance of any Letters of Credit, regardless of any investigation made by any such other party or on its behalf and notwithstanding that the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or incorrect representation or warranty at the time any credit is extended hereunder, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount payable under this Agreement or any other Loan Document is outstanding and unpaid or any Letter of Credit is outstanding and so long as the Commitments have not expired or terminated. The provisions of Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03 and Article VIII shall survive and remain in full force and effect regardless of the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, the repayment of the Loans, the expiration or termination of the Letters of Credit and the Commitments or the termination of this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any provision hereof or thereof.
Survival
SECTION 9.06. . This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. This Agreement, the other Loan Documents and any separate letter agreements with respect to fees payable to the Administrative Agent constitute the entire contract among the parties relating to the subject matter hereof and supersede any and all previous agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof. Except as provided in Section 4.01, this Agreement shall become effective when it shall have been executed by the Administrative Agent and when the Administrative Agent shall have received counterparts hereof which, when taken together, bear the signatures of each of the other parties hereto, and thereafter shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by telecopy shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
Counterparts; Integration; Effectiveness
SECTION 9.07. . Any provision of this Agreement held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions hereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Severability
SECTION 9.08. . If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender and each of its Affiliates is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other obligations at any time owing by such Lender or Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of the Borrower against any of and all the obligations of the Borrower now or hereafter existing under this Agreement held by such Lender, irrespective of whether or not such Lender shall have made any demand under this Agreement and although such obligations may be unmatured. The rights of each Lender under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) which such Lender may have.
Right of Setoff
SECTION 9.09. . (a) This Agreement shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the law of the State of New York.
Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process
(b) The Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court. Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law. Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement against the Borrower or its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
(c) The Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection which it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document in any court referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section. Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
(d) Each party to this Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 9.01. Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
SECTION 9.10. . EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT, ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY OR THEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER THEORY). EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL
SECTION 9.11. . Article and Section headings and the Table of Contents used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and shall not affect the construction of, or be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Headings
SECTION 9.12. . Each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and the Lenders agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the Information (as defined below), except that Information may be disclosed (a) to its and its Affiliates' directors, officers, employees and agents, including accountants, legal counsel and other advisors (it being understood that the Persons to whom such disclosure is made will be informed of the confidential nature of such Information and instructed to keep such Information confidential), (b) to the extent requested by any regulatory authority, (c) to the extent required by applicable laws or regulations or by any subpoena or similar legal process, (d) to any other party to this Agreement, (e) in connection with the exercise of any remedies hereunder or any suit, action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or the enforcement of rights hereunder, (f) subject to an agreement containing provisions substantially the same as those of this Section, to (i) any assignee of or Participant in, or any prospective assignee of or Participant in, any of its rights or obligations under this Agreement or (ii) any actual or prospective counterparty (or its advisors) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to the Borrower and its obligations, (g) with the consent of the Borrower or (h) to the extent such Information (i) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this Section or (ii) becomes available to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender on a non-confidential basis from a source other than the Borrower. For the purposes of this Section, "Information" means all information received from the Borrower relating to the Borrower or its business, other than any such information that is available to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender on a non-confidential basis prior to disclosure by the Borrower; provided that, in the case of information received from the Borrower after the date hereof, such information is clearly identified at the time of delivery as confidential. Any Person required to maintain the confidentiality of Information as provided in this Section shall be considered to have complied with its obligation to do so if such Person has exercised the same degree of care to maintain the confidentiality of such Information as such Person would accord to its own confidential information.
Confidentiality
EACH LENDER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT INFORMATION AS DEFINED IN SECTION 9.12 FURNISHED TO IT PURSUANT TO THIS AGREEMENT MAY INCLUDE MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION CONCERNING THE BORROWER AND ITS SUBSIDIARIES OR THEIR RESPECTIVE SECURITIES, AND CONFIRMS THAT IT HAS DEVELOPED COMPLIANCE PROCEDURES REGARDING THE USE OF MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION AND THAT IT WILL HANDLE SUCH MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THOSE PROCEDURES AND APPLICABLE LAW, INCLUDING FEDERAL AND STATE SECURITIES LAWS.
ALL INFORMATION, INCLUDING REQUESTS FOR WAIVERS AND AMENDMENTS, FURNISHED BY THE BORROWER OR THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT PURSUANT TO, OR IN THE COURSE OF ADMINISTERING, THIS AGREEMENT WILL BE SYNDICATE-LEVEL INFORMATION, WHICH MAY CONTAIN MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION ABOUT THE BORROWER AND THE OTHER LOAN PARTIES OR THEIR RESPECTIVE SECURITIES) AND ITS SECURITIES. ACCORDINGLY, EACH LENDER REPRESENTS TO THE BORROWER AND THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT THAT IT HAS IDENTIFIED IN ITS ADMINISTRATIVE QUESTIONNAIRE A CREDIT CONTACT WHO MAY RECEIVE INFORMATION THAT MAY CONTAIN MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH ITS COMPLIANCE PROCEDURES AND APPLICABLE LAW
SECTION 9.13. . Each Lender that is subject to the requirements of the USA Patriot Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)) (the "") hereby notifies the Borrower that pursuant to the requirements of the Act, it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies the Borrower, which information includes the name and address of the Borrower and other information that will allow such Lender to identify the Borrower in accordance with the Act.
USA PATRIOT Act
Act
[Signature Pages Follow]
ARBITRON INC. as the Borrower
By Name: Sean R. Creamer Title: EVP & CFO
/s/ Sean R. Creamer
JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION,
individually as a Lender, as the Swingline Lender, as the Issuing Bank and as Administrative Agent
By Name: Susan H. Atha Title: Vice President
/s/ Susan H. Atha
CITIBANK, N.A.,
individually as a Lender and as Co-Syndication Agent
By Name: JaHan Wang Title: Vice President
/s/ JaHan Wang
WACHOVIA BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION,
individually as a Lender and as Co-Syndication Agent
By Name: Daniel W. O'Donnell Title: Senior Vice President
/s/ Daniel W. O'Donnell
CITIZENS BANK OF PENNSYLVANIA,
individually as a Lender and as Documentation Agent
By Name: Devon L. Starks Title: Senior Vice President
/s/ Devon L. Starks
U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION,
as a Lender
By Name: Michael P. Dickman Title: Vice President U.S. Bank, N.A.
/s/ Michael P. Dickman
THE BANK OF NEW YORK,
as a Lender
By Name: Steven J. Correll Title: Vice President
/s/ Steven J. Correll

Exhibit 99.1
Press
Information
Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK; December 20, 2006  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced it has entered into a five-year, $150 million unsecured revolving credit facility.
The facility will be available for general corporate purposes, which may include working capital requirements, strategic acquisitions and authorized share repurchases.
The credit facility has been arranged by J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. and includes an expansion feature of up to an additional $50 million.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has also developed the Portable People Meter system, a new technology for media and marketing research.
TM
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by its research and technology organization, located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1,800 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
Portable People Meter
TM
is a mark of Arbitron Inc.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including, in particular, the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in Arbitron's Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2005.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20070130165625.txt.gz
TIME:20070130165625
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On January 24, 2007, the Compensation and Human Resources Committee (the "Committee") of the Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") met and approved a cash bonus plan for the Companys executive officers for 2007, which would be payable in early 2008 (the "Bonus Plan"). The Bonus Plan provides for the payment of cash bonuses based upon the Companys earnings per share, revenue, and implementation of certain non-financial initiatives, with earnings per share weighted 40%, revenue weighted 10%, and the non-financial initiatives weighted 50% in the aggregate for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2007. The bulk of each executive officers bonus for 2007 will be determined as a result of achievement of Company goals, with the remaining portion based on achievement of individual goals, except in the case of Steve Morris, the Companys President and Chief Executive Officer, and Sean Creamer, the Companys Executive Vice President, Finance and Planning and Ch ief Financial Officer, whose bonuses will be determined entirely on the basis of achievement of Company goals. The Bonus Plan provides for a target bonus for each executive officer, expressed as a percentage of base salary. The target bonuses for the executive officers who are expected to be named executive officers in 2007 are: Mr. Morris, 75% of base salary; Owen Charlebois, the Companys President, Operations, Technology, and Research & Development, 55% of base salary; Mr. Creamer, 50% of base salary; Pierre Bouvard, the Companys President, Sales and Marketing, 52% of base salary; and Linda Dupree, Senior Vice President, Portable People Meter New Product Development, 45% of base salary. The target bonuses for other executive officers range from 40-45% of base salary. A greater or lesser amount may be paid in the event the targets are exceeded or not met.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20070201172221.txt.gz
TIME:20070201172221
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On February 1, 2007 Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") formed a joint venture Delaware limited liability company with Nielsen Media Research, Inc. ("NMR") named Project Apollo LLC (the "LLC"). The LLC was formed to implement commercial deployment in the United States of a product that will measure the media return on investment to advertisers by collecting and integrating product purchase and other information using the Companys Portable People Meter ("PPM") technology. Initially, each party will own 50% of the equity interests in the LLC and will share equally in funding obligations. Since April 2005, pursuant to a cost-sharing agreement, the Company and NMR have shared costs and capital expenditures associated with the development and deployment of a pilot panel designed to demonstrate the feasibility of the product. ACNielsen (US) Inc., an affiliate of NMR, has entered into an agreement with the LLC to permit the LLC to use its Homescan Panel and certain other data and recruit panelists, tabu late data, and provide related services. The Company has entered into an agreement with the LLC under which the Company will license PPM data and equipment to the LLC and provide other data collection and transmission services. Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, NMRs parent corporation, the Company also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, cable, newspaper, and online industries. A copy of a press release announcing the formation of the LLC is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits See Exhibit Index attached hereto.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE:ARB) and The Nielsen Company announced today that they have signed an agreement that will govern completion of development and testing of the Project Apollo' marketing research service and the expansion of the pilot panel to a full national service if the test results meet expectations and generate marketplace support. The parties have formed a jointly-owned limited liability company to continue pursuit of the project.
NEW YORK, FEBRUARY 1, 2007
The proposed Project Apollo' service would use the Arbitron Portable People Meter system, ACNielsen Homescan technology and other technologies to provide advertisers with a better understanding of the connection between consumer exposure to advertising on multiple media and their shopping/purchase behavior.
TM
"By making it possible to link the Arbitron Portable People Meter system with ACNielsen Homescan technology, this agreement between Arbitron and The Nielsen Company will help make real the industry's long standing dream of a true, single-source' consumer research service," said Steve Morris, president and chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc.
Said Susan Whiting, executive vice president of The Nielsen Company and chairman/CEO of Nielsen Media Research, "During the past eighteen months, our two companies planned, built and have been operating a 5,000 household pilot panel for Project Apollo' that has been well received by the seven charter advertisers who are helping us develop the service. Together, our companies and our charter supporters in the advertising industry will work to make Project Apollo' the most advanced marketing research service of its kind."
The formation of Apollo LLC follows a May 2005 agreement that allowed the two companies to share the costs of the deployment of a pilot panel for the Project Apollo' service.
The current agreement also encompasses related agreements between the jointly owned limited liability company, Arbitron and other Nielsen companies for services to be used by the pilot panel and the full national service.
About the Project Apollo' Pilot Panel
The Nielsen Company and Arbitron have deployed a national pilot panel of more than 11,000 persons in 5,000 households as a demonstration of the Project Apollo' national marketing research service. The pilot panel is delivering, to a select group of charter supporters, multi-media and purchase information from a common sample of consumers.
Seven advertisers are members of the Project Apollo' Steering Committee, a group of marketers who have signed agreements for the Project Apollo' pilot panel data. In aggregate, these seven advertisers spend more than $6.8 billion for advertising on measured media.
The pilot panel is intended to show advertisers how Project Apollo' enables a better understanding of the link between consumer exposure to advertising on multiple media and their shopping/purchase behavior. The pilot also showcases the enhanced ability of the single-source' marketing research service to measure the return on investment for marketing efforts.
How the Project Apollo' Pilot Panel Works
The panel members are being given incentives to voluntarily carry Arbitron's Portable People Meter, a small, cell phone-sized device that collects the volunteers' exposure to electronic media sources: broadcast television networks, cable networks, and network radio as well as audio-based commercials broadcast on these outlets and on additional media. Consumer exposure to other media such as newspapers, magazines and circulars is being collected through additional survey instruments.
Data on consumer preference and purchases for a wide range of services and products are also being collected from panelists via ACNielsen's Homescan technology, which tracks packaged goods purchases, and by means of additional surveys. Data are being collected in aggregate form to provide a holistic understanding of participants' media interactions and their resulting shopping and purchase behavior.
About The Nielsen Company
The Nielsen Company is a global information and media company with leading market positions and recognized brands in marketing information (ACNielsen), media information (Nielsen Media Research), business publications (, , ) and trade shows. The privately held company has more than 42,000 employees, is active in more than 100 countries, and has headquarters in Haarlem, the Netherlands, and New York, USA.
Billboard
The Hollywood Reporter
Computing, Intermediair
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company is developing the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1,900 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, cable,, newspaper and online industries.
Contacts: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Jack Loftus The Nielsen Company 646-654-8360 Jack.Loftus@Nielsen.com
     
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Note from Arbitron Inc. Regarding Forward-Looking Statements:
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including, in particular, the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in Arbitron's Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2005.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20070215072846.txt.gz
TIME:20070215072846
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 15, 2007, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release reporting 2006 fourth quarter and year end financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated February 15, 2007.
The information in this Form 8-K and the attached Exhibit are furnished to comply with Item 2.02 and Item 9.01 of Form 8-K. Neither this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit are to be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 (except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing).
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Release
Arbitron Inc. Phone: 410-312-8410 sean.creamer@arbitron.com
Company Contact: Sean Creamer, CFO
KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215 tfromer@kcsa.com
Investor Contact: Todd Fromer
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor and Media contact: Thom Mocarsky
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2006.
NEW YORK, February 15, 2007 
For the fourth quarter 2006, the Company reported revenue of $79.3 million, an increase of 5.2 percent over revenue of $75.3 million during the fourth quarter of 2005.
Costs and expenses for the fourth quarter increased by 17.9 percent, from $63.8 million in 2005 to $75.2 million in 2006, due in part to planned expenditures for the 2007 rollout of the Portable People Meter (PPM) ratings service in Philadelphia and New York. Non-cash equity compensation for the quarter amounted to $1.4 million.
TM
Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for the quarter were $10.9 million, a decrease of 35.7 percent compared with EBIT of $17.0 million for the fourth quarter of 2005. Interest expense for the quarter increased to $3.2 million from $0.9 million in 2005 due primarily to a one-time "make whole" charge of $2.9 million stemming from the early repayment of a $50 million outstanding senior note in October 2006.
Net income for the quarter was $4.9 million, compared with $11.2 million for the fourth quarter of 2005. Net income per share for the fourth quarter 2006 decreased to $0.17 per share (diluted), compared with $0.36 per share (diluted) during the comparable period last year.
For the year ended December 31, 2006, revenue was $329.3 million, an increase of 6.2 percent over revenue of $310.0 million for 2005.
A planned increase in expenses for the 2007 rollout of the Portable People Meter radio ratings system in Philadelphia and New York and for the Project Apollo pilot contributed to an increase in costs and expenses for the year of 16.9 percent, from $216.3 million in 2005 to $253.0 million in 2006. Non-cash equity compensation in 2006 totaled $6.5 million.
EBIT decreased 17.2 percent from $101.4 million in 2005 to $84.0 million in 2006. Net income for 2006 decreased 24.7 percent to $50.7 million compared with $67.3 million in 2005. Earnings per share (diluted) in 2006 was $1.68, compared with $2.14 per share (diluted) last year, which included a tax benefit from the reversal of certain tax contingencies relating to prior years of $0.15 per share (diluted).
Management comment on 2006 results
Stephen Morris, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron, made the following comments on 2006 results:
"Despite the continuing challenges that confront the industries we serve, Arbitron was able to increase its revenue and achieve the earnings results that we forecast for 2006, all while investing in our core business and in Portable People Meter-based growth initiatives."
"In 2006, we made significant progress in our effort to transform Arbitron into a company that keeps its core radio ratings business solidly grounded while we move decisively into the digital age with the Portable People Meter."
"We recently earned Media Rating Council accreditation of the Portable People Meter (PPM) radio ratings in Houston and that market is poised to commercialize; we are commercializing the PPM service in Philadelphia and we have recruited the first households for a New York PPM panel that will commercialize this fall."
"For Project Apollo, we solved the very complex logistical challenge inherent in encoding the major broadcast networks at the end of the year. Our seven charter customers, including the recently signed Wal-Mart, are enthusiastically digging into the more robust dataset. We also recently completed the Project Apollo LLC agreement with The Nielsen Company, so our partnership is on solid ground."
"We also paid particular attention to our capital structure throughout 2006, buying back $70 million of our stock and returning capital to our shareholders through quarterly dividends. Also, in the fourth quarter of 2006, our Board of Directors authorized a new stock repurchase program of up to $100 million over a two year period, we repaid our non-investment grade debt and negotiated a new credit facility of up to $200 million. Our goal in managing our capital is to strike the appropriate balance between continued investment in our core business and PPM initiatives, opportunities for acquisitions, and return of capital to shareholders."
Company Guidance for 2007 and Outlook for 2008
Arbitron is updating its guidance practices and plans to continue providing annual guidance, including revenue and earnings per share expectations. The company will no longer provide quarterly guidance for revenue and earnings per share. This new practice is consistent with management's focus on long-term revenue and earnings growth and is particularly appropriate during the company's transition to Portable People Meter measurement.
The guidance being issued today includes a broader range for earnings per share than the company has given in past years. The company is doing this in order to account for the full range of scenarios related to its PPM rollout plans including the pace at which it signs the remainder of its customers to PPM contracts.
For the full year 2007, Arbitron expects revenue to increase between 5.5 percent and 7.5 percent compared to last year. Earnings per share (diluted) for the full year 2007 is expected to be between $1.30 and $1.50 versus $1.68 in 2006. For 2008, the company anticipates accelerating revenue growth to the double-digit range with even higher EBIT growth as the company begins the process of restoring its margins by the completion of the PPM transition process in the top 50 radio markets.
Commenting on factors that would affect Arbitron's performance in 2007, Sean Creamer, chief financial officer, said: "The anticipated year-over-year decline in earnings per share is a result of the increased operational spending for PPM initiatives required as we aggressively move to commercialize Philadelphia, Houston and New York in 2007 and begin preparing for the markets scheduled to commercialize in early 2008."
"Commercializing the Portable People Meter will require that we invest incremental dollars to recruit, equip and maintain the large, long-term panels of consumers for the PPM local market ratings services. For each new PPM market, the period of investment and recognition of the related expense precedes, by six to nine months, the recognition of incremental revenue we expect to earn in electronically measured markets. Since we are in the first year of PPM commercialization, the impact of this lag to our financial results is particularly pronounced in 2007. We continue to believe that 2007 represents the trough year from an earnings perspective for our ratings business."
"In addition, we plan to maintain our spending to lay the groundwork and define the market potential for Project Apollo, an additional avenue of growth for Arbitron that's based on our patented Portable People Meter system."
"I should also note that, as our 2006 results indicated, our core business remains solid. However, the continued stagnation of radio advertising revenue and the additional dollars that we are asking of our radio customers for PPM measurement are putting more and more pressure on our ability to generate new, non-ratings revenue from our core customer base."
"Looking forward, as we help strengthen the radio industry's profile in the eyes of its advertisers as well as our own competitive advantage through the commercialization of the Portable People Meter, we are also focusing our attention on internal cost efficiencies and on acquisitions and other efforts to expand our customer base beyond our accustomed reliance on the radio industry," said Mr. Creamer.
Earnings conference call: schedule and access
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. ET on February 15 to discuss its fourth quarter results and other relevant matters. To listen to the call, dial (toll free) 888-802-8577. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing 973-935-8754. To participate users will need to use the following code: 8285540. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to, either net income, as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing information firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and out of home and online media advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has also developed the Portable People Meter system, a new technology for media and marketing research.
TM
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by its research and technology organization, located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1,900 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company (formerly VNU.) Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "our," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including, in particular, the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in Arbitron's Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2005.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(2) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(3) Earnings before interest and income taxes (EBIT) and earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA) are widely used non-GAAP financial measures of operating performance. They are presented as supplemental information that management of Arbitron believes is useful to investors to evaluate the Company's results because they exclude certain items that are not directly related to the Company's core operating performance. EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered as substitutes either for net income, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20070221165945.txt.gz
TIME:20070221165945
EVENTS:	Notice of Delisting or Failure to Satisfy a Continued Listing Rule or Standard; Transfer of Listing
TEXT:
ITEM: Notice of Delisting or Failure to Satisfy a Continued Listing Rule or Standard; Transfer of Listing
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 3.01 Notice of Delisting or Failure to Satisfy a Continued Listing Rule or Standard; Transfer of Listing.
On February 16, 2007, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") notified The New York Stock Exchange (the "NYSE") that, from September 2005 through February 2007, the Company was not in full compliance with the provisions of Section 303A of the NYSEs Corporate Governance Listing Standards (the "Listing Standards"). Specifically, the Companys non-compliance was caused by the failure of one member of the Companys Board of Directors (the "Board") to be independent (as such term is defined in Section 303A.2(b)(iii) of the Listing Standards, which contain requirements for director independence in addition to those specified under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended) because of the employment of the directors adult son by the Companys registered independent public accounting firm. The director, Alan W. Aldworth, previously served on the Boards Corporate Governance and Audit Committees, each of which is required by the Listing Standards to be composed entirely of independent directors. On February 13, 2007, Mr. Aldworth offered, and the Company accepted, his resignation from both committees effective immediately. The Company has reassessed the independence of each member of the Board following Mr. Aldworths resignation from the committees, and on February 16, 2007, the Company also submitted a Section 303A Interim Written Affirmation to the NYSE affirming that it is currently in full compliance with Section 303A of the Listing Standards. As part of the Companys annual review of its Questionnaire for Directors and Officers in connection with the preparation of its Annual Report on Form 10-K and proxy statement for its 2007 Annual Meeting of Stockholders, the Company became aware that the adult son of Mr. Aldworth was currently employed by KPMG LLP ("KPMG"), the Companys registered independent public accounting firm, in a non-management position in KPMGs Chicago office. While Mr. Aldworth first reported his sons emp loyment by KPMG in February 2006 in the Questionnaire for Directors and Officers he submitted in connection with the 2006 Annual Meeting of Stockholders, the Board was not informed, nor was it aware, prior to February 2007 that Mr. Aldworths son was employed by KPMG. KPMG has reviewed the facts and has determined that the relationship described above has no impact on its independence as the Companys registered public accounting firm. KPMG and the Company believe that the employment of Mr. Aldworths son does not cause a violation of the Securities and Exchange Commissions rules for auditor independence and such employment has not created any actual conflict of interest between Mr. Aldworth and the Company. Mr. Aldworths son is employed in KPMGs Chicago office, is not a partner of KPMG, and has never provided any audit services to the Company nor been involved in any Company audit in any capacity. The KPMG audit engagement partners for the Company are l ocated in KPMGs Baltimore office. The Company understands that the Listing Standards allow no method of appeal or waiver even in cases such as this where the Company believes that the chance of conflict of interest, real or perceived, is remote.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20070227152151.txt.gz
TIME:20070227152151
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(b) On February 21, 2006, Director Alan W. Aldworth notified Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") that he would not stand for reelection at the Companys 2007 Annual Meeting of Stockholders, which will be held on May 15, 2007. Mr. Aldworths decision not to stand for reelection was not the result of any disagreement with the Company related to its operations, policies, or practices.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20070306060505.txt.gz
TIME:20070306060505
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
     Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
Item 7.01      Regulation FD Disclosure
           Arbitron Inc. is scheduled to present at the Bear Stearns 20th Annual Media Conference to be held at The Breakers Hotel in Palm Beach, Florida on Tuesday, March 6, 2007. A copy of the slide show presentation to be made at the conference is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
           The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01      Financial Statements and Exhibits
      (d)            Exhibits
                       The following exhibit relating to Item 7.01 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
                       99.1      Slide Show Presentation of Arbitron Inc.
 
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20070419072709.txt.gz
TIME:20070419072709
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 19, 2007, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release reporting 2007 first quarter financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated April 19, 2007.
The information in this Form 8-K and the attached Exhibit are furnished to comply with Item 2.02 and Item 9.01 of Form 8-K. Neither this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit are to be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 (except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing).
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press Release
Investor and media contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 212-887-1314 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the quarter ended March 31, 2007.
NEW YORK, April 19, 2007 
For the first quarter of 2007, the Company reported revenue of $91.8 million, an increase of 7.9 percent over revenue of $85.1 million during the first quarter of 2006. Contributing to the revenue growth for the quarter were equipment sales consummated in the quarter related to the Company's international Portable People Meter licensing business. Excluding the impact of these sales, revenue grew 7.1 percent.
TM
Costs and expenses for the first quarter increased by 18.0 percent, from $53.7 million in the first quarter of 2006 to $63.3 million in the first quarter of 2007, due primarily to planned spending on the rollout of the Portable People Meter radio ratings service.
The proportionate share of net loss of affiliates in the first quarter of 2007 increased to $(3.8) million from $(2.4) million in the first quarter of 2006. The increase was due primarily to Arbitron's $(1.1) million share of the net losses for the Project Apollo LLC, the joint effort to develop a national marketing research service with The Nielsen Company. With the formation of the Project Apollo LLC, effective February 2007, a substantial portion of the activity for the Project Apollo initiative is now reported on the proportionate share of net loss of affiliates line of the Statement of Income.
Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for the quarter were $24.7 million, a decrease of 15.0 percent over EBIT of $29.0 million during the comparable period last year.
Net income for the quarter was $15.5 million, a decrease of 14.8 percent from $18.2 million for the first quarter of 2006. Net income per share for the first quarter of 2007 was $0.52 (diluted), compared with $0.58 (diluted) for the comparable period last year, a decrease of 10.3 percent.
Management comment on first quarter 2007 results
Stephen Morris, president and chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc., made the following comments on the first quarter 2007 results: "Arbitron is focusing its attention and its resources on the rollout of the Portable People Meter radio ratings service, which went live in Philadelphia last month. Our primary goal in 2007 is to execute successfully the initial markets in our PPM rollout, continue our steady progress toward MRC accreditation for all PPM markets, and work with the radio industry to make the transition to electronic measurement as smooth as possible."
"With The Nielsen Company, we continue to invest in the development of Project Apollo with a goal of reaching a decision about implementation in the second half of the year. While initial results show promise, we still have further work to do to demonstrate the value of Project Apollo for advertisers and the media as well as to complete a workable business plan for Arbitron and The Nielsen Company," said Mr. Morris.
Company Outlook for 2007
Arbitron also reiterated its previously issued revenue and earnings per share guidance for the full year 2007.
Specifically, the Company continues to expect that revenue will increase between 5.5 percent and 7.5 percent in 2007 compared to last year. Earnings per share (diluted) for the full year 2007 is expected to be between $1.30 and $1.50 versus $1.68 in 2006.
Earnings conference call: schedule and access
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. ET on April 19 to discuss its first quarter results and other relevant matters. To listen to the call, dial (toll free) 888-694-4641. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing 973-582-2734. To participate users will need to use the following code: 8623082. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter system, a new technology for media and marketing research.
TM
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 2,100 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "our," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including, in particular, the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in Arbitron's Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2006.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes expense) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(2) Earnings before interest and income taxes (EBIT) and earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA) are widely used non-GAAP financial measures of operating performance. They are presented as supplemental information that management of Arbitron believes is useful to investors to evaluate the Company's results because they exclude certain items that are not directly related to the Company's core operating performance. EBIT is calculated by deducting net interest income from net income and adding back income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by deducting net interest income from net income and adding back income tax expense, depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered as substitutes either for net income, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
Arbitron Inc.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20070629165008.txt.gz
TIME:20070629165008
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On June 26, 2007 Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") entered into a new multi-year agreement (the "New Agreement") with Clear Channel Radio ("Clear Channel"), a division of Clear Channel Broadcasting, Inc., to provide radio ratings and other related services through December 31, 2011 to Clear Channels 268 radio stations located in the 46 markets in which Clear Channel operates out of the 50 markets identified in the Companys previously announced Portable People MeterTM ("PPM") roll-out plan (we refer to the 46 markets in which Clear Channel operates that are included in the PPM roll-out plan, collectively, as the "Clear Channel PPM Markets"). Pursuant to the terms of the New Agreement, the Company will provide Clear Channel with PPM ratings services, as and when the new audience ratings technology is deployed in the Clear Channel PPM Markets. Until such time as the PPM ratings technology is deployed in a particular market, the Company will continue to provide Clear Channel with its diary-ba sed ratings services in that market. As the PPM ratings technology is deployed in a particular market, the diary-based ratings contract will lapse and the New Agreement will become applicable to such market. The New Agreement also extends the diary-based ratings agreement in the Clear Channel PPM Markets that do not enter into PPM pre-currency prior to December 31, 2008 until such time as the PPM service is commercialized in those markets, but not later than December 31, 2011. The existing agreement between the Company and Clear Channel for diary-based ratings in markets outside of the Clear Channel PPM Markets is not amended by the New Agreement and is currently scheduled to expire December 31, 2008, with certain software licenses and other services scheduled to expire March 30, 2009. Under the terms of the New Agreement, the Company will provide its PPM Market Report Service, including the Companys PPM Market Report, PPM Analysis Tool software, PPM Weeklies reports, Tapscan software, and its diary-based Radio Market Report Service, including the Companys Radio Market Report, Maximi$er, Arbitrends, PD Advantage, Sample Surcharge, Ethnic Data, Processor Data Clearance, Sample Increase, and Tapscan software, to Clear Channel, as applicable. These services include new services as well as renewals of existing services. The aggregate amount of all payments to be made by Clear Channel for the diary-based Radio Market Report and related services in the Clear Channel PPM Markets between January 1, 2009 and December 31, 2011 currently is expected to be approximately $30.7 million, based on the radio stations currently owned by Clear Channel and the anticipated roll-out of the PPM ratings services. The aggregate amount of all payments to be made by Clear Channel for the PPM Market Report and related services in the Clear Channel PPM Markets during the term of the New Agreement currently is expected to be approximately $160.6 million, based on the radio stations currently owned by Clear Channel and the anticipated roll-out of the PPM ratings services. A copy of the New Agreement will be filed as an exhibit to the Companys Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2007.
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On June 27, 2007 the Company issued a press release announcing the New Agreement. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, and is incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Item 7.01, including the information set forth in Exhibit 99.1, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits See Exhibit Index attached hereto. Forward-Looking Statements This Current Report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "our," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "scheduled" "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans" or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:  successfully implement the rollout of our PPM service;  renew contracts with large customers as they expire;  execute our business strategies, including entering into potential joint- venture or other third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact of any further consolidation in the radio and advertising agency industries;  respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprietary software systems and new customer products and services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully manage the impact on our business of any economic downturn generally and in the advertising market in particular;  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperation in surveys, privacy concerns, consumer trends, technology changes and/or government regulations ;  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to measure multi- media and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment; and  successfully obtain and/or maintain Media Rating Council accreditation for our audience measurement services. Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitrons filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in Arbitrons Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006. The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

For Immediate Release
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced that Clear Channel Radio ("Clear Channel"), a division of Clear Channel Communications, Inc., has signed a multi-year agreement for Portable People Meter radio ratings services in 46 markets, as and when those services are rolled out by Arbitron. The agreement encompasses all Clear Channel radio stations in those markets that Arbitron has converted or is planning to convert to the Portable People Meter ratings methodology by the end of 2010.
NEW YORK, June 27, 2007 
TM
The agreement expires December 31, 2011, and also extends until that date the current contract for diary-based radio ratings in each of the markets covered by the agreement that have not been converted to Portable People Meter radio ratings before the end of 2008, the expiration date of the current diary agreement with Clear Channel.
Clear Channel is Arbitron's largest radio ratings subscriber and represented approximately 19 percent of Arbitron's revenue in 2006.
By the end of 2010, Arbitron is scheduled to deploy the Portable People Meter in the top 50 markets in place of the paper and pencil diary method that the company has employed to collect radio audience estimates since 1965.
This press release was updated from Arbitron's June 26, 2007 announcement to remove Clear Channel's company description. All contractual information remains the same.
Editor's Note:
About the Portable People Meter
The Arbitron Portable People Metersystem uses a passive audience measurement device  about the size of a small cell phone  to track consumer exposure to media and entertainment, including broadcast, cable and satellite television; terrestrial, satellite and online radio as well as cinema advertising and many types of place-based electronic media. Carried throughout the day by randomly selected survey participants, the PPM device can track when and where they watch television, listen to radio as well as how they interact with other forms of media and entertainment.
TM
The PPM detects inaudible codes embedded in the audio portion of media and entertainment content delivered by broadcasters, content providers and distributors. At the end of the day, the meter is placed in a docking station that extracts the codes and sends them to a central computer. The PPM is equipped with a motion sensor, a patented quality control feature unique to the system, which allows Arbitron to confirm the compliance of the PPM survey participants every day.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 2,100 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Portable People Meter and PPM are marks of Arbitron Inc.
TM
TM
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "our," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," "is scheduled to," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
 -  renew contracts with large customers as they expire;  -  successfully execute our business strategies, including implementation of our Portable People MeterTM system and entering into joint-venture or other material third-party agreements;  -  effectively manage the impact of any further consolidation in the radio and advertising agency industries;  -  keep up with rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprietary software systems and new customer products and services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  -  successfully manage the impact on our business of any economic downturn generally and in the advertising market in particular;  -  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperation in surveys, privacy concerns, consumer trends, technology changes and/or government regulations;  -  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to measure multi-media and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment; and  -  successfully obtain and/or maintain Media Rating Council accreditation for our audience measurement services.
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including, in particular, the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in Arbitron's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20070719084356.txt.gz
TIME:20070719084356
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 19, 2007, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release reporting 2007 second quarter financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated July 19, 2007.
The information in this Form 8-K and the attached Exhibit are furnished to comply with Item 2.02 and Item 9.01 of Form 8-K. Neither this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit are to be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 (except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing).
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Release
Arbitron Inc. Phone: 410-312-8410 sean.creamer@arbitron.com
Company Contact: Sean Creamer, CFO
KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215 tfromer@kcsa.com
Investor Contact: Todd Fromer
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239
Investor and Media contact: Thom Mocarsky
thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2007.
NEW YORK, July 19, 2007 
For the second quarter of 2007, the Company reported revenue of $79.0 million, an increase of 6.6 percent over revenue of $74.2 million during the second quarter of 2006.
Costs and expenses for the second quarter increased by 17.1 percent, from $67.3 million in 2006 to $78.8 million in 2007, due in part to planned expenditures for the rollout of the Portable People Meter (PPM) ratings service in Philadelphia, New York, Nassau-Suffolk, Middlesex-Somerset-Union, Los Angeles, Riverside and Chicago.
TM
Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for the quarter were $5.4 million, a decrease of 55.0 percent compared with EBIT of $11.9 million for the second quarter of 2006.
Net income for the quarter was $3.8 million, compared with $7.4 million for the second quarter of 2006. Net income per share for the second quarter of 2007 was $0.13 per share (diluted), compared with $0.24 per share (diluted) during the comparable period last year.
For the six months ended June 30, 2007, revenue was $170.8 million, an increase of 7.3 percent over revenue of $159.3 million for the same period in 2006.
EBIT decreased 26.6 percent from $41.0 million in the first six months of 2006 to $30.1 million in 2007. Net income for the period in 2007 decreased 24.5 percent to $19.3 million compared with $25.5 million in 2006. Earnings per share (diluted) for the six months in 2007 were $0.64, compared with $0.83 per share (diluted) last year.
Management comment:
Stephen Morris, chairman, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron, made the following comments:
"Since the end of the 1 quarter, we signed long term contracts for the PPM ratings service with three leading radio groups: Clear Channel, Cox Radio and Entravision Communications. These contracts, along with the agreements with more than a dozen other major broadcasters and numerous advertising agencies that we had already signed, allow us to focus all our energy on executing the rollout of the PPM ratings service in the top 50 markets."
st
"Two marketsPhiladelphia and Houstonhave already completed the switch to PPM ratings as the currency in the market. We are also well into the process of installing the PPM service in the three largest and most complex radio markets: New York, Los Angeles and Chicago, and our progress to date has been good. We are currently on schedule, but each market presents its own set of challenges. It is difficult and exacting work to recruit representative panels of consumers in these extremely diverse markets."
"For Project Apollo, our initiative with The Nielsen Company to develop new measures of advertising return-on-investment, our pilot subscribers continue to evaluate the Project Apollo value proposition in the context of their particular company's marketing needs. Our goal remains to reach a decision about implementation in the second half of the year."
Company Guidance for 2007
Arbitron is reiterating its previously issued revenue guidance for the full year 2007 and is updating the earnings per share guidance.
The Company continues to expect that revenue will increase between 5.5 percent and 7.5 percent in 2007 compared to last year.
Based on recently completed contract negotiations as well as on the Company's current experience with the recruitment and management of the PPM panels in the 2007 and 2008 rollout markets, earnings per share (diluted) is expected to be between $1.35 and $1.45 for the full year 2007. This compares to the previous estimate of $1.30 to $1.50 per fully diluted share for 2007.
Earnings conference call: schedule and access
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. ET on July 19 to discuss its second quarter results and other relevant matters. To listen to the call, dial (toll free) 888-694-4641. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing 973-582-2734. To participate users will need to use the following code: 8962786. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to, either net income, as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing information firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and out of home and online media advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has also developed the Portable People Meter system, a new technology for media and marketing research.
TM
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by its research and technology organization, located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1,900 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company (formerly VNU) Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "our," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including, in particular, the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in Arbitron's Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2006.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes expense) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20070829101120.txt.gz
TIME:20070829101120
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(d) Election of Directors: On August 24, 2007, David W. Devonshire was elected to the Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc. ("Arbitron" or "Company") to serve until the next annual meeting of stockholders of the Company, or until his earlier death, resignation, or removal. Additional information about Mr. Devonshire is included in the Companys press release issued on August 24, 2007 that is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. Mr. Devonshire was also appointed as a member of the Audit Committee and the Technology Strategy Committee of the Board of Directors of Arbitron, effective August 24, 2007. Mr. Devonshire will participate in Arbitrons previously disclosed Non-employee Director Incentive Program. In connection with joining the Arbitron Board, on August 24, 2007, Mr. Devonshire received a one-time grant of an option to purchase 15,000 shares of Arbitron common stock. These options will vest and become exercisable in thr ee equal annual installments of 5,000 shares over a three-year period beginning on the first anniversary of the date of grant and expire 10 years from the date of grant. The award is in the form of the Companys standard Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement for Initial Non-Employee Director Stock Option Grants under the Arbitron 1999 Stock Incentive Plan, filed as Exhibit 10.3 to Arbitrons Current Report on Form 8-K, dated February 23, 2005.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits See Exhibit Index attached hereto.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK; August 28, 2007 David W. Devonshire, executive vice president, Motorola, Inc., has been elected to the board of directors at Arbitron Inc. (NYSE:ARB). Mr. Devonshire brings with him 15 years of experience serving as chief financial officer of leading industrial and technology public companies.
"Technology continues to be an important component for the continued growth of Arbitron's media and marketing research business. The insights and leadership that David brings in working with technology companies will be significant assets for Arbitron," said Steve Morris, chairman, president and chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc.
Since 2002, Mr. Devonshire has been with Motorola as an executive vice president and, until April of 2007, served as chief financial officer. In addition, he currently serves as a director on the board of ArvinMeritor, Inc. and Roper Industries.
Prior to Motorola, Mr. Devonshire held the positions of executive vice president and chief financial officer at Ingersoll-Rand Company, during which time he helped facilitate numerous acquisitions, divestitures, and financings, resulting in improved cash flow. Previously, he was senior vice president and chief financial officer at Owens Corning, where he helped to grow the company from $2.8 billion in annual revenues to over $5 billion. Before this, Devonshire served as corporate vice president of finance, as well as corporate vice president and controller at Honeywell Inc. Prior to his career at Honeywell, Devonshire held several finance, planning and business development positions at The Mead Corporation, Baxter International and American Hospital Supply Corporation.
Mr. Devonshire earned a bachelor of science in accounting from Widener University, and an M.B.A. from the Kellogg School of Northwestern University.
As a member of the board of directors, Mr. Devonshire will serve on the Audit and Technology Strategy committees.
With the addition of Mr. Devonshire, the Arbitron Inc. Board of Directors consists of:
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing information firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and out of home and online media advertising companies in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has also developed the Portable People Meter system, a new technology for media and marketing research.
TM
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by its research and technology organization, located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1,900 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company (formerly VNU) Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "our," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including, in particular, the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in Arbitron's Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2006.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20070906172750.txt.gz
TIME:20070906172750
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On August 31, 2007 Stephen B. Morris, Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of Arbitron Inc. ("Arbitron" or the "Company") sent a letter to the Companys Portable People Meter customers regarding the Companys progress with its Portable People Meter service. A copy of the letter is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits The following exhibit relating to Item 7.01 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed: 99.1 Letter dated August 31, 2007
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Stephen B. Morris
Chairman, President & Chief Executive Officer Arbitron Inc. 142 West 57th Street New York, NY 10019
T
(212) 887-1414
August 31, 2007
RE: PPM Progress Report
Dear Valued PPM Client:
I want to thank you and your colleagues in the radio industry for your support of the PPM service. We understand and appreciate the concerns some of you have raised about the current status of our PPM panels in Houston-Galveston and Philadelphia. Our goal is to do a better job of communicating about areas of concern and what we are doing to address the issues. To that end, I would like to share my high-level sense of where we are, the challenges that lie ahead, several initiatives we have put into place and the recommendations from your Advisory Council.
We are not hitting our sample targets in both markets. While sample sizes in Houston and Philadelphia debuted at or close to target, the total panel size dropped over the summer as we introduced a new "tough love" panel-management approach. Instead of trying to coach panelists into better compliance over a period of several months, we now give panelists significantly less time to exhibit good compliance (e.g., take the PPM from its dock in the morning, carry it throughout the day and dock it at night), or the household is removed.
Philadelphia and Houston Panel Maintenance
As we began removing panelists at a faster pace, we were unable to recruit and install new panelists quickly enough to offset the loss. As of the July survey, we were 193 panelists short versus our average daily target of 1361 in Houston, and 179 panelists short versus our 1530 average daily target in Philadelphia. That put the July total sample index at 86 in Houston and 88 in Philadelphia.
Based on initiatives and additional dollar investments that we began earlier this summer, we fully expect to increase the panel sizes in these markets to their targets by late September/early October. We recognize that you expect us to reach our targets, and we acknowledge that our recent performance on this has fallen short.
Let me be clear about one critical point. Despite the shortfall in total in-tab, the audience data are statistically reliable, and audience trends from month to month are stable and credible. When the PPM does show differences in the ratings, clients can be confident that those differences reflect changes in programming or marketing.
The Arbitron Radio Advisory Council, led by Chairman Steve Sinicropi, has urged us to take strong steps to instill "confidence in the currency" by holding ourselves more accountable for the delivery of key metrics on PPM. We understand that you want us to have some "skin in the game" when it comes to our sample targets. Therefore, as of October 1, 2007, we will implement a PPM sample guarantee in which we will provide a deduction from your monthly bill if we fall below a minimum threshold of our 6+ Metro sample size target for the panel. We will work with the Radio Advisory Council on the details of the plan to make sure that it is meaningful.
Introducing the PPM Sample Target Guarantee
We will continue to do all we can to hit our targets, and we have put a series of initiatives into place to focus more tightly on the in-tab sample. Recognizing that research like this is both art and science, we are unlikely to be perfect each month. However, we should establish reasonable parameters and then be "on the line" to deliver. That's what this sample guarantee is all about.
A couple of weeks ago, we reissued the weekly data for July 26August 1 in Houston because of a data processing error that caused the records from approximately 200 in-tab panelists to be excluded from the data set used by our software. Unfortunately, this error was uncovered by clients rather than Arbitron's quality assurance process. This type of error is unacceptable because it diminishes the credibility of our estimates, and it was compounded by the fact that clients uncovered it instead of Arbitron. We are putting extra quality assurance procedures in place to prevent future errors and uncover potential issues before the data goes to clients.
The Houston Weekly Reissue
Sample proportionality in Philadelphia and Houston looks somewhat similar to what we see in the diary service. We are doing well with ethnic groups but poorly with young persons of all races. Young persons' sample proportionality is especially challenging in Philadelphia, where we have been making slow progress since the beginning of the year. However, we expect to make improvements more quickly over the next few months against these very difficult younger demos.
Sample Proportionality
As of today, the New York, Middlesex-Somerset-Union and Nassau-Suffolk (Long Island) panels are on track for the September 20th survey start. About half the panel has been installed in Los Angeles, Riverside-San Bernardino and Chicago, and we are pacing on plan for their January 2008 pre-currency survey start. We have begun recruiting in Dallas-Ft. Worth, San Francisco and San Jose.
Panel Builds for New York, Chicago, Los Angeles and Riverside-San Bernardino
While we have had a lot of communication with the Houston and Philadelphia broadcasters, it is clear that we have not done a good enough job of communication outside those markets. There is a lot of interest in PPM as broadcasters in the rest of the top 50 markets ready themselves for the transition. Given the uncertainties surrounding this currency change, it is important that we move forward with more transparency than ever.
Communication
The Advisory Council has been of great assistance with a number of key recommendations. Here are some of the new proactive communications events we have put into place:
PPM will be in the top ten radio markets next year. It is urgent that we all work together to communicate to media planners the need to reset GRPs/CPPs for 2008.
Marketing the GRP and CPP "Reset"
Our agency staff has been communicating frequently about this message. We are also working on a communication plan that includes advertisements in agency trade publications to alert media planners to focus now for the currency conversion. The current draft of the ad is attached.
We know that you have high expectations of PPM, considering its higher cost and the challenges associated with changing the currency. We are working very hard to train and educate your teams, and we are stepping up our communication to be more open and transparent. We are also focusing on hitting our sample targets, and the new PPM sample guarantee will make Arbitron more accountable.
Conclusions
When I joined Arbitron in 1992, I began learning about a new technology called PPM. During the ensuing years, we worked very closely with the Advisory Council and the radio industry to develop the service. Thank you for your ideas and advice along the way. We look forward to working with you to make PPM a success for the radio industry.
I will provide additional updates as we go forward. Your feedback is welcome at any time.
Warmest regards,
/s/ Steve Morris
Steve Morris


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20070912121126.txt.gz
TIME:20070912121126
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure
     On September 12, 2007 Arbitron Inc. ("Arbitron" or the "Company") will hold a conference call with its Portable People Meter ("PPM") customers regarding the Company's progress with its Portable People Meter service. The Company intends to discuss the following issues, among others, during the conference call:
     The slides to be used on the call are attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
     The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 7.01 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
Forward-Looking Statements
     This Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "our," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans" or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
 
     Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in Arbitron's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006.
     The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ARBITRON INC.

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20070918060407.txt.gz
TIME:20070918060407
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
     Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
      Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
      Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
Item 7.01. Regulation FD Disclosure
     Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") is scheduled to present at the C.L. King Best Ideas Conference to be held at the Omni Berkshire Place Hotel in New York City, New York, on Tuesday, September 18, 2007 and Wednesday, September 19, 2007. A copy of the slide show presentation to be made at the conference is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
     Steve Morris, the Company's chairman, president and chief executive officer, and Sean Creamer, the Company's chief financial officer, will provide an overview of the Company's business and financial highlights on September 18th at 10:00 a.m. ET.
     This event will be available as a live, listen-only webcast. To access the live webcast of the event, visit the Company's website at www.arbitron.com and click on investors.' The presentation will also be archived for 90 days in the investor relations section of the Company's website: www.arbitron.com.
     The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
     
Forward-Looking Statements
     This Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "our," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans" or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
 
     Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in Arbitron's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006.
     The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20071018072454.txt.gz
TIME:20071018072454
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 18, 2007, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release reporting 2007 third quarter financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated October 18, 2007.
The information in this Form 8-K and the attached Exhibit are furnished to comply with Item 2.02 and Item 9.01 of Form 8-K. Neither this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit are to be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 (except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing).
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Release
Arbitron Inc. Phone: 410-312-8410 sean.creamer@arbitron.com
Company Contact: Sean Creamer, CFO
KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215 tfromer@kcsa.com
Investor Contact: Todd Fromer
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor and Media contact: Thom Mocarsky
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2007.
NEW YORK, October 18, 2007 
For the third quarter of 2007, the Company reported revenue of $96.5 million, an increase of 6.4 percent over revenue of $90.7 million during the third quarter of 2006.
Costs and expenses for the third quarter increased by 16.4 percent, from $56.8 million in 2006 to $66.1 million in 2007, due in part to planned expenditures for the rollout of the Portable People Meter (PPM) ratings service in Philadelphia, New York, Nassau-Suffolk, Middlesex-Somerset-Union, Los Angeles, Riverside, Chicago and San Francisco.
Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for the quarter were $27.2 million, a decrease of 15.4 percent compared with EBIT of $32.1 million for the third quarter of 2006.
Net income for the quarter was $17.2 million, compared with $20.2 million for the third quarter of 2006. Net income per share for the third quarter of 2007 was $0.58 per share (diluted), compared with $0.69 per share (diluted) during the comparable period last year.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2007, revenue was $267.3 million, an increase of 6.9 percent over revenue of $250.0 million for the same period in 2006.
EBIT decreased 21.7 percent from $73.1 million in the first nine months of 2006 to $57.2 million in 2007. Net income for the period in 2007 decreased 20.2 percent to $36.5 million compared with $45.7 million in 2006. Earnings per share (diluted) for the nine months in 2007 were $1.21, compared with $1.51 per share (diluted) last year.
Management comment:
Stephen Morris, chairman, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron, made the following comments:
"While the PPM commercialization is both complex and challenging, we have been able to stay on track with our ambitious market-by-market rollout schedule for the Portable People Meter ratings service. On September 20, we launched the pre-currency' survey period in New York and the embedded radio markets of Nassau-Suffolk and Middlesex-Somerset-Union. These three markets are scheduled to convert to Portable People Meter as full currency' on December 31."
"At the same time, we are recruiting consumers for Los Angeles, Riverside, Chicago, San Francisco and San Jose. While this has been logistically demanding, especially because each market has its own unique characteristics, we're committed to converting these markets as scheduled."
"For Project Apollo, we announced last week that we are extending the pilot evaluation period into the first quarter of 2008. This extension has the full support of our seven pilot subscribers. The additional time will be used to address a number of specific efforts aimed at helping the members of the Project Apollo Steering Committee build the strongest possible business case for the commercialization of the proposed single-source marketing information service," said Mr. Morris.
Company Guidance for 2007
Arbitron is reiterating the revenue and earnings per share guidance for the full year 2007, which was provided by the Company on July 19, 2007.
The Company continues to expect that revenue will increase between 5.5 percent and 7.5 percent in 2007 compared to last year. Earnings per share (diluted) are expected to be between $1.35 and $1.45 for the full year 2007.
Earnings conference call: schedule and access
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. ET on October 18 to discuss its third quarter results and other relevant matters. To listen to the call, dial (toll free) 888-694-4641. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing 973-582-2734. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 9307832. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to, either net income, as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing information firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and out of home and online media advertising companies in the United States and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has also developed the Portable People Meter system, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by its research and technology organization, located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 2,100 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company (formerly VNU) Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "our," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including, in particular, the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in Arbitron's Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2006.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20071109120945.txt.gz
TIME:20071109120945
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure
     On November 9, 2007 Arbitron Inc. ("Arbitron" or the "Company") will hold a conference call with its Portable People Meter ("PPM") customers regarding the Company's progress with its Portable People Meter service. The Company intends to discuss the following issues, among others, during the conference call:
     The slides to be used on the call are attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
     The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
     (d) Exhibits
     The following exhibit relating to Item 7.01 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
Forward-Looking Statements
     This Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "our," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans" or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
     Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in Arbitron's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006.
     The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20071115165816.txt.gz
TIME:20071115165816
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On November 15, 2007 Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release announcing that its Board of Directors has authorized a stock repurchase program under which the Company may buy back up to $200 million in shares of the Company's common stock over a period of up to two years. A copy of the press release is attached as exhibit 99.1 to this current report on form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits The following exhibit relating to Item 7.01 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed: 99.1 Press release of Arbitron Inc. dated November 15, 2007 Forward-Looking Statements This Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "our," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans" or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:  successfully implement the rollout of our Portable People MeterTM service;  renew contracts with large customers as they expire;  successfully execute our business strategies, including entering into potential acquisition, joint-venture or other material third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact of any further ownership shifts in the radio and advertising agency industries;  respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprietary software systems and new customer products and services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully manage the impact on our business of any economic downturn generally and in the advertising market in particular;  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperati on in surveys, privacy concerns, consumer trends, technology changes and/or government regulations;  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to measure multi-media and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment; and  successfully obtain and/or maintain Media Rating Council accreditation for our audience measurement services. Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitrons filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in Arbitrons Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006. The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, wheth er as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

PRESS
INFORMATION
Company Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 212-887-1314
thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor Relations Contact: Todd Fromer KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215
tfromer@kcsa.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced that its Board of Directors has authorized a stock repurchase program under which the Company may buy back up to $200 million in shares of the Company's common stock. The Company expects that the shares may be purchased from time to time in either open market or private transactions, in accordance with applicable insider trading and other securities laws and regulations, at then-prevailing market prices over a period of up to two years.
NEW YORK, November 15, 2007 
The exact timing and amount of purchases will depend on market conditions. No assurance can be given as to when during the authorized period any shares will be repurchased or as to whether and to what extent any share repurchase will be consummated.
As of October 31, 2007 the Company had approximately 28,232,700 shares outstanding
In the third quarter of 2007, Arbitron completed a previously authorized $100 million stock repurchase program.
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies, outdoor advertising companies and the online radio ratings industry in the United States, Mexico and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has also developed the Portable People Meter system, a new technology for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
TM
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by its research and technology organization, located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 2,100 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with VNU, Inc., Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, magazine, newspaper and online industries.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "our," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including, in particular, the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in Arbitron's Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2006.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20071126165636.txt.gz
TIME:20071126165636
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On November 26, 2007, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release announcing that it will delay the commercialization of its Portable People Meter radio ratings service in nine markets. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Item 7.01 (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On November 26, 2007, the Company announced that it will delay the commercialization of its Portable People Meter radio ratings service in nine markets. New York, NassauSuffolk and MiddlesexSomersetUnion will be delayed by nine months; Los Angeles, Riverside and Chicago by six months; and San Francisco, San Jose and Dallas by three months. In these nine markets, the Company will extend the use of the paper and pencil diary system that has been serving the industry since 1965. During the delay, Arbitron will continue to work with customers, the Media Rating Council, other industry organizations and community groups on the research and business issues related to the Portable People Meter radio ratings service in local markets. Revised Portable People Meter Rollout Schedule First survey month of "currency" PPM data for buy/sell transactions Market.....................................New schedule.........Former Schedule New York...................... .........September 2008.......December 2007 Nassau-Suffolk......................September 2008.......December 2007 Middlesex-Somerset-Union...September 2008.......December 2007 Los Angeles...........................September 2008.........March 2008 Riverside.................................September 2008.......March 2008 Chicago...................................September 2008........March 2008 San Francisco........................September 2008.........June 2008 San Jose..................................September 2008.........June 2008 Dallas......................................December 2008...........September 2008 Arbitron intends to introduce the Portable People Meter service in Atlanta, Detroit, Washington D.C. and in subsequent markets, as originally scheduled. The ratings for the September 2008 PPM survey month (August 21  September 17) are scheduled to be delivered to customers on October 8, 2008. The first "currency" survey month in Los Angeles, Rivers ide, Chicago, San Francisco and San Jose will be preceded by two "pre-currency" monthly PPM reports in July and August. In Dallas, the two "pre-currency" months will be October and November 2008. The first "currency" month in Dallas will be the December PPM survey month (November 13  December 10) which is currently scheduled to be released on December 31, 2008. New York, Nassau-Suffolk and Middlesex-Somerset-Union "pre-currency" data will continue to be released through August 2008 but only as monthly reports for research and evaluation purposes, and not in a format that can be used by software systems that have a scheduler module which is used for the buying and selling of radio station advertising. This decision does not impact the Portable People Meter radio ratings services currently in operation in Houston and Philadelphia. Monthly and weekly ratings reports based on the currently installed PPM panels in these two markets will continue to be issued to radio stations, agencies an d advertisers as scheduled for their use in the buying and selling of radio station advertising.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits The following exhibit relating to Item 7.01 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed: 99.1 Press release of Arbitron Inc. dated November 26, 2007 Forward-Looking Statements This Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "our," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans" or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:  successfully implement the rollout of our Portable People MeterTM service;  renew contracts with large customers as they expire;  successfully execute our business strategies, including entering into potential acquisition, joint-venture or other material third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact of any further ownership shifts in the radio and advertising agency industries;  respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprietary software systems and new customer products and services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully manage the impact on our business of any economic downturn generally and in the advertising market in particular;  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperati on in surveys, privacy concerns, consumer trends, technology changes and/or government regulations;  successfully design, recruit, and maintain PPM panels that appropriately balance research quality, panel size and operational cost;  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to measure multi-media and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment; and  successfully obtain and/or maintain Media Rating Council accreditation for our audience measurement services. Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitrons filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in Arbitrons Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006. The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Contact: Thom Mocarsky
Arbitron Inc.
410-312-8239
thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK; November 26, 2007  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that it will delay the commercialization of its Portable People Meter (PPM) radio ratings service in nine markets. New York, NassauSuffolk and MiddlesexSomersetUnion will be delayed by nine months; Los Angeles, Riverside and Chicago by six months; and San Francisco, San Jose and Dallas by three months.
In these nine markets, the Company will extend the use of the paper and pencil diary system that has been serving the industry since 1965. During the delay, Arbitron will continue to work with customers, the Media Rating Council, other industry organizations and community groups on the research and business issues related to the Portable People Meter radio ratings service in local markets.
"We remain confident in the audience estimates that the Portable People Meter service is producing. However, over the past three weeks, feedback from our customers, the Media Rating Council and other constituencies has led us to conclude that the radio industry would be better served if we were to delay further commercialization of the PPM in order to address their issues," said Steve Morris, chairman, president and chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc.
"We already have a number of initiatives in the pipeline for implementation in the first quarter of 2008 that we believe will improve the performance of our PPM samples. Our intention is to expand significantly this list of improvement initiatives by working closely with customers, industry organizations and community groups. We expect that the Media Rating Council will be a particularly valuable source of guidance and advice on the more technically oriented aspects of this review and improvement process and we intend to work closely with the members of the MRC over the next several months," said Mr. Morris.
"We also plan to use the additional time to work closely with community leaders to review the workings of the Portable People Meter service and to gather their insights as to how we might improve compliance among persons 18-34, including ethnic young adults, across the diverse communities of New York, Los Angeles, Chicago and subsequent markets," said Mr. Morris.
Arbitron intends to introduce the Portable People Meter service in Atlanta, Detroit, Washington D.C. and in subsequent markets, as originally scheduled.
The ratings for the September 2008 PPM survey month (August 21  September 17) are scheduled to be delivered to customers on October 8, 2008. The first "currency" survey month in Los Angeles, Riverside, Chicago, San Francisco and San Jose will be preceded by two "pre-currency" monthly PPM reports in July and August. In Dallas, the two "pre-currency" months will be October and November 2008. The first "currency" month in Dallas will be the December PPM survey month (November 13  December 10) scheduled to be released on December 31, 2008.
New York, Nassau-Suffolk and Middlesex-Somerset-Union "pre-currency" data will continue to be released through August 2008 but only as monthly reports for research and evaluation purposes, and not in a format that can be used by software systems that have a scheduler module which is used for the buying and selling of radio station advertising.
This decision does not impact the Portable People Meter radio ratings services currently in operation in Houston and Philadelphia. Monthly and weekly ratings reports based on the currently installed PPM panels in these two markets will continue to be issued to radio stations, agencies and advertisers as scheduled for their use in the buying and selling of radio station advertising.
As a result of its decision to delay further implementation of the Portable People Meter service, the Company is updating its previously issued guidance to reflect the resultant financial impact. Earnings per share (diluted) for 2007 are currently estimated to be between $1.30 and $1.35 as compared to its previously issued earnings per share guidance of $1.35 to $1.45.
Revised Financial Guidance for 2007 and Outlook for 2008
In addition, the Company currently estimates the impact of foregone revenue and additional costs required to produce diary estimates in the affected markets will reduce 2008 earnings by $0.22 to $0.33 per share (diluted). Consistent with past practices, detailed annual revenue and earnings per share guidance will be provided in conjunction with our fourth quarter 2007 earnings release expected to be issued in February 2008.
Conference call: schedule and access
Arbitron will host a conference call at 9:00 a.m. ET on Tuesday, November 27 to discuss the revision to the Portable People Meter rollout schedule and other relevant matters. To listen to the call, dial (toll free) 888-694-4641. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing 973-582-2734. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 9500497. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 2,100 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Media Rating Council and the "double checkmark" logo design are registered marks of the Media Rating Council.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "our," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including, in particular, the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in Arbitron's Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2006.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20071205151254.txt.gz
TIME:20071205151254
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On December 5, 2007, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release announcing that it will narrow its Portable People Meter (PPM) sample size guarantee to cover Persons aged 18 to 54 at 80 percent of the companys published target for each monthly report in a PPM market. The Persons 18-54 guarantee will replace the companys previously announced PPM sample size guarantee of Persons age 6 and older at 90 percent of the companys published target for each monthly report in a PPM market. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Item 7.01 (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as exp ressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits The following exhibit relating to Item 7.01 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed: 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated December 5, 2007 Forward-Looking Statements This Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "our," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans" or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such f orward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:  successfully implement the rollout of our Portable People MeterTM service;  renew contracts with large customers as they expire;  successfully execute our business strategies, including entering into potential acquisition, joint-venture or other material third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact of any further ownership shifts in the radio and advertising agency industries;  respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprietary software systems and new customer products and services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully manage the impact on our business of any economic downturn generally and in the advertising market in particular;  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperatio n in surveys, privacy concerns, consumer trends, technology changes and/or government regulations;  successfully design, recruit, and maintain PPM panels that appropriately balance research quality, panel size and operational cost;  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to measure multi-media and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment; and  successfully obtain and/or maintain Media Rating Council accreditation for our audience measurement services. Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitrons filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including in particular the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in Arbitrons Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006. The forward-looking statements contained in t his document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Contact: Thom Mocarsky
Arbitron Inc.
410-312-8239
thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK; December 5, 2007  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that it will narrow its Portable People Meter (PPM) sample size guarantee to cover Persons aged 18 to 54 at 80 percent of the company's published target for each monthly report in a PPM market. The Persons 18-54 guarantee will replace the company's previously announced PPM sample size guarantee of Persons age 6+ and older at 90 percent of the company's published target for each monthly report in a PPM market.
"The Arbitron Radio Advisory Council has recommended that we narrow the guardrails of our current PPM sample guarantee to Persons 18-54. We have considered the Council's recommendation and believe that a Persons 18-54 guarantee is an appropriate next step in our efforts to enhance the quality of our PPM services," said Steve Morris, chairman, president and chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc.
"Meeting sample targets is an integral part of our effort to instill greater confidence in the currency and we hold ourselves accountable for doing so," said Mr. Morris. "The revised guarantee is keyed to Persons 18-54, where most radio selling is focused. If we meet our targets, there will be no need for rebates. We feel confident that we can meet these targets on the schedule provided in the new sample guarantee program."
In Houston and Philadelphia, the two markets in which PPM has already been commercialized, the Persons 18-54 sample size guarantee will take effect with the release of the December 2007 PPM survey month (November 13  December 10, 2007) which is scheduled to be delivered to clients on December 31, 2007.
When and how the new PPM sample size guarantee will take effect
In future PPM markets, the Persons 18-54 sample size guarantee will take effect with the release of the third "currency" PPM survey month.
According to the revised commercialization schedule announced on November 26, the next round of PPM markets will be commercialized with the release of the September PPM survey month (August 21  September 17, 2008), which is scheduled to be delivered to clients on October 8, 2008.
In these markets, the third PPM currency month under the revised schedule would be November (October 16  November 12, 2008), which is scheduled to be delivered to clients on December 3, 2008. The markets that are scheduled to commercialize with the release of the September PPM survey month are New York, NassauSuffolk, MiddlesexSomersetUnion, Los Angeles, Riverside, Chicago, San Francisco and San Jose.
Under the terms of this program, Arbitron will rebate to its PPM customers an aggregate amount equal to the product of (i) one percent of the net license fee actually paid by the customer for PPM radio ratings in a market for a monthly survey period in which the company's delivered average daily in-tab among Persons aged 18-54 falls below the 80 percent threshold, multiplied by (ii) the number of percentage points by which the Company's delivered average daily in-tab in such market among Persons aged 18-54 falls below the 80 percent threshold during the applicable monthly survey period. The rebate will be credited in the last invoice of the calendar year.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron has approximately 1,900 employees; its executive offices are located in New York City.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "our," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including, in particular, the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in Arbitron's Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2006.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20080129171207.txt.gz
TIME:20080129171207
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(e) On January 23, 2008, the Compensation and Human Resources Committee (the "Committee") of the Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") met and approved a non-equity incentive plan for the Companys executive officers for 2008, which would be payable in early 2009 (the "Incentive Plan"). The Incentive Plan provides for an annual cash payment that is performance linked based upon the Companys earnings per share (weighted 30%), revenue (weighted 10%), and commercialization of its Portable People MeterTM based radio ratings service (weighted 60%). The Incentive Plan provides for a target cash payment for each executive officer, expressed as a percentage of base salary. The target Incentive Plan payment for Stephen B. Morris, the Companys Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer is equal to 75% of base salary. The target Incentive Plan payments for other executive officers range from 45-55% of base salary. The Committee has discretion to authorize a gr eater or lesser amount in the event the 2008 goals are exceeded or are not met. In the event that the 2008 goals are achieved, the Committee also has discretion to award additional amounts based upon its evaluation of a combination of other quantitative and qualitative considerations, including stock price and achievement of fundamental organizational change, as determined by the Committee.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20080214082026.txt.gz
TIME:20080214082026
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 14, 2008, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release reporting 2007 fourth quarter and year end financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated February 14, 2008.
The information in this Form 8-K and the attached Exhibit are furnished to comply with Item 2.02 and Item 9.01 of Form 8-K. Neither this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit are to be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 (except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing).
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Arbitron Inc. Phone: 410-312-8410 sean.creamer@arbitron.com
Company Contact: Sean Creamer, CFO
KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215 tfromer@kcsa.com
Investor Contact: Todd Fromer
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor and Media contact: Thom Mocarsky
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2007.
NEW YORK, February 14, 2008 
On January 31, 2008, Arbitron concluded the sale of Continental Research ("Continental"), its UK-based custom research business. As a result, Continental's financial results have been reclassified as a Discontinued Operation for all periods presented. In 2007, Continental Research generated revenue of $13.6 million and a net loss of $0.3 million. During the fourth quarter of 2007, Continental generated a net loss of $0.5 million on revenues of $4.6 million.
Net income for the quarter was $3.7 million, or $0.13 per share (diluted), compared with $4.9 million, or $0.17 per share (diluted), for the fourth quarter of 2006. For the year, net income decreased 20.7 percent to $40.2 million compared with $50.7 million in 2006. Earnings per share (diluted) in 2007 were $1.35, compared with $1.68 per share (diluted) last year. Increased costs and expenses for both the quarter and full year were due to planned expenditures for Portable People Meter (PPM) ratings service panel builds.
TM
Results from Continuing Operations
For the fourth quarter 2007, the Company reported revenue from continuing operations  excluding Continental  of $80.1 million, an increase of 5.4 percent over revenue of $76.0 million during the fourth quarter of 2006.
Costs and expenses for the fourth quarter increased by 10.6 percent, from $72.3 million in 2006 to $79.9 million in 2007, due, as noted, to planned expenditures for the Portable People Meter (PPM) ratings service panel builds in New York, NassauSuffolk, MiddlesexSomersetUnion, Los Angeles, Riverside, Chicago, San Francisco and San Jose.
TM
Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for the quarter were $6.2 million, a decrease of 41.7 percent compared with EBIT of $10.7 million for the fourth quarter of 2006. Interest expense for the quarter declined to $0.4 million from $3.2 million in 2006 due primarily to the early retirement of a $50 million outstanding senior secured note in October 2006.
Income from continuing operations for the quarter was $4.1 million or $0.14 per share (diluted), compared with $4.7 million, or $0.16 per share (diluted) in the fourth quarter of 2006.
For the year ended December 31, 2007, revenue from continuing operations was $338.5 million, an increase of 6.0 percent over revenue of $319.3 million for 2006.
A planned increase in expenses for the Portable People Meter radio ratings panel builds in Philadelphia, New York, NassauSuffolk MiddlesexSomersetUnion, Los Angeles, Riverside, Chicago, San Francisco and San Jose contributed to an increase in costs and expenses for the year of 14.7 percent, from $243.4 million in 2006 to $279.2 million in 2007. Non-cash equity compensation in both 2007 and 2006 was $6.5 million.
Equity in net income of affiliates for 2007 declined 47.6 percent, from $7.7 million in 2006 to $4.1 million in 2007 due to the formation of the Project Apollo LLC in the first quarter of 2007.
EBIT decreased 24.3 percent from $83.7 million in 2006 to $63.3 million in 2007. Interest expense for the year declined to $0.7 million from $6.1 million in 2006, again largely the result of the 2006 early retirement of the then outstanding senior note.
Income from continuing operations for 2007 decreased to $40.5 million or $1.37 per share (diluted) from $50.3 million or $1.67 per share (diluted), in 2006.
Management comment on 2007 results
Stephen Morris, chairman, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron, made the following comments on 2007 results: "In 2007, we began the commercialization of the Portable People Meter ratings system, launching the PPM radio ratings services in Philadelphia in March and in Houston in July. However, in November, responding to feedback from our customers, the Media Rating Council and other constituencies, we elected to delay the scheduled December 2007 commercialization of the PPM system in New York and also delay commercialization in eight other markets by up to nine months."
"While we are disappointed by the delay, our core radio ratings business remains successful and profitable and our basic business model is intact. We fully expect to execute successfully our long-term plans to bring electronic measurement to radio and help the industry prosper in this highly competitive media environment."
"We continued to pay close attention to our capital structure throughout 2007. We bought back $100 million of our stock and returned additional capital to our shareholders through quarterly dividends. Also, in the fourth quarter of 2007, our Board of Directors authorized a new stock repurchase program of up to $200 million over a two-year period. As before, our goal in managing our capital is to strike the appropriate balance between continued investment in PPM initiatives and our core business while returning capital to shareholders, and remaining open to appropriate opportunities for strategic deployment of capital."
Company Guidance for 2008
For the full year 2008, Arbitron expects revenue to increase between 8 percent and 10 percent compared to last year's revenue from continuing operations. (For comparability purposes, this guidance excludes Continental's 2007 revenue.)
Earnings per share (diluted) for the full year 2008 is expected to be between $1.42 and $1.56 versus $1.37 in 2007 for continuing operations.
The earnings per share guidance for 2008 includes approximately $1.6 million in costs associated with extending the Project Apollo pilot into the first quarter. In 2007, costs associated with Project Apollo totaled $6.9 million.
Arbitron intends to provide additional information on the financial impact of a "go" or "no-go" outcome for Project Apollo when that decision is made. This guidance does not contemplate any expenditure that would be incurred either to commercialize the service beginning in 2008 or to close down the pilot panel.
Earnings conference call: schedule and access
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time. The Company invites you to listen to the call by dialing (toll free) 888-873-8496. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing 973-935-8513. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 29933133. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to, either income from continuing operations, as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Its executive offices are located in New York City.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "our," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including, in particular, the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in Arbitron's Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2006.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes expense) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
Certain per share amounts may not total due to rounding.
(2) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes expense) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
Certain per share amounts may not total due to rounding.
(3) Arbitron's management believes that presenting EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization), both non-GAAP financial measures, as supplemental information helps investors, analysts, and others, if they so choose, in understanding and evaluating Arbitron's operating performance in some of the same manners that management does because EBIT and EBITDA exclude certain items that are not directly related to Arbitron's core operating performance. Arbitron's management references these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing current performance and making decisions about internal budgets, resource allocation and financial goals. EBIT is calculated by deducting net interest income from income from continuing operations and adding back income tax expense to income from continuing operations. EBITDA is calculated by deducting net interest income from income from continuing operations and adding back income tax expense, and depreciation and amortization to income from continuing operations. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered substitutes either for income from continuing operations, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20080225070758.txt.gz
TIME:20080225070758
EVENTS:	Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.02 Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement.
On February 25, 2008 Arbitron Inc. ("Arbitron") announced that Arbitron and Nielsen Media Research, Inc., an affiliate of The Nielsen Company ("Nielsen"), as sole members, had agreed to the termination of Project Apollo, LLC ("Project Apollo"). The agreement to terminate Project Apollo was reached on February 19, 2008, following an evaluation by the members of the client commitments that had been secured. The members have agreed that the winding down of the business and liquidation of the net assets of Project Apollo will occur during the next several months. Project Apollo was formed to explore the commercialization of a national marketing research service created by Arbitron and Nielsen with the objective of providing multimedia exposure data combined with sales data from a single source to produce a measure of advertising effectiveness. From April 2005, Arbitron and Nielsen shared costs and capital expenditures associated with Project Apollo. ACNielsen (US) Inc., an affiliate of Nielsen, had entered int o an agreement with Project Apollo to permit Project Apollo to use its Homescan Panel and certain other data and recruit panelists, tabulate data, and provide related services. Arbitron had entered into an agreement with Project Apollo under which Arbitron licensed to Project Apollo its Portable People MeterTM technology and equipment and provided other data collection and transmission services. Each of these agreements will terminate as a result of the termination of Project Apollo. Because of the mutual decision to terminate Project Apollo, neither party will incur early termination penalties. Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with Nielsen, Arbitron provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, cable, newspaper, and online industries.
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
The disclosure under Item 1.02 above is incorporated into this Item 7.01 by reference. A copy of the press release announcing the termination of Project Apollo is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, and is incorporated herein by reference. On February 25, 2008 Arbitron issued a press release announcing that it will hold a conference call on Tuesday, February 26, 2008 at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time to discuss the financial implications of the termination of Project Apollo and to provide updated 2008 financial guidance. A copy of the press release announcing the conference call is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits 99.1 Press Release entitled "Arbitron and Nielsen Terminate Project Apollo" issued by the Company and Nielsen on February 25, 2008. 99.2 Press Release entitled "Arbitron Inc. To Hold Investor Conference Call on February 26, 2008 at 10:00am ET" issued by the Company on February 25, 2008.
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Arbitron Inc. (NYSE:ARB) and The Nielsen Company announced today that the two companies have terminated the development of "Project Apollo," the proposed single-source, national research service.  The two companies had been working on the pilot project since early in 2005.  The announcement was made by Susan D. Whiting, executive vice president of The Nielsen Company, and by Steve Morris, chairman, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron Inc.
NEW YORK, February 25, 2008
"Despite a promising level of interest, we did not secure sufficient client commitments to make Project Apollo a sustainable venture for our two companies," Arbitron and Nielsen said in a joint statement.
"We are grateful to the companies, consultants and to the marketing and advertising agency executives of the seven Project Apollo Steering Committee members who helped us explore the cutting edge of media and marketing research," the statement continued.
 Said Steve Morris: "Everyone recognized from the outset what an ambitious effort we were undertaking:  harness the best in modern research technology and methodology to see if we could finally fulfill the promise of a single-source media and marketing research service."
Said Susan Whiting: "We have learned a great deal from Project Apollo,' and I am confident that this work will enable us to provide even higher levels of quality service to our clients."
About Project Apollo'
"Project Apollo" was designed to be a single-source, national  market  research service based on  Nielsen's Homescan technology for measuring consumer purchase behavior, combined with Arbitron's Portable People Meter
TM
system, measuring electronic media exposure .  In January 2006, The Nielsen Company and Arbitron Inc. completed the deployment of a national pilot panel of more than 11,000 persons in 5,000 households. The pilot panel was intended to show advertisers how Project Apollo' might enable a better understanding of the link between consumer exposure to advertising  in multiple media and their shopping/purchase behavior.
Seven advertisers signed on as members of the "Project Apollo" Steering Committee.  The Committee worked with Arbitron and Nielsen to evaluate the utility of multi-media and purchase information from a common sample of consumers.
(Continued...)
Page 2  Arbitron and Nielsen Terminate Project Apollo'
Individuals within the sample were given incentives to voluntarily carry Arbitron's Portable People Meter
TM
, a small, pager-sized device that collects the person's exposure to electronic media sources: broadcast television networks, cable networks, and network radio as well as audio-based commercials broadcast on these platforms.  Consumer exposure to other media such as newspapers, magazines and circulars were collected through additional survey instruments.
Information on consumer preference and purchases for a wide range of services and products were collected from panelists, via ACNielsen's Homescan technology, which tracks packaged goods purchases. Data were then collected in aggregate to provide a more complete understanding of participants' media interactions and their resulting shopping and purchase behavior.
About The Nielsen Company
The Nielsen Company is a global information and media company with leading market positions in marketing information (ACNielsen), media information (Nielsen Media Research), online intelligence (NetRatings and BuzzMetrics), mobile measurement, trade shows and business publications The privately held company is active in more than 100 countries, with headquarters in Haarlem, the Netherlands, and New York, USA. For more information, please visit .
(Billboard, The Hollywood Reporter, Adweek).
www.nielsen.com
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving radio broadcasters, cable companies, advertisers, advertising agencies and outdoor advertising companies in the United States. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research. 
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron also provides media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, cable, newspaper and online industries.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Its executive offices are located in New York City.
Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Contacts:
Jack Loftus The Nielsen Company 646-654-8360
Jack.Loftus@Nielsen.com
Page 3  Arbitron and Nielsen Terminate Project Apollo'
     
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Note from Arbitron Inc. Regarding Forward-Looking Statements:
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes" or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements are identified and discussed from time to time in our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including, in particular, the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2006.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.

Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239
thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced that it will hold a conference call on Tuesday, February 26, 2008 at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time to discuss the financial implications of the termination of "Project Apollo" and to provide updated 2008 financial guidance.
NEW YORK, February 25, 2008 
The Company invites you to listen to the call by dialing (toll free) (888) 868-9083. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing (973) 935-8512. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 36430989. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
A replay of the call will be available from 12:00 p.m. on February 26 through 11:59 p.m. on March 03, 2008. To access the replay, please call (toll free) 800-642-1687 in the United States, or (706) 645-9291 outside of the United States. To access the replay, users will need to enter the following code: 36430989.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States and Europe. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by its research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Its executive offices are located in New York City.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20080226071120.txt.gz
TIME:20080226071120
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On February 26, 2008, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release announcing updated financial guidance for 2008, following the Company's announcement of the termination of "Project Apollo," the proposed single-source, national research service the Company had been developing with The Nielsen Company. A copy of the text of the Companys press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits 99.1 Press Release entitled "Arbitron Updates Financial Guidance for 2008" issued by the Company on February 26, 2008.
The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB), in a joint release with The Nielsen Company, yesterday announced the termination of "Project Apollo," the proposed single-source, national research service. Arbitron and Nielsen had been working on the pilot project since early in 2005. 
NEW YORK, February 26, 2008 
Taking into account the termination of the Project Apollo' effort and a further review of the company's business operations, Arbitron is updating its financial guidance for the full year 2008, which was provided in its fourth quarter 2007 earnings release and conference call.
On February 14, 2008, the company issued full year 2008 revenue growth guidance of 8 percent to 10 percent and earnings per share guidance expectations between $1.42 and $1.56. At that time, it was noted that the earnings per share guidance excluded the impact of any incremental costs associated with shutting down or commercializing Project Apollo. At the same time, the Company also noted that the outcome of the commercialization decision would result in additional costs of between $4 million and $10 million, with the low end representing a shutdown of the panel and the high end representing a full commercialization scenario.
Arbitron continues to expect revenue for the full year 2008 to increase between 8 percent and 10 percent compared to last year's revenue from continuing operations. (This revenue guidance excludes 2007 revenue from Continental Research, which was sold in January 2008 and has been classified as a Discontinued Operation effective with the fourth quarter 2007.)
Earnings per share (diluted) for the full year 2008 is now expected to be between $1.30 and $1.44 versus $1.35 in 2007. Earnings per share (diluted) from continuing operations in 2007 was $1.37.
The initial earnings per share guidance for 2008 included only costs associated with operating the Project Apollo pilot into the first quarter and represented approximately $0.04 per diluted share. The incremental $0.12 included in the guidance issued today brings the total 2008 estimated costs to $0.16 per diluted share, roughly flat with 2007.
In 2007, costs associated with Project Apollo totaled $6.9 million.
Arbitron will hold a conference call on Tuesday, February 26, 2008 at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time to discuss the financial implications of the termination of "Project Apollo."
Conference call: schedule and access
The Company invites you to listen to the call by dialing (toll free) (888) 868-9083. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing (973) 935-8512. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 36430989. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
A replay of the call will be available from 12:00 p.m. on February 26 through 11:59 p.m. on March 03, 2008. To access the replay, please call (toll free) 800-642-1687 in the United States, or (706) 645-9291 outside of the United States. To access the replay, users will need to enter the following code: 36430989.
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Its executive offices are located in New York City.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "our," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which Arbitron has derived from information currently available to it. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
Additional important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements are identified and discussed from time to time in Arbitron's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including, in particular, the risk factors discussed under the caption "ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS" in Arbitron's Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2006.
The forward-looking statements contained in this document speak only as of the date hereof, and Arbitron undertakes no obligation to correct or update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20080311093955.txt.gz
TIME:20080311093955
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
     Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
      Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
      Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
Item 7.01. Regulation FD Disclosure
     Arbitron Inc. is scheduled to present at the Bear Stearns 21 Annual Media Conference to be held at The Breakers Hotel in Palm Beach, Florida, on Tuesday, March 11, 2008. A copy of the slide show presentation to be made at the conference is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
st
     The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
     (c) Exhibits.
          The following exhibit relating to Item 7.01 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
          99.1 Slide Show Presentation of Arbitron Inc.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20080422080127.txt.gz
TIME:20080422080127
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 22, 2008, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release reporting 2008 first quarter financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated April 22, 2008.
The information in this Form 8-K and the attached Exhibit are furnished to comply with Item 2.02 and Item 9.01 of Form 8-K. Neither this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit are to be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 (except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing).
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Arbitron Inc. Phone: 410-312-8410 sean.creamer@arbitron.com
Company Contact: Sean Creamer, CFO
KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215 tfromer@kcsa.com
Investor Contact: Todd Fromer
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor and Media contact: Thom Mocarsky
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2008.
NEW YORK, April 22, 2008 
Net income for the quarter was $16.3 million, or $0.57 per share (diluted), compared with $15.5 million, or $0.52 per share (diluted), for the first quarter of 2007.
For the first quarter of 2008, the Company reported revenues of $94.1 million, an increase of 5.5 percent over revenue of $89.1 million during the first quarter of 2007.
Results from Continuing Operations
Costs and expenses for the first quarter increased by 4.4 percent, from $60.6 million in 2007 to $63.3 million in 2008, due to planned expenditures for the Portable People Meter (PPM) ratings panels in New York, NassauSuffolk, MiddlesexSomersetUnion, Los Angeles, RiversideSan Bernardino, Chicago, San Francisco, San Jose, DallasFt. Worth and Detroit. In the first quarter of 2008, share-based compensation amounted to $1.6 million, up from $1.3 million in the first quarter of 2007.
TM
Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for the quarter were $26.8 million, an increase of 8.3 percent compared with EBIT of $24.7 million for the first quarter of 2007.
Income from continuing operations for the quarter was $16.3 million or $0.58 per share (diluted), compared with $15.5 million, or $0.52 per share (diluted) in the first quarter of 2007.
Results from Discontinued Operations
On January 31, 2008, Arbitron concluded the sale of CSW Research Limited ("Continental"), its UK-based custom research business. As a result, Continental's financial results have been reclassified as a Discontinued Operation for all periods presented. In the first quarter of 2008, Continental generated a net loss from operations of $495 thousand for the period up through the closing of the transaction and a net gain from the sale of $450 thousand. During the first quarter of 2007, Continental generated a net loss of $31 thousand.
Stephen Morris, chairman, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron, made the following comments regarding the first quarter 2008: "Arbitron made solid progress in the first quarter toward our financial goals for 2008 and continued our ongoing efforts to optimize our capital structure, all as we worked toward further commercialization of the Portable People Meter ratings service."
Management comment on first quarter 2008 results
"Five months have passed since we announced a pause in the commercialization of the PPM service to address issues raised by our customers, the Media Rating Council
and other constituencies. Throughout the first quarter, we worked hard to improve the important measures that our clients have told us are crucial to their confidence in the PPM ratings currency."
"I am encouraged by the results of our efforts. Arbitron has met or surpassed many of the benchmarks we established with our customers for sample size, sample quality, and in-tab rates. The Persons 18-34 sample among all ethnicities has been strengthened significantly."
"I am also encouraged by the public expressions of confidence we have been seeing from radio executives about the value of the PPM service for programming and sales."
"In particular, executives from radio groups serving urban audiences have gone on record during our regular client calls and in the trade press regarding the ratings success they are achieving using our PPM services. While there is work still to be done, I can point to evidence of solid progress on many fronts."
For the full year 2008, Arbitron continues to expect revenue to increase between 8 percent and 10 percent compared to last year's revenue from continuing operations. (For comparability purposes, this guidance excludes Continental's 2007 revenue.)
Company Reiterates Guidance for 2008
Earnings per share from continuing operations (diluted) is still expected to be between $1.30 and $1.44 for the full year 2008 as compared to earnings per share from continuing operations (diluted) of $1.37 in 2007. The earnings per share guidance for 2008 includes the impact of Project Apollo shutdown costs that the Company announced on February 26, 2008.
Arbitron will host a conference call today at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time. The Company invites you to listen to the call by dialing (toll free) 888-868-9083. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing 973-935-8512. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 41432515. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
Earnings conference call: schedule and access
A replay of the call will be available from 12:00 p.m. on April 22 through 11:59 p.m. on April 29, 2008. To access the replay, please call (toll free) 800-642-1687 in the United States or 706-645-9291 outside of the United States. To access the replay, users will need to enter the following code: 41432515.
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to, either income from continuing operations, as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Its executive offices are located in New York City.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "our," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied by such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual events or actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the factors discussed or referenced under the heading "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2007, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
(2) Arbitron's management believes that presenting EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization), both non-GAAP financial measures, as supplemental information helps investors, analysts, and others, if they so choose, in understanding and evaluating Arbitron's operating performance in some of the same manners that management does because EBIT and EBITDA exclude certain items that are not directly related to Arbitron's core operating performance. Arbitron's management references these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing current performance and making decisions about internal budgets, resource allocation and financial goals. EBIT is calculated by deducting net interest income from income from continuing operations and adding back income tax expense to income from continuing operations. EBITDA is calculated by deducting net interest income from income from continuing operations and adding back income tax expense, and depreciation and amortization to income from continuing operations. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered substitutes either for income from continuing operations, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20080612161245.txt.gz
TIME:20080612161245
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On June 12, 2008, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release announcing that it will resume the commercialization of its Portable People Meter radio ratings service in eight markets. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Item 7.01 (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits The following exhibit relating to Item 7.01 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed: 99.1 Press release of Arbitron Inc. dated June 12, 2008 Forward-Looking Statements This Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:  successfully implement the commercialization of our Portable People MeterTM service;  successfully design, recruit, and maintain PPM panels that appropriately balance research quality, panel size and operational cost;  complete the Media Rating Council ("MRC") audit of our local market PPM ratings services in a timely manner and successfully obtain and/or maintain MRC accreditation for our audience measurement services;  renew contracts with large customers as they expire;  successfully execute our business strategies, including entering into potential acquisition, joint-venture, or other material third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact, if any, of any further ownership shifts in the radio and advertising agency industries;  respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprie tary software systems and new customer products and services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully manage the impact on our business of any economic downturn generally and in the advertising market in particular;  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperation in surveys, privacy concerns, consumer trends, technology changes and/or government regulations; and  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to measure new forms of audio content and delivery, multi-media and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment. There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, and elsewhe re, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Contact: Thom Mocarsky
Arbitron Inc.
410-312-8239
thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK; June 12, 2008  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that it will resume the commercialization of its Portable People Meter radio ratings service in eight markets.
TM
"It's time to move forward with electronic measurement for radio," said Steve Morris, chairman, president and chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc. "Radio broadcasters and advertisers are taking bold steps in an effort to enhance the accountability of the medium. The Radio Advertising Bureau recently published guidelines for posting' and ad schedule guarantees and the American Association of Advertising Agencies continues to advance its e-business effort: Project Reinvention.' The Arbitron PPM is uniquely capable of delivering the granularity, precision and speed of reporting that can help radio make these and other accountability initiatives a success."
TM
"We have improved our PPM samples in the four key areas we outlined last November. We have enhanced our ability to deliver PPM sample targets. We've improved the composition of our PPM panels, especially among the 18-34 demographic. We've raised the day-to-day cooperation rate of our PPM respondents. We've also put in place a number of programs designed to have a positive impact on response rates. Our commitment to continuous improvement means that we will keep working on these metrics as we go forward."
"In the past weeks, we have been meeting with our clients to review the progress that we've made since November and to hear their priorities for enhancements to our PPM services. Our conclusion from these meetings is that our PPM ratings are valid and the time is right for electronic measurement. Another outcome from these meetings is that we have established working groups across a number of constituencies within the radio industry to facilitate the exchange of ideas and the implementation of our continuous improvement programs for the PPM. At the same time, we are working diligently with the Media Rating Council in order to achieve MRC accreditation for all our PPM markets."
"We are also seeing that radio operators who have embraced PPM are benefiting from PPM measurement. Over the past few months, there have been numerous reports in the trade press about urban and general market broadcasters who have successfully harnessed PPM ratings to advance their programming and sales efforts. We should not continue to let other media use their more advanced measurement systems to take audience and revenue away from radio," said Mr. Morris.
Eight marketsNew York, Nassau-Suffolk, Middlesex-Somerset-Union, Los Angeles, Riverside-San Bernardino, Chicago, San Francisco, and San Josewill commercialize with the release of the September PPM survey report on October 8, 2008. On that date, the company's diary-based radio ratings will be withdrawn from those eight markets and radio transactions among Arbitron-subscribing stations and agencies will take place solely using PPM-based radio ratings.
Arbitron will deliver "pre-currency" PPM survey reports for Los Angeles, Riverside-San Bernardino and Chicago with a special release of the June PPM survey report in mid-July, and with the regular release of the July PPM survey report on August 13 and the August PPM survey report on September 10.
Arbitron will deliver "pre-currency" PPM survey reports for San Francisco and San Jose with the release of the July PPM survey report on August 13 and the August PPM survey report on September 10.
Pre-currency reports cannot be used in buysell transactions. Arbitron has released PPM pre-currency reports for New York, Nassau-Suffolk and Middlesex-Somerset-Union since October 2007.
Arbitron commercialized the PPM ratings service in Philadelphia in March 2007 and Houston-Galveston in July 2007. In addition, PPM technology is currently being used for radio and/or television measurement in Belgium, Denmark, Norway, Iceland, Kazakhstan, Canada, and Singapore.
In the revised PPM commercialization schedule released by Arbitron in November 2007, Arbitron indicated an expected commercialization of the Portable People Meter ratings service in Atlanta, DallasFt. Worth, Detroit and Washington DC in December 2008. Arbitron is not altering that expectation at this time.
Arbitron will host a conference call for investors on Friday, June 13 at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time. The Company invites you to listen to the call by dialing toll-free (888) 868-9083. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing (973) 935-8512. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 51268751. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
Investor Conference call: schedule and access
The Arbitron Portable People Meter system uses a passive audience measurement device about the size of a small cell phoneto track consumer exposure to media and entertainment, including broadcast, cable and satellite television, terrestrial, satellite and online radio as well as cinema advertising and many types of place-based electronic media. Carried throughout the day by randomly selected survey participants, the PPM device can track when and where they watch television, listen to radio as well as how they interact with other forms of media and entertainment.
About the Portable People Meter
TM
The PPM detects inaudible codes embedded in the audio portion of media and entertainment content delivered by broadcasters, content providers and distributors. At the end of the day, the meter is placed in a docking station that extracts the codes and sends them to a central computer. The PPM is equipped with a motion sensor, a patented quality control feature unique to the system, which allows Arbitron to confirm the compliance of the PPM survey participants every day.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron's executive offices are located in New York City.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2007, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20080721092032.txt.gz
TIME:20080721092032
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On July 21, 2008, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release announcing, among other things, a new Portable People MeterTM ("PPM") sample program that it presented at the July Arbitron Radio Advisory Council meeting. The program is designed to deliver a larger 12+ sample target. The company also announced an increase in its 18-54 sample size guarantee from 80 to 90 percent and raised other key sample benchmarks in its PPM radio ratings service. The previously announced 18-54 sample size guarantee will now apply in each PPM local market beginning with the first month of PPM currency in that market, rather than the fourth month of PPM currency. Additionally, beginning with the first anniversary of PPM currency in a local market the threshold for the Persons 18-54 sample size will be increased to 90 percent of the companys published sample size target applicable to that local market. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incor porated herein by reference. The information in this Item 7.01 (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits The following exhibit relating to Item 7.01 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed: 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated July 21, 2008 Forward-Looking Statements This Current Report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties i nclude, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:  successfully implement the commercialization of our Portable People MeterTM service;  successfully design, recruit, and maintain PPM panels that appropriately balance research quality, panel size and operational cost;  complete the Media Rating Council ("MRC") audit of our local market PPM ratings services in a timely manner and successfully obtain and/or maintain MRC accreditation for our audience measurement services;  renew contracts with large customers as they expire;  successfully execute our business strategies, including entering into potential acquisition, joint-venture, or other material third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact, if any, of any further ownership shifts in the radio and advertising agency industries;  respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprietary software systems and new customer products and services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully manage the impact on our business of any economic downturn generally and in the advertising market in particular;  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperation in surveys, privacy concerns, consumer trends, technology changes and/or government regulations;  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to measure new forms of audio content and delivery, multi-media and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment; and  successfully maintain industry confidence in our products and services in light of governmental regulation, legislation, litigation, activism or adverse public relations efforts prompted by various industry groups and market segments. There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by s uch forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK; July 21, 2008  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced a new Portable People Meter sample program which was presented at the July Arbitron Radio Advisory Council meeting. The program is designed to deliver a larger 12+ sample target. The company also announced an increase in its 18-54 sample size guarantee from 80 to 90 percent and raised other key sample benchmarks in PPM markets. Arbitron will announce additional details of the PPM sample plan and the effective dates of the individual components in the coming weeks.
TM
"The PPM sample program we unveiled at the Advisory Council Meeting is a significant step forward," said Steve Morris, chairman, president and chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc. "The Advisory Council deserves credit from the industry for providing Arbitron with insights and input over the last few months which enabled us to raise the bar regarding these key PPM sample metrics," continued Mr. Morris.
Key components of the PPM sample plan debuted at the July 2008 Arbitron Radio Advisory Council include:
Arbitron plans to increase the Persons 12+ sample target in current and future PPM markets by ten percent.
Persons 12+ sample target to increase by ten percent at no cost to customers
Arbitron is considering several approaches for achieving the Persons 12+ sample target including, among other means, an increase to the cell phone only household sampling rate, redistributing children 6-11 sample and/or the introduction of sample stratification. The specific combinations of approaches are pending the outcome of methodological tests and further industry consultation.
Arbitron plans to implement the increase in Person 12+ sample target in phases, beginning in 2009, with completion currently expected by the end of 2010.
Arbitron also announced two changes to its previously disclosed Persons 18-54 PPM sample size guarantee. First, the current guarantee threshold of 80 percent will now take effect in each PPM local market with the first month of PPM currency in that market instead of the fourth. Second, starting on the first anniversary of PPM currency in the local market, the threshold for the Persons 18-54 sample size guarantee will be raised to 90 percent of the sample target as determined based on a 13-report monthly rolling average.
Persons 18-54 sample guarantee threshold to increase from 80 to 90 percent
The company plans two changes to its persons 6+ benchmark. The current benchmark of 90 percent of the sample target for persons 6+ will take effect in the first month of currency instead of the fourth. Starting on the first anniversary of PPM currency in a market, the Persons 6+-sample benchmark will be raised from 90 to 100 percent of the sample target based on a 13-report monthly rolling average.
Persons 6+ benchmark to increase from 90 to 100 percent
Arbitron's new sample plan involves three elements for its 18-34 benchmarks. First, the current benchmark  70 percent of target  will take effect with the first currency report instead of the current approach, which begins on the fourth month. Second, the benchmark will be raised to 75 percent of target with the sixth currency report. Lastly, the 18-34 benchmark will increase to 80 percent of target effective with first anniversary of PPM currency in a market based on a 13-report monthly rolling average.
18-34 demographic benchmark to increase from 70 percent to 75 percent at month six
The 18-34 benchmarks apply (depending on market population) to the following gender, race and ethnicity breaks: Persons, Men, Women, Black, Hispanic and Other.
"We will review the specific methods by which we plan to achieve these enhancements with the Media Rating Council and the NAB Committee on Local Radio Audience Measurement (COLRAM)," said Mr. Morris.
Industry feedback
Arbitron intends to provide a more detailed summary of the plan along with milestones and timelines in the weeks to come.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron's executive offices are located in New York City.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2007, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20080722084636.txt.gz
TIME:20080722084636
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 22, 2008, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release reporting 2008 second quarter financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated July 22, 2008.
The information in this Form 8-K and the attached Exhibit are furnished to comply with Item 2.02 and Item 9.01 of Form 8-K. Neither this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit are to be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 (except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing).
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Arbitron Inc. Phone: 410-312-8410 sean.creamer@arbitron.com
Company Contact: Sean Creamer, CFO
KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215 tfromer@kcsa.com
Investor Contact: Todd Fromer
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor and Media contact: Thom Mocarsky
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2008.
NEW YORK, July 22, 2008 
Net income for the quarter was $600 thousand, or $0.02 per share (diluted), compared with $3.8 million, or $0.13 per share (diluted) for the second quarter of 2007.
For the second quarter of 2008, the Company reported revenues of $78.7 million, an increase of 3.7 percent over revenue of $75.9 million during the second quarter of 2007.
Results from Continuing Operations
Costs and expenses for the second quarter increased by 9.0 percent, from $75.6 million in 2007 to $82.4 million in 2008, due primarily to planned expenditures for the commercialization of the Portable People Meter ratings service. In the second quarter of 2008, share-based compensation amounted to $2.7 million, up from $2.2 million in the second quarter of 2007.
TM
Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for the quarter were $1.4 million, compared with EBIT of $5.3 million for the second quarter of 2007.
Income from continuing operations for the quarter was $625 thousand or $0.02 per share (diluted), compared with $3.7 million, or $0.12 per share (diluted) in the second quarter of 2007.
For the six months ended June 30, 2008, revenue was $172.7 million, an increase of 4.7 percent over revenue of $165.0 million for the same period in 2007.
Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) decreased 6.2 percent from $30.1 million in the first six months of 2007 to $28.2 million for the same period in 2008. Net income for the six-month period decreased 12.5 percent to $16.9 million compared with $19.3 million in 2007. Earnings per share (diluted) for the six months in 2008 were $0.61 compared with $0.64 per share (diluted) last year.
On January 31, 2008, Arbitron concluded the sale of CSW Research Limited ("Continental"), its UK-based custom research business. As a result, Continental's financial results have been reclassified as a Discontinued Operation for all periods presented. In the second quarter of 2008, the Company reported a net loss from Continental of $25 thousand. For the year to date, the loss from discontinued operations (net of tax) was $70 thousand.
Results from Discontinued Operations
Stephen Morris, chairman, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron, made the following comments regarding the second quarter 2008:
Management comment on second quarter 2008 results
"In June, we made the decision to restart the commercialization of our Portable People Meter ratings services. Now that preliminary PPM ratings are being released in a number of new markets, we are redoubling our ongoing effort to help the radio industry in its transition from diary to electronic ratings. The industry and we have learned much in the transition that has already taken place in Houston and Philadelphia. We intend to help radio apply these lessons as we bring PPM to radio's top markets in the balance of 2008."
TM
"Given the unique role that urban and Spanish-language stations play in their communities, we are devoting particular attention helping these formats capitalize on the advantages that the PPM offers for programming and sales."
For the full year 2008, Arbitron continues to expect revenue to increase between 8 percent and 10 percent compared to last year's revenue from continuing operations. (For comparability purposes, this guidance excludes Continental's 2007 revenue.)
Company Reiterates Guidance for 2008
Earnings per share from continuing operations (diluted) is still expected to be between $1.30 and $1.44 for the full year 2008 as compared to earnings per share from continuing operations (diluted) of $1.37 in 2007.
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time. The Company invites you to listen to the call by dialing (toll free) 888-868-9083. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing 973-935-8512. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 54594714. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
Earnings conference call: schedule and access
A replay of the call will be available from 12:00 p.m. on July 22 through 11:59 p.m. on July 29, 2008. To access the replay, please call (toll free) 800-642-1687 in the United States or 706-645-9291 outside of the United States. To access the replay, users will need to enter the following code: 54594714.
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to, either income from continuing operations, as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Its executive offices are located in New York City.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries ("we," "our," "Arbitron" or the "Company") in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied by such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of important factors known to Arbitron that could cause actual events or actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the factors discussed or referenced under the heading "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2007, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
(2) Arbitron's management believes that presenting EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization), both non-GAAP financial measures, as supplemental information helps investors, analysts, and others, if they so choose, in understanding and evaluating Arbitron's operating performance in some of the same manners that management does because EBIT and EBITDA exclude certain items that are not directly related to Arbitron's core operating performance. Arbitron's management references these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing current performance and making decisions about internal budgets, resource allocation and financial goals. EBIT is calculated by deducting net interest income from income from continuing operations and adding back income tax expense to income from continuing operations. EBITDA is calculated by deducting net interest income from income from continuing operations and adding back income tax expense, and depreciation and amortization to income from continuing operations. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered substitutes either for income from continuing operations, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20080725165200.txt.gz
TIME:20080725165200
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On July 25, 2008 Timothy T. Smith, Executive Vice President, Legal & Business Affairs and Chief Legal Officer of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") established a new stock trading plan in accordance with the requirements specified in Rule 10b5-1(c) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"). Mr. Smith established this plan in order to diversify his investment portfolio and for tax planning purposes. Under the terms of the plan, an authorized third-party broker will sell shares of Company common stock at monthly intervals beginning in October 2008. The plan covers the sale of up to 3,600 shares of Company common stock. This plan is scheduled to terminate no later than September 30, 2009. The plan was adopted during an authorized trading period and when Mr. Smith was not in possession of material non-public information. All trades for executive officers of the Company will be publicly reported on Forms 144 and Forms 4, which are filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The information in this Item 7.01 shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20080815172222.txt.gz
TIME:20080815172222
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On August 1, 2008 Larry E. Kittelberger, a director of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") established a new stock trading plan in accordance with the requirements specified in Rule 10b5-1(c) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"). Under the terms of the plan, an authorized third-party broker may exercise stock options and then sell shares of Company common stock at monthly intervals beginning in October 2008. The plan covers the sale of up to 37,366 shares of Company common stock. This plan is scheduled to terminate no later than September 30, 2009. The plan was adopted during an authorized trading period and when Mr. Kittelberger was not in possession of material non-public information. All trades for directors of the Company will be publicly reported on Forms 144 and Forms 4, which are filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The information in this Item 7.01 shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject t o the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20080828171652.txt.gz
TIME:20080828171652
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On August 26, 2008, the Compensation and Human Resources Committee (the "Committee") of the Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") approved a new form of executive retention agreement (the "Agreement") and authorized the Company to enter into updated Agreements with each of Sean R. Creamer, Pierre C. Bouvard, Owen Charlebois, Linda Dupree (the "named executive officers"), and with certain other executive officers of the Company, not including Stephen B. Morris, the Companys Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer. The new Agreements have a fixed five year term and will replace the executive retention agreements currently in place with each of the named executive officers and certain other executive officers of the Company, which otherwise would remain in effect indefinitely. The terms and conditions of the new Agreements address substantially the same matters as the executive retention agreements that are being replaced. The following summary of the Agreement is qualified in its entirety by the full terms and conditions of the Agreement, a copy of which will be filed as an exhibit to the Companys Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended September 30, 2008 and is incorporated herein by reference. The Agreement provides for severance payments under certain circumstances and for the vesting of awards under the Companys stock-based compensation plans under certain circumstances. The Agreement also provides for a release of claims and enhanced non-competition, non-recruitment, and non-disparagement obligations on the part of the executive for the benefit of the Company as a condition to the Companys obligation to provide any severance or other payments thereunder. Termination by the Company other than for cause or by executive for Position Diminishment The Agreement provides that if the executives employment is terminated: (A) by the Company other than for cause, or (B) by the executive for Position Diminishment (as defi ned below), and in either case the date of termination does not occur during a Window Period (as defined below), the executive will receive a lump-sum cash payment in an amount equal to the sum of: (i) 18 times the executives Reference Compensation (a number based in part on monthly salary as described below), plus (ii) the product of (x) a decimal equal to a number between 0.40 and 0.55 (as applicable depending on the individual executive) times the executives annual salary divided by 12, times (y) the number of full months elapsed in the calendar year before the executives date of employment termination. In addition, if the executive is entitled to receive a lump-sum cash payment pursuant to the conditions described in the immediately preceding paragraph, the Company will also provide the executive with certain outplacement services (to a maximum of $50,000), and for a period of 18 months following termination, or, if sooner, until reemployment with an equivalent benefit, w ith the same or equivalent health, dental, accidental death and dismemberment, short-term and long-term disability, life insurance coverage, and all other insurance and other health and welfare benefits programs he or she was entitled to on the day before the termination, if and to the extent such coverage is available from the Companys benefit plans with respect to former employees. If and to the extent such coverage is not available or ceases to be available, the Company will take commercially reasonable steps to arrange for coverage under individual or conversion policies and will, in any event, pay as premiums the same dollar level of premiums as it paid for the executive as an active employee (with a tax gross up if the payment of premiums would be tax free for active employees but is taxed for a former employee). For purposes of the Agreement, "Position Diminishment" means: (i) a change in the executives reporting responsibilities, titles, duties, or offices as in effect immedia tely prior to a relevant measurement date, or any removal of executive from, or any failure to re-elect executive to, any of such positions, that has the effect of materially diminishing executives responsibility, duties, or authority, (ii) a relocation of the executives principal place of employment to a location more than 25 miles from its then current location and that increases the distance from executives primary residence by more than 25 miles, or (iii) a material reduction in executives annual salary. An executive may only resign as a result of a Position Diminishment that occurs other than during a Window Period if he or she (i) provides notice to the Company within 90 days following the date of Position Diminishment that he or she considers the Position Diminishment grounds to resign; (ii) provides the Company a period of 30 days to cure the Position Diminishment; and (iii) actually ceases employment, if the Position Diminishment is not cured, by six months f ollowing the date of Position Diminishment. For purposes of the Agreement, "Window Period" means the one-year period commencing on either (i) the date that Mr. Morris ceases to be the Companys Chief Executive Officer (a "Leadership Change"), or (ii) a Change of Control. For purposes of the Agreement, a "Change of Control" is generally defined as any of the following: (i) a merger or consolidation involving the Company if less than 50% of its voting stock after the merger or consolidation is held by persons who were stockholders before the merger or consolidation; (ii) ownership by a person or group acting in concert of at least 51% of the Companys voting securities; (iii) ownership by a person or group acting in concert of between 25% and 50% of the Companys voting securities if such ownership was not approved in advance by the Companys Board of Directors; (iv) a sale of the assets of the Company substantially as an entirety; (v) the liquidation of the Company; (vi) specified changes in the composition of the Companys Board of Directors; or (vii) any other events or transactions the Companys Board of Directors determines constitute a change of control. For purposes of the Agreement, "Reference Compensation" means the product of: (i) a decimal equal to a number between 1.40 and 1.55 (as applicable depending on the individual executive), times (ii) the quotient of: (a) the executives annual salary, divided by (b) twelve. Termination during window period following a Change of Control or Leadership Change The Agreement provides that if the executives employment terminates: (A) during a Window Period, or (B) because the executive resigns as a result of a Position Diminishment on or before the Position Diminishment Termination Date (as defined below), in either case other than (X) a termination by the Company for cause, (Y) the executives resignation other than as a result of Position Diminishment, or (Z) the executives death or disability, the executive will receive a lump-sum cash payment in an amount equal to the sum of: (i) 24 times the executives Reference Compensation, and (ii) the product of: (a) a decimal equal to a number between 0.40 and 0.55 (as applicable depending on the individual executive) times the executives annual salary divided by 12, times (b) the number of full months elapsed in the calendar year before the executives employment termination date. If the executives employment terminates and the executive is entitled to receive a lump-sum cash payment pursuant to the conditions described in the immediately preceding paragraph: (i) the Company will provide the executive with the outplacement services, and benefits continuation described above, but for a period of 24 months, and (ii) all outstanding equity incentive awards granted on or after June 1, 2008 and before the expiration of the Agreement will fully and immediately vest (subject to the Comp anys Board of Directors ability to suspend exercises or sales until the executive has released all claims). An executive may only resign as a result of a Position Diminishment and be eligible to receive the severance payments specified in the preceding two paragraphs if: (i) the Position Diminishment occurs during a Window Period, and (ii) he or she (x) provides notice to the Company within 90 days following the date of Position Diminishment that he or she considers the Position Diminishment grounds to resign; (y) provides the Company a period of 30 days to cure the Position Diminishment, and (z) actually ceases employment, if the Position Diminishment is not cured, by the later to occur of: (1) six months following the date of Position Diminishment and (2) the end of the Window Period (the "Position Diminishment Termination Date"). In addition, notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in the Agreement, in the event that the Company determines that any portion of any payment, compensation, or other benefit provided to the executive in connection with his or her employment termination constitutes "nonqualified deferred compensation" within the meaning of Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended ("Section 409A" of the "Code"), and the executive is a specified person as defined in Section 409A, such portion of the payment, compensation, or other benefit shall not be paid before the day that is six months plus one day after the date of "separation from service" as determined under Section 409A. If payments to an executive under the Agreement would result in imposition of an excise tax (a "parachute tax") under Section 4999 of the Code, the executive will also be entitled to be paid an amount to compensate for the imposition of the tax. The payment will be in an amount such that after payment of all taxes, income and excise, the executive will be in the same after-tax position as if no parachute tax under the Code, had been imposed. Upon a Change of Control, all outstanding equity incentive awards granted on or before May 31, 2008 will fully and immediately vest, without regard to whether the executives employment terminates (unless the equity incentive cannot be so accelerated under Section 409A, in which case acceleration will only occur in accordance with Section 409A), subject to the Companys Board of Directors ability to suspend exercises or sales until the executive has released all claims. The foregoing summary of the Agreement is qualified in its entirety by the full terms and conditions of the Agreement, a copy of which will be filed as an exhibit to the Companys Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended September 30, 2008 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20080910082513.txt.gz
TIME:20080910082513
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On September 9, 2008, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release concerning a subpoena received by the Company on that date from the State of New York Office of Attorney General regarding the Companys Portable People MeterTM radio ratings service. The Company maintains that its Portable People Meter radio ratings service is fair, reliable and fully represents the diversity of New York radio markets. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Item 7.01 (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
The following exhibit relating to Item 7.01 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed: 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated September 9, 2008
Forward-Looking Statements This Current Report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:  successfully implement the commercialization of ou r Portable People MeterTM service;  successfully design, recruit, and maintain PPM panels that appropriately balance research quality, panel size and operational cost;  complete the Media Rating Council ("MRC") audit of our local market PPM ratings services in a timely manner and successfully obtain and/or maintain MRC accreditation for our audience measurement services;  renew contracts with large customers as they expire;  successfully execute our business strategies, including entering into potential acquisition, joint-venture, or other material third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact, if any, of any further ownership shifts in the radio and advertising agency industries;  respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprietary software systems and new customer products and services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully manage the impact on o ur business of any economic downturn generally and in the advertising market in particular;  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperation in surveys, privacy concerns, consumer trends, technology changes and/or government regulations;  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to measure new forms of audio content and delivery, multi-media and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment; and  successfully maintain industry confidence in our products and services in light of governmental regulation, legislation, litigation, activism or adverse public relations efforts prompted by various industry groups and market segments. There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK; September 9, 2008  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today released the following statement in response to the subpoena of the State of New York Office of Attorney General regarding the Portable People Meter radio ratings service.
TM
The company maintains that its Portable People Meter radio ratings service is fair, reliable and fully represents the diversity of New York radio markets. The media industry has demanded a more precise and credible measurement tool for radio just as they have for other media.
"The media industry should be concerned about the attempts to supplant or short-circuit the Media Rating Council accreditation process. The MRC was founded at the behest of Congress. Throughout its 40 plus years of service, the MRC has been a driving force behind the vast quality improvements in the ratings services that research companies have been delivering to the advertising and media industries," said Steve Morris, chairman, president and chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron's executive offices are located in New York City.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2007, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20080915171948.txt.gz
TIME:20080915171948
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On September 15, 2008, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release concerning a subpoena received by the Company on that date from the State of New Jersey Office of the Attorney General regarding the Companys Portable People MeterTM radio ratings service. The Company maintains that its Portable People Meter radio ratings services are valid, fair and representative of the diversity of the radio markets measured. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Item 7.01 (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
The following exhibit relating to Item 7.01 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed: 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated September 15, 2008
Forward-Looking Statements This Current Report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:  successfully implement the commercialization of ou r Portable People MeterTM service;  successfully design, recruit, and maintain PPM panels that appropriately balance research quality, panel size and operational cost;  complete the Media Rating Council ("MRC") audit of our local market PPM ratings services in a timely manner and successfully obtain and/or maintain MRC accreditation for our audience measurement services;  renew contracts with large customers as they expire;  successfully execute our business strategies, including entering into potential acquisition, joint-venture, or other material third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact, if any, of any further ownership shifts in the radio and advertising agency industries;  respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprietary software systems and new customer products and services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully manage the impact on o ur business of any economic downturn generally and in the advertising market in particular;  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperation in surveys, privacy concerns, consumer trends, technology changes and/or government regulations;  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to measure new forms of audio content and delivery, multi-media and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment; and  successfully maintain industry confidence in our products and services in light of governmental regulation, legislation, litigation, activism or adverse public relations efforts prompted by various industry groups and market segments. There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press Information
Contact: Thom Mocarsky
Arbitron Inc.
410-312-8239
thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK; September 15, 2008  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today released the following statement in response to the subpoena of the New Jersey Office of the Attorney General regarding the Portable People Meter radio ratings services.
TM
Arbitron is justly proud of the quality and reliability of its Portable People Meter radio ratings services. Arbitron PPMservices are valid, fair and representative of the diversity of the radio markets measured.
TM
Broadcasters have long called for the adoption of a more precise and credible audience measurement tool in order to meet the long-standing demands of advertisers who have called on radio to adopt a more accountable radio ratings system on par with those of other media.
"Once again, the media industry should be concerned about these continued political encroachments on the valuable role that the Media Rating Council fulfills," said Steve Morris, chairman, president and chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc. "The MRC oversees a well-established, widely-accepted process that has served television, radio, print, Internet and other ad-supported media for more than four decades. The MRC has also been a driving force behind the important and continuing quality improvements in the ratings services that the media industry counts on."
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron's executive offices are located in New York City.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2007, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20081003150155.txt.gz
TIME:20081003150155
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On October 2, 2008, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") received a letter from the State of New York Office of the Attorney General (the "Attorney General") notifying the Company that the Attorney General intends to commence litigation against the Company seeking to enjoin allegedly unlawful or deceptive business practices in violation of New York consumer protection and state securities laws relating to the marketing and planned commercialization in New York of the Companys Portable People MeterTM radio ratings service and to obtain additional injunctive relief, penalties, and damages unless the Company can show, within five business days after receipt of the notice, why such proceeding should not be instituted. The Company denies all such allegations and intends to defend itself and its interests vigorously. On October 3, 2008, the Company issued a statement regarding the Attorney Generals notice. A copy of the statement is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Item 7.01 (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits The following exhibit relating to Item 7.01 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed: 99.1 Statement of Arbitron Inc. dated October 3, 2008
Forward-Looking Statements This Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as may, will, should, likely, expects, anticipates, estimates, believes, or plans, or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These r isks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:  successfully implement the rollout of our Portable People MeterTM service;  successfully design, recruit, and maintain PPM panels that appropriately balance research quality, panel size and operational cost;  complete the Media Rating Council (MRC) audit of our local market PPM ratings services in a timely manner and successfully obtain and/or maintain MRC accreditation for our audience measurement services;  renew contracts with large customers as they expire;  successfully execute our business strategies, including entering into potential acquisition, joint-venture, or other material third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact, if any, of any further ownership shifts in the radio and advertising agency industries;  respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new propriet ary software systems and new customer products and services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully manage the impact on our business of any economic downturn generally and in the advertising market in particular;  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperation in surveys, privacy concerns, consumer trends, technology changes and/or government regulations; and  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to measure new forms of audio content and delivery, multi-media and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment. There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, an d elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

October 2, 2008
Arbitron is disappointed that the State of New York Office of the Attorney General has stated its intent to pursue litigation in an effort to stop the implementation of Portable People Meter  a measurement tool that is supported by a majority of the radio industry. We intend to vigorously defend the Company and its interests. We also fear that the radio industry will suffer continued harm and be placed at a competitive disadvantage if PPM is delayed further.
After many years of market trials, and almost two years of commercialization, the PPM is providing more timely and detailed insights into the behavior of radio audiences. These insights have already been used with demonstrated success by radio programmers, including those at urban and Spanish-language stations.
Radio broadcasters, radio advertisers and Arbitron all have an important stake in the transition to electronic measurement. At Arbitron, we appreciate the role that all segments of the radio industry must play during this transition. We reaffirm our commitment to working with all radio broadcasters, agencies, and advertisers to facilitate industry-wide success in an electronically measured world.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20081006091930.txt.gz
TIME:20081006091930
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
Commercialization of Portable People MeterTM Radio Ratings Service in Eight Local Markets On October 6, 2008, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") announced that it has commercialized its Portable People Meter radio ratings services in eight new markets. The Company has released radio audience estimates for the September 2008 PPMTM survey month (August 21-September 17) to its subscribers in New York, Los Angeles, Chicago, San Francisco, Nassau-Suffolk, Middlesex-Somerset-Union, Riverside-San Bernardino, and San Jose. Effective October 6, 2008, the PPM radio audience estimates for these markets should be used as the basis for buy/sell transactions of radio commercial time among subscribing stations, agencies and advertisers. In addition, the July and August PPM survey months, which Arbitron had previously released as "pre-currency" information, are now designated as "currency" data. The Spring 2008 diary-based radio audience report (April 3-June 25) is no longer deemed "currency" for buy/sell transactions. Commencement of Civil Action Seeking Declaratory Judgment and Injunctive Relief Against the Attorney General for the State of New York On October 6, 2008, the Company also announced that it has commenced a lawsuit in the United States District Court for the Southern District of New York, seeking a declaratory judgment and injunctive relief against the Attorney General for the State of New York to prevent any attempt to restrain the Companys publication of its PPM listening estimates. The Company stated that any restraint on the publication of its PPM listening estimates would have an adverse impact on the radio broadcast industry and advertising industries as a whole, would cause the Companys business to suffer severe irreparable harm, would cause economic injury to the Companys shareholders and violates the Companys First Amendment rights to publish its radio audience listening estimates. Among other things, the Company is seeking the following relief:  a judgment declaring that the publication of its PPM listening estimates is fully protected by the U.S. and New York Constitutions; and  a preliminary and permanent injunction along with a temporary restraining order enjoining the New York Attorney General from attempting to restrain or prevent Arbitron from publishing its PPM listening estimates. On October 6, 2008, the Company issued a press release regarding the commercialization of the PPM service in eight local markets. A copy of that press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. On October 6, 2008, the Company also issued a press release regarding the commencement of its civil action in the United States District Court for the Southern District of New York. A copy of that press release is attached as Exhibit 99.2 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Item 7.0 1 (including Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
The following exhibits relating to Item 7.01 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed: 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. regarding commercialization of the PPM radio ratings service in eight local markets dated October 6, 2008 99.2 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. regarding the commencement of its civil action in the United States District Court for the Southern District of New York dated October 6, 2008
Forward-Looking Statements This Current Report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as may, will, should, likely, expects, anticipates, estimates, believes, or plans, or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:  successfully implement the commercialization of our Portable People MeterTM service;  successfully maintain industry usage of our services in light of governmental regulation, legislation, litigation, activism or adverse public relations efforts prompted by various industry groups and market segments;  successfully design, recruit and maintain PPM panels that appropriately balance research quality, panel size and operational cost;  complete the Media Rating Council (MRC) audits of our local market PPM ratings services in a timely manner and successfully obtain and/or maintain MRC accreditation for our audience measurement business;  renew contracts with large customers as they expire;  successfully execute our business strategies, including entering into potential acquisition, joint-venture or other material third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact, if any, of any further ownership shifts in the radio and advertising agency industries;  respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprietary software systems and new customer products and services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully manage the impact on our business of any economic downturn, generally, and in the advertising market, in particular;  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperation in surveys, privacy concerns, consumer trends, technology changes and/or government regulations; and  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to measure new forms of audio content and delivery, multimedia and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment. There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forw ard-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK; October 6, 2008  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that it has commercialized its Portable People Meter radio ratings services in eight new markets.
TM
Arbitron has released radio audience estimates for the September 2008 PPM survey month (August 21-September 17) to its subscribers in New York, Los Angeles, Chicago, San Francisco, Nassau-Suffolk, Middlesex-Somerset-Union, Riverside-San Bernardino and San Jose.
TM
Effective today, the PPM radio audience estimates for these markets should be used as the basis for buy/sell transactions of radio commercial time among subscribing stations, agencies and advertisers. In addition, the July and August PPM survey months, which Arbitron had previously released as "pre-currency" information, are now designated as "currency" data. The Spring 2008 diary-based radio audience report (April 3-June 25) is no longer deemed "currency" for buy/sell transactions.
Said Steve Morris, chairman, president, chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc: "We are commercializing our Portable People Meter radio ratings services in these markets in order to meet our obligations to our customers and to the radio industry."
"Without PPM, the industry will not have up-to-date estimates of the radio audience in the nation's largest markets to facilitate an efficient buy-sell process for radio advertising. Advertisers are in the process of planning their ad budgets for all media including radio. Our goal with the commercialization of the PPM is to help radio remain competitive in an increasingly challenging media marketplace," said Mr. Morris.
The Arbitron Portable People Meter system uses a passive audience measurement device  about the size of a small cell phone  to track consumer exposure to media and entertainment, including broadcast, cable and satellite television; terrestrial, satellite and online radio as well as cinema advertising and many types of place-based electronic media. Carried throughout the day by randomly selected survey participants, the PPM device can track when and where they watch television, listen to radio as well as how they interact with other forms of media and entertainment.
About the Portable People Meter
TM
The PPM detects inaudible codes embedded in the audio portion of media and entertainment content delivered by broadcasters, content providers and distributors. At the end of the day, the meter is placed in a docking station that extracts the codes and sends them to a central computer. The PPM is equipped with a motion sensor, a patented quality control feature unique to the system, which allows Arbitron to confirm the compliance of the PPM survey participants every day.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron's executive offices are located in New York City.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2007, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.

FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK; October 6, 2008  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that it has asked the United States District Court for the Southern District of New York, for a declaratory judgment and injunctive relief against the Attorney General for the State of New York to prevent any attempt to restrain Arbitron's publication of its Portable People Meter listening estimates.
TM
The Company stated that any restraint on the publication of its PPM listening estimates would have an adverse impact on the radio broadcast industry and advertising industries as a whole, would cause Arbitron's business to suffer severe irreparable harm, would cause economic injury to Arbitron's shareholders and violates the Company's First Amendment rights to publish its radio audience listening estimates.
TM
Among other things, the Company is seeking the following relief:
"Arbitron publicly announced in November 2007 that we intended to commercialize our Portable People Meter radio ratings service in New York with the release of the September 2008 PPM survey report on October 8, 2008. The New York Attorney General has waited until October 2, less than a week before our scheduled commercialization, to notify Arbitron that his office intends to bring a lawsuit seeking to enjoin alleged violations of New York law. Such conduct is unfair to Arbitron and is unfair to the radio and advertising industries. We are asking the United States District Court to uphold our First Amendment rights and to prevent the New York Attorney General from attempting to restrain publication of our Portable People Meter listening estimates," said Steve Morris, president, chairman and chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc.
The Arbitron Portable People Metersystem uses a passive audience measurement device  about the size of a small cell phone  to track consumer exposure to media and entertainment, including broadcast, cable and satellite television; terrestrial, satellite and online radio as well as cinema advertising and many types of place-based electronic media. Carried throughout the day by randomly selected survey participants, the PPM device can track when and where they watch television, listen to radio as well as how they interact with other forms of media and entertainment.
About the Portable People Meter
The PPM detects inaudible codes embedded in the audio portion of media and entertainment content delivered by broadcasters, content providers and distributors. At the end of the day, the meter is placed in a docking station that extracts the codes and sends them to a central computer. The PPM is equipped with a motion sensor, a patented quality control feature unique to the system, which allows Arbitron to confirm the compliance of the PPM survey participants every day.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron's executive offices are located in New York City.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2007, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20081010172309.txt.gz
TIME:20081010172309
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
New York State Action On October 10, 2008, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") acknowledged that the State of New York had commenced litigation against the Company in the Supreme Court of New York for New York County alleging false advertising and deceptive business practices in violation of New York consumer protection and civil rights laws relating to the marketing and commercialization in New York of the Portable People MeterTM radio ratings service. The Company denies all such allegations and intends to defend itself and its interests vigorously. New Jersey State Action On October 10, 2008 the Company also acknowledged that the State of New Jersey had commenced litigation against the Company in the Superior Court of New Jersey for Middlesex County, alleging violations of New Jersey consumer fraud and civil rights laws relating to the marketing and commercialization in New Jersey of the Portable People Meter radio ratings service. Arbitron denies all such allegations and inte nds to defend itself and its interests vigorously. Commencement of Civil Action Seeking Declaratory Judgment and Injunctive Relief Against the New Jersey Attorney General On October 10, 2008, the Company announced that it had commenced a lawsuit in the United States District Court for the District of New Jersey, seeking a declaratory judgment and injunctive relief against the New Jersey Attorney General to prevent any attempt to restrain the Companys publication of its PPM listening estimates. On October 10, 2008, the Company issued a press release regarding the foregoing matters. A copy of that press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Item 7.01 (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporat ed by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
The following exhibits relating to Item 7.01 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed: 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated October 10, 2008
Forward-Looking Statements This Current Report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as may, will, should, likely, expects, anticipates, estimates, believes, or plans, or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:  successfully implement the commercialization of our Portable People MeterTM service;  successfully maintain industry usage of our services in light of governmental regulation, legislation, litigation, activism or adverse public relations efforts prompted by various industry groups and market segments;  successfully design, recruit and maintain PPM panels that appropriately balance research quality, panel size and operational cost;  complete the Media Rating Council (MRC) audits of our local market PPM ratings services in a timely manner and successfully obtain and/or maintain MRC accreditation for our audience measurement business;  renew contracts with large customers as they expire;  successfully execute our business strategies, including entering into potential acquisition, joint-venture or other material third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact, if any, of any further ownership shifts in the radio and advertising agency industries;  respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprietary software systems and new customer products and services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully manage the impact on our business of any economic downturn, generally, and in the advertising market, in particular;  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperation in surveys, privacy concerns, consumer trends, technology changes and/or government regulations; and  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to measure new forms of audio content and delivery, multimedia and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment. There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forw ard-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK; October 10, 2008  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that it has asked the United States District Court for the District of New Jersey for a declaratory judgment and injunctive relief against the New Jersey Attorney General to prevent any attempt to restrain Arbitron's publication of its Portable People Meter listening estimates.
TM
The Company acknowledged today that the State of New Jersey has commenced litigation against Arbitron in the Superior Court of New Jersey for Middlesex County, alleging violations of New Jersey consumer fraud and civil rights laws relating to the marketing and commercialization in New Jersey of the PPM radio ratings service.
Regarding the action by the New Jersey Attorney General
TM
Arbitron denies all such allegations and intends to defend itself and its interests vigorously.
The Company also acknowledged today that the State of New York has commenced litigation against Arbitron in the Supreme Court of New York for New York County alleging false advertising and deceptive business practices in violation of New York consumer protection and civil rights laws relating to the marketing and commercialization in New York of the Portable People Meter radio ratings service.
Regarding the action by New York Attorney General
Arbitron denies all such allegations and intends to defend itself and its interests vigorously.
As previously announced, on October 6, 2008, Arbitron commenced a civil action in the United States District Court for the Southern District of New York, seeking a declaratory judgment and injunctive relief against the New York Attorney General to prevent any attempt by the New York Attorney General to restrain Arbitron's publication of its PPM listening estimates.
The Company stated that any restraint on the publication of its PPM listening estimates would have an adverse impact on the radio broadcast industry and advertising industries as a whole, would cause Arbitron's business to suffer severe irreparable harm, would cause economic injury to Arbitron's shareholders and violates the Company's First Amendment rights to publish its radio audience listening estimates.
Regarding Arbitron Federal suit against New Jersey Attorney General
Among other things, the Company is seeking the following relief:
"We are asking the United States District Court to uphold our First Amendment rights and to prevent the New Jersey Attorney General from attempting to restrain publication of our Portable People Meter listening estimates," said Steve Morris, president, chairman and chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc.
On October 6, 2008, Arbitron commercialized its Portable People Meter radio ratings services in New York, Los Angeles, Chicago, San Francisco, Nassau-Suffolk, Middlesex-Somerset-Union, Riverside-San Bernardino and San Jose.
About the Portable People Meter
The Company commercialized its Portable People Meter radio ratings service in Philadelphia on April 27, 2007, and in Houston on July 18, 2007.
The Arbitron Portable People Metersystem uses a passive audience measurement device  about the size of a small cell phone  to track consumer exposure to media and entertainment, including broadcast, cable and satellite television; terrestrial, satellite and online radio as well as cinema advertising and many types of place-based electronic media. Carried throughout the day by randomly selected survey participants, the PPM device can track when and where they watch television, listen to radio as well as how they interact with other forms of media and entertainment.
The PPM detects inaudible codes embedded in the audio portion of media and entertainment content delivered by broadcasters, content providers and distributors. At the end of the day, the meter is placed in a docking station that extracts the codes and sends them to a central computer. The PPM is equipped with a motion sensor, a patented quality control feature unique to the system, which allows Arbitron to confirm the compliance of the PPM survey participants every day.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron's executive offices are located in New York City.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2007, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20081014082102.txt.gz
TIME:20081014082102
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On October 9, 2008, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") and certain of its executive officers received subpoenas from the State of New York Office of Attorney General regarding, among other things, the Companys Portable People MeterTM radio ratings service and purchases and sales of Arbitron securities by such executive officers. The information in this Item 7.01 shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Forward-Looking Statements This Current Report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:  successfully implement the commercialization of ou r Portable People MeterTM service;  successfully design, recruit, and maintain PPM panels that appropriately balance research quality, panel size and operational cost;  complete the Media Rating Council ("MRC") audit of our local market PPM ratings services in a timely manner and successfully obtain and/or maintain MRC accreditation for our audience measurement services;  renew contracts with large customers as they expire;  successfully execute our business strategies, including entering into potential acquisition, joint-venture, or other material third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact, if any, of any further ownership shifts in the radio and advertising agency industries;  respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprietary software systems and new customer products and services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully manage the impact on o ur business of any economic downturn generally and in the advertising market in particular;  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperation in surveys, privacy concerns, consumer trends, technology changes and/or government regulations;  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to measure new forms of audio content and delivery, multi-media and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment; and  successfully maintain industry confidence in our products and services in light of governmental regulation, legislation, litigation, activism or adverse public relations efforts prompted by various industry groups and market segments. There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20081021073505.txt.gz
TIME:20081021073505
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 21, 2008, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release reporting 2008 third quarter financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated October 21, 2008.
The information in this Form 8-K and the attached Exhibit are furnished to comply with Item 2.02 and Item 9.01 of Form 8-K. Neither this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit are to be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 (except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing).
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2008.
NEW YORK, October 21, 2008 
Net income for the quarter was $17.0 million, or $0.63 per share (diluted), compared with $17.2 million, or $0.58 per share (diluted) for the third quarter of 2007.
For the third quarter of 2008, the Company reported revenue of $102.5 million, an increase of 9.9 percent over revenue of $93.3 million during the third quarter of 2007.
Costs and expenses for the third quarter increased by 14.5 percent, from $63.0 million in 2007 to $72.1 million in 2008, due primarily to planned expenditures for the commercialization of the Portable People Meter ratings service. In the third quarter of 2008, share-based compensation amounted to $2.1 million, up from $1.6 million in the third quarter of 2007.
TM
Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for the quarter were $28.2 million, compared with EBIT of $27.1 million for the third quarter of 2007.
Income from continuing operations for the quarter was $16.9 million or $0.63 per share (diluted), compared with $17.1 million, or $0.57 per share (diluted) in the third quarter of 2007.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2008, revenue was $275.2 million, an increase of 6.5 percent over revenue of $258.3 million for the same period in 2007.
Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) decreased 1.3 percent from $57.1 million in the first nine months of 2007 to $56.4 million for the same period in 2008. Net income for the nine-month period decreased 7.3 percent to $33.8 million compared with $36.5 million in 2007. Earnings per share (diluted) for the nine months in 2008 were $1.23 compared with $1.21 per share (diluted) last year.
On January 31, 2008, Arbitron concluded the sale of CSW Research Limited ("Continental"), its UK-based custom research business. As a result, Continental's financial results have been reclassified as a Discontinued Operation for all periods presented. In the third quarter of 2008, the Company reported income (net of tax) from Continental of $55 thousand. For the year to date, the loss from discontinued operations (net of tax) was $15 thousand.
Stephen Morris, chairman, president and chief executive officer of Arbitron, made the following comments regarding the third quarter 2008:
Management comment on third quarter 2008 results
"On October 6, 2008, Arbitron commercialized the Portable People Meter radio ratings services in eight new markets, including in New York, Los Angeles, Chicago and San Francisco. Our priority, as we launch these services, is to continue the help we are giving broadcasters and agencies in their transition to electronic measurement and to maintain advertiser confidence in radio as one of the most effective of all ad media."
"In the third quarter, we announced significant quality enhancements to our diary services, including a plan to add cell-phone-only households to the diary sample and to accelerate the development of electronic and online alternatives to the paper and pencil diary for all markets."
"We realize that any transition brings both challenges and opportunities. Our goal is to work through the challenges and to take advantage of the opportunities for the radio industry," said Mr. Morris.
As previously disclosed, on October 6, Arbitron commenced a civil action in the United States District Court for the Southern District of New York, seeking a declaratory judgment and injunctive relief against the New York Attorney General, and on October 10, Arbitron brought a civil action in the United States District Court for the District of New Jersey seeking a declaratory judgment and injunctive relief against the New Jersey Attorney General, in each case seeking to prevent any attempt by the Attorneys General to restrain Arbitron's publication of its PPM listening estimates.
Recent Litigation
Also as previously disclosed, on October 10, the State of New York commenced litigation against Arbitron in the Supreme Court of New York for New York County alleging false advertising and deceptive business practices in violation of New York consumer protection and civil rights laws, and the State of New Jersey commenced litigation against Arbitron in the Superior Court of New Jersey for Middlesex County, alleging violations of New Jersey consumer fraud and civil rights laws, in each case relating to the marketing and commercialization in those states of our Portable People Meter radio ratings service.
Details of these civil actions are available in the press releases issued by the Company on October 6, 2008 and October 10, 2008 and in the Current Reports on Form 8-K Arbitron furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission on October 6, 2008 and October 10, 2008.
For the full year 2008, Arbitron continues to expect revenue to increase between 8 percent and 10 percent compared to last year's revenue from continuing operations.
Company Updates Guidance for 2008
Due to the impact of Hurricane Ike on our operations in Houston, and costs and expenses related to litigation, including the litigation described above, and other interactions with governmental entities, primarily regarding our PPM radio ratings services, we now expect that if all of the ongoing litigation and governmental entity activity were to continue at current levels and we were to continue to incur related expenses at current rates through the end of the year, earnings per share from continuing operations (diluted) would likely fall into the lower end of our previously stated range of $1.30 to $1.44 for the full year 2008.
In 2007, earnings from continuing operations were $1.37(diluted).
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time. The Company invites you to listen to the call by dialing (toll free) 888-868-9083. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing 973-935-8512. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 66831761. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
Earnings conference call: schedule and access
A replay of the call will be available from 12:00 p.m. on October 21 through 11:59 p.m. on November 21, 2008. To access the replay, please call (toll free) 800-642-1687 in the United States, or 706-645-9291 if you're calling from outside of the United States. To access the replay, users will need to enter the following code: 66831761
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to, either income from continuing operations, as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Its executive offices are located in New York City.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2007, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
(3) Arbitron's management believes that presenting EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization), both non-GAAP financial measures, as supplemental information helps investors, analysts, and others, if they so choose, in understanding and evaluating Arbitron's operating performance in some of the same manners that management does because EBIT and EBITDA exclude certain items that are not directly related to Arbitron's core operating performance. Arbitron's management references these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing current performance and making decisions about internal budgets, resource allocation and financial goals. EBIT is calculated by deducting net interest income from income from continuing operations and adding back income tax expense to income from continuing operations. EBITDA is calculated by deducting net interest income from income from continuing operations and adding back income tax expense, and depreciation and amortization to income from continuing operations. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered substitutes either for income from continuing operations, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20081119175358.txt.gz
TIME:20081119175358
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On November 18, 2008 Arbitron Inc. ("Arbitron" or the "Company") held a conference call to discuss the outcome of the Cumulus Media RFP for radio audience measurement in small markets. A transcript from that call is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. The information in this Item 2.02 shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 (the "Securities Act") or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
The information set forth in Item 2.02 above is incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Item 7.01 shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits The following exhibit relating to Items 2.02 and 7.01 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed: 99.1 Arbitron Inc. conference call transcript dated November 18, 2008
The information in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing. Forward-Looking Statements This Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements ba sed on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:  absorb costs related to legal proceedings and governmental entity interactions and avoid related fines, limitations, or conditions on our business activities;  successfully implement the commercialization of our Portable People MeterTM service;  successfully respond to competition and maintain and promote industry usage of our services, a critical mass of broadcaster encoding, and the proper understanding of our audience measurement services and methodology in light of governmental regulation, legislation, litigation, activism or adverse public relations efforts;  s uccessfully design, recruit and maintain PPM panels that appropriately balance research quality, panel size and operational cost;  complete the Media Rating Council ("MRC") audits of our local market PPM ratings services in a timely manner and successfully obtain and/or maintain MRC accreditation for our audience measurement business;  renew contracts with key customers ;  successfully execute our business strategies, including entering into potential acquisition, joint-venture or other material third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact, if any, of any further ownership shifts in the radio and advertising agency industries;  respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprietary software systems and new customer products and services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully manage the impact on our business of any economic downturn, generally, and in the advertising market, in particular;  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperation in surveys, privacy concerns, consumer trends, technology changes and/or government regulations; and  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to measure new forms of audio content and delivery, multimedia and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment. There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, our Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended September 30, 2008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

CORPORATE PARTICIPANTS
Thom Mocarsky
Arbitron Inc.  SVP, Press, IR
Steve Morris
Arbitron Inc.  Chairman, CEO, President
Sean Creamer
Arbitron Inc.  CFO
CONFERENCE CALL PARTICIPANTS
Jim Boyle
C.L. King  Analyst
Troy Mastin
William Blair and Company  Analyst
Howard Rosencrans
Value Advisory  Analyst
Townsend Buckles
JP Morgan  Analyst
PRESENTATION
Operator
Ladies and gentlemen, thank you for standing by and welcome to the Arbitron update conference call. (OPERATOR INSTRUCTIONS). Thank you. Now to Mr. Thom Mocarsky, Senior Vice President, Press, and Investor Relations. Please go ahead.
Thom Mocarsky
- Arbitron Inc.  SVP, Press, IR
Thank you, Julie Ann. Good afternoon, ladies and gentlemen, and welcome to our call. I'm Thom Mocarsky and I will be your moderator for today's call. Today I have got the pleasure of introducing Steve Morris, our Chairman, and Chief Executive Officer, and Sean Creamer, our Chief Financial Officer. In today's call, Steve and Sean will discuss the announcement made this morning by Cumulus and Clear Channel. After the presentation, Steve and Sean will be happy to take your questions, but before we begin today's presentations I do want to note this afternoon's discussion includes forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based on our current expectations about future events. We have derived these expectations from information currently available to us. Actual results might differ materially from results projected in our forward-looking statements which involve known and unknown risks.
For a discussion of the factors that can cause our actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements, please refer to Arbitron's 10-K for the period ended December 31, 2007, our quarterly report on Form 10-Q for the period ended September 30, 2008, and elsewhere and on any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission. A copy of all of these documents are on file with the SEC. At this time, I do want to turn the call over to Steve Morris, our Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer.
Steve Morris
- Arbitron Inc.  Chairman, CEO, President
Thank you, Thom. Good afternoon, everybody, and thank you for joining us. We scheduled this call to discuss this morning's Cumulus announcement, but I want to make it clear up front that radio audience measurement is our core business and we intend to aggressively protect it. We are and will continue to be a leader in moving industry that kind of accountability that advertisers are demanding. We have no intention of exiting any of these markets and we contend to continue to invest in further enhancing our service offerings both for diary and for PPM. I should also make clear that both Cumulus and Clear Channel remain under contract for PPM. We are also in negotiations with Clear Channel for a significant number of diary markets, those falling outside of the RFP markets.
Having said that the Cumulus and Clear Channel decision to sign on for alternative service clearly will have a negative impact on our revenues from those markets. Specifically, our lost revenue from Cumulus and Clear Channel combined in 2009 will be in the neighborhood of $7 million. On a full year run rate basis in those markets the revenue impact will be about $10 million.
There's still a lot we don't know about the specifics but this is what we have heard so far. The 50 markets for the new service will appear are spread across markets that range from market 104 to 286. The service will employ sticker diaries which, to our knowledge, have never been used in the United States. While they have been used outside the US, the utility seems to be limited to markets where there are a very small number of stations. For example, in Australia where Nielsen proposes to use it, there are only one to five stations in a typical small to medium size market. This compares with between 50 and 120 in the US markets where they intend to use it.
Even though the original RFP specs said no diaries, the outcome proved that we have been right all along and that the diary is, in fact, the best solution available today for small and mid size markets. The diary is a radio measurement tool with which we have more experience than any other company in measuring US radio audiences. They also propose to conduct only one survey a year. That's a step backward, plain and simple. Less frequent measurement means less accountability for advertisers who buy radio all year long.
Advertisers have told us that radio markets need more than once a year survey in order for stations to maintain accountability and to recapture revenue from out-of-home, internet, and online media. An eight week once-a-year survey is also dangerously vulnerable to hyping, which radio stations flood the market with aggressive giveaways during the short survey period in order to influence and distort the survey results. Advertisers have always hated that practice in both TV and radio and have welcomed increases in measurement and frequency that we have introduced over the years.
From a business perspective we still need to evaluate what impact this move by Nielsen might have on our existing Scarborough partnership, but rest assured we will take all appropriate steps to preserve our rights and to protect our interests. In short, we are confident we have a superior audience measurement solution for these markets. In addition, as part of our commitment to continually improving our services we previously announced a program of enhancements designed to make the diary service even more useful to broadcasters, agencies and advertisers and markets of all sizes.
Our plans include adding cell phone only households to survey sample in 50 diary markets beginning with the spring of 09 and expanding to 125 markets in the fall. Enhancing 18-to-34 participation by redirecting cash incentives from older to younger respondents and answering the qualitative and consumer questions in the back of our diary. Accelerating the development and deployment of electronics and online alternatives to the paper and pencil diary for all markets.
In closing I want to make it clear again that radio audience measurement is our core business and we will aggressively protect it. We are implementing a number of enhancements right now, and have more in the pipeline for both diary and PPM markets. Moreover, new technology offers us new and exciting technology we will consider as well. So with that, I'd like to turn this call over to Julie Ann for questions and Sean and I will be happy to answer whatever you have.
QUESTION AND ANSWER
Operator
(OPERATOR INSTRUCTIONS). Your first question is from the line of Alexia Quadrani with JPMorgan.
Townsend Buckles
Thanks. This is Townsend Buckles for Alexia with a few questions. First, can you give us a general schedule of when your diary contracts in revenue terms come up for renewal over the next several years?
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
It is Sean. With all of our contracts, there is no clear schedule, they are generally spread and don't bunch up. So it is pretty steady over annual period. So there's not a single period where virtually all of them come due at the same time. They're entered into during varying expiration dates and are renewed for periods of time depending on individual negotiations but, over time, that's left us with a staggered set of expirations. It is pretty consistent from year to year.
Townsend Buckles
Okay. And can you give us a sense of the relative profitability of the small market ratings business versus the rest of Company and can we assume that the bottom line impact of these lost revenues will be pretty high if you continue providing rating in these markets?
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
Certainly the answer to the last question is yes. We intend to remain in those markets so the revenue is gone and there won't be any short-term reduction in cost because it is our intention to continue in those markets. So there certainly is a significant bottom line impact to that lost revenue.
Townsend Buckles
Okay.
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
In terms of how our profitability breaks out by markets, we have not gone into and will not go into any more specificity than what we have sort of said in the past which is it is clearly disproportionately high in the top 50 markets and even more so in the top ten. We clearly leverage that infrastructure which brought us into some of these smaller markets. That's not to say they're not profitable on their own, but certainly the bigger markets just by scale tend to be the most profitable markets.
Townsend Buckles
Okay. And then finally does this encroachment many the radio business by Nielsen change your view on whether you may consider going after the TV market with PPM longer term?
Steve Morris
- Arbitron Inc.  Chairman, CEO, President
I would say that nothing is off the table in terms of what our responses might be. We do know that PPM is an effective way to measure television audiences, we did that as part of our Apollo project. So I guess the answer is, it is on the table.
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
And it is not just television, it is any audio-based medium, PPM, we believe is particularly well suited for.
Townsend Buckles
Okay. Thank you.
Operator
Your next question is from the line of Jim Boyle with C.L. King.
Jim Boyle
- C.L. King  Analyst
Good evening. Quick question on just one of the things you said. Did you really say you are staying in markets, small markets, where everyone has gone to Nielsen radio?
Steve Morris
- Arbitron Inc.  Chairman, CEO, President
We don't know what the final outcome is going to be in terms of, they're very, I don't think there are any markets where there are only two competitors, Clear Channel and Cumulus so our position is, yes, we are staying in those markets and we intend to demonstrate in each of them that our measurement is superior to this alternative.
Jim Boyle
- C.L. King  Analyst
So that would help your remaining Arbitron subscribers and what's the length of the Nielsen radio contracts where if you did prove your diary service is better they could flip flop back to you?
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
We don't know the specifics of any of those individual contracts, and wouldn't speculate on them. Obviously, the point we are making is we don't intend to concede any of the turf. We are going to continue to invest in those markets and it is our intention to win the business back. I can't give you a time line for that, but we are certainly not packing up our tent.
Jim Boyle
- C.L. King  Analyst
Okay. Also, do you have a rough idea on the Nielsen small market diary pricing versus your pricing?
Steve Morris
- Arbitron Inc.  Chairman, CEO, President
We don't have the details on that, Jim.
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
We would simply be speculating. What we do know is what it costs to produce high quality research, and beyond speculating, our own view is it will be difficult for us to understand how there can be a significant, pure economic driver to the decision, but beyond that would be speculation. We know what we know about the cost of producing a high quality rating service, and that's all we have to say on that.
Jim Boyle
- C.L. King  Analyst
Okay. We had heard it was similar, but let me move on. Clear Channel says they're going to test 17 markets with this new product. How many clear channel small markets remain with Arbitron at this point?
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
I don't have the exact number off the top of my head but obviously Clear Channel is significantly in larger markets, but the 17 markets that are subject to this RFP in 100 plus I just wouldn't know off the top of my head what the balance of those outside of that are?
Jim Boyle
- C.L. King  Analyst
Okay. And, therefore, the $7 million 09 and $10 million run rate beyond just presumes 17 markets, it doesn't presume if more defect down the line hypothetically?
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
That is true. What we do know is that the total annual run rate for all of the markets, so it would include any customers in those markets that have not signed up, at least as we understand, to date, is $10.5 million, $11 million. So the balance of the market is made up by a number of relatively smaller customers.
Jim Boyle
- C.L. King  Analyst
Let me get that straight. $10.5 million to $11 million of Clear Channel markets that haven't signed up remain?
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
No. We said the rough run rate for Clear Channel and Cumulus was about $10 million. If you include other customers who have stations in those markets who have not, were not announced today to have signed up with that new service, if you assumed they did, now or in the future the total, including Cumulus and Clear Channel, would be $11.5 million.
Jim Boyle
- C.L. King  Analyst
Oh, $11.5 total. So maybe another incremental $1.5 million.
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
That's right.
Jim Boyle
- C.L. King  Analyst
And when you say that level, does that include just quantitative diary type research or also qualitative software at Arbitron services?
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
That is the ratings piece.
Jim Boyle
- C.L. King  Analyst
Just the ratings piece.
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
Yes, there's, and we are still obviously sorting through, we just got the list of markets today. We don't believe there's any significant direct overlap with Scarborough offerings that we currently do in the qualitative with the markets that are listed.
Jim Boyle
- C.L. King  Analyst
So you think this is mainly unless someone else defects?
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
Yes. But again, that would be speculation because we just don't have more information than we have given you guys already.
Jim Boyle
- C.L. King  Analyst
Okay. And, finally, who is the next sizable radio group with a sizable number of small markets who's contract expires in the near to mid term?
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
I don't know the specific customer who is next up. I know we have looked at sort of the schedule for renewals and it is pretty balanced year in year out. So there's no unusual activity in the coming years.
Jim Boyle
- C.L. King  Analyst
And, Steve, actually there was a thing at the end of today, the FCC chairman turned down FCC Adelstein's request to start a special inquiry and even though you state the FCC lacks jurisdiction, a certain Illinois senator sent you a letter questioning PPM. He's going to be in the White House soon. What's your thinking on President Obama's PPM position?
Steve Morris
- Arbitron Inc.  Chairman, CEO, President
Talk about a speculative question. I think we are  I have no idea the answer to that. We have been spending a lot of time talking to each of the commissioners explaining our position. I think we continue to feel very strongly and I think this view is shared by some of the commissioners that there's not a jurisdiction that applies here and the other point we make is that the government already chartered an organization to pay attention to quality in these markets and that group, of course, is the MRC. So, I think we are, we feel that we have made our case pretty strongly with the FCC.
Jim Boyle
- C.L. King  Analyst
Okay. Thank you.
Operator
(OPERATOR INSTRUCTIONS). Your next question is from the line of Troy Mastin with William Blair and Company.
Troy Mastin
- William Blair and Company  Analyst
Thank you. Good afternoon. Can you remind us what the delivery dates are for these markets? I don't know if they vary from market to market, just so we can have some context relative to the once a year plan and the third quarter launch that Nielsen has?
Steve Morris
- Arbitron Inc.  Chairman, CEO, President
These are generally two-time per year markets. So we do a spring and a fall survey in those markets. There's is a once per year that, as I understand it, they're going to collect the data in April, May and release it in August.
Troy Mastin
- William Blair and Company  Analyst
Your delivery date for your spring would be in those markets similar timing?
Steve Morris
- Arbitron Inc.  Chairman, CEO, President
Yes, in July.
Troy Mastin
- William Blair and Company  Analyst
Okay.
Steve Morris
- Arbitron Inc.  Chairman, CEO, President
Or early August.
Troy Mastin
- William Blair and Company  Analyst
There really won't be a void of data for them; however, they wouldn't have a fall book in 2009, correct?
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
In 2009?
Troy Mastin
- William Blair and Company  Analyst
Right. So there won't be a void of data between the fall book 08 and what you would call the spring book of 09, that's when they would get the Nielsen data and when they would have, not have an update?
Steve Morris
- Arbitron Inc.  Chairman, CEO, President
Correct.
Troy Mastin
- William Blair and Company  Analyst
Okay.
Steve Morris
- Arbitron Inc.  Chairman, CEO, President
They would have a couple, a few weeks perhaps but not a major void.
Troy Mastin
- William Blair and Company  Analyst
Okay. Okay. Good. And then, just out of curiosity in your contract structure in general, do you have anything along the line of maybe most favored nations type pricing where if you were to provide different pricing to a certain client, the other clients would enjoy that kind of a discount. Can you share that?
Steve Morris
- Arbitron Inc.  Chairman, CEO, President
We don't talk about the content of the individual contracts.
Troy Mastin
- William Blair and Company  Analyst
Okay. And then you have talked about enhancements you are planning for diary markets, you went through some of them on the call. I'm curious how significant these costs may be.
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
Troy, you are hard to hear, if you don't mind if you can speak up a little bit.
Troy Mastin
- William Blair and Company  Analyst
Okay. Sorry. I am asking about the enhancements that you are talking about for the non-diary  I'm sorry, for the diary markets and I don't know if you can quantify how significant these costs are but I am curious, if the make up for these costs, if you will be able to make up for these costs through pricing or some other means through efficiency to where in these markets you wouldn't see a meaningfully different margin the next couple of years.
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
Yes. Well, certainly what we have talked about today was initiatives that we had announced previously and had contemplated in any of our conversations we would have had on our quarterly calls relative to business model changes. We don't view any of these individually or in aggregate to change the fundamental cost structure for our diary business. Obviously, we don't know a lot about what this new service is. So a natural question is what potential investments might we need to make to be competitive in those markets the next time it comes up. We simply can't answer that because we don't know what it is we are competing against with any level of specificity.
Our approach has always been we don't make quality enhancements in direct response to something like this. We have continuously improved over product. We announced these initiatives long before today's announcement and I think it is simply part of our culture around quality and continuous improvement, and when we make those decision, we give investors a sense of what the financial implications are. So, the ones we have announced we are comfortable with, fall within the construct of our existing business model. Cell phone only we did highlight on the last two calls as a wild card in the sense that it is an expensive proposition that we expect we will become more efficient over time doing. But that is a challenge that is facing anyone who's in this business, including the new service provider in these small markets.
Troy Mastin
- William Blair and Company  Analyst
Okay. Thanks. Finally, the contract structure in the smaller, in the diary markets that will remain. Can you give us some detail on the typical contract length? I think it is maybe a couple of years but I just want to get that straight.
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
In a diary world, the average contract is between three to four years as compared to the PPM contracts which tend to be five to six.
Troy Mastin
- William Blair and Company  Analyst
Okay. Thank you.
Operator
Your next question is from the line of Howard Rosencrans with Value Advisory.
Howard Rosencrans
- Value Advisory  Analyst
Hi, guys. Can you give us, you had given us a lot of generalities, and I would maybe you would take this opportunity in light of what is transpired with the stock and the competitive threats to your smaller market business to give us some sort of clarity as to the PPM market contributions so if we sort of isolate out everything else, can you give us an idea of where the PPM market contribution in some of the major markets goes to in the out years when you're fully rolled out in the market?
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
Well, what we said is we envision the PPM business model with the margin structure comparable to our diary business and that has been a 30s margin proposition. We don't see any change in that at this point. But, in terms of how that breaks out between market 1 and market 49, we don't provide and aren't going provide anymore granular detail on that.
Howard Rosencrans
- Value Advisory  Analyst
Okay. I'm not really sure what the  Impressive but I won't  I'm not sure what the logic is associated with that. But in terms of the 30% margin you have now suggested you are going to stay in the smaller markets and you are not going anywhere, but you are not going to have the revenue associated with it. So, is it just in the PPM markets where you have the, where there's this  my understanding was Company  please correct me if I am mistaken, was that Company wide you were going to get back to this north of 30% number.
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
That's right. That's right. But keep in mind we announced an annual run rate impact of this and this is a contract we do not yet know the term of but it is a $10 million number on a revenue base for 2008 which is based on our guidance in the neighborhood of $367 million, $368 million. So, it is a 1% to 2% point implication. Is that good news? Certainly not but is it manageable, I think absolutely. And we don't intend to not be serving those markets indefinitely.
Howard Rosencrans
- Value Advisory  Analyst
Okay. All right. Thank you.
Operator
Your next question is from the line of Jim Boyle with C.L. King.
Jim Boyle
- C.L. King  Analyst
A follow up question. BIA's numbers indicate that about 13% of the radio industry revenues and markets 101 to 300, 20% is in unrated so they're just too tiny for research. Is that roughly Arbitron's revenue in markets smaller than 100?
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
Yes. We have said that 100 plus is less than 20% of our revenues.
Jim Boyle
- C.L. King  Analyst
Closer to the 13%, that BIA numbers would indicate or are you also throwing this software, tap scan and other odds and ends?
Sean Creamer
- Arbitron Inc.  CFO
Yes. I think our total revenue from those markets is in, is below 20% level.
Jim Boyle
- C.L. King  Analyst
Okay. Thank you.
Operator
There are no further questions at this time. I will now turn the call back over to Mr. Steve Morris for closing comments.
Steve Morris
- Arbitron Inc.  Chairman, CEO, President
Sorry to do this on such short notice. Thank you for tuning in and there will be more information that flows as we get a better sense of the details of what it is that Cumulus and Clear Channel are doing, and we will pass them along as we have important information for you. Thank you.
Operator
Thank you, all, for participating in today's Arbitron update conference call. You may now disconnect.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20081231165609.txt.gz
TIME:20081231165609
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
Item 5.02(e) On December 30, 2008, the Compensation and Human Resources Committee (the "Committee") of the Board of Directors (the "Board") of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") approved an Executive Transition Agreement dated December 30, 2008 by and between the Company and Stephen B. Morris (the "Agreement"). The Agreement generally replaces and supersedes all prior agreements and undertakings between Mr. Morris and the Company with respect to Mr. Morriss employment. Mr. Morriss prior employment agreement, most recently amended as of July 3, 2006, had incented Mr. Morris to remain with the Company until December 31, 2009, as well as to manage a strategic/succession plan, including assisting the Board with the selection of his successor. Pursuant to the terms and conditions of the Agreement Mr. Morriss employment as President and Chief Executive Officer (collectively, "CEO") of the Company will continue until the earlier to occur of December 31, 2009 or the Board s approval and appointment of a successor as chief executive officer of the Company. After the appointment of such a successor, Mr. Morris will remain an employee of the Company and be available to provide transition assistance, consultation, and advice through December 31, 2009 and will serve, for such time as the Board chooses, as Chairman of the Board. Mr. Morris will not be required to provide consulting services after December 31, 2009. Salary and Bonus or Incentive Compensation The Company will pay Mr. Morris a base salary at the rate of $57,240 per month for each month of calendar year 2009 prior to and including the month in which the Board appoints a successor as chief executive officer of the Company. Beginning with the month following the appointment of a successor as chief executive officer of Company, or Mr. Morriss transition to an advisory role, the Company will pay Mr. Morris a base salary at the rate of $11,250 per month through December 31, 2009. Bonus or incentive compensation will be at the sole discretion of the Committee, but the Agreement contemplates that Mr. Morris will be eligible for a bonus equal to 75% of his Blended Base Salary for 2009. For purposes of the Agreement, "Blended Base Salary" means a blended rate of base salary determined using the higher base salary applicable to that portion of 2009 during which Mr. Morris serves as CEO and the remainder of 2009 at the lower rate. Equity Grant Subject to approval by the Committee, in February 2009 the Company will grant Mr. Morris a restricted stock award covering 43,333 shares of common stock, $0.50 par value per share, of the Company (the "Common Stock"). The restricted stock award will vest in full on December 31, 2009, provided that Mr. Morris remains on the Board or in the continuous employ or service of the Company as of such date. Upon vesting, the Company will issue the restricted stock award in the form of shares of Common Stock as to 50% of the number of shares covered by the aw ard and deferred stock units as to 50% of the number of shares of Common Stock covered by the award. Pursuant to the Agreement, Mr. Morris confirms his earlier waiver of any right to accelerate the vesting of any outstanding restricted stock award or any outstanding stock option upon his retirement, and his agreement not to sell, transfer or otherwise dispose of more than 25% of the aggregate number of shares of Common Stock covered by the restricted stock award during any consecutive 12 month period. Benefits Mr. Morris will be entitled to participate during 2009 in any Company benefit plans that cover him and provide for participation based on his level of continuing services. If medical coverage ceases under the terms of the Companys plan, Mr. Morris will be entitled to obtain continuation coverage for the lesser of the period for which he is entitled to such coverage and 18 months, at his own expense. The Company will provide Mr. Morris and his spouse with an annual physical ex amination in March 2009, even if his services as CEO have already then ceased. Mr. Morris will be entitled to vacation at a rate consistent with past practice while serving as CEO, but will cease to accrue vacation after transition to an advisory role. Supplemental Retirement Benefit Consistent with his prior employment agreement, Mr. Morris will be entitled to a supplemental retirement benefit following his separation from service with the Company for any reason, other than breach of the Agreement or termination for cause, as defined in the Agreement. The amount of the supplemental retirement benefit provided under the Agreement is determined substantially by multiplying the number of years of Mr. Morriss employment, giving credit from 1994, by a percentage of Mr. Morriss final average earnings (as defined in the Companys Retirement Plan) and subtracting from this gross amount an offset amount. The offset amount consists of the annual amounts payable to Mr. Morris under the Company Retirement Plan (a tax-qualified, defined benefit plan), the Company benefit equalization plan, and the tax-qualified pension plan of any of Mr. Morriss previous employers. The supplemental retirement benefit will be paid on July 1, 2010 (or such later date as is required by Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended ("Section 409A" of the "Code")) in the form of a lump sum cash payment. If Mr. Morris dies before the first day of the first calendar month following separation from service with the Company (the "Determination Date"), the Company will pay to Mr. Morriss surviving spouse, if any, a benefit equal to 50% of the amount of the supplemental retirement benefit that would have otherwise been paid to Mr. Morris under the Agreement if Mr. Morris had lived until he received the supplemental retirement benefit. If Mr. Morris dies on or after the Determination Date but before payment of the supplemental retirement benefit, the Company will pay to Mr. Morriss estate the supplemental retirement benefit that would have otherwise been paid had Mr. Morris lived. Transitional Compensation In consideration for his service as required in the transition to a new chief executive officer and as Chairman of the Board during all or part of 2009, and assuming his employment is not terminated for cause, as defined in the Agreement, the Company will pay Mr. Morris or his estate, on July 10, 2010 (or such later date as required by Section 409A), a lump sum cash payment equal to $1,018,888.67, reduced by any required tax withholdings. Payments Upon Early Termination If the Company terminates Mr. Morriss employment for cause, as defined in the Agreement, the Company will pay Mr. Morris the then applicable rate of base salary through the date of termination specified in any written notice of termination. If the Company or Mr. Morris terminates Mr. Morriss employment without cause, as defined in the Agreeme nt, the Company will generally pay Mr. Morris, starting on the 60th day after the date employment ends, an amount equal to the sum of the base salary scheduled to be paid for the remainder of 2009 and 75% of the Blended Base Salary. The Company will make this payment ratably over the remainder of 2009. To receive the payments specified in this paragraph, Mr. Morris must execute a release in the form provided by the Company of all legally-releasable claims that Mr. Morris may then have against the Company and any of its affiliates. If Mr. Morriss employment terminates because of his death during 2009, the Company will generally pay to Mr. Morriss designated beneficiary, surviving spouse, or estate an amount equal to 175% of the Blended Base Salary in a lump sum. In the event of disability, as defined in the Agreement, during 2009, base salary will be terminated as of the date such disability is determined. In the event of termination by reason of death or disability during 2009, the Company will pay to Mr. Morris or his heirs an amount, if any, equal to (i) the amount Mr. Morris would have received in annual non-equity incentive for 2009 had "target" goals been achieved, multiplied by (ii) a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of whole months Mr. Morris was employed during 2009 and the denominator of which is 12. Any amount determined pursuant to the preceding sentence will be paid within 15 days after the date such payment would have been paid had Mr. Morris remained employed for all of 2009. The parties agree that Mr. Morris will not be entitled to any other termination or severance payment under any other agreement between Mr. Morris and the Company. Non-Competition, Non-Recruitment, and Non-Disparagement The Agreement contains provisions pursuant to which Mr. Morris has agreed that, while employed by the Company or a member of the Board and for a period of 12 months thereafter (the "Restrictive Period"), he will not directly or indirectly, subject t o certain de minimis exceptions involving the ownership of publicly traded securities, compete with any part of the Companys business. Mr. Morris has agreed during the Restrictive Period not to initiate or actively participate in any other employers recruitment or hiring of Company employees. Mr. Morris has also agreed to non-disparagement provisions. Tax Reimbursement If payments to Mr. Morris under the Agreement would result in imposition of an excise tax (a "parachute tax") under Section 4999 of the Code, Mr. Morris will also be entitled to be paid an amount to compensate for the imposition of the tax. The payment will be in an amount such that after payment of all taxes, income and excise, Mr. Morris will be in the same after-tax position as if no parachute tax under the Code had been imposed. The foregoing summary of the Agreement is qualified in its entirety by the full terms and conditions of the Agreement, a copy of which will be filed as an exhibit to the Comp anys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the period ended December 31, 2008 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090107171611.txt.gz
TIME:20090107171611
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 8.01 Other Events.
Settlement of New York civil litigation On January 7, 2009, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") joined in a Stipulated Order on Consent (the "New York Settlement") in connection with a previously announced civil action brought by the Attorney General of the State of New York (the "New York Attorney General") against the Company in the Supreme Court of New York for the County of New York, alleging violations of New York consumer protection and civil rights laws relating to the marketing and commercialization in New York of the Companys Portable People Meter TM ("PPM") radio ratings service (the "New York Action"). The New York Settlement, when fully executed and performed by the Company to the reasonable expectation of the New York Attorney General, will resolve all claims against the Company that were alleged by the New York Attorney General in the New York Action. In connection with the New York Settlement, the Company has agreed to achieve specified metrics concerning telephone number-based , address-based, and cell phone-only sampling, and to take reasonable measures designed to achieve specified metrics concerning sample performance indicator and in-tab rates (the "Specified Metrics") in its New York local market PPM TM radio ratings service by agreed dates. The Company also will make certain disclosures to users and potential users of its audience estimates, report to the New York Attorney General on its performance against the Specified Metrics, and make all reasonable efforts in good faith to obtain and retain accreditation by the Media Rating Council, Inc. (the "MRC") of its New York local market PPM ratings service. If, by October 15, 2009, the Company has not obtained accreditation from the MRC of its New York local market PPM radio ratings service and also has failed to achieve all of the Specified Metrics, the New York Attorney General reserves the right to rescind the New York Settlement and reinstitute litigation against the Company for the allegations made in the civil action. The Company will pay $200,000 to the New York Attorney General in settlement of the claims and $60,000 for investigative costs and expenses. The New York Settlement does not affect the previously announced subpoenas that the Company and certain of its executive officers received from the New York Attorney General on October 9, 2008 regarding, among other things, the commercialization of the PPM radio ratings service in New York and purchases and sales of Company securities by those executive officers. Settlement of New Jersey civil litigation On January 7, 2009, the Company joined in a Final Consent Judgment (the "New Jersey Settlement") in connection with a previously announced civil action brought by the Attorney General of New Jersey (the "New Jersey Attorney General") against the Company in the Superior Court of New Jersey for Middlesex County, alleging violations of New Jersey consumer protection and civil rights laws relating to the marketing and commercialization in New J ersey of the Companys PPM radio ratings service (the "New Jersey Action"). The New Jersey Settlement, when fully executed and performed by the Company to the reasonable expectation of the New Jersey Attorney General, will resolve all claims against the Company that were alleged by the New Jersey Attorney General in the New Jersey Action. In connection with the New Jersey Settlement, the Company has agreed to achieve, and in certain circumstances to take reasonable measures designed to achieve, Specified Metrics in its New York and Philadelphia local market PPM radio ratings services by agreed dates. The Company also will make certain disclosures to users and potential users of its audience estimates, report to the New Jersey Attorney General on its performance against the Specified Metrics, and make all reasonable efforts in good faith to obtain and retain accreditation by the MRC of its New York and Philadelphia local market PPM ratings services. If, by December 31, 2009, the Company has no t obtained accreditation from the MRC of either its New York and Philadelphia local market PPM radio ratings service and also has failed to achieve all of the Specified Metrics, the New Jersey Attorney General reserves the right to rescind the New Jersey Settlement and reinstitute litigation against the Company for the allegations made in the New Jersey Action. As part of the New Jersey Settlement, the Company denies any liability or wrongdoing. The Company will pay $130,000 to the New Jersey Attorney General for investigative costs and expenses. Jointly in connection with the New York Settlement and the New Jersey Settlement the Company also will create and fund a non-response bias study in the New York market, fund an advertising campaign promoting minority radio in major trade journals, and pay a single lump sum of $100,000 to the National Association of Black Owned Broadcasters (NABOB) for a joint radio project between NABOB and the Spanish Radio Association to support minority radio . The foregoing description of the New York Settlement is qualified in its entirety to the full text of the New York Settlement, a copy of which is attached hereto as exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference. The foregoing description of the New Jersey Settlement is qualified in its entirety to the full text of the New Jersey Settlement, a copy of which is attached hereto as exhibit 99.2 and is incorporated herein by reference. On January 7, 2009, the Company issued a statement regarding the New York Settlement. A copy of that statement is attached as Exhibit 99.3 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. Also on January 7, 2009, the Company issued a statement regarding the New Jersey Settlement. A copy of that statement is attached as Exhibit 99.4 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits 99.1 Stipulated Order on Consent by and between the Attorney General of the State of New York and Arbitron Inc. dated January 7, 2009 99.2 Final Consent Judgment by and between the Attorney General of New Jersey and Arbitron Inc. dated January 7, 2009 99.3 Statement of Arbitron Inc. regarding New York Settlement dated January 7, 2009 99.4 Statement of Arbitron Inc. regarding New Jersey Settlement dated January 7, 2009
Forward-Looking Statements This Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibits 99.1, 99.2, 99.3, and 99.4) contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as may, will, should, likely, expects, anticipates, estimates, believes, or plans, or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-l ooking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:  absorb costs related to legal proceedings and governmental entity interactions and avoid related fines, limitations, or conditions on our business activities;  successfully implement the commercialization of our Portable People MeterTM service;  successfully maintain industry usage of our services, a critical mass of broadcaster encoding, and the proper understanding of our audience measurement services and methodology in light of governmental regulation, legislation, litigation, activism or adverse public relations efforts;  successfully design, recruit and maintain PPM panels that appropriately balance research quality, panel size and operational cost;  compete with companies that may have financial, marketing, sales, technical, and other advantages over us;  complete the Media Rating Council (MRC) audits of o ur local market PPM ratings services in a timely manner and successfully obtain and/or maintain MRC accreditation for our audience measurement business;  renew contracts with key customers as they expire;  successfully execute our business strategies, including entering into potential acquisition, joint-venture or other material third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact, if any, of any further ownership shifts in the radio and advertising agency industries;  effectively respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprietary software systems, such as software systems intended to support our cell phone-only sampling plans, and new customer services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully manage the impact on our business of any economic downturn, generally, and in the advertising and radio industries, in particular;  successfully manage the trend of increasing data co llection costs stemming from lower respondent cooperation in surveys, privacy concerns, consumer trends, including the increasing incidence of cell-phone-only households, evolving technology and/or government regulations; and  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to measure new forms of audio-based content and delivery, multimedia and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment. There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, our Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended September 30, 2008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

This Stipulated Order on Consent ("Order") is entered into by and between petitioners, THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, by ANDREW M. CUOMO, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, and respondent ARBITRON INC., a corporation organized under the laws of the State of Delaware;
WHEREAS New York State Law Executive Law  63(12) prohibits repeated or persistent fraudulent or illegal acts in the transaction of business; New York General Business Law  349 and 350 prohibit deceptive and misleading business practices and false advertising; and New York Civil Rights Law  40-c and New York Executive Law  290 et seq. ("New York State Human Rights Law") prohibit any person or firm, corporation or institution from discriminating against any person because of race, creed, color, or national origin;
WHEREAS, pursuant to the provisions of Section 63(12) of the New York State Executive Law, the Office of the Attorney General ("Attorney General") conducted an investigation into the policies, procedures, and practices of Arbitron Inc. ("Arbitron"), regarding allegations of fraudulent and unlawful business practices;
WHEREAS Arbitron, which is headquartered in New York, is one of the largest media ratings companies in the United States, and the only major provider of listener measurement services to radio broadcasters in the State of New York;
WHEREAS Arbitron for decades based its radio ratings on surveys using a "diary" system which utilizes journals kept by listeners who record their daily radio listening habits;
WHEREAS Arbitron in New York replaced the diary system with the Portable People Meter ("PPM"), an electronic device that tracks the radio stations that listeners are exposed to, and has developed, a methodology to recruit radio listeners to serve as panelists in their geographic area by carrying the PPM ("PPM methodology");
WHEREAS the reliability and accuracy of the media measurement of PPM depends on the reliability of the PPM methodology, because the ratings will only be reliable and accurate if the samples are representative of the communities measured, and the persons carrying the PPM are compliant with Arbitron's instructions on how to use the PPM;
WHEREAS the Media Rating Council, Inc. ("MRC"), a not-for-profit organization that for over forty years has been the primary accrediting agency for ratings services in the United States, denied accreditation in November 2007 to Arbitron's PPM methodology in New York;
WHEREAS the Attorney General received complaints that the PPM methodology as applied to New York is not reliable or fair in that it undercounts New York African-American and Hispanic radio listeners, potentially depriving New York minority broadcasters of advertising revenue and these New York listeners of their primary media resources;
WHEREAS, the Attorney General commenced, through the filing of a complaint, the above captioned lawsuit in the Supreme Court of the State of New York, New York County ("Lawsuit") seeking injunctive and monetary relief on grounds that the PPM methodology is not reliable or accurate, Arbitron made representations regarding the accreditation, fairness, representativeness and reliability of the PPM Methodology in New York that are fraudulent and deceive or have the capacity or tendency to deceive consumers and violate New York's Civil Rights and Human Rights Laws;
WHEREAS, the parties herein desire to resolve this matter without further litigation or adjudication; and
WHEREAS, in consideration of the covenants and undertakings set forth herein and intending to be legally bound thereby, the Attorney General, on behalf of itself and the petitioners, and Arbitron, have agreed to the terms of this Order;
NOW, THEREFORE, it is hereby ORDERED, ADJUDGED AND DECREED as follows:
1.3 "Order" means this Stipulated Order on Consent.
1.5 "Effective Date" means the date this Order is executed by the parties hereto.
1.6 "Including" means without limitation.
1.12 The use of the singular form of any word includes the plural and vice versa.
IN WITNESS THEREOF, the parties hereto, intending to be legally bound hereby, have executed this Order on Consent on the dates written below:

ANNE MILGRAM ATTORNEY GENERAL OF NEW JERSEY Division of Law Hughes Justice Complex 25 Market Street P.O. Box 112 Trenton, New Jersey 08625-0112 Attorney for Plaintiffs
SUPERIOR COURT OF NEW JERSEY
LAW DIVISION  MIDDLESEX COUNTY
DOCKET NO.: MID-L-8428-08
     
:
1. Plaintiffs ANNE MILGRAM, Attorney General of the State of New Jersey ("Attorney General"), DAVID SZUCHMAN, Director of the New Jersey Division of Consumer Affairs, and J. FRANK VESPA-PAPALEO, Director of the New Jersey Division on Civil Rights, (collectively "Plaintiffs"), having filed a Complaint (hereinafter "the Complaint") and Defendant Arbitron Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Arbitron"), appearing through counsel, stipulate that this Final Consent Judgment ("Consent Judgment") may be signed and entered by a judge.
2. The Plaintiffs and Defendant (collectively, "Parties") having consented to the entry of this Consent Judgment for the purposes of settlement only without this Judgment constituting evidence against or any admission by any party and without trial of any issue of fact or law. This Consent Judgment does not constitute any admission of liability or wrongdoing, either express or implied, by Defendant or any other party. Further, this Consent Judgment shall not be competent evidence in any judicial or other proceeding of any liability or wrongdoing by Defendant.
3. The entry of this Consent Judgment has been consented to by Defendant as its own free and voluntary act and with full knowledge and understanding of the nature of the proceedings and the obligations and duties imposed upon them by this Consent Judgment, and it consents to its entry without further notice, and avers that no offer, agreement or inducements of any nature whatsoever have been made to them by the Plaintiffs or their attorneys of any employee of the Office of the Attorney General to procure this Consent Judgment.
4. In the event that the Court shall not enter this Consent Judgment, this proposed Consent Judgment shall be of no force and effect against the Attorney General of New Jersey and the Directors or the Defendant.
5. This Consent Judgment shall bind Defendant, its officers, directors, agents, representatives, parents, affiliates, subsidiaries and employees, and shall be binding on any and all successors and assigns, future purchasers, acquired parties, acquiring parties, successors-in-interest, and its officers, agents, representatives, and employees, directly or indirectly or through any corporation or anyone acting directly or indirectly on their behalf.
6. Subject to paragraph 38 below, Defendant has, by its signature and the signatures of its respective counsel hereto, waived any right to appeal, petition for certiorari, move to reargue or rehear or be heard in connection with entry of this Consent Judgment concerning past conduct addressed in this Consent Judgment.
7. In exchange for the consideration set forth herein, upon execution of this Consent Judgment, the Plaintiffs agree to release Defendant, all of its parent entities, subsidiaries and affiliated entities, and the officers, directors, members, agents servants, employees of each of them, and shareholders from all civil claims, causes of action, suits and demands, of any kind or character for violation of the New Jersey Consumer Fraud Act ("CFA"), 56:8-1 et seq., or the New Jersey Law Against Discrimination ("LAD"), 10:5-1 et seq., arising prior to the date this Consent Judgment is filed and arising out of or based upon matters addressed in this Consent Judgment and the Plaintiffs' Complaint.
N.J.S.A.
N.J.S.A.
8. The Court having considered the pleadings and the proposed Consent Judgment executed by the Parties and their attorneys and filed herewith, and good cause appearing,
that the Consent Judgment may be entered in this matter as follows:
IT IS HEREBY ORDERED, ADJUDGED AND DECREED
9. Pursuant the CFA and LAD, jurisdiction of this Court over the subject matter and over the Defendant for purposes of entering into and enforcing this Consent Judgment is admitted. Jurisdiction is retained by this Court for such further orders and directions as may be necessary or appropriate for the construction and modification of the injunctive provisions herein, or execution of this Consent Judgment, including punishment for any violation of this Consent Judgment. If the Plaintiffs are required to file a petition to enforce any provision of this Consent Judgment against
Defendant, Defendant agrees to pay any courts costs and reasonable attorneys' fees associated with any successful petition to enforce any provision of this Consent Judgment. Pursuant to 56:8-8, venue is proper in this Court, and venue as to all matters between the parties relating hereto or arising out of this Consent Judgment is solely in the Superior Court of New Jersey, Middlesex County.
N.J.S.A.
10. Unless otherwise specified, the following definitions shall apply:
a. "And" and "or" shall be construed conjunctively or disjunctively as necessary to make the meaning inclusive rather than exclusive.
b. "Arbitron" means Arbitron Inc. and all of its executives, officers, directors, managers, representatives, employees and all individuals who act on their behalf.
c. "Order" means this Final Consent Judgment.
d. "Diary system" means Arbitron's long-standing methodology of collecting journals written by panelists of their daily radio listening habits and utilizing them to create ratings based on an estimate of the number of listeners of radio broadcasts.
e. "Effective Date" means the date this Order is executed by the parties hereto.
f. "Including" means without limitation.
g. "Install" means a household or person who has agreed to participate as part of a sample panel, received PPM equipment to participate, installed PPM in the household and meets all of the reporting requirements.
h. "In Tab" rate means the number, expressed as a percentage, of households or persons supplying usable information for reports or tabulations.
I. "Media Rating Council" and "M.R.C." mean Media Rating Council, Inc., a trade organization of broadcasters and advertisers that accredits media measurement services.
j. "New York Market" means all geographic areas in and surrounding New York City designated by Arbitron as a market where as of the effective date hereof P.P.M. has been commercialized, including but not limited to the "embedded" market of Middlesex, Somerset, and Union Counties in New Jersey ("Middlesex-Somerset-Union"), as well as the New Jersey counties of Essex, Bergen, Passaic, and Monmouth counties.
k. "Philadelphia Market" means all geographic areas in and surrounding the City of Philadelphia designated by Arbitron as a market where as of the effective date hereof P.P.M. has been commercialized, including but not limited to which includes the New Jersey counties of Burlington, Camden and Gloucester.
l. "Portable People Meter" and "P.P.M." refer to the device Arbitron utilizes to identify and store information regarding radio broadcasts that panelists are exposed to and to transmit that information to Arbitron.
m. "P.P.M. methodology" refers to the policies, procedures, and practices by which Arbitron recruits individuals to wear the P.P.M. and obtains P.P.M. data from a sample of persons in households within a geographic region.
n. "Recruitment efforts" means procedures used to select, contact and recruit potential P.P.M. panelists.
o. "SPI" is an abbreviation for Sample Performance Indicator and refers to a surrogate measure for response rate in panel based samples.
p. The use of the singular form of any word includes the plural and vice versa.
11. Arbitron agrees to comply fully with the New Jersey Consumer Fraud Act, 56:8-1 et seq., and the New Jersey Law Against Discrimination ("LAD"), 10:5-1 et seq.
N.J.S.A.
N.J.S.A.
12. Arbitron shall commence recruitment of panelists in the New York Market for the P.P.M. using a combination of telephone based and address based methodologies beginning in January 2009. The address based methodology must be utilized in at least 10% of all recruitment efforts by or before July 1, 2009 and in at least 15% of all recruitment efforts by or before July 1, 2010. Further, Arbitron shall ensure that recruitment of racial and ethnic minorities as surveyed is commensurate with the racial and ethnic composition of the geographic area being surveyed, as determined by the most recent, annually updated United States census data.
13. Arbitron shall commence recruitment of panelists in the Philadelphia Market for the P.P.M. using a combination of telephone based and address based methodologies beginning in January 2009. The address based methodology must be utilized in at least 10% of all recruitment efforts by or before July 1, 2009, and in at least 15% of all recruitment efforts by or before December 31, 2010. Further, Arbitron shall ensure that recruitment of racial and ethnic minorities as surveyed is commensurate with the racial and ethnic composition of the geographic area being surveyed, as determined by the most recent, annually updated United States census data.
14. Arbitron shall increase cell phone only ("CPO") sampling, based on all recruitment efforts, in the New York Market from 7.5% to 10% by or before July 1, 2009, from 10% to 12.5% by or before December 1, 2009 and from 12.5% to 15% by or before July 1, 2010. Within fifteen (15) business days at the end of each quarter, Arbitron shall provide data on the composition of the CPO sample cross-tabulated by race, ethnicity and age to the Attorney General and to subscribing broadcasters of the New York P.P.M. data.
15. Arbitron shall increase cell phone only ("CPO") sampling, based on all recruitment efforts, in the Philadelphia Market from 7.5% to 10% by or before July 1, 2009, from 10% to 12.5% by or before June 1, 2010 and from 12.5% to 15% by or before December 31, 2010. Within fifteen (15) business days at the end of each quarter, Arbitron shall provide data on the composition of the CPO sample cross-tabulated by race, ethnicity and age to the Attorney General and to subscribing broadcasters of the Philadelphia P.P.M. data.
16. Arbitron must take all reasonable measures, including necessary front-loaded treatments and refusal conversion strategies (incentives), to increase SPI in the New York Market and to ensure a minimum SPI of 15 by or before July 1, 2009; a minimum SPI of 16 by or before October 1, 2009; and a minimum SPI of 17 by or before June 1, 2010, with a target SPI of 20.
17. Arbitron must take all reasonable measures, including necessary front-loaded treatments and refusal conversion strategies (incentives), to increase SPI in the Philadelphia Market and to ensure a minimum SPI of 15 by or before October 1, 2009; a minimum SPI of 16 by or before April 1, 2010; and a minimum SPI of 17 by or before November 30, 2010, with a target SPI of 20.
18. Arbitron must take all reasonable measures, including in-person coaching and compliance incentives, to ensure in-tab rates of at least 75% by or before April 1, 2009 in all demographics in the New York Market as defined by race, ethnicity, age, and gender. The in-tab rates of all sub-categories of race, ethnicity, age and gender cannot fall below 90% of the target rate, excluding sub-categories that are less than 10% of the New York Market on a six (6) month basis beginning April 1, 2009.
19. Arbitron must take all reasonable measures, including in-person coaching and compliance incentives, to ensure in-tab rates for the Philadelphia PPM Market of at least 75% for the overall population (over the age of 6) by or before April 1, 2009. The in-tab rates of all sub-categories of race, ethnicity, age and gender cannot fall below 85% of the target rate, excluding sub-categories that are less than 10% of the Philadelphia Market on a six (6) month basis beginning April 1, 2009.
20. Further, beginning on January 21, 2009, Arbitron shall provide to subscribing broadcasters install and in-tab data by individual zip code for the New York Market and provide racial and ethnic demographic data for each zip code. For the Philadelphia Market Arbitron shall begin providing install and in-tab data by zip code on April 1, 2009. Thereafter, Arbitron shall continue to provide the zip code data fifteen (15) business days after the monthly release of the monthly e-book for the New York Market and the Philadelphia Market.  Arbitron reserves the right to discontinue delivery of a portion or all of the zip code data based on formal, written advice from the MRC, or in the event there is substantial evidence, as determined by the Attorney General, that a person or company is using the zip code data to identify or contact PPM panel members.
21. Arbitron shall create, fund and commence a valid non-response bias study by January 15, 2009, to identify and determine measurable bias, if any, in the PPM methodology utilized in the New York Market. The study shall be completed by July 15, 2009. This study is intended to satisfy Arbitron's obligations in this regard both hereunder as well as under Arbitron's separate agreement to settle the case with the New York Attorney General. If the study finds measurable bias, Arbitron shall use all reasonable measures to address the bias within six (6) months. To the extent Arbitron believes in good faith that it cannot cure such bias within six (6) months, it shall notify and confer with the Attorney General.
22. Arbitron shall fund an advertising campaign of at least $25,000 promoting minority radio in major trade journals. This advertising campaign is intended to satisfy Arbitron's obligations in this regard both hereunder as well as under Arbitron's separate agreement to settle the case with the New York Attorney General.
23. Arbitron agrees to pay a single lump sum of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000) to the National Association of Black Owned Broadcasters for a joint radio project between the National Association Black Owned Broadcasters and the Spanish Radio Association to support minority radio. This single payment shall satisfy Arbitron's obligation in connection with the settlement of this action as well as the action in New York with the New York Attorney General.
24. Effective immediately, Arbitron must include a prominent disclaimer in
14 font bold typeface
on all written promotional materials of the PPM on paper or internet advertising on direct links, including e-book, and any sub-links that contain promotional materials, stating that the PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of the demographic or radio market in New York and Philadelphia markets.
25. Arbitron shall prepare and submit reports fifteen (15) days after each quarter in 2009 and 2010 to the Attorney General relating to all metrics outlined in paragraphs 12 through 19. Arbitron shall submit a sworn statement, certifying (1) the current PPM methodology design changes and metrics discussed in paragraphs 12 through 19, (2) whether Arbitron is in compliance with paragraphs 12 through 19, and if not, (3) identify the paragraphs in which Arbitron is non-compliant, and (4) where Arbitron is non-compliant with paragraphs 12 through 19, identify all reasonable measures taken to achieve compliance.
26. Arbitron shall take all reasonable efforts in good faith to obtain and retain accreditation for the New York Market and the Philadelphia Market from the M.R.C. In addition to the rights reserved to the Attorney General set forth herein, if Arbitron has not obtained accreditation from the MRC in either market by December 31, 2009 and has failed to meet any of the minimum standards as set forth in paragraphs 12 through 19 of this Order, the Attorney General reserves the right to rescind the Order and reinstitute litigation against Arbitron for the above-referenced claims.
27. Arbitron agrees to pay a single lump sum in the amount of One Hundred Thirty Thousand ($130,000.) for investigative costs and expenses associated with the Attorney General's investigation.
28. Payments to the Attorney General are due no later than four (4) weeks after the time of the signing of this Order, and must be in the form of a certified check, bank check, money order, or attorney's check made payable to "The State of New Jersey" and forwarded to the New Jersey Attorney General's Office, Attention: James Michael, Deputy Attorney General, 25 Market Street, Trenton, New Jersey 08625-0112.
29. This Order, when fully executed and performed by Arbitron to a reasonable expectation of the Attorney General, will resolve all claims against Arbitron that were raised in the Complaint filed by the Attorney General in this action. However, nothing in this Order is intended to, nor shall, limit the Attorney General's investigatory or compliance review powers otherwise provided by law.
30. Notwithstanding any provision of this Order to the contrary, the Attorney General may, in its sole discretion, grant written extensions of time for Arbitron to comply with any provision of this Order.
31. This Order shall become effective upon its execution by all parties and its entry by the Court.
32. The signatories to this Order warrant and represent that they have read and understand this Order, that they are duly authorized to execute this Order, and that they have the authority to take all appropriate action required to be taken pursuant to the Order to effectuate its terms.
33. This Order may be executed in multiple counterparts, each of which shall be deemed a duplicate original.
34. This Order is final and binding on the parties, including all principals, agents, representatives, successors in interest, assigns, and legal representatives thereof. Each party has a duty to so inform any such successor in interest of the terms of this Order. No assignment by any party thereto shall operate to relieve such party of its obligations herewith.
35. All of the terms of this Order are contractual and not merely recitals, and none may be amended or modified except by a writing executed by all parties hereto approved by the Court or with Court approval.
36. This above captioned lawsuit shall be dismissed without prejudice. However, the Court shall retain jurisdiction over the parties and the matter and retain the power to order all applicable equitable remedies to ensure compliance with this Order, including, but not limited to, contempt.
37. This Order supersedes and renders null and void any and all written or oral prior undertakings or agreements between the parties regarding the subject matter hereof.
38. The parties hereby waive and shall not have any right to appeal any of the terms of this Order or in any way challenge the validity of any of the terms of this Order in any forum. Further, Arbitron hereby agrees to withdraw without prejudice any and all pending legal claims filed in any New Jersey trial court, whether state or federal, involving the Attorney General relating to the marketing or commercialization of the PPM or the PPM methodology, or the Attorney General's jurisdiction to investigate and litigate claims relating to the PPM.
39. If any provisions, terms, or clauses in this Order are declared illegal, unenforceable, or ineffective in a legal forum, those provisions, terms, and clauses shall be deemed severable, such that all other provisions, terms, and clauses of this Order shall remain valid and binding on the parties.
40. The parties may seek to enforce this Order by motion before the Court to the full extent of the law; however, in the event of a dispute among the parties regarding any issue arising hereunder, the parties shall attempt in good faith to resolve the dispute before seeking the Court's intervention.
41. Failure to comply with any provision of this Order shall be considered a violation of this Consent Order. Upon such a violation, the Attorney General may take any and all steps available to enforce this Consent Order, including seeking an order of contempt. Upon application by the Attorney General showing Arbitron has failed to pay penalties and costs pursuant to paragraphs herein, the Court shall also enter a money judgment in the amount of the unpaid balance, plus interest at the rate of nine (9) percent per annum from the date of violation or nonpayment, against Arbitron, and the Attorney General shall have execution thereof.
42. In any application by the Attorney General pursuant to paragraph 41 above, the Attorney General may request an allowance for costs.
43. Failure by any party to seek enforcement of this order pursuant to its terms with respect to any instance or provision shall not be construed as a waiver to such enforcement with regard to other instances or provisions.
44. All communications and notices regarding this Order shall be sent by first class mail and facsimile, if twenty-five (25) pages or less in length, to:
IT IS ON THIS            DAY OF      , 2009 SO ORDERED, ADJUDGED AND DECREED.
     
HON. EDWARD J. RYAN, J.S.C.
Jointly Approved and Submitted for Entry:
ARBITRON INC. 142 West 57th Street New York, NY 10019-3300
By: Timothy T. Smith Executive Vice President & Chief Legal Officer
/s/ Timothy T. Smith
Dated: January 7, 2009

Press
Information
Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK; January 7, 2009  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that it has joined in a Stipulated Order on Consent with the Attorney General of the State of New York (NYAG) that will resolve all claims against Arbitron that were alleged in the lawsuit filed by the NYAG in New York County Supreme Court on October 9, 2008.
The lawsuit alleged violations of New York state executive, business and civil rights statutes relating to the marketing and commercialization in New York of the Portable People Meter radio ratings service.
TM
As part of the settlement, Arbitron will incorporate a number of actions into its continuous improvement program for the Portable People Meter ratings service in the New York radio market.
In summary, within the PPM service for the New York Radio metro, Arbitron has agreed to:
TM
Recruit panelists using a combination of telephone number and addressed-based sampling methods beginning January 2009. Arbitron has committed to use the address-based sampling technique for 15 percent of our recruitment efforts in New York by July 2010;
Increase the sample target for persons residing in cell-phone-only households to 15 percent of the total New York sample target by July 2010;
Set a target of 20 percent for the New York Sample Performance Indicator (SPI) by 2010 and make all reasonable efforts to achieve a minimum 15 percent SPI level by July 2009, 16 percent SPI level by October 2009, and 17 percent SPI level by June 2010;
Take all reasonable measures to achieve average in-tab rates of at least 75 percent for all age/sex and race/ethnicity demographic groups by April 1, 2009, and to ensure that subcategories comprising 10 percent or more of the New York Metro population fall within 90 percent of the overall 75 percent target;
Provide to subscribers monthly reports detailing the PPM installed and in-tab sample sizes by individual zip code in the New York Market;
Complete a non-response bias study in the New York market by July 15, 2009. Should the study indicate any measureable bias, Arbitron will use all reasonable measures to address identified sources of ratings bias within 6 months;
Make all reasonable efforts to obtain and retain accreditation for the New York PPM radio ratings service from the Media Rating Council.
Fund an advertising campaign in the New York market promoting minority radio;
Include a disclaimer on promotional material indicating that PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of the New York radio market.
The company also agreed to pay $200,000 in settlement of the claims and $60,000 for costs. The company will pay $100,000 to the National Association of Black Owned Broadcasters (NABOB) for a joint radio project between NABOB and the Spanish Radio Association to support minority radio.
The New York Attorney General reserves the right to rescind the Order and reinstitute the civil action, if the company has not obtained accreditation from the Media Rating Council for its New York PPM radio ratings service by October 15, 2009 also has not achieved all of the specific metrics in the agreement.
and
Commenting on the agreement, Steve Morris, chairman, president and chief executive officer stated: "Broadcasters, agencies and advertisers in New York can continue to use PPM measurement of radio without any hesitation or reservation. We are also pleased to be able to resolve this action within the framework of our continuous improvement program for the Portable People Meter ratings service in the New York radio market. These initiatives are sure to increase the accountability of radio to the benefit of all New York radio broadcasters and their advertisers."
The Arbitron Portable People Metersystem uses a passive audience measurement device  about the size of a small cell phone  to track consumer exposure to media and entertainment, including broadcast, cable and satellite television; terrestrial, satellite and online radio as well as cinema advertising and many types of place-based electronic media. Carried throughout the day by randomly selected survey participants, the PPM device can track when and where they watch television, listen to radio as well as how they interact with other forms of media and entertainment.
About the Portable People Meter
The PPM detects inaudible codes embedded in the audio portion of media and entertainment content delivered by broadcasters, content providers and distributors. At the end of the day, the meter is placed in a docking station that extracts the codes and sends them to a central computer. The PPM is equipped with a motion sensor, a patented quality control feature unique to the system, which allows Arbitron to confirm the compliance of the PPM survey participants every day.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and represent the opinion of Arbitron. PPM ratings, like all audience estimates however derived, should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2007, our Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended September 30, 2008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.

Press
Information
Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK; January 7, 2009  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that it has joined in a Final Consent Judgment with the Attorney General of New Jersey (NJAG) that will resolve all claims against Arbitron that were alleged in the lawsuit filed by the NJAG in the Superior Court of New Jersey for Middlesex County on October 9, 2008.
The lawsuit alleged violations of New Jersey consumer protection and civil rights laws relating to the marketing and commercialization in New Jersey of the Portable People Meter radio ratings services.
TM
As part of the settlement, Arbitron denies any liability or wrongdoing.
Also as part of the settlement, Arbitron will incorporate a number of actions into its continuous improvement program for the Portable People Meter ratings service in the Philadelphia and New York radio markets, consistent with the actions already included in Arbitron's continuous improvement program for the New York market and that are part of its agreement announced earlier today with the Attorney General of the State of New York.
In summary, within the PPM services in the Philadelphia and New York radio markets, Arbitron has agreed to:
TM
Recruit panelists using a combination of telephone number and addressed-based sampling methods beginning January 2009. Arbitron agreed to use the address-based sampling technique for 15 percent of our recruitment efforts for New York by July 2010 and for Philadelphia by January 2011;
Increase the sample target for persons residing in cell-phone-only households in stages to 15 percent of the total New York radio metro sample target by July 2010 and in the Philadelphia radio metro by January 2011;
Set a target of 20 percent for the Sample Performance Indicator (SPI) by 2011 and take all reasonable measures to achieve in the New York radio metro a minimum 15 percent SPI level by July 2009, 16 percent by October 2009 and 17 percent by June 2010, per the agreement with the Attorney General of the State of New York;
Set a target of 20 percent for the Sample Performance Indicator (SPI) by 2010 and take all reasonable measures to achieve in the Philadelphia radio metro a minimum 15 percent SPI level by October 2009, 16 percent by April 2010 and 17 percent by December 2010;
Take all reasonable measures to achieve average in-tab rates of at least 75 percent for all age/sex and race/ethnicity demo groups in New and Philadelphia by April 1, 2009, and, per the agreement with the Attorney General of the State of New York; ensure that subcategories comprising 10 percent or more of the New York Metro population fall within 90 percent of the overall 75 percent target; and to ensure that subcategories comprising 10 percent or more of the Philadelphia radio metro population fall within 85 percent of the overall 75 percent target
Make all reasonable efforts to obtain and retain accreditation for the New York and Philadelphia PPM radio ratings services from the Media Rating Council;
Provide to subscribers monthly reports detailing the PPM sample sizes by individual zip code in the Philadelphia and New York Markets; and
Include a disclaimer on promotional material indicating that PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of the New York and Philadelphia radio market.
The company also agreed to pay the state of New Jersey $130,000 for investigative costs and expenses.
Jointly and in connection with the settlement agreement with the New York Attorney General also announced on January 7, 2009, the company will pay a single lump sum of $100,000 to the National Association of Black Owned Broadcasters (NABOB) for a joint radio project between NABOB and the Spanish Radio Association to support minority radio; complete a non-response bias study in the New York radio market; and fund an advertising campaign in the radio trade press promoting minority radio.
The New Jersey Attorney General reserves the right to rescind the settlement agreement and reinstitute the civil action if the company has not obtained accreditation from the Media Rating Council for either New York or Philadelphia PPM radio ratings service by December 31, 2009 and also has not achieved all of the specific metrics in the agreement.
The Arbitron Portable People Metersystem uses a passive audience measurement device  about the size of a small cell phone  to track consumer exposure to media and entertainment, including terrestrial, satellite and online radio; broadcast, cable and satellite television as well as cinema advertising and many types of place-based electronic media. Carried throughout the day by randomly selected survey participants, the PPM device can track when and where they watch television, listen to radio as well as how they interact with other forms of media and entertainment.
About the Portable People Meter
The PPM detects inaudible codes embedded in the audio portion of media and entertainment content delivered by broadcasters, content providers and distributors. At the end of the day, the meter is placed in a docking station that extracts the codes and sends them to a central computer. The PPM is equipped with a motion sensor, a patented quality control feature unique to the system, which allows Arbitron to confirm the compliance of the PPM survey participants every day.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and represent the opinion of Arbitron. PPM ratings, like all audience estimates however derived, should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron's executive offices are located in New York City.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2007, our Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended September 30, 2008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090109090224.txt.gz
TIME:20090109090224
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On January 9, 2009 Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") announced that the Media Rating Council ("MRC") has accredited the Company's Portable People Meter TM radio quarter hour ratings data in Riverside-San Bernardino. The Company will host a conference call at 4:30 p.m. Eastern Time on Monday, January 12, 2009 to discuss the accreditation of the PPM service in Riverside-San Bernardino, the recently announced settlements with the New York and New Jersey Attorneys General and other matters. The conference call may be accessed by dialing (toll free) (888) 562-3356. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing (973) 582-2700. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 80146538. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com and www.streetevents.com. On January 9, 2009, the Company issued a statement regarding the MRC Accreditation of the PPM radio ratings data in Riverside-San Bernardino. A copy of the statement is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Item 7.01 (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits The following exhibit relating to Item 7.01 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed: 99.1 Statement of Arbitron Inc. dated January 9, 2009
Forward-Looking Statements This Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibits 99.1, 99.2, 99.3, and 99.4) contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as may, will, should, likely, expects, anticipates, estimates, believes, or plans, or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-l ooking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:  absorb costs related to legal proceedings and governmental entity interactions and avoid related fines, limitations, or conditions on our business activities;  successfully implement the commercialization of our Portable People MeterTM service;  successfully maintain industry usage of our services, a critical mass of broadcaster encoding, and the proper understanding of our audience measurement services and methodology in light of governmental regulation, legislation, litigation, activism or adverse public relations efforts;  successfully design, recruit and maintain PPM panels that appropriately balance research quality, panel size and operational cost;  compete with companies that may have financial, marketing, sales, technical, and other advantages over us;  complete the Media Rating Council (MRC) audits of o ur local market PPM ratings services in a timely manner and successfully obtain and/or maintain MRC accreditation for our audience measurement business;  renew contracts with key customers as they expire;  successfully execute our business strategies, including entering into potential acquisition, joint-venture or other material third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact, if any, of any further ownership shifts in the radio and advertising agency industries;  effectively respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprietary software systems, such as software systems intended to support our cell phone-only sampling plans, and new customer services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully manage the impact on our business of any economic downturn, generally, and in the advertising and radio industries, in particular;  successfully manage the trend of increasing data co llection costs stemming from lower respondent cooperation in surveys, privacy concerns, consumer trends, including the increasing incidence of cell-phone-only households, evolving technology and/or government regulations; and  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to measure new forms of audio-based content and delivery, multimedia and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment. There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, our Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended September 30, 2008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press Information
Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK; January 9, 2009  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that the Media Rating Council (MRC) has accredited the Arbitron Portable People Meter radio quarter hour ratings data in Riverside-San Bernardino.
TM
"The accreditation of the monthly PPM quarter hour radio estimates in Riverside-San Bernardino demonstrates that our Radio First' methodology, which uses a telephone-based sample frame and telephone recruitment, can deliver audience estimates that meet the standards of the Media Rating Council," said Steve Morris, chairman, president and chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc. "Our goal now is to demonstrate that the sample quality initiatives we have committed to for all our PPM markets will have a continuing positive impact, just as they have had in Riverside-San Bernardino."
TM
"Our commitment to MRC accreditation means a commitment to continuous improvement," said Mr. Morris. "In Riverside-San Bernardino, we are continuing to work with the MRC on enhancing the quality of the sample."
The PPM radio estimates in Riverside are based on Arbitron's Radio First' PPM methodology, which uses a telephone-based sampling and recruitment methodology and includes both landline and cell-phone-only households.
The MRC has accredited the monthly quarter hour radio ratings data in Riverside-San Bernardino, which are the "buy-sell" currency data for PPM markets. Arbitron has not submitted weekly and minute-by-minute PPM data for MRC accreditation.
Arbitron will host a conference call at 4:30 p.m. Eastern Time on Monday, January 12, 2009 to discuss the accreditation of the PPM service in Riverside-San Bernardino, the recently announced settlements with the New York and New Jersey Attorneys General and other matters.
Investor Call: Schedule and Access
The Company invites you to listen to the call by dialing (toll free) (888) 562-3356. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing (973) 582-2700. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 80146538. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com and www.streetevents.com.
A replay of the call will be available from 7:30 p.m. on January 12 through 11:59 p.m. on February 14, 2009. To access the replay, please call (toll free) 800-642-1687 in the United States, or 706-645-9291 if you're calling from outside of the United States. To access the replay, users will need to enter the following code: 80146538.
Arbitron submits voluntarily to the Media Rating Council process and is following the requirements of the draft Voluntary Code of Conduct (VCOC).
About the MRC Voluntary Code of Conduct
The VCOC requires, at minimum, that a measurement service seeking to replace an existing accredited currency product in a market submit the replacement product to a rigorous independent audit and that the results of the audit are shared with customers who are members of MRC prior to commercialization of the replacement product. The VCOC also requires a period of comparison data for customers to evaluate.
Arbitron fulfilled the minimum prerequisites of the VCOC prior to the commercialization of Philadelphia on April 27, 2007, prior to the commercialization of Houston on July 18, 2007, prior to the commercialization of New York, Los Angeles, Chicago, San Francisco, Nassau-Suffolk, Riverside-San Bernardino, San Jose and Middlesex-Somerset-Union on October 6, 2008 and prior to the commercialization of Dallas-Ft. Worth, Atlanta, Washington DC and Detroit on December 31, 2008.
More information about the MRC and the MRC Accreditation process can be found at www.mediaratingcouncil.org
The Arbitron Portable People Metersystem uses a passive audience measurement device  about the size of a small cell phone  to track consumer exposure to media and entertainment, including broadcast, cable and satellite television; terrestrial, satellite and online radio as well as cinema advertising and many types of place-based electronic media. Carried throughout the day by randomly selected survey participants, the PPM device can track when and where they watch television, listen to radio as well as how they interact with other forms of media and entertainment.
About the Portable People Meter
TM
TM
The PPM detects inaudible codes embedded in the audio portion of media and entertainment content delivered by broadcasters, content providers and distributors. At the end of the day, the meter is placed in a docking station that extracts the codes and sends them to a central computer. The PPM is equipped with a motion sensor, a patented quality control feature unique to the system, which allows Arbitron to confirm the compliance of the PPM survey participants every day.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and represent the opinion of Arbitron. PPM ratings, like all audience estimates however derived, should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland. Arbitron's executive offices are located in New York City.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Media Rating Council and the "double checkmark" logo design are registered marks of the Media Rating Council.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2007, our Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended September 30, 2008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090112071611.txt.gz
TIME:20090112071611
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
Effective January 12, 2009 the Board of Directors (the "Board") of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") appointed Michael P. Skarzynski as President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company. Pursuant to the Executive Employment Agreement by and between the Company and Mr. Skarzynski described below, the Board intends to appoint Mr. Skarzynski as a director of the Company at a special Board meeting as soon as practicable. During 2008, Mr. Skarzynski, age 52, served as President and Chief Executive Officer of Iptivia, Inc., a privately held network performance management software company. From 2007 to 2008, he was founder and Managing Director of Red Lion Technologies, a consulting firm. From 2005 to 2007, Mr. Skarzynski was Chief Executive Officer of Performance Technologies, Inc., a NASDAQ listed telecommunications and IP networking equipment company. From 2003 to 2005, he was Vice President  International Operations for UTStarcom, Inc., a NASDAQ listed wireline, wireless, optical and access switching developer. The Company has determined that there are no related person transactions between the Company and Mr. Skarzynski within the meaning of Item 404(a) of Regulation S-K. Also effective as of January 12, 2009 and as previously announced, upon the Boards appointment of Mr. Skarzynski, Stephen B. Morris transitioned from his position as President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company to become an advisor to the Board. Pursuant to the terms and conditions of an Executive Transition Agreement disclosed by the Company in a Current Report on Form 8-K on December 31, 2008, Mr. Morris will remain an employee of the Company and be available to provide transition assistance, consultation, and advice through December 31, 2009 and will serve, for such time as the Board chooses, as Chairman of the Board. Executive Employment Agreement On January 7, 2009, the Company and Mr. Skarzynski entered into an Executive Employment Agreement, effective as of January 12, 2009 (the "Agreement") covering Mr. Skarzynskis employment as President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company. Pursuant to the Agreement, the Board intends to appoint Mr. Skarzynski as a director of the Company at a special meeting of the Board as soon as practicable. For so long as Mr. Skarzynski remains Chief Executive Officer of the Company, the Board intends to nominate him to the Board, and if elected by the Companys stockholders, Mr. Skarzynski will serve as a member of the Board without additional consideration while employed. Salary and Bonus or Incentive Compensation Pursuant to the terms and conditions of the Agreement, the Company will pay Mr. Skarzynski an annual base salary of $500,000 and Mr. Skarzynski will be eligible to receive an annual incentive bonus equal to 100% of his annual base salary upon meeting applicable performance criteria set by the Boards Compensation and Human Resources Committee (the "Compensation Committee"). For performance exceedi ng such applicable performance criteria, the annual incentive bonus will be increased to an amount in excess of the target bonus up to a maximum of 200% of annual base salary, at the sole discretion of the Compensation Committee. The Company will pay an annual bonus in the minimum amount of $250,000 for 2009, provided that Mr. Skarzynski is an employee in good standing on December 31, 2009. The Compensation Committee will review the base salary no less frequently than annually. If increased, the increased base salary will become the base salary for all purposes under the Agreement. Equity Grant Subject to approval by the Compensation Committee, the Company will grant to Mr. Skarzynski an equity award to be valued at $1,250,000 on the date of grant, with the award divided by value into 50% stock options and 50% restricted stock units, each with respect to the Companys common stock, par value $0.50 (the "Common Stock") (where the value for the options is determined using the Company&#x 2019;s standard Black-Scholes assumptions applied as of the date of grant and where the value for the restricted stock units is determined by dividing the target value for the restricted stock units by the fair market value of the Common Stock on the grant date) (the "Inducement Grant"). Subject to the Compensation Committees further approval, the Company will grant to Mr. Skarzynski an additional equity award prior to or in connection with the Companys February 2009 grant cycle, valued at $1,250,000 and divided into stock options and restricted stock units in the same manner as the Inducement Grant, but based on the fair market value of the Common Stock on the grant date (the "First Year Grant"). The Inducement Grant and the First Year Grant will be made under the Companys 1999 Stock Incentive Plan or 2008 Equity Compensation Plan (as applicable and with any successor plan, the "Stock Plans") as the Compensation Committee selects. Assuming continued employment, the stock options u nder the Inducement Grant and the First Year Grant will each vest in equal amounts on an annual basis over a three year period following the date of grant (beginning with one third on the first anniversary), and otherwise will contain substantially the same terms and conditions as the Companys standard form of nonqualified stock option agreement adopted for use under the applicable Stock Plan. Assuming continued employment, the restricted stock units under the Inducement and First Year Grants will each vest in equal amounts over a four year period following the date of grant (beginning with 25% on the first anniversary) and otherwise will contain the same terms and conditions as the Companys standard form of restricted stock unit agreement adopted for use under the applicable Stock Plan. The Compensation Committee, at its sole discretion, will consider the grant of additional compensatory stock awards to Mr. Skarzynski no less frequently than annually. Benefits Mr. Skarz ynski will, to the extent eligible, be entitled to participate at a level commensurate with his position in all employee welfare, benefit, and retirement plans and programs the Company provides to its executives in accordance with Company policies. Mr. Skarzynski will work at the Companys offices in Columbia, Maryland. Providing that Mr. Skarzynski relocates to a primary residence in proximity to Columbia, Maryland, the company will reimburse Mr. Skarzynski for relocation expenses and temporary living expenses up to a maximum of $300,000. If Mr. Skarzynskis employment ends before December 31, 2010 as a result of resignation or termination for Cause (as defined in the Agreement), Mr. Skarzynski will repay a pro rata portion of the relocation expenses to the Company. The Company will also pay Mr. Skarzynski an annual allowance of $10,000 for tax preparation and financial planning. Potential Payments Upon Early Termination The Company or Mr. Skarzynski may terminate the Agreeme nt at any time for any reason, or for no reason. If Mr. Skarzynskis employment terminates for any reason (including for Cause), the Company will pay to Mr. Skarzynski (i) any earned but unpaid annual base salary; (ii) any earned but unpaid annual bonus; (iii) any unreimbursed business expenses, in accordance with the Companys policies; (iv) any unpaid relocation or temporary living expenses (subject to the repayment obligation described above); and (v) any amounts or benefits payable under any Company benefit plans then in effect. In addition to the payments described above, if the Company terminates Mr. Skarzynskis employment without Cause, Mr. Skarzynski will be entitled to receive cash severance and the full cost of health care continuation until the earlier of 18 months or subsequent coverage. If Mr. Skarzynski is entitled to receive cash severance in connection with a without Cause termination, the Company will pay to him in cash (i) an amount equal to two times the th en applicable base salary; and (ii) a bonus component. If Mr. Skarzynskis employment is terminated without Cause during 2009, the bonus component will be $500,000. If, in subsequent years, the annual bonus for the year of termination is determined by the Compensation Committee under a program intended to qualify as performance-based for purposes of Section 162(m) of the Internal Revenue Code (an "Exempt Bonus"), the bonus component will be determined under the factors for such bonus, but without the exercise by the Compensation Committee of negative discretion (with the expectation, if all performance factors are satisfied, that the bonus component would be two times target bonus). If the annual bonus for the year of termination is not intended to be an Exempt Bonus, the bonus component will be two times target bonus. In addition to the payments described above, if, within 12 months following a Change in Control (as defined in the Agreement), Mr. Skarzynskis employment ends on a ter mination without Cause, any outstanding equity compensation awards will fully and immediately vest and become exercisable. In order to receive the severance benefits provided under the Agreement, Mr. Skarzynski must execute a release in the form provided by the Company of all legally-releasable claims that Mr. Skarzynski may then have against the Company and any of its affiliates. Non-Competition, Non-Recruitment, and Non-Disparagement The Agreement contains provisions pursuant to which Mr. Skarzynski has agreed that, while employed and for the longest of 12 months following termination for any reason not involving termination by the Company without Cause, 18 months following termination by the Company without Cause, and 24 months following termination by the Company without Cause within 12 months after a Change in Control, he will not directly or indirectly, subject to certain de minimis exceptions involving the ownership of publicly traded securities, compete with any part of the Com panys business. Mr. Skarzynski has agreed during employment and for 12 months thereafter not to initiate or actively participate in any other employers recruitment or hiring of Company employees. The Agreement also contains mutual non-disparagement provisions. The foregoing summary of the Agreement is qualified in its entirety by the full terms and conditions of the Agreement, a copy of which will be filed as an exhibit to the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the period ended December 31, 2008 and is incorporated herein by reference. A copy of the press release announcing the events described above is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK; January 12, 2009  The Board of Directors for Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that it has appointed Michael P. Skarzynski as president and chief executive officer, effective immediately. Mr. Skarzynski will also be appointed to Arbitron's Board of Directors. Stephen B. Morris will continue as chairman of the board and will be an advisor to Mr. Skarzynski during the transition.
"After a thorough search process, we believe we have selected the candidate that best matches the requirements for leading the company during these challenging economic times," said Phil Guarascio, Arbitron director and chairman, Arbitron Board Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee. "Michael Skarzynski is an accomplished corporate executive with three decades of experience in general management, sales, marketing, finance, business development, technology, government and international business. He is the perfect leader to build on Arbitron's strong foundation and to leverage the latest technology to respond to the rapidly changing needs of our current clients and future customers around the world."
"When I came to Arbitron in December 1992, we were just announcing the program to develop the Portable People Meter. Now that the PPM has been successfully commercialized in 14 markets and remains on track for its full commercialization in the top radio markets, this is a good time to hand the reins over to a new chief executive officer," said Mr. Morris. "Michael is a visionary leader who can translate the needs of customers and the marketplace into innovative products and services."
Most recently, Mr. Skarzynski served as chief executive officer of Iptivia, a privately held performance management software company based in New York City, where he was responsible for the restructuring and global expansion of the business.
"What attracted me to Arbitron are the significant accomplishments and market leadership of the company," said Mr. Skarzynski. "I am impressed with the enormous opportunity for Arbitron and I am honored to join this team. My priorities are clear: focus the collective talent and commitment of the Arbitron team to support our worldwide customer base and ensure our joint success in today's economic climate."
Mr. Skarzynski was an executive with Lucent and AT&T Network Systems where he held a number of sales, marketing, business development and general manager positions, including vice president and chief operating officer of the Emerging Service Provider Business, a multi-billion dollar business unit.
He has served as chief executive officer for one public company, Performance Technologies and three privately held technology firms  Iptivia, Xebeo and Predictive Networks.
His experience also includes management positions with Motorola and appointments as Assistant Secretary for Trade Development and Chief of Staff at the U.S. Department of Commerce. Mr. Skarzynski started his career as an Assistant to the President of the Center for Strategic and International Studies (CSIS) in Washington, D.C.
Mr. Skarzynski earned a Bachelor of Science in Foreign Service degree from Georgetown University in 1978 and a Master of Business Administration degree from Northwestern University in 1983. He is a member of the Council on Competitiveness, National Defense Industrial Association, Navy League of the United States, Association for Corporate Growth, Lean Enterprise Institute and is a 49er' with the Young Presidents Organization.
Mr. Skarzynski, 52, will work at the Arbitron Columbia, Maryland office.
Steve Morris, 65, served as chief executive officer for Arbitron for 16 years and will continue to serve as chairman of the board.
Arbitron will host a conference call at 4:30 p.m. Eastern Time on Monday, January 12, 2009 to discuss the executive transition, the accreditation of the PPM service in Riverside-San Bernardino, the recently announced settlements with the New York and New Jersey Attorneys General and other matters.
Investor Call: Schedule and Access
The Company invites you to listen to the call by dialing (toll free) 888-562-3356. The call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing 973-582-2700. Users will need to use the following code: 80146538. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com and www.streetevents.com.
A replay of the call will be available from 7:30 p.m. on January 12 through 11:59 p.m. on February 14, 2009. To access the replay, please call (toll free) 800-642-1687 in the United States, or 706-645-9291 if you're calling from outside of the United States. To access the replay, users will need to enter the following code: 80146538.
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090122171246.txt.gz
TIME:20090122171246
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On January 21, 2009 the Board of Directors (the "Board") of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") adopted a resolution increasing the number of persons comprising the Board from eight to nine and elected Michael P. Skarzynski, the Companys President and Chief Executive Officer, as a member of the Board to serve until the next annual meeting of stockholders of the Company and until his successor shall have been elected and qualified, or until his earlier death, resignation, or removal. The Board also appointed Mr. Skarzynski to serve as a member of the Executive Committee of the Board. The election of Mr. Skarzynski was pursuant to the terms of an Executive Employment Agreement by and between the Company and Mr. Skarzynski previously disclosed in a Current Report on Form 8-K filed by the Company on January 12, 2009, which Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated herein by reference. The Company has determined that there are no related person transactions between the Company and Mr. Skarzynsk i within the meaning of Item 404(a) of Regulation S-K.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090217073109.txt.gz
TIME:20090217073109
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 17, 2009, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release reporting 2008 fourth quarter and year end financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated February 17, 2009.
The information in this Form 8-K and the attached Exhibit are furnished to comply with Item 2.02 and Item 9.01 of Form 8-K. Neither this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit are to be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 (except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing).
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Arbitron Inc. Phone: 410-312-8410 sean.creamer@arbitron.com
Company Contact: Sean Creamer, CFO
KCSA Worldwide 212-896-1215 tfromer@kcsa.com
Investor Contact: Todd Fromer
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor and Media contact: Thom Mocarsky
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the fourth quarter and year ended December 31, 2008.
NEW YORK; February 17, 2009 
Net income for the quarter was $3.4 million, or $0.13 per share (diluted), compared with $3.7 million, or $0.13 per share (diluted) for the fourth quarter of 2007.
For the fourth quarter of 2008, the Company reported revenue of $93.6 million, an increase of 16.8 percent over revenue of $80.1 million during the fourth quarter of 2007.
Costs and expenses for the fourth quarter increased by 18.2 percent, from $79.9 million in 2007 to $94.5 million in 2008, due primarily to planned expenditures for the commercialization of the Portable People Meter ratings service and legal costs due primarily to actions undertaken by the New York and New Jersey Attorneys General. In the fourth quarter of 2008, share-based compensation totaled $2.0 million compared to $1.5 million in 2007.
TM
Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for the quarter were $6.7 million, an increase of 8.6 percent compared with EBIT of $6.2 million for the fourth quarter of 2007.
Income from continuing operations for the quarter was $3.4 million or $0.13 per share (diluted), compared with $4.1 million, or $0.14 per share (diluted) in the fourth quarter of 2007.
For the full year ended December 31, 2008, revenue was $368.8 million, an increase of 9.0 percent over revenue of $338.5 million for the same period in 2007. Costs and expenses for the year increased by 11.9 percent from $279.2 million in 2007 to $312.4 million in 2008, due primarily to the planned expenditures for the commercialization of PPM. Share-based compensation in 2008 was $8.4 million as compared to $6.5 million in 2007.
Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) decreased 0.3 percent from $63.3 million in the full-year 2007 to $63.1 million for the same period in 2008. Net income for the full-year 2008 decreased 7.5 percent to $37.2 million compared with $40.2 million in 2007. Earnings per share (diluted) for the full-year 2008 were $1.36 compared with $1.35 per share (diluted) last year.
Income from continuing operations for the full-year 2008 decreased to $37.2 million or $1.37 per share (diluted) from $40.5 million or $1.37 per share (diluted), in 2007.
On January 31, 2008, Arbitron concluded the sale of CSW Research Limited ("Continental"), its UK-based custom research business. As a result, Continental's financial results have been reclassified as a Discontinued Operation for all periods presented. In the fourth quarter of 2008 and 2007, the Company reported losses (net of tax) from Continental of $24 thousand and $458 thousand, respectively. For the full years 2008 and 2007, the losses from discontinued operations (net of tax) were $39 thousand and $324 thousand, respectively.
Michael Skarzynski, president and chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc., made the following comments:
Management comment on 2008 results
"In the fourth quarter of 2008, we restarted the commercialization of the Portable People Meter service by bringing electronic measurement to radio in 12 new markets including New York, Los Angeles, Chicago, San Francisco, Dallas, Atlanta, Detroit and Washington D.C. With the recent MRC accreditation in Riverside-San Bernardino, we continue to make progress in the commercialization of our PPM radio ratings services. We also signed settlement agreements with the New York and New Jersey Attorneys General and are implementing programs that we believe will further improve our PPM services.
"These are all significant accomplishments that keep our long-term plans to commercialize PPM in radio's largest markets solidly on track.
"We have also strengthened our commitment to continuous improvement in markets of all sizes. We are adding cell-phone-only households to our samples in diary markets and have accelerated the development of electronic and online alternatives to the paper and pencil diary for all markets.
"Our goal is to maintain our leadership position in radio research in markets large and small while helping the radio industry prosper once again in the highly competitive media environment,said Mr. Skarzynski.
"
For the full year 2009, Arbitron expects revenue to increase between 6 percent and 10 percent compared to the 2008 revenue of $368.8 million.
Company Guidance for 2009
Earnings per share (diluted) for the full year 2009 is expected to be between $1.40 and $1.55, an increase of between 3 percent to 14 percent, versus $1.36 in 2008.
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time. The Company invites you to listen to the call by dialing (toll free) 888-868-9083. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing 973-935-8512. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 79664083. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.streetevents.com and www.arbitron.com/investors/.
Earnings conference call: schedule and access
A replay of the call will be available from 12:00 p.m. on February 17 through 11:59 p.m. on March 1, 2009. To access the replay, please call (toll free) 800-642-1687 in the United States, or 706-645-9291 if you're calling from outside of the United States. To access the replay, users will need to enter the following code: 79664083.
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to, either income from continuing operations, as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Through its Scarborough Research joint venture with The Nielsen Company, Arbitron provides additional media and marketing research services to the broadcast television, newspaper and online industries.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2007, our Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended September 30, 2008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
(3) Arbitron's management believes that presenting EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization), both non-GAAP financial measures, as supplemental information helps investors, analysts, and others, if they so choose, in understanding and evaluating Arbitron's operating performance in some of the same manners that management does because EBIT and EBITDA exclude certain items that are not directly related to Arbitron's core operating performance. Arbitron's management references these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing current performance and making decisions about internal budgets, resource allocation and financial goals. EBIT is calculated by deducting net interest income from income from continuing operations and adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to income from continuing operations. EBITDA is calculated by deducting net interest income from income from continuing operations and adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, and depreciation and amortization to income from continuing operations. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered substitutes either for income from continuing operations, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090225074607.txt.gz
TIME:20090225074607
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
In connection with a strategic review by Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") of its operations, effective as of February 24, 2009, the positions of President, Sales and Marketing and President, Technology, Research and Development of the Company have been eliminated. Pierre C. Bouvard, previously President, Sales and Marketing of the Company will become Executive Vice President, Sales of the Company. Owen Charlebois employment as President, Technology, Research and Development of the Company will be terminated effective as of March 22, 2009. Mr. Charlebois will be entitled to receive severance compensation pursuant to the terms and conditions of a previously disclosed Executive Retention Agreement by and between the Company and Mr. Charlebois dated August 28, 2008.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090302150601.txt.gz
TIME:20090302150601
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On March 2, 2009, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") delivered a letter from Michael P. Skarzynski, the Company's President and Chief Executive Officer, to The Honorable Robert Menendez, United States Senator for the State of New Jersey regarding the Company's Portable People MeterTM market improvement program. A copy of the letter is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. On March 2, 2009 the Company also issued a press release regarding the foregoing matters. A copy of that press release is attached as Exhibit 99.2 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Item 7.01 (including Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the E xchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits The following exhibit relating to Item 7.01 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed: 99.1 Letter from Michael P. Skarzynski to The Honorable Robert Menendez 99.2 Statement of Arbitron Inc. dated March 2, 2009
Forward-Looking Statements This Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2) contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as may, will, should, likely, expects, anticipates, estimates, believes, or plans, or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statem ents. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:  absorb costs related to legal proceedings and governmental entity interactions and avoid related fines, limitations, or conditions on our business activities;  successfully commercialize our Portable People MeterTM service;  successfully manage the impact on our business of the current economic downturn generally, and in the advertising market, in particular, including, without limitation, the insolvency of any of our customers or the impact of such downturn on our customers ability to fulfill their payment obligations to us;  successfully maintain and promote industry usage of our services, a critical mass of broadcaster encoding, and the proper understanding of our audience measurement services and methodology in light of governmental regulation, legislation, litigation, activism, or adverse public relations efforts;  compete with companies th at may have financial, marketing, sales, technical, or other advantages over us;  successfully design, recruit and maintain PPM panels that appropriately balance research quality, panel size, and operational cost;  successfully develop, implement, and fund initiatives designed to increase sample sizes;  complete the Media Rating Council, Inc. (MRC) audits of our local market PPM ratings services in a timely manner and successfully obtain and/or maintain MRC accreditation for our audience measurement business;  renew contracts with key customers;  successfully execute our business strategies, including entering into potential acquisition, joint-venture or other material third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact, if any, of any further ownership shifts in the radio and advertising agency industries;  effectively respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new pr oprietary software systems, such as software systems to support our cell phone-only sampling plans, and new customer services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperation in surveys, consumer trends including a trend toward increasing incidence of cell phone-only households, privacy concerns, technology changes, and/or government regulations; and  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to encode and/or measure new forms of media content and delivery, and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment. There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2 008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

February 27, 2009
The Honorable Robert Menendez United States Senate 317 Hart Senate Office Building Washington, DC 20510-4305
Dear Senator Menendez:
Thank you again for meeting with me at your office on February 12, 2009, to discuss the progress Arbitron has made in our introduction of electronic audience measurement into the major United States radio markets.
I want to reiterate that Arbitron is committed to ensuring that all radio listeners are fully and fairly represented by our radio ratings services, and that we have been focused on that goal every dayfor more than 40 years.
In my short time since joining Arbitron on January 12, 2009, as the new Chief Executive Officer, I have been in regular and frequent dialogue with our Portable People Meter (PPM) customers, including members of the National Association of Black Owned Broadcasters and the Spanish Radio Association. I am committed to continue our focus on and to resolve satisfactorily the concerns of all of our PPM market customers in terms of the sample size, sample proportionality and sample quality of our PPM panels. I want to assure you that Arbitron is actively engaged in the continuous improvement of our PPM and Diary market services. Thanks to specific customer input, Arbitron is already making good progress on improvements in many operational areas. As an integral part of the company's continuous improvement programs, Arbitron is on track to meet or exceed 100 percent of the settlement agreement criteria with the Attorney General of New Jersey and the Attorney General of the State of New York.
Please allow me to summarize the commitments and progress that Arbitron is making in our continuous improvement program for the PPM markets in more detail.
As a first step, Arbitron will provide all PPM markets with the benefit of many of the key methodological enhancements that we have committed to in our agreements with the attorneys general of New Jersey, New York and Maryland. While there will be some variation in metrics and milestones based on particulars of the local market environments, all of our PPM customers would be able to count on receiving enhancements to our PPM methodology in four key areas:
In addition, customers in all PPM markets can expect to see increased transparency for more of the sample metrics of our PPM survey research, including the distribution of our sample by zip code and by cell phone status. We will also continue to share with all customers any current and future findings of the impact of nonresponse on the PPM service.
Arbitron intends to maintain its commitment to Media Rating Council (MRC) accreditation in all PPM and Diary markets. Arbitron recognizes that the U.S. Congress inspired the formation of the MRC in order to secure for the media industry and related users audience measurement that is valid, reliable and effective.
The Media Rating Council's accreditation of Arbitron's PPM radio ratings in Houston-Galveston and Riverside-San Bernardino stands as a testament to Arbitron's commitment to transparency, accuracy and the delivery of high-quality audience measurement. MRC accreditation reaffirms Arbitron's dedication to maintaining an industry-wide gold standard for audience measurement.
Beyond the progress that I have just outlined, we are also addressing specific matters of interest to the Spanish Radio Association, including country of origin, which I will review in this letter.
Finally, I would like to review some news highlights from PPM markets across the country. Broadcasters have recently converted two general-market formatted radio stations, one in Los Angeles and one in Dallas, to Spanish-language formats, and the early PPM ratings estimates indicate a promising start for the new Spanish station in Los Angeles.
Let me now address the commitments we are making to all of our customers, starting with the key methodological enhancements that we are extending to all PPM markets.
1: Extending our commitment to cell-phone-only sampling to all PPM markets
Arbitron will increase the sample target for cell-phone-only households in all PPM markets to an average of 15 percent by year-end 2010. In an interim step, the current target of 7.5 percent will be raised to 12.5 percent in PPM markets by year-end 2009. (Monthly milestones within each year will vary by market. Our latest cell phone research is indicating that markets such as Nassau-Suffolk and Middlesex-Somerset-Union have a cell-phone-only penetration that is significantly less than 15 percent.)
Arbitron has recognized from the beginning of the PPM service that coverage of cell-phone-only households is very important. Arbitron has been at the forefront of measuring cell-phone-only persons, including conducting the first survey ever in the United States that called cell phones in 2002. Our commitment to understanding how to measure cell-phone-only persons and households has been cited by leaders in the survey research industry.
This commitment to cell-phone-only sampling is important because Federal statistics show that Hispanics and Blacks are more likely to live in cell-phone-only households.
We believe that increasing the number of cell-phone-only households in our PPM samples will be an important element in our ongoing programs to enhance the participation of 18- to 34-year-olds by race and ethnicity. As the number of households that can be reached only by cell phone continues to grow, Arbitron plans to update its methodologies to better include this important segment of the population.
2: Cell-phone-only sampling plans for Diary markets
Arbitron is also committing to expanding cell-phone-only sampling to 151 Diary markets in Spring 2009 and to all Diary markets in the continental U.S., Alaska and Hawaii by Fall 2009. Arbitron also plans to use an address-based sample frame as the foundation of its cell-phone-only sample in Diary markets, while maintaining the effective random-digit-dial (RDD) sample frame for landline households.
3: Extending our commitment to address-based sampling to all PPM markets
In keeping with our national commitment to increase cell-phone-only sample, Arbitron is committing to the use of address-based sampling technique for at least 10 percent of its sampling efforts by late 2009 and for at least 15 percent of its recruitment efforts by the end of December 2010 in all PPM markets. (Again, monthly milestones within each year will vary by market.)
Because federal law prohibits auto-dialing wireless lines without consent from the called party, Arbitron, as a survey researcher, cannot efficiently use a random-digit-dial sample frame to expand cell-phone-only sampling in our PPM markets. That is why, effective with the March 2009 survey period, random-digit-dial, telephone-based sampling will be replaced with address-based sampling for cell-phone-only households.
This new method is more efficient than the manual dialing procedures we had been using and should allow us to substantially increase the number of cell-phone-only persons included in our panels.
We are also retaining the random-digit-dialing sampling method for landline homes because that approach enables telephone contact with a higher percentage of landline homes not listed in telephone directories. These unlisted landline households, which are more likely than listed ones to contain Hispanics, Blacks and young adults, are still best reached through a random-digit-dial frame. Their inclusion in the random-digit-dial frame, along with the additional recruitment contacts that a telephone-based method makes possible, can improve the overall representation of these groups in our PPM samples.
4: Extending our agreement for compliance metrics to all PPM markets
In our agreements with New Jersey, New York and Maryland, we committed to take all reasonable measures to achieve average In-Tab rates of at least 75 percent for all Persons aged 6 and older by specific dates and to work to minimize differential compliance (with differing metrics across local markets) for demographic subcategories comprising 10 percent or more of the population in a PPM market.
Arbitron is applying the agreed-upon 75 percent metric to all PPM markets. In addition, we are also implementing in all PPM markets many of the techniques and methods that we are using to minimize differential compliance rates in order to fulfill the terms of the New Jersey, New York and Maryland agreements. (Specific programs and techniques are being applied based on an individual market's in-tab performance.)
5: Our commitment to enhancing Sample Performance Indicator (SPI)
In our agreements with New Jersey, New York and Maryland, Arbitron committed to set a target of 20 percent for the Sample Performance Indicator (SPI) by 2010. While we have set a target of 20 percent, we also agreed to take all reasonable measures to achieve certain interim minimums, such as 15 percent SPI level in mid-2009, 16 percent SPI in late 2009 and 17 percent SPI in 2010. (The precise milestones vary by market.)
SPI is a longitudinal measure that is used as a proxy for response metrics in electronic media panels for radio and television. No metric is more variable by local market than SPI; smaller markets tend to have higher SPI metrics than larger ones. The newest PPM markets, which were first recruited in 2008, have also received the benefit of our response rate and compliance programs starting with the very first recruitment contact. In these markets, SPI metrics are already above our commitments to New Jersey, New York and Maryland.
Based on the progress we are seeing in our response rate programs, we have informed the MRC that we hope to achieve a 21 percent SPI average across all PPM markets by the end of 2010.
Arbitron commitments to greater transparency
Our commitments to New Jersey, New York and Maryland do not stop with sampling, recruitment and compliance improvements. They include greater transparency in terms of information regarding PPM sample composition and other metrics of PPM services. We intend to provide additional information in all PPM markets that many of our clients have indicated they would find useful and that would help clients understand the strengths and limitations of PPM samples.
6: Understanding sample distribution by zip code reports
Going beyond the New Jersey, New York and Maryland agreements, we will provide in all PPM markets installation and in-tabulation data by individual zip code, along with market population data for Blacks, Hispanics and others (non-Black or non-Hispanic) for each individual zip code. We have also released a new and enhanced Web application, PD Advantage Web, which allows a station access to unweighted audience information for zip codes where 20 percent or more of the panelists report exposure to the station (subject to appropriate minimums over time).
7: Understanding how our sample is distributed by cell-phone-only status
Since cell-phone-only sampling is of vital interest to our customers, Arbitron will continue its practice of publishing the percentages of installed and In-Tab cell-phone-only sample in the front of all monthly Arbitron electronic PPM market reports.
8: Understanding the potential for nonresponse bias
While Arbitron has committed to complete a nonresponse bias study in the New York market by July 15, 2009, we intend for all PPM markets to benefit from the findings of that study. Arbitron has already conducted nonresponse studies in Houston-Galveston and Philadelphia, and has shared the results of the Philadelphia study at a research industry conference. In the case of the New York study, should the findings indicate any measurable statistical bias, Arbitron will inform all of our clients of the identified sources of that statistical bias in our PPM methodology and will take reasonable measures to address those sources.
9: Our ongoing commitment to MRC accreditation
Another important ongoing commitment is to obtain and maintain accreditation by the MRC in all of our PPM and Diary markets. While there are milestones in our agreements with New Jersey, New York and Maryland, that commitment to MRC accreditation extends to all PPM and Diary markets.
In my first month with the company, I have devoted a substantial amount of time in meetings with the MRC executive staff and Arbitron's customers who serve on the MRC Radio Committee, as well as in internal company meetings related to MRC accreditation activities.
One positive outcome of our continued commitment is the January 2009 decision by the MRC to accredit the Arbitron PPM radio quarter-hour ratings data in Riverside-San Bernardino, California. Riverside-San Bernardino is a heavily Hispanic market, with Hispanics accounting for 46.7 percent of the population and Spanish-dominant Hispanics accounting for 21.5 percent of the market.
The accreditation in Riverside-San Bernardino demonstrates that our Radio First' methodology, which uses a telephone-based sampling and recruitment methodology that includes both landline and cell-phone-only households, can deliver audience estimates that can be accredited by the MRC. We are using the Radio-First' sampling methodology in PPM markets outside of Houston-Galveston.
Our goal now is to demonstrate that the sample quality initiatives we have committed to for all of our PPM markets will have a continuing positive impact, just as they have had in Riverside-San Bernardino.
Beyond the progress to date that I have just outlined, we are also addressing additional matters of importance to the Spanish Radio Association, including country of origin.
10: Country of origin
The option to see the current composition of the Hispanic sample by country of origin has been a topic of discussion with Hispanic broadcasters. We have already conducted zip code analyses by density of country of origin population in New York City specifically to address this concern. The long-term objective is to have this information available on an ongoing basis to provide a degree of assurance that the country of origin representation is reasonable and reflective of the proper mix of Hispanics in a given market.
We have worked in a collaborative effort with the leading researchers of the Spanish Radio Association to define a multistep process to achieve this goal.
Arbitron has conducted a test of three markets selected by the Spanish Radio Association (Houston-Galveston, Los Angeles and New York) to determine if asking the country of origin question during one of our regular status calls to PPM households would have an adverse impact on the PPM sample. Early results from the test are indicating that we will be able to collect and track country of origin without affecting the quality of the sample.
While full test results are pending, we don't anticipate any significant roadblock to the implementation of country of origin in PPM markets with a significant Hispanic population.
News From PPM markets
At the same time that we are making improvements based on the input of our customers, our radio clients are also learning how to take advantage of the new PPM measurement system. We have seen changes in the ratings of many stations as programmers have made adjustments in the presentation of their programming. We have seen Urban radio come back in Houston-Galveston to consistently take the top spot. We have seen Spanish-language radio rise to number one in Dallas, which was not the case in the Diary service.
During the week of February 16, 2009, CBS Radio in Dallas replaced Rhythmic Adult Contemporary "Movin" KMVK-FM with a Spanish-language Hot Adult Contemporary format. Dallas now has a dozen PPM-rated Spanish-language radio stations, serving a market that is 15.7 percent Spanish dominant.
In Los Angeles in mid-January 2009, Entravision (to great public outcry) dropped the Anglo-focused Alternative format on KDLD-FM and switched the station to Mexican Regional. In a matter of a few weeks, ratings for "El Gato 103.1" increased by as much as three times.
On January 16, 2009, the radio trade publication published an article written by Latin editor Jackie Madrigal reviewing the steps that Spanish-language broadcasters are taking to get ready for the introduction of electronic measurement in future PPM markets.
Radio and Records
Bobby Ramos, program director for Sun City Latin rhythm station KVIB-FM in Phoenix, is quoted: "You can actually see what drives a listener, whether it's a song, DJ chatter or a commercial...learning how to use this system will begin to answer key questions, like what to do and what not to do and the rest is left to good, passionate programming."
George Mier, program director for CBS Radio's Spanish Tropical WYUU-FM in Tampa noted: "From a programming point of view, it [PPM] is a far more accurate reading than the Diary."
On February 27, 2009, a article noted that "Another big winner since the advent of the portable people meter is WOJO-FM (105.1), the Hispanic station that jumped from fourth place in the last book to No. 2 in the January report among 25-to-54-year-olds. The station's huge success underscores the importance of the city's Hispanicsand their love for radio formatted to appeal to them. And never count out the urban adult contemporary format in Chicago, where it is obviously a draw..."
Chicago Sun-Times
We believe these experiences and our commitment to continuous improvement point to the progress being made with PPM nationally.
I am very pleased to provide this progress report to you, and I wish to reiterate my commitment to addressing specific priorities of our customers regarding sample size, proportionality and related quality metrics. I welcome the opportunity to work with you and your staff, and look forward to keeping you fully apprised of our progress.
Sincerely,
Michael Skarzynski President and Chief Executive Officer Arbitron Inc.

FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK; March 2, 2009  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) confirmed today that it has been extending to all PPM markets a number of the key methodological enhancements that the company committed to in its agreements with the Attorneys General of New Jersey, New York and Maryland.
While there is variation in metrics and milestones based on particulars of the local market environments, all of Arbitron PPM customers are in the process of receiving enhancements to the PPM methodology in four key areas:
In addition, customers in all PPM markets will be seeing an increase in transparency for more of the sample metrics of in the Arbitron PPM survey research, including the distribution of sample by zip code and by cell phone status. Arbitron will also continue to share with all customers any current and future findings of the impact of nonresponse on the PPM service.
"I am committed to continue our focus on the concerns of our PPM market customers in terms of the sample size, sample proportionality and sample quality of our PPM panels. I want to assure the industry that Arbitron is actively engaged in the continuous improvement of our PPM and Diary market services. Thanks to specific customer input, Arbitron is already making good progress on improvements in many operational areas," said Michael Skarzynski, President and Chief Executive Office, Arbitron Inc. "As an integral part of the company's continuous improvement programs, Arbitron is on track to meet or exceed 100 percent of the settlement agreement criteria with the Attorneys General of New York, New Jersey and Maryland."
Cell-phone-only sampling in all PPM markets
Arbitron will increase the sample target for cell-phone-only households in all PPM markets to an average of 15 percent by year-end 2010. In an interim step, the current target of 7.5 percent will be raised to 12.5 percent in PPM markets by year-end 2009. (Monthly milestones within each year will vary by market.)
In keeping with the commitment to increase cell-phone-only sample in all markets, Arbitron is committing to the use of address-based sampling technique for at least 10 percent of its sampling efforts by late 2009 and for at least 15 percent of its recruitment efforts by the end of December 2010 in all PPM markets. (Monthly milestones within each year will vary by market.)
Address-based sampling in all PPM markets
Arbitron has already begun using addressed-based sampling for cell-phone-only households in PPM markets. The initial returns from the first round of address-based sampling are indicating that markets such as Nassau-Suffolk and Middlesex-Somerset-Union have a cell-phone-only penetration that is significantly less than 15 percent.
Arbitron is applying its average-daily in-tab benchmark of 75 percent of installed sample to all PPM markets. Arbitron is currently implementing in all PPM markets many of the techniques and methods that Arbitron is using to minimize differential compliance rates in order to fulfill the terms of the New Jersey, New York and Maryland agreements. (Specific programs and techniques are being applied based on an individual market's in-tab performance.)
Daily In-Tab Compliance efforts in all PPM markets
The PPM markets that were first recruited in 2008 have received the benefit of the latest response rate and compliance programs starting with the very first recruitment contact. In these markets, SPI metrics are already above the commitments to New Jersey, New York and Maryland.
Response metric efforts in all PPM markets
Arbitron will continue its focus on improving the Sample Performance Indicator in all PPM markets. Based on the progress to date in the company's response rate programs, Arbitron has informed the MRC that it hopes to achieve a 21 percent SPI average across all PPM markets by the end of 2010.
Arbitron commitments to greater transparency
The company's commitments to New Jersey, New York and Maryland include greater transparency in terms of information regarding PPM sample composition and other metrics of PPM services. Arbitron intends to provide this additional information in all PPM markets that many of its clients have indicated they would find useful and would help their understanding the strengths and limitations of PPM samples.
Sample distribution by zip code
Arbitron is providing in all PPM markets installation and in-tabulation data by individual zip code, along with market population data for Blacks, Hispanics and others (non-Black or non-Hispanic) for each individual zip code.
Sample composition by cell-phone-only status
Arbitron will continue its practice of publishing the percentages of installed and In-Tab cell-phone-only sample in the front of all monthly Arbitron electronic PPM market reports.
PPM response studies
The company intends for all PPM markets to benefit from the findings of a nonresponse bias study that it will conduct in the New York market by July 15, 2009. Should the findings indicate any measurable statistical bias, Arbitron will inform all clients of the identified sources of that statistical bias in the PPM methodology and will take reasonable measures to address those sources.
The option to see the current composition of the Hispanic sample by country of origin has been a topic of discussion with Hispanic broadcasters.
Additional initiatives in the continuous improvement programs
Arbitron has conducted a test of three markets selected by the Spanish Radio Association (Houston-Galveston, Los Angeles and New York) to determine if asking the country of origin question during one of the regular status calls to PPM households would have an adverse impact on the PPM sample. Early results from the test are indicating that Arbitron would be able to collect and track country of origin without affecting the quality of the sample.
The decision about moving forward with country-of-origin tracking is pending a full analysis of the test.
The Arbitron Portable People Metersystem uses a passive audience measurement device  about the size of a small cell phone  to track consumer exposure to media and entertainment, including broadcast, cable and satellite television; terrestrial, satellite and online radio as well as cinema advertising and many types of place-based electronic media. Carried throughout the day by randomly selected survey participants, the PPM device can track when and where they watch television, listen to radio as well as how they interact with other forms of media and entertainment.
About the Portable People Meter
TM
TM
The PPM detects inaudible codes embedded in the audio portion of media and entertainment content delivered by broadcasters, content providers and distributors. At the end of the day, the meter is placed in a docking station that extracts the codes and sends them to a central computer. The PPM is equipped with a motion sensor, a patented quality control feature unique to the system, which allows Arbitron to confirm the compliance of the PPM survey participants every day.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and represent the opinion of Arbitron. PPM ratings, like all audience estimates however derived, should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies in the United States. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's marketing and business units are supported by a world-renowned research and technology organization located in Columbia, Maryland.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090311181903.txt.gz
TIME:20090311181903
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
In connection with an ongoing strategic review by Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") of its operations, effective as of March 10, 2009, the position of Executive Vice President, New Product Development, Portable People Meter of the Company has been eliminated. The employment of Linda Dupree, formerly Executive Vice President, New Product Development, Portable People Meter of the Company, will end effective as of March 24, 2009. Ms. Dupree will be entitled to receive severance compensation pursuant to the terms and conditions of a previously disclosed Executive Retention Agreement by and between the Company and Ms. Dupree dated August 28, 2008.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090324172842.txt.gz
TIME:20090324172842
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On March 24, 2009 Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") announced, as a further step in its previously announced strategic realignment, a reduction in its workforce of approximately 10 percent of its full-time employees. The Company also announced implementation of a reduction in non-employee related expenses on a company-wide basis. The Company anticipates that it will incur pre-tax expenses of approximately $8 million to $9 million in the first quarter of 2009, related principally to severance and benefit expenses as a result of this restructuring and expense reduction program. As a result of these initiatives, the company expects to realize savings in the balance of 2009 that would offset the first quarter 2009 charge. Taken together, the workforce and expense reductions are expected to result in a reduction in the 2010 run rate expenses of more than $10 million. Also on March 24, 2009 the Company issued a statement regarding the foregoing matters. A copy of the statement is attached as Ex hibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Item 7.01 shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
This current report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as may, will, should, likely, expects, anticipates, estimates, believes, or plans, or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whe ther we will be able to:  absorb costs related to legal proceedings and governmental entity interactions and avoid related fines, limitations, or conditions on our business activities;  successfully commercialize our Portable People MeterTM service;  successfully manage the impact on our business of the current economic downturn generally, and in the advertising market, in particular, including, without limitation, the insolvency of any of our customers or the impact of such downturn on our customers ability to fulfill their payment obligations to us;  successfully maintain and promote industry usage of our services, a critical mass of broadcaster encoding, and the proper understanding of our audience measurement services and methodology in light of governmental regulation, legislation, litigation, activism, or adverse public relations efforts;  compete with companies that may have financial, marketing, sales, technical, or other advantages o ver us;  successfully design, recruit and maintain PPM panels that appropriately balance research quality, panel size, and operational cost;  successfully develop, implement, and fund initiatives designed to increase sample sizes;  complete the Media Rating Council, Inc. (MRC) audits of our local market PPM ratings services in a timely manner and successfully obtain and/or maintain MRC accreditation for our audience measurement business;  renew contracts with key customers;  successfully execute our business strategies, including entering into potential acquisition, joint-venture or other material third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact, if any, of any further ownership shifts in the radio and advertising agency industries;  effectively respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprietary software systems, such as software systems to support our cell phone-only sampling plans, and new customer services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperation in surveys, consumer trends including a trend toward increasing incidence of cell phone-only households, privacy concerns, technology changes, and/or government regulations;  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to encode and/or measure new forms of media content and delivery, and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment; and  realize expected savings from our workforce and expense reduction program. There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ende d December 31, 2008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
COLUMBIA, MD; March 24, 2009  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today, as a further step in its previously announced strategic realignment, a reduction in its workforce of approximately 10 percent of its full-time employees. The Company is also implementing a reduction in non-employee related expenses on a company-wide basis.
The Company anticipates that it will incur pre-tax expenses of approximately $8 million to $9 million in the first quarter of 2009, related principally to severance and benefit expenses as a result of this restructuring and expense reduction program. As a result of these initiatives, the company expects to realize savings in the balance of 2009 that would offset the first quarter 2009 charge.
Taken together, the workforce and expense reductions are expected to result in a reduction in the 2010 run rate expenses of more than $10 million.
"The company is realigning and restructuring in order to focus on our strategic priorities: strengthening our radio measurement service and developing new, multimedia services. This restructuring is also designed to speed decision-making so that we can better capitalize on growth opportunities," said Michael Skarzynski, President and Chief Executive Officer.
"The workforce reduction was a difficult and painful decision and I am grateful for the contributions of all of our employees. Arbitron is offering transition assistance and outplacement support for those colleagues exiting the company as a result of this restructuring and expense reduction program. The company is reevaluating the skill sets that we need given the rapidly changing and competitive media measurement marketplace. We also believe the cost reductions provided by this restructuring will contribute to the company's long-term success.
"Our customers will continue to receive the quality services that they have come to expect from Arbitron. We remain committed to our continuous improvement programs, which include increasing cell-phone-only samples and enhancing qualitative data. We also intend to invest in Arbitron's strategic growth areas.
"Arbitron expects to complete the realignment before the end of the first quarter so that we can focus on business process improvements, infrastructure enhancements and the strategic plan that position the company for long-term growth in current and new markets," said Mr. Skarzynski.
For the full year 2009, Arbitron continues to expect revenue to increase between 6 percent and 10 percent compared to the 2008 revenue of $368.8 million.
Company Reiterates 2009 Guidance
Earnings per share (diluted) for the full year 2009 is expected to be between $1.40 and $1.55, an increase of between 3 percent to 14 percent, versus $1.36 in 2008.
Arbitron expects to release its first-quarter 2009 financial results and hold its earnings call on Tuesday, April 21, 2009.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, broadcast television, cable and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's headquarters , research and engineering organizations are located in Columbia, Maryland.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090330171235.txt.gz
TIME:20090330171235
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
Effective March 30, 2009 Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") appointed two new executive officers. Alton L. Adams, age 51, will serve as the Companys Executive Vice President, Chief Marketing Officer. Dr. Robert F. Henrick, age 54, will serve as the Companys Executive Vice President, Customer Solutions. Mr. Adams served as a Managing Director of Accenture Ltd., a New York Stock Exchange listed management consulting, technology services, and outsourcing company, from 2003 to March 2009. Mr. Adams has previously served as President, Experian Database Solutions, President and Chief Executive Officer of Mindbranch Inc., and President of Standard and Poors DRI. Mr. Henrick served as Program Manager, Johns Hopkins University Applied Physics Laboratory, working on communications and system technology solutions for national security, from 2003 to March 2009. Mr. Henrick has previously served as a Senior Partner in the interactive division of Ogilvy & Mather, and in positions wit h AT&T, Lucent Technologies, and Xebeo Communications. The Company has determined that there are no related person transactions between the Company and Messrs. Adams and Henrick within the meaning of Item 404(a) of Regulation S-K. Adams Employment Agreement The Company and Mr. Adams have entered into an Executive Employment Agreement, effective as of March 30, 2009 (the "Adams Agreement") covering Mr. Adams employment as Executive Vice President, Chief Marketing Officer of the Company. Salary and Incentive Compensation Pursuant to the terms and conditions of the Adams Agreement, the Company will pay Mr. Adams an annual base salary of $400,000 and Mr. Adams will be eligible to receive an annual incentive bonus equal to 50% of his annual base salary upon meeting applicable performance criteria set by the Boards Compensation and Human Resources Committee (the "Compensation Committee"). For performance exceeding such applicable performance criteria, the annual incent ive bonus will be increased to an amount in excess of the target bonus up to a maximum of 150% of annual base salary, at the sole discretion of the Compensation Committee. The Compensation Committee will review the base salary no less frequently than annually. If increased, the increased base salary will become the base salary for all purposes under the Adams Agreement. Equity Grant Subject to approval by the Compensation Committee, the Company will grant to Mr. Adams an equity award to be valued at $1,600,000 on the date of grant, with the award divided by value into 75% stock options and 25% restricted stock units, each with respect to the Companys common stock, par value $0.50 (the "Common Stock") (where the value for the options is determined using the Companys standard Black-Scholes assumptions applied as of the date of grant and where the value for the restricted stock units is determined by dividing the target value for the restricted stock units by the fair market valu e of the Common Stock on the grant date) (the "Adams Inducement Grant"). Assuming continued employment, the stock options under the Adams Inducement Grant will vest in equal amounts on an annual basis over a three year period following the date of grant (beginning with one third on the first anniversary), and otherwise will contain substantially the same terms and conditions as the Companys standard form of nonqualified stock option agreement adopted for use under its stock plans. Assuming continued employment, the restricted stock units under the Adams Inducement Grant will vest in equal amounts over a four year period following the date of grant (beginning with one quarter on the first anniversary) and otherwise will contain the same terms and conditions as the Companys standard form of restricted stock unit agreement adopted under its stock plans. The Compensation Committee, at its sole discretion, will consider the grant of future compensatory equity awards to Mr. Adams. B enefits Mr. Adams will, to the extent eligible, be entitled to participate at a level commensurate with his position in all employee welfare, benefit, and retirement plans and programs the Company provides to its executives in accordance with Company policies. Mr. Adams will work at the Companys Columbia, Maryland headquarters. Providing that Mr. Adams relocates to a primary residence in proximity to Columbia, Maryland, the company will reimburse Mr. Adams for qualified relocation expenses and temporary living expenses incurred during 2009 up to a maximum of $200,000. If Mr. Adamss employment ends before December 31, 2010 as a result of resignation or termination for Cause (as defined in the Adams Agreement), Mr. Adams must repay a pro rata portion of the relocation expenses to the Company. Potential Payments Upon Early Termination The Company or Mr. Adams may terminate Mr. Adams's employment at any time for any reason, or for no reason. If Mr. Adamss employ ment terminates for any reason, the Company will pay to Mr. Adams (i) any earned but unpaid annual base salary; (ii) any earned but unpaid annual bonus; (iii) any unreimbursed business expenses, in accordance with the Companys policies; (iv) any unpaid relocation or temporary living expenses (subject to the repayment obligation described above); and (v) any amounts or benefits payable under any Company benefit plans then in effect. In addition to the payments described above, if the Company terminates Mr. Adamss employment without Cause or if Mr. Adams resigns as a result of a Position Diminishment, Mr. Adams will be entitled to receive cash severance and the full cost of health care continuation until the earlier of 18 months or subsequent coverage. Except as provided in the next paragraph, if Mr. Adams is entitled to receive cash severance in connection with a without Cause termination or a resignation as a result of a Position Diminishment, the Company will pay to him in cash an amount equal to 1.75 times his then applicable base salary, in equal installments over a 12 month period. Payment will cease if Mr. Adams obtains subsequent employment prior to the end of the 12 month period. If Mr. Adams is entitled to receive cash severance in connection with a without Cause termination or a resignation as a result of a Position Diminishment within 12 months following a Change in Control, the Company will pay to him in cash an amount equal to 2.625 times his then applicable base salary, in equal installments over a 12 month period. In addition, any outstanding equity compensation awards will fully and immediately vest and become exercisable. Severance payments will cease if Mr. Adams obtains subsequent employment prior to the end of the 12 month period. In order to receive the severance benefits provided under the Adams Agreement, Mr. Adams must execute a release in the form provided by the Company of all legally-releasable claims that Mr. Adams may then have against the Company and any of its affiliates. Non-Competition, Non-Recruitment, and Non-Disparagement The Adams Agreement contains provisions pursuant to which Mr. Adams has agreed that, while employed and for the longest of (i) 12 months following termination for any reason not involving termination by the Company without Cause, (ii) 18 months following termination by the Company without Cause or following a resignation for Position Diminishment, and (iii) 24 months following termination by the Company without Cause or a resignation as a result of a Position Diminishment within 12 months after a Change in Control, he will not directly or indirectly, subject to certain de minimis exceptions involving the ownership of publicly traded securities, compete with any part of the Companys business. Mr. Adams has agreed during employment and for 12 months thereafter not to initiate or actively participate in any other employers recruitment or hiring of Company employees. The Adams Ag reement also contains non-disparagement provisions. Henrick Employment Agreement The Company and Mr. Henrick have entered into an Executive Employment Agreement, effective as of March 30, 2009 (the "Henrick Agreement") covering Mr. Henricks employment as Executive Vice President, Customer Solutions of the Company. Salary and Incentive Compensation Pursuant to the terms and conditions of the Henrick Agreement, the Company will pay Mr. Henrick an annual base salary of $375,000 and Mr. Henrick will be eligible to receive an annual incentive bonus equal to 50% of his annual base salary upon meeting applicable performance criteria set by the Compensation Committee. For performance exceeding such applicable performance criteria, the annual incentive bonus will be increased to an amount in excess of the target bonus up to a maximum of 150% of annual base salary, at the sole discretion of the Compensation Committee. The Compensation Committee will review the base salary no les s frequently than annually. If increased, the increased base salary will become the base salary for all purposes under the Henrick Agreement. Equity Grant Subject to approval by the Compensation Committee, the Company will grant to Mr. Henrick an equity award to be valued at $1,300,000 on the date of grant, with the award divided by value into 75% stock options and 25% restricted stock units, each with respect to the Common Stock (where the value for the options is determined using the Companys standard Black-Scholes assumptions applied as of the date of grant and where the value for the restricted stock units is determined by dividing the target value for the restricted stock units by the fair market value of the Common Stock on the grant date) (the "Henrick Inducement Grant"). Assuming continued employment, the stock options under the Henrick Inducement Grant will vest in equal amounts on an annual basis over a three year period following the date of grant (beginning with one third on the first anniversary), and otherwise will contain substantially the same terms and conditions as the Companys standard form of nonqualified stock option agreement adopted for use under its stock plans. Assuming continued employment, the restricted stock units under the Henrick Inducement Grant will vest in equal amounts over a four year period following the date of grant (beginning with one quarter on the first anniversary) and otherwise will contain the same terms and conditions as the Companys standard form of restricted stock unit agreement adopted under its stock plans. The Compensation Committee, at its sole discretion, will consider the grant of future compensatory equity awards to Mr. Henrick. Benefits Mr. Henrick will, to the extent eligible, be entitled to participate at a level commensurate with his position in all employee welfare, benefit, and retirement plans and programs the Company provides to its executives in accordance with Company policies. Mr. H enrick will work at the Companys Columbia, Maryland headquarters. Potential Payments Upon Early Termination The Company or Mr. Henrick may terminate Mr. Henrick's employment at any time for any reason, or for no reason. If Mr. Henricks employment terminates for any reason, the Company will pay to Mr. Henrick (i) any earned but unpaid annual base salary; (ii) any earned but unpaid annual bonus; (iii) any unreimbursed business expenses, in accordance with the Companys policies; and (iv) any amounts or benefits payable under any Company benefit plans then in effect. In addition to the payments described above, if the Company terminates Mr. Henricks employment without Cause (as defined in the Henrick Agreement) or if Mr. Henrick resigns as a result of a Position Diminishment (as defined in the Henrick Agreement), Mr. Henrick will be entitled to receive cash severance and the full cost of health care continuation until the earlier of 18 months or subsequen t coverage. Except as provided in the next paragraph, if Mr. Henrick is entitled to receive cash severance in connection with a without Cause termination or a resignation as a result of a Position Diminishment, the Company will pay to him in cash an amount equal to 1.75 times his then applicable base salary, in equal installments over a 12 month period. Payment will cease if Mr. Henrick obtains subsequent employment prior to the end of the 12 month period. If Mr. Henrick is entitled to receive cash severance in connection with a without Cause termination or a resignation as a result of a Position Diminishment within 12 months following a Change in Control, the Company will pay to him in cash an amount equal to 2.625 times his then applicable base salary, in equal installments over a 12 month period. Payment will cease if Mr. Henrick obtains subsequent employment prior to the end of the 12 month period. In addition, any outstanding equity compensation awards will fully and immediately ves t and become exercisable. In order to receive the severance benefits provided under the Henrick Agreement, Mr. Henrick must execute a release in the form provided by the Company of all legally-releasable claims that Mr. Henrick may then have against the Company and any of its affiliates. Non-Competition, Non-Recruitment, and Non-Disparagement The Henrick Agreement contains provisions pursuant to which Mr. Henrick has agreed that, while employed and for the longest of (i) 12 months following termination for any reason not involving termination by the Company without Cause, (ii) 18 months following termination by the Company without Cause or following a resignation for Position Diminishment, and (iii) 24 months following termination by the Company without Cause or a resignation as a result of a Position Diminishment within 12 months after a Change in Control, he will not directly or indirectly, subject to certain de minimis exceptions involving the ownership of publicly traded securities , compete with any part of the Companys business. Mr. Henrick has agreed during employment and for 12 months thereafter not to initiate or actively participate in any other employers recruitment or hiring of Company employees. The Henrick Agreement also contains non-disparagement provisions. The foregoing summaries of the Adams Agreement and the Henrick Agreement are qualified in their entirety by the full terms and conditions of the two agreements, copies of which will be filed as exhibits to the Companys Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended March 31, 2009 and are incorporated herein by reference. A copy of the press release announcing the events described above is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this Current Report on Form 8-K by reference.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
COLUMBIA, MD; March 30, 2009  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today the appointment of two new Executive Vice Presidents who will lead key organizations and programs designed to advance the Company's long-term strategy. The appointments are effective March 30.
Alton L. Adams is appointed to the newly created position of Executive Vice President, Chief Marketing Officer, reporting to Michael Skarzynski, President and Chief Executive Officer.
Dr. Robert F. Henrick is appointed to the newly created position of Executive Vice President, Customer Solutions, also reporting to Michael Skarzynski.
"These two seasoned executives bring new and needed skill sets to an already talented company. Alton and Bob will lead the teams at Arbitron that are enhancing current services for our core radio customers, identifying the best growth opportunities and moving the Company into new markets, both in the United States as well as in international markets," said Michael Skarzynski, President and Chief Executive Officer.
In his new role, Mr. Adams is responsible for developing new solutions that use the Arbitron Portable People Meter platform to integrate measures of multiple media including radio, cinema, out-of -home and the 3-screen' markets of television, wireless, and Internet.
Alton Adams, EVP, Chief Marketing Officer
TM
Mr. Adams is also responsible for Arbitron's marketing, communications and brand. He will direct the Company's marketing efforts designed to help maintain its current leadership and to expand its customer base in domestic and international markets.
"Alton brings to Arbitron a wealth of experience delivering new and valuable services for customers through the integration of large, disparate databases," said Mr. Skarzynski. "Thanks to his demonstrated ability to develop new information services and his proven expertise in marketing, Alton will lead the effort to expand Arbitron's portfolio of information services.
Prior to joining Arbitron, Mr. Adams was a Managing Partner at Accenture. As a senior partner in the CRM practice, Mr. Adams specialized in helping companies use data, analytics and technology to more effectively acquire and retain customers.
Mr. Adams has extensive experience in information services and market research, as President, Experian Database Solutions, where he was responsible for marketing, product management and new product development; and as President and Chief Executive Officer, Mindbranch Inc., a technology focused market research aggregator where he built a complete sales, marketing and technology infrastructure and led the design of a new product suite. Mr. Adams was also President of Standard and Poor's DRI, an economic research and consulting business and has held senior positions at Equifax Financial Services Group, TRW Information Services Group and Dun and Bradstreet Corporation.
Mr. Adams earned an MBA in Marketing and Finance from The Wharton School University of Pennsylvania and a BA in Economics from Georgetown University.
Mr. Adams (51) will work at Arbitron's headquarters in Columbia, Maryland.
In his new role, Dr. Henrick is responsible for Arbitron's survey research methods and product management, as well as for enhancements of the company's existing services for the radio industry and for the delivery of new Arbitron services being developed for domestic and global markets.
Robert Henrick, EVP, Customer Solutions
"Bob Henrick comes to Arbitron with more than 25 years of experience in media, communications, and national security. He has led diverse teams, delivering products and services that help customers improve their businesses," said Michael Skarzynski. "Bob will work to enhance the quality and utility of our diary and PPM services and deliver the new multimedia offerings that we are developing for domestic and international customers."
Most recently, Dr. Henrick served as a Program Manager in the Johns Hopkins Applied Physics Laboratory, working on communications and system technology solutions for national security.
Dr. Henrick has extensive experience in media and interactive fields, having run the MyNetWorks multimedia communications venture in Lucent Technologies and having served as a Senior Partner in the interactive division of Ogilvy & Mather, where he developed wireless and broadband "pervasive" applications to develop new customer touchpoints for O&M clients.
He also has extensive experience in telecommunications services with as a Director with AT&T and Lucent, and as Vice President of Product Management and Marketing at Xebeo a privately held telecom technology firm.
Dr. Henrick holds 12 patents for media and telecommunications services. He earned a PhD in Applied Mathematics from the Rennselaer Polytechnic Institute.
Dr. Henrick (54) will work at Arbitron's headquarters in Columbia, Maryland.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's headquarters and its world-renowned research and technology organizations are located in Columbia, Maryland.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090410170205.txt.gz
TIME:20090410170205
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
Effective as of April 6, 2009 Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") entered into Waiver and Amendment of Executive Retention Agreements (each, an "Amendment", and collectively, the "Amendments") with Sean R. Creamer, Timothy T. Smith, Pierre C. Bouvard, V. Scott Henry, and Steven M. Smith (each, an "Officer", and collectively, the "Officers"). Pursuant to the Amendments, the Officers have agreed to waive certain provisions of, and the Company and the Officers have agreed to amend the Executive Retention Agreements by and between the Company and each of the Officers previously disclosed by the Company in a Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC on August 26, 2008, and a form of which was filed as Exhibit 10.3 to the Companys Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended September 30, 2008 (each an "Existing Agreement" and, collectively the "Existing Agreements"). Pursuant to the Amendments, the Company and each Officer agree (i) that the Company has undergone a Leadership Change as defin ed in the Existing Agreements, (ii) that the Officer desires to continue his employment with the Company in the role currently held by the Officer and desires to waive any protections under the Leadership Change provisions of the Existing Agreements, and (iii) to amend the Existing Agreements to remove all references to "Leadership Change" and to eliminate any enhancement to severance benefits payable by the Company under the Existing Agreements as a result of or otherwise in connection with a Leadership Change. Except as specifically changed by the Amendments, all other provisions of the Existing Agreements remain in effect. The following summary of the Amendments is qualified in its entirety by the full terms and conditions of the Amendments, a form of which will be filed as an exhibit to the Companys Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended March 31, 2009, and is incorporated herein by reference.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090417165608.txt.gz
TIME:20090417165608
EVENTS:	Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
TEXT:
ITEM: Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.05 Costs Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities.
On March 24, 2009 Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") filed a Current Report on Form 8-K announcing, as a further step in its previously announced strategic realignment, which the Company committed to on February 20, 2009, a reduction in its workforce of approximately 10 percent of its full-time employees. The Company also announced implementation of a reduction in non-employee related expenses on a company-wide basis. The Company has undertaken this strategic realignment and restructuring in order to focus on its strategic priorities: strengthening its radio measurement services and developing new, multimedia services. This restructuring is also designed to speed decision-making so that the Company can better capitalize on growth opportunities. The Company anticipates that it will incur pre-tax expenses of approximately $8.2 million in the first quarter of 2009, related principally to severance and benefit expenses as a result of this restructuring and expense reduction program. The Company anticipates th at it will also incur additional pre-tax expenses of approximately $800 thousand, in the aggregate, during the final three quarters of 2009, also related principally to severance and benefit expenses.
This current report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as may, will, should, likely, expects, anticipates, estimates, believes, or plans, or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whe ther we will be able to:  absorb costs related to legal proceedings and governmental entity interactions and avoid related fines, limitations, or conditions on our business activities;  successfully commercialize our Portable People MeterTM service;  successfully manage the impact on our business of the current economic downturn generally, and in the advertising market, in particular, including, without limitation, the insolvency of any of our customers or the impact of such downturn on our customers ability to fulfill their payment obligations to us;  successfully maintain and promote industry usage of our services, a critical mass of broadcaster encoding, and the proper understanding of our audience measurement services and methodology in light of governmental regulation, legislation, litigation, activism, or adverse public relations efforts;  compete with companies that may have financial, marketing, sales, technical, or other advantages o ver us;  successfully design, recruit and maintain PPM panels that appropriately balance research quality, panel size, and operational cost;  successfully develop, implement, and fund initiatives designed to increase sample sizes;  complete the Media Rating Council, Inc. (MRC) audits of our local market PPM ratings services in a timely manner and successfully obtain and/or maintain MRC accreditation for our audience measurement business;  renew contracts with key customers;  successfully execute our business strategies, including entering into potential acquisition, joint-venture or other material third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact, if any, of any further ownership shifts in the radio and advertising agency industries;  effectively respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprietary software systems, such as software systems to support our cell phone-only sampling plans, and new customer services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperation in surveys, consumer trends including a trend toward increasing incidence of cell phone-only households, privacy concerns, technology changes, and/or government regulations;  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to encode and/or measure new forms of media content and delivery, and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment; and  realize expected savings from our workforce and expense reduction program. There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ende d December 31, 2008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090420091853.txt.gz
TIME:20090420091853
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
Effective April 20, 2009 Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") appointed Taher G. Behbehani, age 47, to serve as the Companys Executive Vice President, Chief Strategy and Business Development Officer. Mr. Behbehani served as Vice President, Business Affairs, Time Warner Cable Inc., from 2007 to March 2009. During 2006 and 2007 Mr. Behbehani acted as a corporate advisor and private investor in California and Hong Kong. From 2005 to 2006 Mr. Behbehani served as Vice President, Corporate development for SourceFire, Inc. From 2001 to 2005 Mr. Behbehani served as Vice President, Corporate Business Development & Strategic Planning for UTStarcom, Inc. Mr. Behbehani has also previously served in senior positions with 3Com Corporation. The Company has determined that there are no related person transactions between the Company and Mr. Behbehani within the meaning of Item 404(a) of Regulation S-K. Employment Agreement The Company and Mr. Behbehani have entered into an Executive Emp loyment Agreement, effective as of April 20, 2009 (the "Behbehani Agreement") covering Mr. Behbehani's employment as Executive Vice President, Chief Strategy and Business Development Officer of the Company. Salary and Incentive Compensation Pursuant to the terms and conditions of the Behbehani Agreement, the Company will pay Mr. Behbehani an annual base salary of $300,000 and Mr. Behbehani will be eligible to receive an annual incentive bonus equal to 75% of his annual base salary upon meeting applicable performance criteria set by the Boards Compensation and Human Resources Committee (the "Compensation Committee"). For performance exceeding such applicable performance criteria, the annual incentive bonus will be increased to an amount in excess of the target bonus up to a maximum of 150% of annual base salary, at the sole discretion of the Compensation Committee. The Compensation Committee will review the base salary no less frequently than annually. If increased, the increased ba se salary will become the base salary for all purposes under the Behbehani Agreement. Equity Grant Subject to approval by the Compensation Committee, the Company will grant to Mr. Behbehani an equity award to be valued at $1,200,000 on the date of grant, with the award divided by value into 75% stock options and 25% restricted stock units, each with respect to the Companys common stock, par value $0.50 (the "Common Stock") (where the value for the options is determined using the Companys standard Black-Scholes assumptions applied as of the date of grant and where the value for the restricted stock units is determined by dividing the target value for the restricted stock units by the fair market value of the Common Stock on the grant date) (the "Behbehani Inducement Grant"). Assuming continued employment, the stock options under the Behbehani Inducement Grant will vest in equal amounts on an annual basis over a three year period following the date of grant (beginning with one th ird on the first anniversary), and otherwise will contain substantially the same terms and conditions as the Companys standard form of nonqualified stock option agreement adopted for use under its stock plans. Assuming continued employment, the restricted stock units under the Behbehani Inducement Grant will vest in equal amounts over a four year period following the date of grant (beginning with one quarter on the first anniversary) and otherwise will contain the same terms and conditions as the Companys standard form of restricted stock unit agreement adopted under its stock plans. The Compensation Committee, at its sole discretion, will consider the grant of future compensatory equity awards to Mr. Behbehani. Benefits Mr. Behbehani will, to the extent eligible, be entitled to participate at a level commensurate with his position in all employee welfare, benefit, and retirement plans and programs the Company provides to its executives in accordance with Company policie s. Mr. Behbehani will work at the Companys Columbia, Maryland headquarters. Potential Payments Upon Early Termination The Company or Mr. Behbehani may terminate Mr. Behbehani's employment at any time for any reason, or for no reason. If Mr. Behbehanis employment terminates for any reason, the Company will pay to Mr. Behbehani (i) any earned but unpaid annual base salary; (ii) any earned but unpaid annual bonus; (iii) any unreimbursed business expenses, in accordance with the Companys policies; (iv) any unpaid relocation or temporary living expenses (subject to the repayment obligation described above); and (v) any amounts or benefits payable under any Company benefit plans then in effect. In addition to the payments described above, if the Company terminates Mr. Behbehanis employment without Cause or if Mr. Behbehani resigns as a result of a Position Diminishment, Mr. Behbehani will be entitled to receive cash severance and the full cost of health ca re continuation until the earlier of 18 months or subsequent coverage. Except as provided in the next paragraph, if Mr. Behbehani is entitled to receive cash severance in connection with a without Cause termination or a resignation as a result of a Position Diminishment, the Company will pay to him in cash an amount equal to 1.75 times his then applicable base salary, in equal installments over a 12 month period. Payment will cease if Mr. Behbehani obtains subsequent employment prior to the end of the 12 month period. If Mr. Behbehani is entitled to receive cash severance in connection with a without Cause termination or a resignation as a result of a Position Diminishment within 12 months following a Change in Control, the Company will pay to him in cash an amount equal to 2.625 times his then applicable base salary, in equal installments over a 12 month period. In addition, any outstanding equity compensation awards will fully and immediately vest and become exercisable. Severance paym ents will cease if Mr. Behbehani obtains subsequent employment prior to the end of the 12 month period. In order to receive the severance benefits provided under the Behbehani Agreement, Mr. Behbehani must execute a release in the form provided by the Company of all legally-releasable claims that Mr. Behbehani may then have against the Company and any of its affiliates. Non-Competition, Non-Recruitment, and Non-Disparagement The Behbehani Agreement contains provisions pursuant to which Mr. Behbehani has agreed that, while employed and for the longest of (i) 12 months following termination for any reason not involving termination by the Company without Cause, (ii) 18 months following termination by the Company without Cause or following a resignation for Position Diminishment, and (iii) 24 months following termination by the Company without Cause or a resignation as a result of a Position Diminishment within 12 months after a Change in Control, he will not directly or indirectly, subj ect to certain de minimis exceptions involving the ownership of publicly traded securities, compete with any part of the Companys business. Mr. Behbehani has agreed during employment and for 12 months thereafter not to initiate or actively participate in any other employers recruitment or hiring of Company employees. The Behbehani Agreement also contains non-disparagement provisions. The foregoing summary of the Behbehani Agreement is qualified in its entirety by the full terms and conditions of the agreement, a copy of which will be filed as exhibits to the Companys Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended June 30, 2009 and is incorporated herein by reference. A copy of the press release announcing the events described above is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this Current Report on Form 8-K by reference.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Columbia MD; April 20, 2009Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today the appointment of Taher G. Behbehani to the newly-created position of Executive Vice President, Chief Strategy and Business Development Officer, reporting to Michael Skarzynski, President and Chief Executive Officer.
"Taher brings to Arbitron more than 20 years of experience in operations, general management and business development at cable television and technology companies," said Michael Skarzynski. "Taher has been instrumental in the development of partnerships and joint ventures with some of the world's leading wireless, Internet and multimedia companies and we anticipate significant contributions from his insights into the industry."
"His track record in developing new business opportunities and in leveraging core business platforms through extensions into new markets makes Taher an ideal addition to the new Arbitron executive team. We expect that his expertise with interactive technologies, coupled with his creativity in delivering business solutions will be valuable assets for the growth of the company," said Mr. Skarzynski.
"I joined Arbitron to help the company extend its Portable People Meter platform into multimedia markets," said Mr. Behbehani. "Arbitron has a solid, patent-protected platform technology for personal, portable and passive electronic measurement and my goal is to help the company create balanced business expansion strategies that will make the most of its technology and capital assets."
Most recently, Mr. Behbehani served as Vice President, Business Affairs, Time Warner Cable Inc.; (NYSE: TWC). He established several key industry partnerships with leading web search and display advertising companies, and led complex negotiations related to platform extensions for video delivery, advanced advertising, wireless, and Internet services. He was also an advisor on strategic issues and analyzed a range of new growth opportunities for Time Warner Cable.
Mr. Behbehani has global executive experience in the telecom and high tech industries in the U.S. and abroad. He has extensive operational experience and planned and executed expansion strategies for publicly traded companies: 3Com Corporation, SourceFire Inc. and UTStarcom Inc. He has extensive experience in the wireless industry and ran 3Com's wireless infrastructure business unit (CommWorks). Mr. Behbehani is a successful entrepreneur, having starting several companies in the online web services, telecom and wireless industries.
Mr. Behbehani earned a Masters of Science in Electrical Engineering from Yale, and a Bachelor of Science degree in Electrical Engineering from the University of Wisconsin-Madison.
Mr. Behbehani (47) will work at Arbitron's headquarters in Columbia, Maryland.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's headquarters and its world-renowned research and engineering organizations are located in Columbia, Maryland.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090421073402.txt.gz
TIME:20090421073402
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 21, 2009, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release reporting 2009 first quarter financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated April 21, 2009.
The information in this Form 8-K and the attached Exhibit are furnished to comply with Item 2.02 and Item 9.01 of Form 8-K. Neither this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit are to be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall this Form 8-K nor the attached Exhibit be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 (except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing).
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Arbitron Inc. Phone: 410-312-8410 sean.creamer@arbitron.com
Company Contact: Sean Creamer, CFO
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor and Media contact: Thom Mocarsky
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2009.
Columbia MD, April 21, 2009 
Net income for the quarter was $12.3 million, or $0.46 per share (diluted), compared with $16.3 million, or $0.57 per share (diluted), for the first quarter of 2008. Excluding the $8.2 million pre-tax impact of the previously disclosed restructuring charge, earnings per share for the quarter were $0.65 per share (diluted).
For the first quarter of 2009, the Company reported revenue of $98.5 million, an increase of 4.7 percent over revenue of $94.1 million during the first quarter of 2008.
Results from Continuing Operations
Costs and expenses for the first quarter increased by 19.1 percent, from $63.3 million in 2008 to $75.4 million in 2009, due to planned expenditures for the Portable People Meter (PPM) ratings panels, the planned introduction of cell-phone-only household sampling in diary markets and expenses of $8.2 million related principally to severance and benefits for the reorganization and restructuring program announced in March 2009.
TM
Share-based compensation amounted to $1.9 million in the first quarter of 2009 versus $1.6 million in the first quarter 2008.
Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for the quarter were $20.1 million, a decrease of 25.1 percent compared with EBIT of $26.8 million for the first quarter of 2008.
Income from continuing operations for the quarter was $12.3 million or $0.46 per share (diluted), compared with $16.3 million, or $0.58 per share (diluted) in the first quarter of 2008.
On January 31, 2008, Arbitron concluded the sale of CSW Research Limited ("Continental"), its UK-based custom research business. As a result, Continental's financial results have been reclassified as a Discontinued Operation for all periods presented. In the first quarter of 2008, Continental generated a net loss from operations of $495 thousand for the period up through the closing of the transaction and a net gain from the sale of $450 thousand.
Results from Discontinued Operations
Said Michael Skarzynski, President and Chief Executive Officer: "During the first quarter of 2009, Arbitron focused its efforts in four areas: customer satisfaction, service quality, cost management and strategic positioning."
Management Comment on First Quarter 2009 Results
"The recession and decline in the advertising spending for radio remains the number one challenge for our customers, particularly for radio broadcasters. Arbitron is working hard through our customer satisfaction improvement programs to increase the value and utility of our PPM and diary market services while prioritizing our customer needs and interests in our decision-making.
"Continuously improving service quality for the PPM and diary markets also remains a top priority. Arbitron has extended, to all PPM markets nationwide, key methodological enhancements including an expansion of cell-phone-only households in our panels using address-based sampling, as well as increases in our benchmarks for in-tab compliance rates, response measures and other key metrics. We also initiated cell-phone-only household sampling in an initial 151 diary markets for the Spring 2009 radio survey.
"In our cost management efforts, we reduced the company's projected 2010 expense run rate by $10 million.
"In the area of strategic positioning, we realigned the executive staff, restructured the organization to move the company closer to our customers, recruited three new executive vice presidents and relocated company headquarters to Columbia, Maryland," said Mr. Skarzynski.
Arbitron is reiterating its revenue and EPS guidance for 2009.
2009 Guidance
For the full year 2009, Arbitron expects revenue to increase between 6 percent and 10 percent compared to the 2008 revenue of $368.8 million.
Earnings per share (diluted) for the full year 2009 is expected to be between $1.40 and $1.55, an increase of between 3 percent to 14 percent, versus $1.36 in 2008.
Earnings per share guidance for 2009 includes the impact of the previously disclosed pre-tax expense of $8.2 million, related to the restructuring program. As a result of these initiatives, the company expects to realize net savings during the last three quarter of 2009 approximately equivalent to the first quarter 2009 restructuring expense.
Arbitron will host a conference call today at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time. The Company invites you to listen to the call by dialing (toll free) 888-873-8496. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing 973-935-8513. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 93107051. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
Earnings Conference Call: Schedule and Access
A replay of the call will be available from 12:00 p.m. on April 21, 2009 through 11:59 p.m. on May 21, 2009. To access the replay, please call (toll free) 800-642-1687 in the United States, or 706-645-9291 if you're calling from outside of the United States. To access the replay, users will need to enter the following code: 93107051.
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to, either income from continuing operations, as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's headquarters and its world-renowned research and technology organizations are located in Columbia, Maryland.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
(2) Arbitron's management believes that presenting EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization), both non-GAAP financial measures, as supplemental information helps investors, analysts, and others, if they so choose, in understanding and evaluating Arbitron's operating performance in some of the same manners that management does because EBIT and EBITDA exclude certain items that are not directly related to Arbitron's core operating performance. Arbitron's management references these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing current performance and making decisions about internal budgets, resource allocation and financial goals. EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to income from continuing operations. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, and depreciation and amortization to income from continuing operations. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered substitutes either for income from continuing operations, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
Note: The December 31, 2008 Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet is derived from the audited Balance Sheet included in the Company's Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2008.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090505083711.txt.gz
TIME:20090505083711
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On May 5, 2009, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") announced that it had entered into new three year agreements with Clear Channel Communications, Inc., and certain other subsidiaries of CC Media Holdings, Inc. ("Clear Channel"), to provide diary-based radio ratings and other related services for Clear Channels radio stations in the 105 United States local markets set forth below. The Company entered into the agreements on May 4, 2009 with an effective term beginning on January 1, 2009 and expiring on December 31, 2011. Under the terms and conditions of the new agreements, the Company will provide its diary-based Radio Market Reports, Maximi$er, Tapscan, Scarborough consumer data and Arbitron qualitative data, and related services and software to Clear Channel. Premiere Radio Networks has also entered into a new contract to receive the Companys RADAR National Radio Network ratings services and data. The Company has also entered into new agreements with Katz Media Group and Clear Ch annel Traffic. The aggregate amount of all payments to be made by Clear Channel for the Radio Market Report and other related services during the term of the agreements (assuming the agreements are not terminated prior to the expiration of the stated term) currently is expected to be approximately $69.0 million, based on the radio stations currently owned by Clear Channel. The United States local markets covered by the agreements are as follows: Akron, OH Albany, GA Albany-Schenectady-Troy, NY Albuquerque, NM Allentown-Bethlehem, PA Anchorage, AK Ann Arbor, MI Asheville, NC Augusta, GA Bakersfield, CA Baton Rouge, LA Battle Creek, MI Beaumont-Port Arthur, TX Biloxi-Gulfport-Pascagoula, MS Binghamton, NY Birmingham, AL Bismarck, ND Bryan-College Station, TX Canton, OH Cedar Rapids, IA Charleston, SC Chattanooga, TN Cheyenne, WY Colorado Springs, CO Columbia, SC Columbus, GA Corpus Christi, TX Dayton, OH De s Moines, IA Eau Claire, WI El Paso, TX Fayetteville, AR Frederick, MD Fresno, CA Ft. Collins-Greeley, CO Ft. Myers-Naples-Marco Island, FL Ft. Pierce-Stuart-Vero Beach, FL Ft. Smith, AR Grand Forks, ND-MN Grand Rapids, MI Greenville-Spartanburg, SC Harrisburg-Lebanon-Carlisle, PA Harrisonburg, VA Honolulu, HI Huntington-Ashland, WV-KY Huntsville, AL Jackson, MS Jonesboro, AR Killeen-Temple, TX Lancaster, PA Laurel-Hattiesburg, MS Lexington-Fayette, KY Lima, OH Little Rock, AR Louisville, KY Macon, GA Madison, WI Manchester, NH McAllen-Brownsville-Harlingen, TX Melbourne-Titusville-Cocoa, FL Mobile, AL Modesto, CA Monterey-Salinas-Santa Cruz, CA Montgomery, AL Muskegon, MI New Haven, CT New Orleans, LA Oklahoma City, OK Omaha-Council Bluffs, NE-IA Panama City, FL Parkersburg-Marietta, WV-OH Pensacola, FL Portsmouth-Dover-Rochester, NH Poughkeepsie, NY Pueblo, CO Quad Ci ties, IA-IL Reading, PA Richmond, VA Roanoke-Lynchburg, VA Rochester, MN Rochester, NY Salisbury-Ocean City, MD Sarasota-Bradenton, FL Savannah, GA Sioux City, IA Spokane, WA Springfield, MA Springfield, MO Stockton, CA Sussex, NJ Syracuse, NY Tallahassee, FL Toledo, OH Tucson, AZ Tulsa, OK Tupelo, MS Tuscaloosa, AL Waco, TX Wheeling, WV Wichita, KS Williamsport, PA Wilmington, DE Winchester, VA Worcester, MA Youngstown-Warren, OH The foregoing description of the agreements is qualified in its entirety by reference to the contracts entered into between the Company and Clear Channel, copies of which will be filed as exhibits to the Companys Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2009. A copy of the press release announcing the contracts is filed herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated May 5, 2009.
This current report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as may, will, should, likely, expects, anticipates, estimates, believes, or plans, or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whe ther we will be able to:  absorb costs related to legal proceedings and governmental entity interactions and avoid related fines, limitations, or conditions on our business activities;  successfully commercialize our Portable People MeterTM service;  successfully manage the impact on our business of the current economic downturn generally, and in the advertising market, in particular, including, without limitation, the insolvency of any of our customers or the impact of such downturn on our customers ability to fulfill their payment obligations to us;  successfully maintain and promote industry usage of our services, a critical mass of broadcaster encoding, and the proper understanding of our audience measurement services and methodology in light of governmental regulation, legislation, litigation, activism, or adverse public relations efforts;  compete with companies that may have financial, marketing, sales, technical, or other advantages o ver us;  successfully design, recruit and maintain PPM panels that appropriately balance research quality, panel size, and operational cost;  successfully develop, implement, and fund initiatives designed to increase sample sizes;  complete the Media Rating Council, Inc. (MRC) audits of our local market PPM ratings services in a timely manner and successfully obtain and/or maintain MRC accreditation for our audience measurement business;  renew contracts with key customers;  successfully execute our business strategies, including entering into potential acquisition, joint-venture or other material third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact, if any, of any further ownership shifts in the radio and advertising agency industries;  effectively respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprietary software systems, such as software systems to support our cell phone-only sampling plans, and new customer services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperation in surveys, consumer trends including a trend toward increasing incidence of cell phone-only households, privacy concerns, technology changes, and/or government regulations;  successfully integrate our new management team;  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to encode and/or measure new forms of media content and delivery, and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment; and  realize expected savings from our workforce and expense reduction program. There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS  in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

For Immediate Release
COLUMBIA, MD; May 5, 2009  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that it has signed a new three year agreement with Clear Channel Communications, Inc. for diary-based radio ratings services, as well as other related agreements.
Arbitron has filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission a Current Report on Form 8-K that contains more information regarding the agreements. A copy of the Current Report on Form 8-K can also be found on the Arbitron Web site.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's headquarters and its world-renowned research and technology organizations are located in Columbia, Maryland.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090515172223.txt.gz
TIME:20090515172223
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 8.01 Other Events.
In connection with a review of its executive compensation practices, Arbitron Inc. has determined that, effective as of January 1, 2009, it will not enter into any new or materially amended agreements with named executive officers providing for excise tax gross-up provisions with respect to payments contingent upon a change in control.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090604141801.txt.gz
TIME:20090604141801
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On June 3, Stephen Morris, the former President, Chief Executive Officer and Chairman of the Board of Directors and current employee of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") established a new stock trading plan in accordance with the requirements specified in Rule 10b5-1(c) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"). Mr. Morris established this plan in order to diversify his investment portfolio. Under the terms of the plan, an authorized third-party broker will sell shares of Company common stock at monthly intervals beginning in August 2009. Additionally, an authorized third-party broker may exercise stock options and then sell shares of Company common stock beginning in August 2009 and ending in October 2009. The plan covers the sale of up to 27,617 shares of Company common stock. This plan is scheduled to terminate no later than December 31, 2009. The plan was adopted during an authorized trading period and when Mr. Morris was not in possession of material non-public informati on. Transactions under this plan will be publicly reported to the Securities and Exchange Commission in accordance with applicable securities laws, rules and regulations.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated June 4, 2009
The information in this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press Information
Contact: Deirdre Blackwood Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8523 didi.blackwood@arbitron.com
Jessica Benbow Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8363 jessica.benbow@arbitron.com
For Immediate Release
 Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that former Chairman and Chief Executive Officer and current employee Stephen Morris has entered into a Rule 10b5-1 stock trading plan in order to diversify his investment portfolio covering the sale of 27,617 shares of Arbitron common stock.
COLUMBIA, Md., June 4, 2009
Under the terms of the plan, an authorized third-party broker will sell shares of Arbitron common stock at monthly intervals beginning in August 2009. Additionally, an authorized third-party broker may exercise stock options and then sell shares of Arbitron common stock beginning in August 2009 and ending in October 2009. This plan is scheduled to terminate no later than December 31, 2009. The plan was adopted during an authorized trading period and when Mr. Morris was not in possession of material non-public information.
Transactions under this plan will be publicly reported to the Securities and Exchange Commission in accordance with applicable securities laws, rules and regulations.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Arbitron's headquarters and its world-renowned research and technology organizations are located in Columbia, Maryland.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090629190231.txt.gz
TIME:20090629190231
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On June 29, 2009, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release in response to reports that U.S. House Committee on Oversight and Government Reform has requested information from the Federal Communications Commission regarding the impact of the Portable People Meter radio ratings service.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated June 29, 2009
The information in this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Contact: Jessica Benbow Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8363 jessica.benbow@arbitron.com
For Immediate Release
COLUMBIA, MD; June 29, 2009  Arbitron Inc., in response to reports that U.S. House Committee on Oversight and Government Reform has requested information from the Federal Communications Commission regarding the impact of the Portable People Meter (PPM) on radio listening estimates, has issued the following statement:
"Arbitron welcomes any opportunity to discuss the importance of electronic measurement, the effectiveness of the PPM technology, the value of the data it produces and our disciplined approach to the deployment of the service across the United States," said Michael Skarzynski, President and Chief Executive Officer for Arbitron. "Arbitron looks forward to sharing with the Committee our expertise and insights based on our long history and extensive experience in gathering, distributing and supporting the currency that is used throughout the radio industry by broadcasters, advertisers, and agencies."
The PPM electronic measurement service is currently used in markets to gather detailed information on radio listening habits. As Arbitron continues to commercialize its PPM service across the country, the company is seeking input from its stakeholders and has already implemented a number of improvements, including more cell-phone only panelists and increased targets for minority listeners in PPM samples.
"We maintain an ongoing dialogue with broadcasters, industry groups, advertising agencies, the Federal Communications Commission, and Congress as part of our commitment to continuous improvement program for the PPM service and technologies," said Mr. Skarzynski.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Portable People Meter and PPM are marks of Arbitron Inc.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2009 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, the current global economic recession and the upheaval in the credit markets and financial services industry, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, our ability to successfully commercialize our Portable People Meter service, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, our ability to successfully identify, consummate and integrate appropriate acquisitions, the impact of increased costs of data collection including a trend toward increasing incidence of cell phone-only households, litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2008 Annual Report on Form 10-K. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090714172858.txt.gz
TIME:20090714172858
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
Commercialization of Portable People Meter ("PPM) Radio Ratings Service in Miami-Ft. Lauderdale-Hollywood On July 14, 2009, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") announced that it has commercialized its Portable People Meter radio ratings services in the Miami-Ft. Lauderdale-Hollywood market. The Company is releasing radio audience estimates for the June 2009 PPM survey month to its subscribers in Miami-Ft. Lauderdale-Hollywood. Effective July 14, 2009, the PPM radio audience estimates for this market should be used as the basis for buy/sell transactions of radio commercial time among subscribing stations, agencies and advertisers. In addition, the April and May PPM survey months, which Arbitron had previously released as "pre-currency" information, are now designated as "currency" data. The Winter 2009 diary-based radio audience report (January 8  April 1, 2009) is no longer deemed "currency" for buy/sell transactions. PPM ratings are based on audience estimates a nd are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market. On July 14, 2009, the Company issued a press release regarding the commercialization of the PPM service in Miami-Ft. Lauderdale-Hollywood. A copy of that press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. regarding commercialization of the PPM radio ratings service in Miami-Ft. Lauderdale-Hollywood dated July 14, 2009
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements This Current Report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as may, will, should, likely, expects, anticipates, estimates, believes, or plans, or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncerta inties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:  absorb costs related to legal proceedings and governmental entity interactions and avoid related fines, limitations, or conditions on our business activities;  successfully commercialize our Portable People MeterTM service;  successfully manage the impact on our business of the current economic downturn generally, and in the advertising market, in particular, including, without limitation, the insolvency of any of our customers or the impact of such downturn on our customers ability to fulfill their payment obligations to us;  successfully maintain and promote industry usage of our services, a critical mass of broadcaster encoding, and the proper understanding of our audience measurement services and methodology in light of governmental regulation, legislation, litigation, activism, or adverse public relations efforts;  compete with companies that may have financial, marketi ng, sales, technical, or other advantages over us;  successfully design, recruit and maintain PPM panels that appropriately balance research quality, panel size, and operational cost;  successfully develop, implement, and fund initiatives designed to increase sample sizes;  complete the Media Rating Council, Inc. (MRC) audits of our local market PPM ratings services in a timely manner and successfully obtain and/or maintain MRC accreditation for our audience measurement business;  renew contracts with key customers;  successfully execute our business strategies, including entering into potential acquisition, joint-venture or other material third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact, if any, of any further ownership shifts in the radio and advertising agency industries;  effectively respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprietary software systems, su ch as software systems to support our cell phone-only sampling plans, and new customer services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperation in surveys, consumer trends including a trend toward increasing incidence of cell phone-only households, privacy concerns, technology changes, and/or government regulations;  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to encode and/or measure new forms of media content, delivery and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment; and  realize the anticipated savings from the Companys workforce and expense reduction program. There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTOR S in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Contact: Jessica Benbow Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8363 Jessica.benbow@arbitron.com
 Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that it has commercialized its Portable People Meter radio ratings service in the Miami-Ft. Lauderdale-Hollywood, Florida market and is releasing radio audience estimates for the June 2009 PPM survey month to its subscribers in Miami-Ft. Lauderdale-Hollywood.
Columbia, MD; July 14, 2009
TM
TM
Effective today, the PPM radio audience estimates for this market may be used as the basis for buy/sell transactions of radio commercial time among subscribing stations, agencies and advertisers. In addition, the April and May PPM survey months, which Arbitron had previously released as "pre-currency" information, are now designated as "currency" data. The winter 2009 diary-based radio audience report (January 8  April 1, 2009) has been retired and is no longer deemed "currency" for buy/sell transactions.
"We are commercializing our Portable People Meter radio ratings service in Miami-Ft. Lauderdale-Hollywood in order to meet our obligations to our customers and to the radio industry at large," said Michael Skarzynski, Arbitron President and Chief Executive Officer.
"The industry needs current estimates of the radio audience in the nation's largest markets to facilitate an efficient buy-sell process for radio advertising," continued Skarzynski. "Our goal with the commercialization of the PPM is to help radio remain competitive in an increasingly challenging media marketplace."
About the Portable People Meter 
The Arbitron Portable People Meter system uses a passive audience measurement device  about the size of a small cell phone  to track consumer exposure to media and entertainment, including broadcast, cable and satellite television; terrestrial, satellite and online radio as well as cinema advertising and many types of place-based electronic media. Carried throughout the day by randomly selected survey participants, the PPM device can track when and where they watch television, listen to radio as well as how they interact with other forms of media and entertainment.
The PPM detects inaudible codes embedded in the audio portion of media and entertainment content delivered by broadcasters, content providers and distributors. At the end of the day, the meter is placed in a docking station that extracts the codes and sends them to a central computer. The PPM is equipped with a motion sensor, a patented quality control feature unique to the system, which allows Arbitron to confirm the compliance of the PPM survey participants every day.
.
ABOUT ARBITRON INC
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Portable People Meter and PPM are marks of Arbitron Inc.
TM
TM
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
FORWARD LOOKING STATEMENT
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090721070713.txt.gz
TIME:20090721070713
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 21, 2009, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release reporting second quarter 2009 financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated July 21, 2009.
The information in this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky
Press Contacts
Arbitron Inc.
: Didi Blackwood / Jessica Benbow
410-312-8523 / 410-312-8363 didi.blackwood@arbitron.com / jessica.benbow@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced financial results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2009.
Columbia MD, July 21, 2009 
Net income for the quarter was $3.5 million or $0.13 per share (diluted), compared with $600 thousand or $0.02 per share (diluted) for the second quarter of 2008.
For the second quarter of 2009, the Company reported revenues of $86.8 million, an increase of 10.4 percent over revenue of $78.7 million during the second quarter of 2008. As anticipated, revenue growth in the quarter benefited from the Company's commercialization of its Portable People Meter (PPMratings service in Boston as well as the recognition of pre-currency revenue in five new PPM markets  Miami-Ft. Lauderdale-Hollywood, Seattle-Tacoma, Phoenix, Minneapolis-St. Paul and San Diego.
TM
TM)
Costs and expenses for the second quarter increased by 4.2 percent, from $82.4 million in 2008 to $85.9 million in 2009, due primarily to planned expenditures for the commercialization of the PPM ratings service and the introduction of cell-phone-only household sampling in 151 diary markets. These increases were offset in part by cost reduction initiatives implemented in prior quarters.
In the second quarter of both 2009 and 2008, share-based compensation totaled $2.7 million.
Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for the quarter were $6.5 million, compared with EBIT of $1.4 million for the second quarter of 2008.
For the six months ended June 30, 2009, revenue was $185.3 million, an increase of 7.3 percent over revenue of $172.7 million for the same period in 2008.
EBIT decreased 5.8 percent from $28.2 million in the first six months of 2008 to $26.6 million for the same period in 2009 due primarily to $8.4 million of reorganization and restructuring expense recorded year-to-date. Net income for the six-month period decreased 6.1 percent to $15.8 million compared with $16.9 million in 2008. Earnings per share (diluted) for the six months in 2009 were $0.60 compared with $0.61 per share (diluted) last year.
"In the second quarter of 2009, Arbitron commercialized the Portable People Meter radio ratings service in Boston, and continued the work of building PPM panels for the additional markets we plan to commercialize in 2009," said Michael Skarzynski, President and Chief Executive Officer.
Management Comment on Second Quarter 2009 Results
"We signed a three-year agreement with Clear Channel Radio for diary-based radio ratings services in 105 markets. Additionally, Arbitron signed multi-year diary market agreements with a number of other customers.
"We also successfully introduced cell-phone-only household sampling in an initial 151 diary markets in the Spring 2009 survey. As a result, we saw significant sample quality gains for young adults, age 18-34, in the first month of the survey.
"We also continue to make the hard choices required to reduce costs and target our resources on initiatives that we believe can best enhance the long-term value of Arbitron's services to the radio industrydeploying the Portable People Meter radio ratings service in additional markets, expanding cell-phone-only household measurement in PPM and diary markets and working toward MRC accreditation for the PPM service through our continuous improvement programs," said Mr. Skarzynski.
Arbitron is revising downward its revenue guidance for the full-year 2009, while maintaining its earnings per share guidance for the year.
2009 Guidance
Due largely to the overall economic conditions and the impact of the continuing advertising recession, Arbitron now expects revenue for the full year 2009 to increase between 2 percent and 6 percent compared to the 2008 revenue of $368.8 million. The Company originally projected revenue would increase between 6 percent and 10 percent for the year as compared to 2008.
Arbitron continues to expect that earnings per share (diluted) for the full-year 2009 will be between $1.40 and $1.55 versus $1.36 in 2008.
"In light of the reduced revenue visibility associated with the challenging economy, we have taken difficult yet appropriate steps to rationalize our cost structure to suit the uncertain environment in which we are operating," said Sean Creamer, Executive Vice President, Finance & Planning & Chief Financial Officer.
"We are monitoring events closely, including overall economic conditions as well as legislative, regulatory and judicial developments affecting the Company. Should future events change our current thinking, we will, as appropriate, re-evaluate our guidance with the benefit of that knowledge."
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time. The Company invites you to listen to the call by dialing (toll free) 888-873-8496. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing 973-935-8513. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 19150443. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
Earnings conference call: schedule and access
A replay of the call will be available from 12:00 p.m. on July 21, 2009 through 11:59 p.m. on August 21, 2009. To access the replay, please call (toll free) 800-642-1687 in the United States, or 706-645-9291 if you're calling from outside of the United States. To access the replay, users will need to enter the following code: 19150443.
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to, either income from continuing operations, as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
.
(2) Arbitron's management believes that presenting EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization), both non-GAAP financial measures, as supplemental information helps investors, analysts, and others, if they so choose, in understanding and evaluating Arbitron's operating performance in some of the same manners that management does because EBIT and EBITDA exclude certain items that are not directly related to Arbitron's core operating performance. Arbitron's management references these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing current performance and making decisions about internal budgets, resource allocation and financial goals. EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to income from continuing operations. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, and depreciation and amortization to income from continuing operations. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered substitutes either for income from continuing operations, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
Note: The December 31, 2008 Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet is derived from the audited Balance Sheet included in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2008.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090916122734.txt.gz
TIME:20090916122734
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
Arbitron Inc. is scheduled to present at the 7 Annual C.L. King Best Ideas Conference on Wednesday, September 16th at the Omni Berkshire Place Hotel in New York City. A copy of the slide show presentation to be made at the conference is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
th
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
The following exhibit relating to Item 7.01 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
Exhibit 99.1      Arbitron Inc. Slide Show Presentation
The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
Exhibit Index
Exhibit 99.1      Arbitron Inc. Slide Show Presentation

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20090930171732.txt.gz
TIME:20090930171732
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(b) Effective September 30, Pierre C. Bouvard has assumed the position of Executive Vice President, Cross-Platform Services and no longer functions as Executive Vice President, Sales.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20091002143105.txt.gz
TIME:20091002143105
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On October 2, 2009, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release regarding its plan to increase sample sizes accross all markets in its Portable People Meter(TM) radio ratings service. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated October 2, 2009
The information in this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Columbia, MD; October 02, 2009  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today its implementation strategy to increase sample sizes in its Portable People Meter (PPM) markets. The Company now plans to increase sample targets by ten percent in the important advertising demographic of Persons aged 18-54 by mid-year 2011.
Arbitron has designed these sample improvements to address the needs of broadcasters and advertisers. Using a phased approach, the Company plans to:
The Company also plans to maintain a minimum sample target of at least 750 active panel participants aged 6 and older by mid-year 2011 in substantially all PPM markets. Arbitron plans to increase the minimum sample target for Memphis and Providence to 675 by year end 2011.*
Arbitron plans to:
* Minimum sample targets for Persons 6+ in Memphis and Providence, will be increased to 630 by year end 2010 and 675 by year end 2011. Clients in these two markets did not elect to take advantage of a previously offered sample increase proposal. Both markets will have options to increase minimum sample targets further.
The total PPM sample across all markets is expected to increase by approximately 10 percent in the aggregate for Persons aged 12+ by mid-year 2011 as a result of this plan.
"Over the past 9 months, Arbitron has made significant advancements to improve sample quality," said Michael Skarzynski, Chief Executive Officer and President, Arbitron. "As part of our ongoing quality initiatives, we have accelerated the prioritization of increasing our cell-phone-only sample. This new plan to increase sample targets for Persons aged 18-54 complements our recently announced commitment to increasing the number of cell-phone-only households in all PPM markets. We continue to lay the groundwork to help ensure that the radio industry has the state-of-the-art solutions and services that it will need to compete for the long-term."
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
The PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2009 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, the current global economic recession and the upheaval in the credit markets and financial services industry, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, our ability to successfully commercialize our Portable People Meter
TM
service, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, our ability to successfully identify, consummate and integrate appropriate acquisitions, the impact of increased costs of data collection including a trend toward increasing incidence of cell phone-only households, litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2008 Annual Report on
Form 10-K
. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20091009161902.txt.gz
TIME:20091009161902
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
Effective October 6, 2009, Taher G. Behbehani is no longer employed at Arbitron Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20091020070317.txt.gz
TIME:20091020070317
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 20, 2009, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release reporting third quarter 2009 financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated October 20, 2009
The information in this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky
Press Contacts
Arbitron Inc.
: Didi Blackwood / Jessica Benbow
410-312-8523 / 410-312-8363 didi.blackwood@arbitron.com / jessica.benbow@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced financial results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2009.
Columbia, MD, October 20, 2009 
Net income for the quarter was $13.7 million or $0.51 per share (diluted), compared with $17.0 million or $0.63 per share (diluted) for the third quarter of 2008.
For the third quarter of 2009, the Company reported revenue of $98.1 million, a decrease of 4.3 percent over revenue of $102.5 million during the third quarter of 2008.
Lower revenue during the current quarter compared to the third quarter of last year is largely the result of several previously disclosed factors, including: the impact of a decision by Cumulus and Clear Channel to subscribe to a competitor's diary-based radio ratings service in a limited number of small and medium sized markets, beginning with the Spring 2009 survey period; the impact of Univision electing not to subscribe to the Portable People Meter (PPM) service in certain markets; and the continued impact of the advertising recession on renewals and new business.
Comparability between the 2008 and 2009 third quarters is also affected by the previously disclosed impact of the transition of our services from diary to PPM. During the first quarter of PPM commercialization, Arbitron recognizes revenue based on the delivery of both the final quarterly diary ratings and the initial monthly PPM ratings in each market. This impact was pronounced in the third quarter of 2008  during which the Company commercialized the PPM service in eight large markets, including New York, Los Angeles, Chicago, and San Francisco.
Costs and expenses for the third quarter increased by 1.9 percent, from $72.1 million in 2008 to $73.5 million in 2009, due primarily to the recognition of a $1.8 million, or $0.04 per share (diluted), non-cash charge relating to the acceleration of pension expense for certain pension plan participants who were part of the Company's restructuring and reorganization program.
The planned increase in expenditures for the commercialization of the PPM ratings service and the introduction of cell-phone-only household sampling in diary markets were offset by savings realized from the reorganization and restructuring program.
In the third quarter of 2009, share-based compensation totaled $2.9 million compared to $2.1 million in the third quarter of 2008.
Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for the quarter were $22.7 million, compared with EBIT of $28.2 million for the third quarter of 2008.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2009, revenue was $283.4 million, an increase of 3.0 percent over revenue of $275.2 million for the same period in 2008.
EBIT decreased 12.6 percent from $56.4 million in the first nine months of 2008 to $49.3 million for the same period in 2009, due primarily to $10.1 million of reorganization and restructuring expense recorded year-to-date.
Net income for the nine-month period decreased by $4.3 million to $29.6 million compared with $33.8 million in 2008. Earnings per share (diluted) for the nine months in 2009 were $1.11 compared with $1.23 per share (diluted) last year.
Trade receivables as of September 30, 2009 were $50.0 million compared to $65.0 million as of June 30, 2009 and $50.0 million as of December 31, 2008.
"In the third quarter of 2009, Arbitron commercialized the Portable People Meter radio ratings service in TampaSt. PetersburgClearwater, St. Louis, DenverBoulder, Baltimore and Pittsburgh, bringing to 25 the total number of PPM markets," said Michael Skarzynski, President and Chief Executive Officer. "In addition, we have built out the PPM panels and begun the pre-currency surveys for the eight additional PPM markets that we plan to commercialize in December 2009.
Management Comment on Third Quarter 2009
"We continue to receive positive feedback from the market that electronic measurement is improving broadcasters' programming and sales strategies. Our goal is to help the radio industry leverage the advantages that PPM can offer to increase the value and utility of radio for local and national advertisers in all markets.
"With the start of the Fall 2009 survey in September, Arbitron is now sampling cell-phone-only households in all our diary-based syndicated radio markets in the continental U.S., Alaska and Hawaii, an important milestone in our continuous improvement programs.
"Also in the third quarter, the ratings consortium in Canada launched the world's largest combined panel for television and radio audience measurement, using our PPM technology.
"We created a Cross-Platform media measurement group, bringing together product development, sales and product management in a significant step toward leveraging our PPM technologies beyond our traditional radio business," said Mr. Skarzynski.
Arbitron is reiterating the following revenue and EPS guidance:
2009 Guidance
For the full year 2009, Arbitron continues to expect revenue to increase between two percent and six percent as compared to full year 2008 revenue of $368.8 million.
For the full year 2009, Arbitron continues to expect earnings per share (diluted) to be between $1.40 and $1.55, an increase of between three percent and 14 percent, as compared to $1.36 for the full year 2008.
The Company's earnings per share guidance for the full year 2009 currently contemplates the impact of $10.1 million in pre-tax expense, related to the restructuring and reorganization program.
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time. The Company invites you to listen to the call by dialing (toll free) 888-562-3356. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing 973-582-2700. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 32982459. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com, www.ccbn.com and www.streetevents.com.
Earnings conference call: schedule and access
A replay of the call will be available from 12:00 p.m. on October 20, 2009 through 11:59 p.m. on October 27, 2009. To access the replay, please call (toll free) 800-642-1687 in the United States, or 706-645-9291 if you're calling from outside of the United States. To access the replay, users will need to enter the following code: 32982459.
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to, either income from continuing operations, as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
.
(2) Arbitron's management believes that presenting EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization), both non-GAAP financial measures, as supplemental information helps investors, analysts, and others, if they so choose, in understanding and evaluating Arbitron's operating performance in some of the same manners that management does because EBIT and EBITDA exclude certain items that are not directly related to Arbitron's core operating performance. Arbitron's management references these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing current performance and making decisions about internal budgets, resource allocation and financial goals. EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to income from continuing operations. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, and depreciation and amortization to income from continuing operations. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered substitutes either for income from continuing operations, as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow, as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
Note: The December 31, 2008 Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet is derived from the audited Balance Sheet included in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2008.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20100111172440.txt.gz
TIME:20100111172440
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On January 11, 2010, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") announced that, effective immediately, Michael P. Skarzynski resigned from his position as the Companys President and Chief Executive Officer and resigned from serving on the Companys Board of Directors. The Company also announced that, effective January 11, 2010, William T. Kerr, a member of the Companys Board of Directors, will assume the position of President and Chief Executive Officer. The information under the caption "Additional Background Information Regarding Mr. Kerr" in the press release attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On January 11, 2010, the Company also updated the status of the Companys application for accreditation by the Media Rating Council of the monthly Average Quarter Hour radio ratings data produced by the Arbitron Portable People Meter radio ratings service in 21 local markets. A copy of the press release announcing the status update is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated January 11, 2010 Exhibit 99.2 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated January 11, 2010
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements This Current Report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as may, will, should, likely, expects, anticipates, estimates, believes, or plans, or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainti es include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:  absorb costs related to legal proceedings and governmental entity interactions and avoid related fines, limitations, or conditions on our business activities;  successfully commercialize our Portable People MeterTM service;  successfully manage the impact on our business of the current economic downturn generally, and in the advertising market, in particular, including, without limitation, the insolvency of any of our customers or the impact of such downturn on our customers ability to fulfill their payment obligations to us;  successfully maintain and promote industry usage of our services, a critical mass of broadcaster encoding, and the proper understanding of our audience measurement services and methodology in light of governmental actions, including investigation, regulation, legislation or litigation, customer or industry group activism, or adverse community or public relations efforts ;  compete with companies that may have financial, marketing, sales, technical, or other advantages over us;  successfully design, recruit and maintain PPM panels that appropriately balance research quality, panel size, and operational cost;  successfully develop, implement, and fund initiatives designed to increase sample quality;  complete the Media Rating Council, Inc. (MRC) audits of our local market PPM ratings services in a timely manner and successfully obtain and/or maintain MRC accreditation for our audience measurement business;  renew contracts with key customers;  successfully execute our business strategies, including entering into potential acquisition, joint-venture or other material third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact, if any, of any further ownership shifts in the radio and advertising agency industries;  effectively respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating new proprietary software systems, such as software systems to support our cell phone-only sampling plans, and new customer services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperation in surveys, consumer trends including a trend toward increasing incidence of cell phone-only households, privacy concerns, technology changes, and/or government regulations;  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to encode and/or measure new forms of media content, delivery and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment;  successfully manage the transition associated with our new CEO; and  realize the anticipated savings from the Companys workforce and expense reduction program. There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change. The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K and attached Exhibits shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1 933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8523 didi.blackwood@arbitron.com
Media Contacts: Deirdre Blackwood
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
COLUMBIA, MD  JANUARY 11, 2010 The Board of Directors of Arbitron, Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that, effective immediately, Michael P. Skarzynski has resigned as President and Chief Executive Officer, and as a member of the Company's Board of Directors. Also effective immediately, William T. Kerr, a member of the Company's Board of Directors, will become Arbitron's President and Chief Executive Officer.
"Bill's experience as a Chief Executive Officer and Chairman of a large public media company coupled with his board memberships make him uniquely qualified to lead Arbitron. Additionally, Bill's service as a member of Arbitron's Board of Directors should provide a fast and effective transition into his new role," said Philip Guarascio, Chairman of the Board, Arbitron Inc.
Mr. Skarzynski and the Company's Board together determined that he had violated a Company policy in a matter entirely unrelated to the financial performance of the Company. Accordingly, Mr. Skarzynski has submitted his resignation to the Company.
Arbitron will host a conference call at 12:00 noon Eastern Time, Tuesday January 12.
The Company invites you to listen to the call by dialing (toll free) 888-562-3356. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing 973-582-2700. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 50602911. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com and www.streetevents.com.  
 
Additional Background Information Regarding Mr. Kerr
William T. Kerr, age 68, has been a Director of Arbitron since May 2007. From July 2006 to the present, Mr. Kerr has been Chairman of the Board of Directors of Meredith Corporation, a New York Stock Exchange listed diversified media company that publishes magazines and special interest publications and also owns and operates local television stations. Mr. Kerr has been a member of the Meredith Corporation Board of Directors since 1994. Mr. Kerr was Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Meredith Corporation from January 1996 until July 2007. Mr. Kerr was President and Chief Operating Officer of Meredith Corporation, from 1994 to 1996, President, Magazine Group and Executive Vice President of Meredith, from 1991 to 1994.
Mr. Kerr has been a member of the Boards of Directors of The Interpublic Group of Companies, Inc., a New York Stock Exchange listed marketing communications and marketing services company, since November 2006; Whirlpool Corporation, a New York Stock Exchange listed appliance manufacturer, since June 2006; The Principal Financial Group, Inc., a New York Stock Exchange listed financial services company, since 2001; and a member of the Board of Penton Media, Inc., a private firm.  
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2010 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, the current global economic recession and the upheaval in the credit markets and financial services industry, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, our ability to successfully commercialize our Portable People Meter
TM
service, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, our ability to successfully identify, consummate and integrate appropriate acquisitions, the impact of increased costs of data collection including a trend toward increasing incidence of cell phone-only households, litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2008 Annual Report on
Form 10-K
. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.

Press
Information
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8523 Didi.Blackwood@arbitron.com
Contact: Deidre Blackwood
For Immediate Release
COLUMBIA, MD  January 11, 2010  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today issued the following statement regarding the status of the Company's application for accreditation by the Media Rating Council (MRC) of the monthly Average Quarter Hour (AQH) radio ratings data produced by the Arbitron Portable People Meter (PPM) radio ratings service in 21 local markets.
Arbitron has been informed by the MRC that it has accredited the monthly AQH radio ratings data produced by the PPM service in the Minneapolis-St. Paul market  which joins Houston-Galveston and Riverside-San Bernardino as accredited markets for Arbitron's PPM ratings service.
Additionally, Arbitron has been notified that the MRC will deny accreditation to PPM services in the following local markets: Atlanta, Baltimore, Boston, Chicago, Dallas, Denver, Detroit, Los Angeles, New York, Miami, Philadelphia, Phoenix, Pittsburgh, St. Louis, San Diego, Seattle, Tampa-St. Petersburg, and Washington, DC. Further, the MRC closed without action audits for two California markets (San Francisco and San Jose) and these two markets remain unaccredited. Arbitron will collaborate with the MRC to re-audit each of these markets in 2010.
The Company is encouraged by the accreditation of Minneapolis-St. Paul, which further validates our Radio First methodology. The Company understands the MRC's need to close out old audits. Arbitron believes that across all of its PPM markets it has demonstrated significant progress and ongoing commitment to improvement requested by the MRC.
The Company continues to adhere to the MRC accreditation process, and looks forward to working together with the MRC on that process.
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
TM
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2010 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, the current global economic recession and the upheaval in the credit markets and financial services industry, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, our ability to successfully commercialize our Portable People Meter
TM
service, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, our ability to successfully identify, consummate and integrate appropriate acquisitions, the impact of increased costs of data collection including a trend toward increasing incidence of cell phone-only households, litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2008 Annual Report on
Form 10-K
. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20100112100237.txt.gz
TIME:20100112100237
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(e) On January 11, 2010 and in connection with Michael P. Skarzynskis resignation from Arbitron Inc. (the "Company"), the Company entered into a Settlement Agreement and General Release (the "Agreement") with Mr. Skarzynski. The material terms of the Agreement are as follows:  The Company will pay Mr. Skarzynski a total of $750,000 in cash less applicable taxes.  If Mr. Skarzynski and/or his eligible dependents become eligible for COBRA coverage under the Companys group health plans, the Company will pay the cost of COBRA coverage until the earlier of: (i) December 31, 2010 or (ii) none of Mr. Skarzynski and/or his eligible dependents are eligible for COBRA coverage.  The Company will not to seek reimbursement from Mr. Skarzynski of approximately $125,000 in relocation monies that would otherwise have been due to be repaid by Mr. Skarzynski pursuant to the terms of Mr. Skarzynskis Executive Employment Agreement.  The Company will indemn ify Mr. Skarzynski for reasonable attorneys fees and costs incurred through the effective date of the Agreement in connection with matters that culminated with his resignation in an amount not to exceed $100,000.  The Company will continue to cover Mr. Skarzynski under its Directors and Officers insurance policies for actions/inactions taken in his capacity as an officer and director of the Company during the term of his employment. The non-competition, non-recruitment and non-disparagement provisions set forth in Mr. Skarzynskis Executive Employment Agreement will survive his resignation, and Mr. Skarzynski has agreed to continue to abide by those provisions. The equity awards made to Mr. Skarzynski on January 13, 2009 pursuant to his Executive Employment Agreement will not vest as a result of Mr. Skarzynskis resignation. The above description is qualified in its entirety by reference to the terms and conditions of the Agreement, which the Company i ntends to file as an exhibit to its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20100120151217.txt.gz
TIME:20100120151217
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(d) On January 20, 2010, John A. Dimling was elected to the Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") to serve until the next annual meeting of stockholders of the Company, or until his earlier death, resignation or removal. Additional information about Mr. Dimling is included in the Companys press release issued on January 20, 2010, which is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. Mr. Dimling will participate in the Companys previously disclosed Non-Employee Director Incentive Program. In connection with joining the Companys Board of Directors, on January 20, 2010, Mr. Dimling received a one-time grant of 4,500 deferred stock units, which deferred stock units will vest in three equal installments of 1,500 deferred stock units over a three-year period and will be payable no sooner than six months following Mr. Dimling's termination of service as a director of the Company. The award is in the form of the Compan ys standard Form of 2008 Equity Compensation Plan Director Deferred Stock Unit Agreement under the Arbitron Inc. 2008 Equity Compensation Plan, filed as Exhibit 10.2 to the Companys Form 10-Q, filed on May 7, 2009.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated January 20, 2010
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Contact: Deirdre Blackwood Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8523 Didi.Blackwood@arbitron.com
For Immediate Release
 Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced that John A. Dimling, former Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of Nielsen Media Research, Inc. ("Nielsen"), has been appointed to the Arbitron Board of Directors, effective January 20, 2010, to serve until the next annual meeting of stockholders.
COLUMBIA, MD; January 20, 2010
"John brings extraordinary insight and valuable leadership experience in both broadcast media measurement research and technology to Arbitron's board," said Philip Guarascio, Chairman of the Arbitron Board of Directors. "John's long history of partnering with the media industry to develop solutions for customers and grow a business across a variety of customer segments is a timely asset to help the Company navigate the changing media environment."
Mr. Dimling joined Nielsen in August 1985. He served as President and Chief Operating Officer of Nielsen from August 1993 to June 1998, as President and Chief Executive Officer from July 1998 to December 2001, and as Chairman and Chairman Emeritus from January 2002 to April 2008. He was also Chairman of the Board of Directors of NetRatings, Inc. from May 2002 to June 2007.
Currently, Mr. Dimling serves on the Board of Innerscope Research, Inc. Previously, Mr. Dimling served as Executive Director of the Electronic Media Rating Council from 1982-1985, and held positions with the Corporation for Public Broadcasting, the National Association of Broadcasters, and was Chairman of the Board of the Advertising Research Foundation. Mr. Dimling has an A.B. in Mathematics (Summa Cum Laude) from Dartmouth College, M.S. (with Distinction), Industrial Administration from Carnegie Mellon University, and a Doctor of Jurisprudence (with honors) from George Washington University.
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
Portable People Meter and PPM are marks of Arbitron Inc.
TM
TM
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2010 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, the current global economic recession and the upheaval in the credit markets and financial services industry, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, our ability to successfully commercialize our Portable People Meter
TM
service, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, our ability to successfully identify, consummate and integrate appropriate acquisitions, the impact of increased costs of data collection including a trend toward increasing incidence of cell phone-only households, litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2008 Annual Report on
Form 10-K
. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20100212071638.txt.gz
TIME:20100212071638
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On February 11, 2010, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release regarding a New York State court order compelling Spanish Broadcasting System, Inc. to resume PPM encoding until Tuesday, January 16, 2010. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report and incorporated by reference herein. The information in this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated February 11, 2010
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

COLUMBIA, MD  February 11, 2010  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that the Supreme Court of the State of New York for the County of New York has issued a Temporary Restraining Order effective immediately requiring Spanish Broadcasting System, Inc. (SBS) to resume encoding its broadcasting signals for Arbitron's Portable People Meter (PPM) radio ratings service until Tuesday, February 16, 2010. This order applies to nine SBS radio properties in five cities across the United States. Arbitron also indicated that it suspended delivery of PPM data to SBS in December 2009.
Arbitron sought the Temporary Restraining Order after learning on February 4, 2010 that SBS had ceased encoding its broadcast signals for the PPM service in any of its radio properties in cities where Arbitron has commercialized the PPM ratings service. The court will convene a hearing on Tuesday, February 16, 2010 to determine whether to continue to compel SBS to encode pursuant to its agreement with Arbitron.
"SBS has existing contracts with Arbitron for both the PPM service and to encode its broadcast signals that remain in effect," stated Timothy T. Smith, Arbitron Chief Legal Officer. "We expect SBS to honor the terms of its agreements."
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter device, a new technology for media and marketing research.
Portable People Meter and PPM are marks of Arbitron Inc.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2010 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, the current global economic recession and the upheaval in the credit markets and financial services industry, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, our ability to successfully commercialize our Portable People Meter service, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, our ability to successfully identify, consummate and integrate appropriate acquisitions, the impact of increased costs of data collection including a trend toward increasing incidence of cell phone-only households, litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2008 Annual Report on Form 10-K. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20100218163721.txt.gz
TIME:20100218163721
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(e) On February 11, 2010, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") entered into an Executive Employment Agreement (the "Agreement") with William T. Kerr covering Mr. Kerrs employment as President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company. The material terms and conditions of the Agreement are set forth below. Employment Term The term of Mr. Kerrs employment commenced on January 10, 2010 and will end on January 10, 2012 (the "Initial Term"). Such period may be extended. Salary and Bonus or Incentive Compensation Pursuant to the terms and conditions of the Agreement, the Company will pay Mr. Kerr an annual base salary of $800,000, and Mr. Kerr will be eligible to receive an annual incentive bonus equal to 100% of his annual base salary upon meeting applicable performance criteria set by the Companys Compensation and Human Resources Committee (the "Compensation Committee"). For performance exceeding such applicable performance criteria, the annual incentive bonus wil l be increased up to a maximum of 200% of annual base salary, at the sole discretion of the Compensation Committee. The Compensation Committee will review the base salary no less frequently than annually. Equity Awards Initial Grant Pursuant to the Agreement, on February 11, 2010 the Compensation Committee also approved an initial equity award to Mr. Kerr of 45,254 stock options and 60,144 deferred stock units (DSUs), each with respect to the Companys common stock, par value $0.50 (the "Common Stock") (collectively, the "Initial Grant"). These Options and DSUs were granted under the Companys 2008 Equity Compensation Plan (the "2008 Plan") and subject to its terms. Assuming continued employment, the stock options under the Initial Grant will vest in equal amounts on an annual basis over a three year period following the date of grant (beginning with one third on the first anniversary), and otherwise contain substantially the same terms and conditions as the Compa nys standard form of nonqualified stock option agreement adopted for use under the 2008 Plan, except as described below with regard to potential payments upon early termination. Assuming continued employment, the DSUs under the Initial Grant will vest in equal amounts over a four year period following the date of grant (beginning with one quarter on the first anniversary) and otherwise contain substantially the same terms and conditions as the Companys standard form of deferred stock unit agreement adopted for use under the 2008 Plan, except as described below with regard to potential payments upon early termination. Long-Term Incentive Subject to approval by the Compensation Committee, the Company also will grant to Mr. Kerr a long-term incentive award to be valued at $1,500,000 on the date of grant and to be divided into substantially the same mix of stock options, performance-based cash, and restricted stock units as apply to other senior executives (and with the restricted stock units also performance-based to the extent grants to other senior executives are subject to performance conditions) but with the restricted stock units in the form of DSUs payable only after Mr. Kerrs separation from service. The long-term incentive award to Mr. Kerr also will be subject to the accelerated vesting terms described below with regard to potential payment upon early termination. The Compensation Committee, at its sole discretion, will consider the grant of additional compensatory stock awards to Mr. Kerr no less frequently than annually. Benefits Mr. Kerr will, to the extent eligible, be entitled to participate at a level commensurate with his position in all employee welfare, benefit, and retirement plans and programs the Company provides to its executives in accordance with Company policies. Mr. Kerr will work at the Companys offices in Columbia, Maryland. Potential Payments Upon Early Termination The Company or Mr. Kerr may terminate the Agreement at any time for any reason, or for no reason. If Mr. Kerrs employment terminates for any reason (including for Cause (as defined in the Agreement)), the Company will pay to Mr. Kerr (i) any earned but unpaid annual base salary; (ii) any earned but unpaid annual bonus; (iii) any unreimbursed business expenses, in accordance with the Companys policies; and (iv) any amounts or benefits payable under any Company benefit plans then in effect. In addition to the payments described above, if the Company terminates Mr. Kerrs employment, during the Initial Term, without Cause or if Mr. Kerrs Retirement occurs, Mr. Kerr will be entitled to receive (i) base salary for the remainder of the Initial Term, paid in accordance with the Companys standard payroll practices and (ii) a bonus component. For purposes of the Agreement, "Retirement" means Mr. Kerrs voluntary resignation (i) at or after completion of the Initial Term or (ii) earlier upon Mr. Kerr& #x2019;s replacement as Chief Executive Officer and his completion of a post-replacement transition period of 90 days or a shorter period at the Boards request; provided, however, that Mr. Kerr may not initiate his resignation under clause (ii) above before the Board approves his replacement and have such resignation treated as Retirement. If Mr. Kerrs employment is terminated without Cause during 2010, the bonus component will be $800,000. If, in subsequent years, the annual bonus for the year of termination is determined by the Compensation Committee under a program intended to qualify as performance-based for purposes of Section 162(m) of the Internal Revenue Code (an "Exempt Bonus"), the bonus component will be determined under the factors for such bonus and with the exercise by the Compensation Committee of negative discretion. If the annual bonus for the year of termination is not intended to be an Exempt Bonus, the bonus component will be one time target bonus, prorated for hi s months of employment during the year of termination. The bonus component will not be prorated for a termination without Cause or Retirement occurring before December 31, 2010. The equity awards described above will vest and/or become exercisable in accordance with the Companys customary terms. However, to the extent more favorable to Mr. Kerr (except in the case of a termination for Cause) the following special acceleration terms will apply. Upon termination of employment as a result of Mr. Kerrs death or disability outstanding equity awards will accelerate, with continued exercisability of options for one year following termination. Upon a termination of Mr. Kerrs employment by the Company without Cause or upon Mr. Kerrs Retirement: (x) any performance based awards will require satisfaction of the applicable performance objectives but will not be prorated for partial years of service; (y) any stock options will continue to vest as though Mr. Kerr remained employe d, and will remain exercisable for three years following termination of employment; and (z) any DSUs not subject to performance criteria will continue to vest as if Mr. Kerr had remained employed. Upon Mr. Kerrs resignation other than in connection with his Retirement, all unvested awards will be forfeited and vested portions of stock options will remain exercisable for 90 days following termination of employment. Upon termination of Mr. Kerrs employment by the Company for Cause, all vested and unvested awards will be forfeited. In order to receive any severance benefits or accelerated vesting provided under the Agreement, Mr. Kerr must execute a release in the form provided by the Company of all legally-releasable claims that Mr. Kerr may then have against the Company and any of its affiliates. Non-Competition, Non-Recruitment, and Non-Disparagement The Agreement contains provisions pursuant to which Mr. Kerr has agreed that, while employed and for 12 months followin g termination of employment for any reason, he will not directly or indirectly, subject to certain de minimis exceptions involving the ownership of publicly traded securities, compete with any part of the Companys business. Mr. Kerr has agreed during employment and for 12 months thereafter not to initiate or actively participate in any other employers recruitment or hiring of Company employees. The Agreement also contains non-disparagement provisions.
The foregoing summary of the Agreement is qualified in its entirety by the full terms and conditions of the Agreement, a copy of which will be filed as an exhibit to the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the period ended December 31, 2009 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20100222081631.txt.gz
TIME:20100222081631
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
     Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
     Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
     Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
     Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
Arbitron Inc. is scheduled to present at the Credit Suisse 12 Annual Global Services Conference on Monday, February 22, 2010 at the Arizona Biltmore Hotel in Phoenix, Arizona. A copy of the slide show presentation to be made at the conference is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
th
The information in this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1     Arbitron Inc. Slide Show Presentation
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
Exhibit Index

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20100310164231.txt.gz
TIME:20100310164231
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(e) 2010 Non-Equity Incentive Plan On March 4, 2010, the Compensation and Human Resources Committee (the "Committee") of the Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") Board of Directors met and approved a non-equity incentive plan for the Companys executive officers for 2010, which would be payable in early 2011 (the "Incentive Plan"). The Incentive Plan provides for an annual cash payment that is linked to performance based upon the Companys earnings per share (weighted 50%), Portable People Meter commercialization and improvement program (weighted 20%), Diary market improvement program (weighted 20%), cross-platform services strategic plan execution (weighted at 10%), and completion of a comprehensive corporate strategic assessment (weighted at 10%). The Incentive Plan provides for a target cash payment for each executive officer, expressed as a percentage of base salary. The target Incentive Plan payment for William T. Kerr, the Companys President and Chief Executive Offi cer, is equal to 100% of his base salary pursuant to his Executive Employment Agreement. The target Incentive Plan payments for other executive officers range from 50-60% of base salary. The Committee has discretion to authorize a greater or lesser amount in the event the 2010 goals are exceeded or are not met. In the event that the 2010 goals are achieved, the Committee also has discretion to award additional amounts based upon its evaluation of a combination of other quantitative and qualitative considerations, as determined by the Committee. 2010 Long-Term Incentive Plan Also on March 4, 2010, the Committee established the performance objectives and other terms of the Companys 2010 Long-Term Incentive Plan (the "2010 LTI Plan") for officers and other eligible employees of the Company. The targeted opportunity for the Companys executive officers is divided into the following three components, with each component representing approximately 33% of the total opportunity: ( i) non-qualified stock options, (ii) performance-based restricted stock units, and (iii) performance cash awards. The target 2010 LTI Plan opportunity for executive officers ranges from 50% of 2010 base salary to 187.5% of 2010 base salary. The number of non-qualified stock options will be based on the value of each option determined using the Companys standard Black-Scholes valuation model. The exercise price of each stock option will be equal to the closing price of the Companys common stock on the grant date and the options will vest ratably in three equal portions beginning on the first anniversary of the grant date. The restricted stock units contain a one year performance period. The restricted stock units will expire without vesting if the one-year performance goal is not satisfied by the first anniversary of the date of grant. If the performance goal is met, the grant will become vested as to one-fourth of the RSUs on each of the four one-year anniversaries of the date of grant, provided that the recipient remains an employee or service provider to the Company through those dates. The performance goal requires return on invested capital (as defined in the 2010 LTI Plan) to exceed the Companys weighted average cost of capital (as defined in the 2010 LTI Plan). The performance cash award will be based on the Companys achievement of cumulative earnings per share over a three year performance period, and the amount of the performance cash award may range from 0% to 150% based on the achievement of specified results. The non-qualified stock options, restricted stock units, and performance cash awards will be made pursuant to the Companys 2008 Equity Incentive Plan.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20100311165907.txt.gz
TIME:20100311165907
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On March 10, 2010, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") filed a Form 8-K describing the 2010 Non-Equity Incentive Plan and 2010 Long-Term Incentive Plan. The Form 8-K incorrectly attributed the weighting of the Diary market improvement program metric under the 2010 Non-Equity Incentive Plan as 20%. Under the 2010 Non-Equity Incentive Plan this metric is weighted 10%. This 8-K/A is being filed for the sole purpose of amending the previously filed Form 8-K to correct this error. The other disclosure remains unchanged and is set forth below. (e) 2010 Non-Equity Incentive Plan On March 4, 2010, the Compensation and Human Resources Committee (the "Committee") of the Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") Board of Directors met and approved a non-equity incentive plan for the Companys executive officers for 2010, which would be payable in early 2011 (the "Incentive Plan"). The Incentive Plan provides for an annual cash payment that is linked to performance based upon the Companys ear nings per share (weighted 50%), Portable People Meter commercialization and improvement program (weighted 20%), Diary market improvement program (weighted 10%), cross-platform services strategic plan execution (weighted at 10%), and completion of a comprehensive corporate strategic assessment (weighted at 10%). The Incentive Plan provides for a target cash payment for each executive officer, expressed as a percentage of base salary. The target Incentive Plan payment for William T. Kerr, the Companys President and Chief Executive Officer, is equal to 100% of his base salary pursuant to his Executive Employment Agreement. The target Incentive Plan payments for other executive officers range from 50-60% of base salary. The Committee has discretion to authorize a greater or lesser amount in the event the 2010 goals are exceeded or are not met. In the event that the 2010 goals are achieved, the Committee also has discretion to award additional amounts based upon its evaluation of a combination of o ther quantitative and qualitative considerations, as determined by the Committee. 2010 Long-Term Incentive Plan Also on March 4, 2010, the Committee established the performance objectives and other terms of the Companys 2010 Long-Term Incentive Plan (the "2010 LTI Plan") for officers and other eligible employees of the Company. The targeted opportunity for the Companys executive officers is divided into the following three components, with each component representing approximately 33% of the total opportunity: (i) non-qualified stock options, (ii) performance-based restricted stock units, and (iii) performance cash awards. The target 2010 LTI Plan opportunity for executive officers ranges from 50% of 2010 base salary to 187.5% of 2010 base salary. The number of non-qualified stock options will be based on the value of each option determined using the Companys standard Black-Scholes valuation model. The exercise price of each stock option will be equal to the closi ng price of the Companys common stock on the grant date and the options will vest ratably in three equal portions beginning on the first anniversary of the grant date. The restricted stock units contain a one year performance period. The restricted stock units will expire without vesting if the one-year performance goal is not satisfied by the first anniversary of the date of grant. If the performance goal is met, the grant will become vested as to one-fourth of the RSUs on each of the four one-year anniversaries of the date of grant, provided that the recipient remains an employee or service provider to the Company through those dates. The performance goal requires return on invested capital (as defined in the 2010 LTI Plan) to exceed the Companys weighted average cost of capital (as defined in the 2010 LTI Plan). The performance cash award will be based on the Companys achievement of cumulative earnings per share over a three year performance period, and the amount o f the performance cash award may range from 0% to 150% based on the achievement of specified results. The non-qualified stock options, restricted stock units, and performance cash awards will be made pursuant to the Companys 2008 Equity Incentive Plan.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20100316170859.txt.gz
TIME:20100316170859
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On March 10, 2010, Vaughan Scott Henry, Executive Vice President and Chief Information Officer of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") and Timothy Smith, Executive Vice President and Chief Legal Officer of the Company, each established a stock trading plan in accordance with the requirements specified in Rule 10b5-1(c) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (a "Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan"). On March 12, 2010, Larry Kittelberger, a member of the Companys Board of Directors and Chairman of its Compensation and Human Resources and Technology Strategy Committees, and Richard Post, a member of the Companys Board of Directors and Chairman of its Audit Committee, established Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plans. On March 16, 2010, Sean Creamer, Executive Vice President, Finance and Planning, and Chief Financial Officer of the Company, also established a Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan. Set forth below is a discussion of each Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan. The Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plans were adopted during an a uthorized trading period and when none of Messrs. Creamer, Henry, Kittelberger, Post, or Smith was in possession of material non-public information. Each of the individuals established his Rule 10b5-1 Trading plan in order to diversify his investment portfolio and for tax planning purposes. The trading plans of Mr. Post and Mr. Kittelberger cover the exercise of stock options that would otherwise expire during 2011 and 2012 and the sale of shares of Company common stock. Transactions under these Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plans will be publicly reported to the Securities and Exchange Commission in accordance with applicable securities laws, rules and regulations. Sean Creamer Under the terms of Mr. Creamers Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan, an authorized third-party broker will sell shares of Company common stock at quarterly intervals beginning in May 2010. Mr. Creamers Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan covers the sale of a number of shares of Company common stock necessary to satisfy the tax liab ility resulting from the vesting of approximately 55,100 shares restricted stock vesting before and during the term of the Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan. This Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan is scheduled to terminate no later than May 2011. Scott Henry Under the terms of Mr. Henrys Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan, an authorized third-party broker will sell shares of Company common stock at monthly intervals beginning in May 2010. Mr. Henrys Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan covers the sale of up to approximately 22,100 shares of Company common stock. This Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan is scheduled to terminate no later than March 2011. Larry Kittelberger Under the terms of Mr. Kittelbergers Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan, an authorized third-party broker will sell shares of Company common stock beginning in May 2010. Mr. Kittelbergers Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan covers the exercise of options that would otherwise expire between March 2011 and October 2011 and sale of up to approximate ly 16,400 shares of Company common stock. This Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan is scheduled to terminate no later than October 2011. Richard Post Under the terms of Mr. Posts Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan, an authorized third-party broker will sell shares of Company common stock at monthly intervals beginning in June 2010. Mr. Posts Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan covers the exercise of options that would otherwise expire between March 2011 and October 2012 and sale of up to approximately 28,200 shares of Company common stock. This Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan is scheduled to terminate no later than June 2012. Timothy Smith Under the terms of Mr. Smiths Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan, an authorized third-party broker will sell shares of Company common stock at monthly intervals beginning in May 2010. Mr. Smiths Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan covers the sale of up to approximately 15,300 shares of Company common stock. This Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan is scheduled to terminate no l ater than April 2011.
The information in this Item 7.01 shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20100422071448.txt.gz
TIME:20100422071448
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 22, 2010, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release reporting first quarter 2010 financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On April 22, 2010, the Company issued a press release announcing a settlement with the PPM Coalition and its members. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated April 22, 2010 Exhibit 99.2 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated April 22, 2010
The information in this Form 8-K and attached Exhibits shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky
Press Contacts
Arbitron Inc.
: Didi Blackwood / Jessica Benbow
410-312-8523 / 410-312-8363 didi.blackwood@arbitron.com / jessica.benbow@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Columbia MD, April 22, 2010  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2010.
Net income for the quarter was $13.7 million, or $0.51 per share (diluted), an increase of 11.4 percent, compared with $12.3 million, or $0.46 per share (diluted), for the first quarter of 2009. Net income for the first quarter of 2010 included a pre-tax pension settlement charge of $1.2 million, or $0.03 per share (diluted). Net income for the first quarter of 2009 included an $8.2 million charge, or $0.19 per share (diluted) relating to the reorganization and restructuring initiated during that quarter.
For the first quarter of 2010, the Company reported revenue of $95.9 million, a decrease of 2.6 percent as compared to revenue of $98.5 million during the first quarter of 2009.
Revenue for the quarter declined versus the first quarter of 2009 as the result of a number of previously disclosed factors including: the decision by Cumulus and Clear Channel to subscribe to a competitor's diary-based radio ratings service in a limited number of small and medium-sized markets; the continuing impact of the advertising recession on renewals and new business; and the impact of certain customers, primarily Univision, not subscribing to the Portable PeopleMeter (PPM) service in certain markets. The impact of these items during the quarter offset the increase in revenue realized from the ongoing transition to PPM pricing in the 33 markets where the service is currently commercialized
TM
TM
.
Costs and expenses for the first quarter declined by 6.3 percent, from $75.4 million in 2009 to $70.7 million in 2010, due largely to the impact of a $8.2 million restructuring and reorganization charge reported in the first quarter 2009.
Operating income in the first quarter increased 9.3 percent, from $23.1 million in 2009 to $25.2 million in 2010.
Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for the quarter were $22.7 million, an increase of 13.0 percent compared with EBIT of $20.1 million for the first quarter of 2009.
Said William T. Kerr, President and Chief Executive Officer:
Management Comment on First Quarter 2010 Results
"Our results in the first quarter do not fully reflect the progress we have made in our PPM commercialization plan. We remain optimistic that an improvement in overall economic conditions will positively impact the advertising marketplace, which could favorably impact our customers and our own business.
"One of my top priorities has been to resolve responsibly the concerns of the PPM Coalition regarding PPM methodology. Today, the Coalition and we announced an agreement for enhancements to our recruitment methodology that are designed to be a net benefit for all our PPM customers. My thanks go to Chairman Edolphus Towns and to the Media Rating Council for their roles in advancing this agreement.
"Our priorities for the balance of 2010 are straightforward. We will work toward the completion of the commercialization of the PPM ratings service. We will continue our programs that are designed to improve key sample quality metrics for our PPM and diary services. We will continue our efforts to obtain and maintain Media Rating Council accreditation for our services across all of our markets and we will continue our efforts to further develop our cross-platform measurement capabilities.
"While we are encouraged by recent improvement in the overall economic environment and in the radio industry in particular, we also know that it will not turn around overnight. However, we are committed to working with our customers to help position the radio industry to benefit from the recovery as it may occur."
Arbitron is reiterating its revenue and EPS guidance for 2010.
2010 Guidance
For the full year 2010, Arbitron expects revenue to increase between two percent and six percent compared to the 2009 revenue of $385.0 million.
Earnings per share (diluted) for the full year 2010 are expected to be between $1.50 and $1.75.
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time. The Company invites you to listen to the call by dialing (toll free) 888-562-3356. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing 973-582-2700. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 66162370. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com and www.streetevents.com.
Earnings Conference Call: Schedule and Access
A replay of the call will be available from 1:00 p.m. on April 22, 2010 through 11:59 p.m. on April 29, 2010. To access the replay, please call (toll free) 800-642-1687 in the United States, or 706-645-9291 if you're calling from outside of the United States. To access the replay, users will need to enter the following code: 66162370.
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to either net income as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
Arbitron's headquarters and its world-renowned research and technology organizations are located in Columbia, Maryland.
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Media Rating Council and the "double checkmark" logo design are registered marks of the Media Rating Council.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2009, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(2) Arbitron's management believes that presenting EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization), both non-GAAP financial measures, as supplemental information helps investors, analysts, and others, if they so choose, in understanding and evaluating Arbitron's operating performance in some of the same manners that management does because EBIT and EBITDA exclude certain items that are not directly related to Arbitron's core operating performance. Arbitron's management references these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing current performance and making decisions about internal budgets, resource allocation and financial goals.
EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, and depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered substitutes either for net income as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
Note: The December 31, 2009 Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet is derived from the audited Balance Sheet included in the Company's
Form 10-K
for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009.

FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) and the PPM Coalition (PPMC) today announced that they have settled their outstanding disputes and plan to move forward collaboratively.
COLUMBIA MD, April 22, 2010 
Under the leadership of House Oversight and Government Reform Committee Chairman Rep. Edolphus Towns (D-NY), Arbitron and the PPMC have worked jointly with the Media Rating Council (MRC) to implement a series of steps designed to enhance the recruitment methodology of the Arbitron Portable People Meter (PPM) ratings service. These enhancements include the addition of address-based sampling with targeted in-person recruiting to increase PPM panelist participation in key market segments.
"Arbitron remains committed to the continuous improvement of our PPM ratings service," said William T. Kerr, Arbitron Chief Executive Officer and President. "We have worked with the PPMC and the MRC to design these initiatives, and we believe they will help Arbitron deliver the quality data that our customers expect. These initiatives, together with other elements, are part of a larger ongoing program by Arbitron to obtain and retain MRC accreditation. We appreciate the leadership of Chairman Towns and his team for helping move this dialogue forward."
"We believe that this agreement represents a positive step that moves both groups forward in a spirit of collaboration," said Charles Warfield, Chief Operating Officer, ICBC Broadcast Holdings, Inc., on behalf of the PPMC. "This has been a long and difficult journey, but we are committed to working closely with Arbitron and the MRC and seeing the implementation of these initiatives."
"Reliable ratings data is vitally important for all stakeholders in the radio marketplace," added Joe Uva, President and Chief Executive Officer of Univision Communications Inc. "Arbitron's commitment to evolve its methodology is a step forward in achieving that goal."
"We are very pleased with the settlement. We hope it marks the beginning of a new kind of partnership with Arbitron where we all work together to continuously improve the PPM service which we believe will instill a new level of confidence in its results," said Frank Flores, Chief Revenue Officer of Spanish Broadcasting System, Inc.
The initiatives include the addition of targeted in-person recruitment to Arbitron's multi-faceted PPM panelist recruitment approach that currently includes mailings and phone calls. In-person recruitment benefits all broadcasters as it targets population segments that are more likely to be reachable only by cell phone  including youth and minorities. Arbitron will also use address-based sampling to select landline households to further improve geographic proportionality.
This enhanced recruitment approach is scheduled to begin in July 2010 with targeted in-person recruiting. In-person recruiting would initially be deployed in the high density Black and Hispanic areas across the top 25 PPM Markets by year-end 2010; with implementation of address-based sampling and the addition of targeted in-person recruiting across all geographies of all PPM Markets by the end of 2011.
Additional initiatives undertaken by Arbitron to help support minority and all broadcasters include:
"We hope that this agreement has placed us on the road to the improved audience measurement," said Jim Winston, Executive Director of the National Association of Black Owned Broadcasters.  "We have been talking with Arbitron for more than three years about PPM, and I am pleased that we have been able to come to an agreement for moving forward."
"In order to effectively reach and connect with minority populations, quality data and audience representation is imperative for agencies and advertisers," said Jessica Pantanini, Association of Hispanic Advertising Agencies (AHAA) chair-elect and COO of Bromley Communications. "We appreciate the commitment to address the needs of minority communities and embrace the implementation of these initiatives."  
"The MRC has been focused on seeking more in-person recruitment, meter-installation and respondent coaching, as well as improved sample distribution, in Arbitron's PPM methodology as part of our accreditation proceedings," said George Ivie, CEO and Executive Director of the Media Rating Council.  "We are pleased to see Arbitron agree to add these enhancements, which we believe can improve the quality of Arbitron's currency ratings, and the MRC is proud to have been an independent and neutral component of this ongoing dialogue as requested by the House Oversight Committee."
Arbitron has maintained its commitment to continuous improvement and obtaining and maintaining MRC accreditation for our PPM ratings service. While these and other improvement initiatives have been designed to accomplish the goals described above, there can be no assurance of success.
The PPMC
The PPM Coalition was formed in 2008 specifically to address its members' concerns with Arbitron's PPM methodology. PPMC members include ICBC Broadcast Holdings, Inc., Univision Communications, Inc., The Association of Hispanic Advertising Agencies, Spanish Broadcasting System, Inc., The National Association of Black Owned Broadcasters and The Minority Media and Telecommunications Council.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing information services firm primarily serving radio, television, cable, advertising agencies, advertisers, retailers, out-of-home media, and online media. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring and estimating network and local market radio audiences across the United States; providing application software used for analyzing our media audience and marketing information data; and providing consumer, shopping, and other media usage information services. The Company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
TM
###
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Media Rating Council and the "double checkmark" logo design are registered marks of the Media Rating Council.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2010 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, the current global economic recession and the upheaval in the credit markets and financial services industry, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, our ability to successfully commercialize our Portable People Meter(TM) service, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, our ability to successfully identify, consummate and integrate appropriate acquisitions, the impact of increased costs of data collection including a trend toward increasing incidence of cell phone households, litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2009 Annual Report on Form 10-K. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20100526163832.txt.gz
TIME:20100526163832
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.07 Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
On May 25, 2010, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") held its 2010 Annual Meeting of Stockholders. The certified results of the matters voted upon at the meeting, which are more fully described in the Company's proxy statement, are as follows:
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20100602090210.txt.gz
TIME:20100602090210
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On June 2, 2010, Arbitron Inc. and Spanish Broadcasting System, Inc. jointly issued a press release regarding their entry into a settlement agreement and extension of ratings agreement. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report and incorporated by reference herein.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. and Spanish Broadcasting System, Inc. dated June 2, 2010
The information in this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Spanish Broadcasting System, Inc. (NASDAQ: SBSA) (SBS) and Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announce today that they have entered into a settlement agreement. SBS will resume encoding its broadcast signals for all of its markets that use the Arbitron's Portable People Meter (PPM) radio ratings service, and SBS has extended its agreement with Arbitron for the use of PPM ratings in those markets.
COCONUT GROVE, FL and COLUMBIA MD, June 2, 2010 
Frank Flores, SBS Chief Revenue Officer, endorsed the outcome, noting: "Both Arbitron and SBS are committed to working together to address SBS's previously-voiced concerns about the impact of the PPM service on minority radio broadcasters." Flores added that, "SBS is gratified that it has reached an amicable resolution with Arbitron."
"SBS is a valued client, and we look forward to growing our relationship, and moving forward together in a productive and meaningful way" said William T. Kerr, Arbitron Chief Executive Officer and President. "We believe that the radio industry is best served when Arbitron and broadcasters work collaboratively."
Spanish Broadcasting System, Inc. is the largest publicly traded Hispanic-controlled media and entertainment company in the United States. SBS owns and/or operates 21 radio stations located in the top U.S. Hispanic markets of New York, Los Angeles, Miami, Chicago, San Francisco and Puerto Rico, including the #1 Spanish-language radio station in America, WSKQ-FM in New York City, as well as leading radio stations airing the Tropical, Mexican Regional, Spanish Adult Contemporary and Urban format genres. The Company also owns and operates Mega TV, a television operation with over-the-air, cable and satellite distribution and affiliates throughout the U.S. and Puerto Rico. SBS also produces live concerts and events in the major U.S. markets and Puerto Rico. In addition, the Company operates www.LaMusica.com, a bilingual Spanish-English online site providing content related to Latin music, entertainment, news and culture. The Company's corporate Web site can be accessed at www.spanishbroadcasting.com.
About Spanish Broadcasting System, Inc.
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing information services firm primarily serving radio, television, cable, advertising agencies, advertisers, retailers, out-of-home media, and online media. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring and estimating network and local market radio audiences across the United States; providing application software used for analyzing our media audience and marketing information data; and providing consumer, shopping, and other media usage information services. The Company has developed the Portable People Meter, a new technology for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
TM
Portable People Meter
TM
and PPM
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains certain forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements, which are included in accordance with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, may involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause SBS's or Arbitron's actual results and performance in future periods to be materially different from any future results or performance suggested by the forward-looking statements in this press release. Although SBS and Arbitron believe the expectations reflected in such forward-looking statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, neither company can give any assurance that actual results will not differ materially from these expectations. Forward-looking statements, which are based upon certain assumptions and describe future plans, strategies and expectations of SBS and Arbitron, are generally identifiable by use of the words "may," "will," "expect," "believe," "anticipate," "intend," "could," "estimate," "might," or "continue" or the negative or other variations thereof or comparable terminology. Factors that could cause actual results, events and developments to differ are included from time to time in SBS's and Arbitron's public reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements made herein are qualified by these cautionary statements and there can be no assurance that the actual results, events or developments referenced herein will occur or be realized. SBS and Arbitron undertake no obligation to update or revise forward-looking statements to reflect changed assumptions, the occurrence of unanticipated events or changes to future operation results.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20100624085305.txt.gz
TIME:20100624085305
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(b) Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") announces changes to its executive staff. Effective as of June 21, 2010, the positions of Executive Vice President, Chief Marketing Officer, and Executive Vice President, Customer Solutions, have been eliminated. The employment of Alton L. Adams, formerly Executive Vice President, Chief Marketing Officer, and Dr. Robert F. Henrick, formerly Executive Vice President, Customer Solutions, will end during the third quarter of 2010. Mr. Adams will be entitled to receive severance compensation pursuant to the terms and conditions of a previously disclosed Executive Employment Agreement by and between the Company and Mr. Adams dated March 6, 2009. Dr. Henrick will be entitled to receive severance compensation pursuant to the terms and conditions of a previously disclosed Executive Employment Agreement by and between the Company and Dr. Henrick dated March 2, 2009. In addition, among other changes, Sean R. Creamer, currently Executive Vice President, Finance and Plann ing and Chief Financial Officer, assumes an expanded role in the newly-created position of Executive Vice President of U.S. Media Services, responsible for the Companys radio and cross-platform services and operations. Mr. Creamer will continue to lead the finance organization while the Company searches for his replacement as Chief Financial Officer. Additional information about the Companys changes to its executive staff is included in the press release issued on June 24, which is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated June 24, 2010
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

 
Press
Information
Contact: Deirdre Blackwood 410-312-8523 Didi.blackwood@arbitron.com
For Immediate Release
 Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today it has restructured its executive leadership team. The new management structure is designed to build a stronger partnership with our customers and to continue to enhance Arbitron's focus on the value and quality of its services.
Columbia, MD; June 24, 2010
"Over the past several months I have made it a top priority to meet with many of our customers and other key stakeholders," said William T. Kerr, President and Chief Executive Officer of Arbitron Inc. "I have found that feedback invaluable and I have incorporated it into this realignment. I believe this new structure is customer-focused and collaborative  and can help support the growth of both the radio industry and of the Company."
Effective immediately, Arbitron is implementing several shifts in leadership positions; realigning key organizational groups reporting directly to Mr. Kerr: 
Sean will continue to lead the Finance organization while the Company initiates a search for a Chief Financial Officer.
As a result of these changes, Executive Vice President, Chief Marketing Officer Alton L. Adams and Executive Vice President, Customer Solutions Robert F. Henrick are leaving Arbitron.  On an interim basis, Tim Smith will also have the Company's research department reporting to him while the Company initiates a search for a Chief Research Officer.
"I thank both Bob and Alton for their contributions and their commitment to Arbitron, and wish them well in their future endeavors," said Kerr.
"It is an exciting time at Arbitron as we have made progress over the past several months," Kerr noted. "We look forward to an enhanced level of partnership with our customers and believe strongly that these changes have the Company well-positioned for growth and to maximize new opportunities."
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter (PPM) and the PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
TM
Portable People Meter, PPM and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2010 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, the current global economic recession and the upheaval in the credit markets and financial services industry, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, our ability to successfully commercialize our Portable People Meter service, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, our ability to successfully identify, consummate and integrate appropriate acquisitions, the impact of increased costs of data collection including a trend toward increasing incidence of cell phone-only households, litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2009 Annual Report on Form 10-K. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20100721070458.txt.gz
TIME:20100721070458
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 21, 2010, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release reporting second quarter 2010 financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated July 21, 2010
The information in this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky
Press Contacts
Arbitron Inc.
: Didi Blackwood / Jessica Benbow
410-312-8523 / 410-312-8363 didi.blackwood@arbitron.com / jessica.benbow@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Columbia MD, July 21, 2010  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2010.
The Company reported revenue of $88.3 million, an increase of 1.8 percent as compared to revenue of $86.8 million during the second quarter of 2009.
Costs and expenses for the second quarter increased by 2.1 percent, from $85.9 million in 2009 to $87.7 million in 2010, due primarily to the continued commercialization of the Portable People Meter (PPM) radio ratings service. Also in the quarter, Arbitron incurred a one-time expense of approximately $1.5 million relating to our previously announced executive staff realignment.
TM
TM
Earnings before interest, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA) for the quarter was $12.9 million, an increase of 6.4 percent compared with EBITDA of $12.2 million for the second quarter of 2009.
For the second quarter of 2010, net income was $3.8 million, an increase of 8.7% compared with $3.5 million for the second quarter of 2009. Earnings per share (diluted) was $0.14 for the quarter versus $0.13 for the second quarter of 2009.
For the six months ended June 30, 2010, revenue was $184.2 million, a decrease of 0.6 percent versus revenue of $185.3 million for the same period in 2009.
The decline in revenue for the six-month period was the result of a number of previously disclosed factors including: the decision by Cumulus and Clear Channel to subscribe to a competitor's diary-based radio ratings service in a limited number of small and medium-sized markets (which primarily affected first quarter results); and the impact of certain customers, including Univision, that were subscribers in 2009 either reducing their level of service or not subscribing in 2010.
Revenue comparisons versus the first half 2009 were impacted by the timing of the commercialization of the PPM service in new markets. During the first six months of 2009, Arbitron benefited from the recognition of PPM revenue in six markets where the service was commercialized in March and June of last year. The PPM service was not commercialized in any new markets during the first six months of 2010.
The impact of these and other items during the first and second quarters offset the increase in revenue realized from the ongoing transition to PPM in the 33 markets where the service is currently commercialized.
Costs and expenses for the six months ended June 30, 2010 decreased by 1.8 percent, from $161.3 million to $158.4 million, due primarily to the restructuring costs recorded in the first half of 2009.
EBITDA increased 12.5 percent from $37.4 million in the first six months of 2009 to $42.1 million for the same period in 2010. Net income for the six-month period increased 10.8 percent to $17.5 million compared with $15.8 million in 2009. Earnings per share (diluted) for the first six months of 2010 was $0.65 compared with $0.60 per share (diluted) for the first six months of 2009.
Said William T. Kerr, President and Chief Executive Officer:
Management Comment on Second Quarter 2010 Results
"In the second quarter, the radio advertising marketplace continued to improve. As the ad economy brightens, we continue to work with customers to help the radio industry take better advantage of the rebound in advertising dollars.
"Our efforts in the second quarter also yielded significant progress towards our near-term and longer-term goals.
"We settled the outstanding disputes with the PPM Coalition and created a plan to move forward collaboratively.
"We maintained our focus on improving the sample quality of our PPM and diary-based ratings services. We also developed the systems and trained the field staff for the launch of our targeted in-person recruiting program.
"We unveiled the PPM 360, our next generation electronic measurement device, which is a step toward our goal of delivering PPM technology on smart phones and other internet-enabled devices.
TM
"Finally, at the end of the quarter, we announced a new management structure that is designed to enhance Arbitron's focus on the value and quality of our services. I believe this new structure is also more customer-focused and collaborative  which can help support the growth of both the radio industry and of the Company.
"Our other priorities for the balance of 2010 remain straightforward. We will work toward the completion of the commercialization of the PPM ratings service. We will continue our programs that are designed to improve key sample quality metrics for our PPM and diary services and further develop our cross-platform measurement capabilities."
Arbitron is reiterating its revenue and EPS guidance for 2010.
2010 Guidance
For the full year 2010, Arbitron expects revenue to increase between two percent and six percent compared to the 2009 revenue of $385.0 million.
Earnings per share (diluted) for the full year 2010 are expected to be between $1.50 and $1.75.
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time on July 21, 2010.
Earnings Conference Call: Schedule and Access
The Company invites you to listen to the call by dialing (toll free) 888-562-3356. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing 973-582-2700. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 85968571. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com and www.streetevents.com.
A replay of the call will be available from 1:00 p.m. on July 21, 2010 through 11:59 p.m. on July 28, 2010. To access the replay, please call (toll free) 800-642-1687 in the United States, or 706-645-9291 if you're calling from outside of the United States. To access the replay, users will need to enter the following code: 85968571.
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to either net income as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter and PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
Portable People Meter
TM
, PPM
TM
and PPM 360
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Media Rating Council and the "double checkmark" logo design are registered marks of the Media Rating Council.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2009, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(2) Arbitron's management believes that presenting EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization), both non-GAAP financial measures, as supplemental information helps investors, analysts, and others, if they so choose, in understanding and evaluating Arbitron's operating performance in some of the same manners that management does because EBIT and EBITDA exclude certain items that are not directly related to Arbitron's core operating performance. Arbitron's management references these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing current performance and making decisions about internal budgets, resource allocation and financial goals.
EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, and depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered substitutes either for net income as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
Note: The December 31, 2009 Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet is derived from the audited Balance Sheet included in the Company's
Form 10-K
for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20100915164423.txt.gz
TIME:20100915164423
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(d) On September 15, 2010, Erica Farber was re-appointed to the Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") to serve until the next annual meeting of stockholders of the Company, or until her earlier death, resignation or removal. Additional information about Ms. Farber is included in the Companys press release issued on September 15, 2010, which is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. Ms. Farber will participate in the Companys previously disclosed Non-Employee Director Incentive Program. In connection with joining the Companys Board of Directors, on September 15, 2010, Ms. Farber received a one-time grant of 4,500 deferred stock units, which deferred stock units will vest in three equal installments of 1,500 deferred stock units over a three-year period and will be payable no sooner than six months following Ms. Farbers termination of service as a director of the Company. The award is in the form of the Companys standard 2008 Equity Compensation Plan Director Deferred Stock Unit Agreement - Initial Grant under the Arbitron Inc. 2008 Equity Compensation Plan, which will be filed as an exhibit to the Companys Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2010.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated September 15, 2010
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 Thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor Contact:
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE:ARB) announced today that the Company's Board of Directors has re-appointed Erica Farber as a Director of Arbitron. Ms. Farber previously served as an Arbitron Director from March 2001 to July 2006. Ms Farber was a member of the Nominating Committee and chaired the Compensation and Human Resources Committee.
COLUMBIA MD, September 15, 2010 
Ms. Farber voluntarily relinquished her seat on the Arbitron board in July 2006 when VNU, then owner of Nielsen Media Research, was in the process of acquiring Radio & Records, Inc., where she held the post of Publisher & Chief Executive Officer.
A veteran of the radio and broadcasting industries, Ms Farber is currently the Chief Executive Officer of the radio consulting and Internet service provider, The Farber Connection LLC, a firm she founded in 2010. From August 2006 to January 2009, she was a Publisher and President at Radio & Records, a division of The Nielsen Company. During her career, Ms. Farber held several positions at Radio & Records, Inc. including Publisher and Chief Executive Officer from 1996 to 2006 and Chief Operating Officer from 1994 to 1996.
Philip Guarascio, Chairman of the Arbitron Board of Directors, commented, "We are especially pleased that Erica has accepted our invitation to rejoin our Board. She is well respected within the radio and broadcasting industry and has first hand knowledge of the issues and challenges facing those businesses. Her background will provide us with a valuable perspective and will be especially useful in guiding Arbitron's development and growth."
In 2000, Ms. Farber received an American Broadcast Pioneer Award from the Broadcasters' Foundation and she was consistently voted one of "The Most Influential Women in Radio" by the readers of Radio Ink Magazine. She currently serves as a Director for the Broadcast Foundation and the Library of American Broadcasting. She is also President of the Society of Singers.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm providing insights to the radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-home industries  as well as to advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter (PPM) and PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
TM
Portable People Meter, PPM and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20101020083708.txt.gz
TIME:20101020083708
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On October 20, 2010 Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") announced that Gregg Lindner, age 54, will become Chief Research Officer and Executive Vice President, Service Innovation of the Company. Mr. Lindner currently serves as Executive Vice President of Scarborough Research ("Scarborough"), a joint venture between the Company and The Nielsen Company, and has served in that capacity since June 1999. From February 1996 to May 1999, Mr. Lindner was Senior Vice President of Operations of Scarborough. Prior to February 1996, Mr. Lindner served in various capacities with the Company. Mr. Lindners employment as Chief Research Officer and Executive Vice President, Service Innovation of the Company will commence on the earlier to occur of: (i) the appointment of a new chief executive officer of Scarborough or (ii) January 3, 2011. The Company has determined that there are no related person transactions between it and Mr. Lindner within the meaning of Item 404(a) of Regulation S-K. Lindner Of fer Letter The Company and Mr. Lindner have entered into a letter agreement (the "Offer Letter"), dated as of October 20, 2010, covering Mr. Lindners employment as Chief Research Officer and Executive Vice President, Service Innovation of the Company. Salary and Incentive Compensation Pursuant to the terms and conditions of the Offer Letter, the Company will pay Mr. Lindner an annual base salary of $375,000 and Mr. Lindner will be eligible to receive an annual incentive bonus equal to 50% of his annual base salary upon meeting applicable performance criteria set by the Compensation and Human Resources Committee of the Companys Board of Directors (the "Compensation Committee"). For performance exceeding such applicable performance criteria, the annual incentive bonus will be increased to an amount in excess of the target bonus up to a maximum of 100% of annual base salary, at the sole discretion of the Compensation Committee. Scarborough Bonus In the or dinary course of business the Scarborough partners committee will determine an annual incentive bonus payable to Mr. Lindner for his performance during 2010 (the "Scarborough Bonus"). If Mr. Lindner becomes a full-time employee of the Company prior to December 31, 2010, the Company will pay a pro-rata portion of the Scarborough Bonus, based on the number of months Mr. Lindner is employed by the Company during 2010, if any. In addition, if the Scarborough Bonus is less than $265,000, the Company will make an additional payment to Mr. Lindner in an amount equal to $265,000 minus the Scarborough Bonus. Equity Grant Subject to approval by the Compensation Committee, the Company will grant to Mr. Lindner an equity award to be valued at $750,000 on the date of grant, with the award to be determined by the Compensation Committee as a mix of 75% restricted stock units and 25% stock options, each with respect to the Companys common stock, par value $0.50 (the "Common Stock") (where the value f or the restricted stock units is determined by dividing the target value for the restricted stock units by the fair market value of the Common Stock on the grant date and where the value for the options is determined using the Companys standard Black-Scholes assumptions applied as of the date of grant). Benefits Mr. Lindner will, to the extent eligible, be entitled to participate at a level commensurate with his position in all employee welfare, benefit, and retirement plans and programs the Company provides to its executives in accordance with Company policies. Mr. Lindner will work at the Companys Columbia, Maryland headquarters. Mr. Lindner will receive $15,000 for relocation assistance, which will be paid shortly after his first day of employment. The Company expects that that Mr. Lindner will enter into a retention agreement following the commencement date of his employment. The foregoing summary of the Offer Letter is qualified in its entirety by the full terms and conditions of the agreement. The Offer Letter will be filed as an exhibit to the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated October 20, 2010
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press Information
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
For Immediate Release
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced that Gregg Lindner will join the company in the newly established position of chief research officer and executive vice president, Service Innovation.
COLUMBIA MD, October 20, 2010 
In this role, Mr. Lindner will be responsible for Arbitron's research quality and methods, product development as well as policies and standards for the Portable People Meter, diary, and cross-platform services, and leadership for the Company's Media Rating Council (MRC) accreditation initiatives. Mr. Lindner will also serve as an Arbitron representative on the Scarborough partners committee.
TM
"Gregg brings with him more than twenty five years of experience as a leader across key areas of our businessresearch, product development and operationsareas that are important to Arbitron's future growth," said William T. Kerr, president and chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc. "In addition to his strong technical skills, Gregg is widely respected by broadcasters, agency executives, and marketers as well as by his peers in the media and marketing research industry.
Gregg is expected to help Arbitron strengthen the quality and sophistication of our core radio audience measurement services and to lead the development of the research methods and systems for our emerging cross-platform media and marketing measurement services.
Through his expertise in media and marketing research, and through his knowledge of its application to business, Gregg will help direct Arbitron's strategies and resources in the evolving arena of media measurement and cross platform services," said Mr. Kerr.
Mr. Lindner will report to Mr. Kerr directly on matters of research and service quality, and to Sean Creamer, executive vice president, U.S. Media Services, for ongoing operations. He will be based in Arbitron's headquarters in Columbia, Maryland.
Mr. Lindner will join Arbitron from Scarborough Research, the leading source for the demographics, lifestyles, shopping patterns, and media behaviors of American consumer, where he was executive vice president. As such, he managed the company's day-to-day business and operations. Prior to his role of executive vice president, Mr. Lindner headed up the Research and Operations team which was responsible for quality assurance of all Scarborough data, creating and adapting research methodologies, custom research projects and overall management of Scarborough's product line. He joined Scarborough Research 1993.
Under Mr. Lindner's leadership, Scarborough expanded its top-tier local market service; introduced USA+, a national consumer research service; created a mid-tier market service designed to meet the needs of local media, advertisers and marketers in mid-market cities across the United States; and began cell-phone-household sampling in its consumer surveys. Mr. Lindner also successfully led Scarborough Research's efforts to earn Media Rating Council accreditation for its top-tier, multi-market, and USA+ services, along with PRIME NExT software.
Prior to joining Scarborough in the mid-1990's, Mr. Lindner was at Simmons Market Research (now a division of Experian), and was at Arbitron from 1981 to 1992.
Mr. Lindner holds a Masters degree in quantitative analysis and urban sociology from the University of Maryland, where he also completed his undergraduate work.
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter and PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
TM
Portable People Meter, PPM and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Media Rating Council and the "double checkmark" logo design are registered marks of the Media Rating Council.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2010 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, the current global economic recession and the upheaval in the credit markets and financial services industry, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, our ability to successfully commercialize our Portable People Meter service, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, our ability to successfully identify, consummate and integrate appropriate acquisitions, the impact of increased costs of data collection including a trend toward increasing incidence of cell phone-only households, litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2009 Annual Report on Form 10-K. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20101026070314.txt.gz
TIME:20101026070314
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 26, 2010, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release reporting third quarter 2010 financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated October 26, 2010
The information in this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky
Press Contacts
Arbitron Inc.
: Kim Myers
410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Columbia MD, October 26, 2010  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2010.
The Company reported revenue of $99.5 million, an increase of 1.4 percent as compared to revenue of $98.1 million during the third quarter of 2009. Revenue in the quarter increased due to the commercialization of the Portable People Meter (PPM) radio ratings service in 10 additional markets versus the five markets commercialized in the third quarter of 2009. The increase in revenue realized from the ongoing transition to the PPM service in the third quarter was partially offset by a number of previously disclosed factors, including the impact of certain customers who were subscribers in 2009 and who either reduced their level of service in 2010 or did not renew expiring contracts.
TM
TM
Costs and expenses for the third quarter increased by 7.0 percent, from $73.5 million in 2009 to $78.6 million in 2010, due primarily to the continued commercialization of the Portable People Meter radio ratings service and investments in programs to recruit persons age 18-34 in PPM and diary markets.
Earnings before interest, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA) for the quarter was $25.4 million, a decrease of 11.7 percent compared with EBITDA of $28.7 million for the third quarter of 2009.
For the third quarter of 2010, net income was $11.3 million, a decrease of 17.4 percent compared with $13.7 million for the third quarter of 2009. Earnings per share (diluted) was $0.42 for the quarter versus $0.51 for the third quarter of 2009.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2010, revenue was $283.7 million, an increase of 0.1 percent versus revenue of $283.4 million for the same period in 2009.
During the first three quarters of 2010, the increase in revenue realized from the ongoing transition to the PPM radio ratings service was offset by a number of previously disclosed factors including: the decision by Cumulus and Clear Channel to subscribe to a competitor's diary-based radio ratings service in a limited number of small and medium-sized markets (which primarily affected first quarter results); and the impact of certain customers, including Univision, that were subscribers in 2009 but reduced their level of service or did not subscribe in 2010.
Costs and expenses for the nine months ended September 30, 2010 increased by 1.0 percent, from $234.8 million to $237.0 million.
EBITDA increased 2.0 percent from $66.1 million in the first nine months of 2009 to $67.5 million for the same period in 2010. Net income for the nine-month period decreased 2.3 percent to $28.9 million compared with $29.6 million in 2009. Earnings per share (diluted) for the first nine months of 2010 was $1.07 compared with $1.11 per share (diluted) for the first nine months of 2009.
Said William T. Kerr, President and Chief Executive Officer:
Management Comment on Third Quarter 2010 Results
"In the third quarter, the radio advertising marketplace continued its recovery from the severe advertising recession of 2009. At the same time, radio broadcasters remain cautious in this still uncertain economic environment. This uncertainty has kept some of our customers on the sidelines in terms of discretionary services and contract renewals.
"We aren't simply waiting for an economic rebound to undo the impact of the ad recession. We are focused on strengthening the value proposition that an Arbitron ratings subscription represents to broadcasters in markets large and small. Thanks to this focus, we recently signed the last of our top-five renewals for 2010, as well as additional contracts in PPM and diary markets, including in competitive diary markets.
"In the third quarter, we commercialized the PPM service in ten new markets. The PPM radio ratings service is now the currency for buying and selling radio advertising in 43 markets, accounting for nearly half of all radio ad revenue. The panels for the final five PPM markets are recruited and these markets are in their two-month pre-currency period. We continue to expect that we will complete the commercialization of the PPM service by the end of the year.
"We also strengthened the executive leadership as part of our continuing effort to evolve a long-term senior management structure that will drive and support Arbitron's growth. We announced that Gregg Lindner, an experienced research executive from Scarborough Research, will become our new chief research officer. We also named Bill McKenna, an innovator in media research with decades of experience, as our senior vice president of New Media Ventures.
"As we approach the end of the year, we will continue our focus on completing the commercialization of our PPM ratings service, maintaining our programs designed to improve key sample quality metrics for our PPM and diary services and developing further our cross-platform measurement capabilities."
Arbitron is updating its revenue and EPS guidance for 2010.
2010 Guidance
For the full year 2010, Arbitron now expects its revenue increase to be near the lower end of the previously announced range of 2 percent to 6 percent versus 2009.
Earnings per share (diluted) for the full year 2010 is now expected to be $1.60 to $1.65, compared to the Company's previous earnings guidance of $1.50 and $1.75 per share (diluted.)
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time on Tuesday, October 26, 2010.
Earnings Conference Call: Schedule and Access
The Company invites you to listen to the call toll-free by dialing (888) 562-3356. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing (973) 582-2700. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 15750169. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com and www.streetevents.com.
A replay of the call will be available from 1:00 p.m. on October 26, 2010, through 11:59 p.m. on November 9, 2010. To access the replay toll-free, please call (800) 642-1687 in the United States or (706) 645-9291 if you're calling from outside of the United States. To access the replay, users will need to enter the following code: 15750169.
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to either net income as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter and PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
Portable People Meter
TM
, PPM
TM
and PPM 360
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2009, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(2) Arbitron's management believes that presenting EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization), both non-GAAP financial measures, as supplemental information helps investors, analysts, and others, if they so choose, in understanding and evaluating Arbitron's operating performance in some of the same manners that management does because EBIT and EBITDA exclude certain items that are not directly related to Arbitron's core operating performance. Arbitron's management references these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing current performance and making decisions about internal budgets, resource allocation and financial goals.
EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, and depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered substitutes either for net income as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
Note: The December 31, 2009 Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet is derived from the audited Balance Sheet included in the Company's
Form 10-K
for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20101122084601.txt.gz
TIME:20101122084601
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On November 22, 2010, Arbitron Inc. announced that Univision Radio, the leading Spanish-language radio group in the United States, has signed multi-year contracts for Arbitrons Portable People MeterTM (PPM) radio ratings services in twelve markets: New York, Los Angeles, Chicago, San Francisco, San Jose, Dallas, Miami, San Diego, Phoenix, Las Vegas, San Antonio and Austin. A copy of the press release announcing the status update is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated November 22, 2010
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
Monica Talan Univision 212-455-5331 mtalan@univision.net
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
COLUMBIA, MD, November 22, 2010  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced that Univision Radio, the leading Spanish-language radio group in the United States, has signed multi-year contracts for Arbitron's Portable People Meter (PPM) radio ratings services in twelve markets: New York, Los Angeles, Chicago, San Francisco, San Jose, Dallas, Miami, San Diego, Phoenix, Las Vegas, San Antonio and Austin. These twelve markets are served by 44 Univision Radio stations. Financial details of the agreement were not disclosed.
TM
"Reliable ratings data are vitally important for all stakeholders in the radio marketplace. Based on the steps taken by Arbitron to date to improve the PPM service, and on Arbitron's commitment to continue its current efforts to improve the service, we concluded that we could begin subscribing to the PPM service again," said Ceril Shagrin, executive vice president of Audience Measurement Innovation and Analytics, Univision Communications Inc. "We remain committed to ensuring that the industry has access to the most reliable ratings data by working closely in partnership with Arbitron."
"Univision Radio's commitment to the PPM radio ratings service is one more vote of confidence in the value and utility of Arbitron's electronic ratings for radio," said Carol Hanley, executive vice president, Chief Sales and Marketing Officer, Arbitron Inc. "We are grateful for the support and, as part of our renewed partnership with Univision Radio, we will work together to promote the value of radio to agencies, advertisers and the communities it serves."
Univision Radio has been a subscriber to the Arbitron PPM ratings service in Houston and to the Arbitron diary service in Albuquerque, El Paso, Fresno, McAllen-Brownsville and Puerto Rico.
The Arbitron Portable People Meter is a portable device that captures a consumer's exposure to media and entertainment by passively capturing an inaudible code that can be embedded in the audio content of terrestrial, satellite and online radio broadcasts, in broadcast, cable and satellite television as well as cinema advertising and many types of place-based digital media. The PPM service is currently commercialized in 43 markets nationwide, and is scheduled to be commercialized in a total of 48 markets by December 31, 2010.
About Arbitron Portable People Meter Radio Ratings Services
Univision Communications Inc. is the premier Spanish-language media company in the United States. Its operations include Univision Network, the most-watched Spanish-language broadcast television network in the U.S. reaching 95% of U.S. Hispanic Households; TeleFutura Network, a general-interest Spanish-language broadcast television network, which was launched in 2002 and now reaches 85% of U.S. Hispanic Households; Galavisin, the country's leading Spanish-language cable network; Univision Studios, which produces and co-produces telenovelas, reality shows, dramatic series and other programming formats for all of the Company's platforms; Univision Television Group, which owns and operates 62 television stations in major U.S. Hispanic markets and Puerto Rico; Univision Radio, the leading Spanish-language radio group which owns and/or operates 68 radio stations in 16 of the top 25 U.S. Hispanic markets and 5 stations in Puerto Rico; and Univision Interactive Media, which includes http://www.univision.com, the premier Spanish-language Internet destination in the U.S., and Univision Mvil, the industry's most comprehensive Spanish-language suite of mobile offerings. Univision Communications also has a 50% interest in TuTv, a joint venture formed to broadcast Televisa's pay television channels in the U.S. Univision Communications has television network operations in Miami and television and radio stations and sales offices in major cities throughout the United States.
About Univision Communications
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-homeas well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter device and PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
Portable People Meter, PPM and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2010 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, the current global economic recession and the upheaval in the credit markets and financial services industry, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, our ability to successfully commercialize our Portable People Meter service, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, our ability to successfully identify, consummate and integrate appropriate acquisitions, the impact of increased costs of data collection including a trend toward increasing incidence of cell phone-only households, litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2009 Annual Report on Form 10-K. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20101206083758.txt.gz
TIME:20101206083758
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") announced today that the Media Rating Council, Inc. withdrew accreditation for the Companys Radio's All Dimension Audience Research and Nationwide services. The withdrawal does not affect any other currently accredited service or market. A copy of the press release announcing the accreditation update is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated December 6, 2010
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press Information
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
COLUMBIA, MD; December 6, 2010  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that the Media Rating Council, Inc. (MRC) has withdrawn its accreditation for the Company's RADAR (Radio's All Dimension Audience Research) and Nationwide network and national radio audience services.
The withdrawal is effective with RADAR 107, which is scheduled to release on December 13, 2010 and with the Fall 2010 Nationwide report, which is scheduled to release in early March 2011.
The MRC informed Arbitron that its Board of Directors elected to withdraw accreditation for RADAR and Nationwide because the two services incorporate data from an increasing number of Portable People Meter (PPM) markets that are not accredited by the MRC.
TM
TM
The accreditation process for the Portable People Meter service is ongoing. Of the 43 markets where the PPM service is currently commercialized only those data produced by the PPM services in Houston-Galveston, Riverside-San Bernardino, and Minneapolis-St. Paul are accredited by the MRC.
Because the withdrawal of accreditation for RADAR occurred late in the production cycle for the release of the RADAR 107 estimates, representation of accreditation from software, data files and related materials will not be removed. Arbitron will directly inform all subscribers to the RADAR 107 data of the change in accreditation status.
Arbitron intends to continue to use commercially reasonable efforts in good faith to pursue MRC accreditation of its PPM ratings service in each market where it has commercialized or is currently scheduled to commercialize the service, regain MRC accreditation of the RADAR and Nationwide services, and maintain MRC accreditation of currently accredited PPM, diary and software services. Arbitron continues to comply with the minimum requirements of the MRC Voluntary Code of Conduct.
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter (PPM) and PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
Portable People Meter, PPM and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
RADAR is a registered trademark of Arbitron Inc.
Media Rating Council and the "double checkmark" logo design are registered marks of the Media Rating Council.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2010 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, the current global economic recession and the upheaval in the credit markets and financial services industry, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, our ability to successfully commercialize our Portable People Meter service, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, our ability to successfully identify, consummate and integrate appropriate acquisitions, the impact of increased costs of data collection including a trend toward increasing incidence of cell phone-only households, litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2009 Annual Report on Form 10-K. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20101208163443.txt.gz
TIME:20101208163443
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On December 8, 2010, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") announced that it had entered into new multi-year agreements with Clear Channel Radio, a division of Clear Channel Communications, Inc. ("Clear Channel") to provide radio ratings and other related services to all of Clear Channels radio markets in the United States. The Company entered into the agreements on December 8, 2010 for an effective term beginning on January 1, 2011 and expiring on December 31, 2016. The new agreements will replace the existing agreements with Clear Channel, which generally otherwise would have expired December 31, 2011. Under the terms and conditions of the new agreements, the Company will provide its diary-based Radio Market Reports, Maximi$er Data, Scarborough consumer data and Arbitron qualitative data, and related services and software to Clear Channel for the term of the new agreements. The Company will also provide its PPM Market Report Service, including the PPM Analysis Tool software, and PPM Weeklies reports. In addition, the Company will provide its Tapscan services and software to Clear Channel through December 31, 2012. On December 8, 2010, Premiere Radio Networks, Katz Media Group, and Clear Channel Traffic, affiliates of Clear Channel, also entered into new contracts to receive the Companys services. The aggregate amount of all payments to be made by Clear Channel for the services during the term of the agreements currently is expected to be approximately $538.2 million, based on the radio stations currently owned by Clear Channel. The foregoing description of the agreements is qualified in its entirety by reference to the material agreements entered into between the Company and Clear Channel, copies of which will be filed as exhibits to the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010. A copy of the press release announcing the agreements is furnished in accordance with Item 7.01 herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and attached heret o.
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On December 8, 2010, the Company issued a press release announcing the new agreements. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference. On December 8, 2010, the Company also issued a press release announcing full-year 2011 financial guidance. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated December 8, 2010 announcing Clear Channel Radio renewal Exhibit 99.2 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated December 8, 2010 announcing full-year 2011 financial guidance Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements This Current Report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forwar d-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:  successfully maintain and promote industry usage of our services, a critical mass of broadcaster encoding, and the proper understanding of our audience measurement services and methodologies in light of governmental actions, including investigation, regulation, legislation or litigation, customer or industry group activism, or adverse community or public relations efforts;  complete the Media Rating Council, Inc. ("MRC") audits of our local market Arbitron Portable People Meter (PPM) ratings services in a timely manner and successfully obtain and/or maintain MRC accreditation for our audience measurement services;  successfully commercialize our PPM service;  design, recruit, and maintain PPM panels that appropriately balance research quality, panel size and operational cost;  absorb costs related to legal proceedings and governmental en tity interactions and avoid any related fines, limitations or conditions on our business activities, including, without limitation, by meeting or exceeding our commitments and agreements with various governmental entities;  successfully develop, implement and fund initiatives designed to increase sample quality;  successfully manage the impact on costs of data collection due to lower respondent cooperation in surveys, consumer trends including a trend toward increasing incidence of cell phone households, privacy concerns, technology changes, and/or government regulations;  provide appropriate levels of operational capacity and funding to support the more costly identification and recruitment of younger demographics into our panels and samples;  successfully manage the impact on our business of the recent economic downturn generally, and in the advertising market, in particular, including, without limitation, the insolvency of any of our customers or the impact of s uch downturn on our customers ability to fulfill their payment obligations to us;  compete with companies that may have financial, marketing, sales, technical or other advantages over us;  effectively respond to rapidly changing technological needs of our customer base, including creating proprietary technology and systems to support our cell phone sampling plans, and new customer services that meet these needs in a timely manner;  successfully execute our business strategies, including evaluating and, where appropriate, entering into potential acquisition, joint-venture or other material third-party agreements;  effectively manage the impact, if any, of any further ownership shifts in the radio and advertising agency industries;  successfully develop and implement technology solutions to encode and/or measure new forms of media content and delivery, and advertising in an increasingly competitive environment;  successfully develop, implement, and launch our cross-platform initiatives; and  renew contracts with key customers. There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
The information in this Item 7.01, including the information set forth in Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act), nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press Information
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
COLUMBIA, MD; December 8, 2010  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced that Clear Channel Radio has signed multi-year, multi-market contracts for Arbitron's Portable People Meter (PPM) and diary radio ratings services. These agreements extend Clear Channel's access to Arbitron radio ratings and other services in all of Clear Channel Radio's markets through December 31, 2016.
TM
"Arbitron's PPM and diary ratings are an integral part of the radio buy-sell process for both terrestrial and digital outlets. We're gratified that Clear Channel Radio, our largest client, has ensured its continued access to Arbitron services by renewing our partnership on this long term basis," said William Kerr, President and Chief Executive Officer, Arbitron Inc. "Going forward Arbitron and Clear Channel will be working closely with other radio groups in an industry-wide advocacy program to further promote the value of radio as the ultimate audio-powered and community-driven medium," said Mr. Kerr.
"In today's competitive media environment, advertisers and agencies increasingly demand accurate and timely data to inform their buying decisions," said Clear Channel Radio President and CEO John Hogan. "Arbitron's PPM and diary ratings validate the great power of our medium and our platforms  and help us demonstrate every day how well we deliver on radio's unique ability to engage audiences."
Clear Channel is Arbitron's largest radio ratings subscriber and represented approximately 19 percent of Arbitron's revenue in 2009.
Arbitron has filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission a Current Report on Form 8-K that contains more information regarding the agreements. A copy of the Current Report on Form 8-K can be found on the Arbitron Web site.
In a separate announcement also released today, Arbitron has provided full-year 2011 guidance for revenue and earnings per share.
Investor Conference Call: Schedule and Access
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time on Thursday, December 9, 2010.
The Company invites you to listen to the call toll-free by dialing (888) 562-3356. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing (973) 582-2700. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 30309082.
The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com and www.streetevents.com.
A replay of the call will be available from 1:00 p.m. on December 9, 2010, through 11:59 p.m. on December 16, 2010. To access the replay toll-free, please call (800) 642-1687 in the United States or (706) 645-9291 if you're calling from outside of the United States. To access the replay, users will need to enter the following code: 30309082.
The Arbitron Portable People Meter is a portable device that captures a consumer's exposure to media and entertainment by passively capturing an inaudible code that can be embedded in the audio content of terrestrial, satellite and online radio broadcasts, in broadcast, cable and satellite television as well as cinema advertising and many types of place-based digital media. The PPM service is currently commercialized in 43 markets nationwide, and is scheduled to be commercialized in a total of 48 markets by December 31, 2010.
About Arbitron Radio Ratings Services
The Arbitron diary service has measured radio audiences of more than 13,000 stations broadcasting in the United States as well as from Canada and Mexico for more than 40 years. The Arbitron diary methodology has evolved significantly over the past four decades, including improvements to sampling cell phone households and improving recruitment of hard-to-reach young and ethnic demographics.
Clear Channel Radio is a leading radio company focused on serving local communities across the U.S. with an audience of more than 110 million choosing Clear Channel Radio programming each week. The company's content can be heard on AM/FM stations, HD digital radio channels, on the Internet, at iheartradio.com and on the iheartradio mobile application on iPods and smart phones, and used via navigation systems from TomTom, Garmin and others. Clear Channel Radio's iheartradio app delivers over 750 of America's favorite local radio stations, celebrity-hosted channels, local traffic reports & exclusive videos. The company's operations include radio broadcasting, syndication and independent media representation. Clear Channel Radio is a division of Clear Channel Communications, Inc. (OTCBB:CCMO), a leading global media and entertainment company. More information on the company can be found at . Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media radio, television, cable, online radio and out-of-homeas well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter device and PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
About Clear Channel Radio
www.clearchannel.com
About Arbitron
Portable People Meter, PPM and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for future performance and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, the current global economic recession and the upheaval in the credit markets and financial services industry, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, our ability to successfully commercialize our Portable People Meter service, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, our ability to successfully identify, consummate and integrate appropriate acquisitions, the impact of increased costs of data collection including a trend toward increasing incidence of cell phone-only households, litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2009 Annual Report on
Form 10-K
. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.

Press Information
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
COLUMBIA, MD; December 8, 2010  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced financial guidance for the full-year ending December 31, 2011.
The Company is providing 2011 guidance in order to detail the financial implications of the multi-year, multi-market contract renewal signed by Clear Channel Radio as well as those of the recent signing by Univision Radio to multi-year contracts for Arbitron's Portable People Meter radio ratings services.
TM
Arbitron expects 2011 revenue to increase between 6 percent and 8 percent over its 2010 revenue. For the full-year 2010, Arbitron continues to expect a revenue increase near the lower end of the previously announced range of 2 percent to 6 percent versus the Company's 2009 revenue of $385.0 million.
Earnings per share (diluted) is expected to be between $1.90 and $2.05 for the full-year 2011.
Investor Conference Call: Schedule and Access
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time on Thursday, December 9, 2010.
The Company invites you to listen to the call toll-free by dialing (888) 562-3356. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing (973) 582-2700. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 30309082.
The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com and www.streetevents.com.
A replay of the call will be available from 1:00 p.m. on December 9, 2010, through 11:59 p.m. on December 16, 2010. To access the replay toll-free, please call (800) 642-1687 in the United States or (706) 645-9291 if you're calling from outside of the United States. To access the replay, users will need to enter the following code: 30309082.
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter(PPM) and PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
TM
Portable People Meter, PPM and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2009, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20101230160759.txt.gz
TIME:20101230160759
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On December 21, 2010, Steven M. Smith, Executive Vice President, Service Operations of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") established a stock trading plan in accordance with the requirements specified in Rule 10b5-1(c) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (a "Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan"). On December 28, 2010, Carol Hanley, Executive Vice President, Chief Sales & Marketing Officer of the Company, established a Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan. On December 30, 2010, Luis Nogales, a member of the Companys Board of Directors, and Vaughan Scott Henry, Executive Vice President and Chief Information Officer of the Company, each established a Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan. Set forth below is information regarding each Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan. Each of the Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plans was adopted during an authorized trading period and when none of Messrs. Smith, Nogales, Henry or Ms. Hanley was in possession of material non-public information. Each of the individuals established his or her Rule 10b5-1 Tradi ng Plan in order to diversify their investment portfolio and for tax planning purposes. The trading plan of Mr. Nogales covers the exercise of stock options that would otherwise expire during 2012 and 2013 and the sale of shares of Company common stock. Transactions under these Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plans will be publicly reported to the Securities and Exchange Commission in accordance with applicable securities laws, rules and regulations. Steven M. Smith Under the terms of Mr. Smiths Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan, an authorized third-party broker will sell shares of Company common stock beginning in February 2011. Mr. Smiths Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan covers the sale of approximately 1,100 shares of Company common stock. This Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan is scheduled to terminate no later than December 31, 2011. Carol Hanley Under the terms of Ms. Hanleys Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan, an authorized third-party broker will sell shares of Company common stock beginning in March 2011. Ms. Hanleys Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan covers the sale of approximately 10,200 shares of Company common stock. This Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan is scheduled to terminate no later than June 2011. Luis Nogales Under the terms of Mr. Nogales Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan, an authorized third-party broker will sell shares of Company common stock beginning in March 2011. Mr. Nogales Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan covers the exercise of options that would otherwise expire between January 2012 and May 2013 and sale of up to approximately 12,400 shares of Company common stock. This Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan is scheduled to terminate no later than February 2012. V. Scott Henry Under the terms of Mr. Henrys Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan, an authorized third-party broker will sell shares of Company common stock at monthly intervals beginning in March 2011. Mr. Henrys Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan covers the sale of up to approximately 57,500 shares of Company commo n stock. This Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan is scheduled to terminate no later than November 2011.
The information in this Item 7.01 shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20110208172746.txt.gz
TIME:20110208172746
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On February 8, 2011, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") announced that Richard Surratt, age 50, has been named Executive Vice President, Finance of the Company effective as of February 6, 2011. The Company intends to transition Mr. Surratt into the Chief Financial Officer role as soon as is practicable. From December 2009 to the present, Mr. Surratt has served as a Director of Cambium Learning Group, Inc., a publicly-held company that provides research-based education solutions for students. From December 2009 to June 2010, Mr. Surratt served as an advisor to SPO Partners & Co., a private equity company. From January 2007 to December 2009, Mr. Surratt was president and chief executive officer of Voyager Learning Company (formerly ProQuest Company). He led the sale of Voyager Learning Company to Cambium Learning Group, Inc. in December 2009. He was chief financial officer of Voyager Learning Company from November 2005 to January 2007. The Company has determined that there are no related person transactions between it and Mr. Surratt within the meaning of Item 404(a) of Regulation S-K. Surratt Offer Letter The Company and Mr. Surratt have entered into a letter agreement (the "Offer Letter"), dated as of February 2, 2011, covering Mr. Surratts employment by the Company. Salary and Incentive Compensation Pursuant to the terms and conditions of the Offer Letter, the Company will pay Mr. Surratt an annual base salary of $400,000 and Mr. Surratt will be eligible to receive an annual incentive bonus equal to 55% of his annual base salary upon meeting applicable performance criteria set by the Compensation and Human Resources Committee of the Companys Board of Directors (the "Compensation Committee"). For performance exceeding such applicable performance criteria, the annual incentive bonus may be increased to an amount in excess of the target bonus up to a maximum of 100% of annual base salary, at the sole discretion of the Compensation Committee. Equity Grant Subject to approval by the Compensation Committee, the Company will grant to Mr. Surratt an equity award to be valued at $500,000 on the date of grant, with the award to be determined by the Compensation Committee as a mix of (i) 34% performance-based restricted stock units, which will vest only upon satisfaction of applicable performance objectives to be established by the Compensation Committee, (ii) 33% stock options, each with respect to the Companys common stock, par value $0.50 (the "Common Stock"), and (iii) 33% performance cash award. The value for the restricted stock units will be determined by dividing the target value for the restricted stock units by the Common Stocks fair market value on the date of grant and the value of the options will be determined using the Companys standard Black-Scholes assumptions applied as of the date of grant. Benefits Mr. Surratt will, to the extent eligible, be entitled to participate at a level commensurate with his position in all employee welfare, benefit, and retirement plans and programs the Company provides to its executives in accordance with Company policies. Mr. Surratt will work at the Companys Columbia, Maryland headquarters. The foregoing summary of the Offer Letter is qualified in its entirety by the full terms and conditions of the agreement. The Offer Letter will be filed as an exhibit to the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010 and is incorporated herein by reference. Executive Retention Agreement Effective February 6, 2011, Mr. Surratt entered into an Executive Retention Agreement (the "Agreement") with the Company on similar terms to other Company executives, which provides for severance payments under certain circumstances. The Agreement also provides for a release of claims and enhanced non-competition, non-recruitment, and non-disparagement obligations on the part of Mr. Surratt for the benefit of the Company as a condition to the Companys obligation to provide any severance or other payments thereunder. Termination without Cause; Position Diminishment The Agreement provides that if Mr. Surratts employment is terminated on or before August 25, 2013: (A) by the Company other than for cause, or (B) by the executive for Position Diminishment (as defined below), Mr. Surratt will receive a lump-sum cash payment in an amount equal to the sum of: (i) 12 times Mr. Surratts monthly base salary multiplied by 1.55, plus (ii) a bonus component, which is equal to the product of 0.55 times Mr. Surratts annual salary. The Compensation Committee has discretion to adjust such bonus component, including proration for a partial year of service. The Company will also provide Mr. Surratt with certain outplacement services (to a maximum of $50,000), and for a period until the second taxable year following the taxable year in which the termination occurred, or, if sooner, until reemployment. For purposes of the Agreement, "Position Diminishment" means: (i) a change in Mr. Surratts reporting responsibilities, duties, or authority of Mr. Surratt, (ii) a relocation of Mr. Surratts principal place of employment to a location more than 50 miles from its then current location and that increases the distance from Mr. Surratts primary residence by more than 50 miles, or (iii) a material reduction in Mr. Surratts annual base salary, other than reductions that are generally applicable to his peers as executive officers. Mr. Surratt may only resign as a result of a Position Diminishment and be eligible to receive the severance payments specified in the preceding paragraphs if: Mr. Surratt (x) provides notice to the Company within 90 days following the date of Position Diminishment that he considers the Position Diminishment grounds to resign; (y) provides the Company a period of 30 days to cure the Position Diminishment, and (z) actually ceases employment, if the Position Diminishment is not cured, by six months following the date of Position Diminishment. Change in Control If Mr. Surratts employment terminates during the 12 month period following a Change in Control: (A) by the Company other than for cause, or (B) by Mr. Surratt for Position Diminishment, Mr. Surratt will receive a lump-sum cash payment in an amount equal to the sum of: (i) 24 times Mr. Surratts monthly base salary multiplied by 1.55, plus (ii) a bonus component, equal to the product of 0.55 times Mr. Surratts annual salary. The Compensation and Human Resources Committee has discretion to adjust such bonus component, including proration for a partial year of service. Only if Mr. Surratts employment terminates as described in the paragraph above, all outstanding equity incentive awards fully and immediately vest (unless the equity incentive cannot be so accelerated under Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended ("Section 409A"), in which case acceleration will only occur in accordance with Section 409A). The foregoing summary of the Agreement is qualified in its entirety by the full terms and conditions of the agreement. The form of Agreement will be filed as an exhibit to the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. announcing appointment of Richard Surratt as Executive Vice President, Finance dated February 8, 2011
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Release
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
COLUMBIA, MD; February 8, 2011  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that Richard J. Surratt has been appointed Executive Vice President, Finance, reporting directly to William T. Kerr, President and Chief Executive Officer. The Company plans to transition Mr. Surratt into the role of Chief Financial Officer as soon as practicable.
When appointed as CFO, Mr. Surratt will succeed Sean Creamer, who was promoted in June 2010 to Executive Vice President, U.S. Media Services, responsible for the Company's radio and cross-platform services and operations. Mr. Creamer has continued his duties as Chief Financial Officer during the search for his replacement.
"Richard is a respected finance executive who we believe can help our company grow as a leading provider of integrated measures of the media experience and its impact on consumer behavior," said Mr. Kerr.
"His solid track record managing complex businesses, executing mergers and acquisitions, negotiating financing agreements and overseeing international finance operations make him an ideal addition to our executive team as we work to fulfill our goals of consistent growth, profitability, and a more diversified revenue base.
"Once Richard takes on the responsibilities of Chief Financial Officer, Sean Creamer will be able to fully focus his attention and his talents on enhancing our core radio services and building the new cross platform offerings that are designed to help Arbitron grow into new markets," said Mr. Kerr.
From 2007 to 2009, Mr. Surratt was President and Chief Executive Officer at Voyager Learning Company in Ann Arbor, MI, a K-12 education software company with approximately 300 employees and $98 million in annual revenues. Richard joined Voyager Learning in 2005 as Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. He led the sale of the company in December 2009 to Cambium Learning Group, Inc.
From 1999 to 2005, Mr. Surratt worked as Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer at Atlantic Coast Airlines Holdings, Inc., a publicly traded company that operated regional airline Independence Air.
Prior to Atlantic Coast Airlines Holdings, Mr. Surratt held a number of finance positions at Mobil Corporation from 1991 to 1999, including Director, Mergers and Acquisitions Group; Treasurer, Latin America; Senior Associate  Global Capital Markets; and Senior Financial Analyst.
Mr. Surratt received an M.B.A. from Stanford Graduate School of Business, Stanford, CA; an M.S., Fluid Mechanics and Thermal Sciences from The George Washington University, Washington, D.C. and a B.S. Marine Engineering Systems from U.S. Merchant Marine Academy, Kings Point, New York.
Mr. Surratt is a Director of Cambium Learning Group, Inc., (NASDAQ: ABCD), a Dallas- based company that provides research-based education solutions for students in the United States.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter(PPM) and PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
TM
Portable People Meter, PPM and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2011 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, our ability to expand our business in new markets, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, competition, the impact of increased costs of data collection including cell phone household recruitment and targeted in-person recruitment, the current global economic recession and the upheaval in the credit markets and financial services industry, litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our ability to successfully identify, consummate and integrate appropriate acquisitions, and our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2009 Annual Report on
Form 10-K
. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20110214191725.txt.gz
TIME:20110214191725
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(e) Kerr Amended and Restated Executive Employment Agreement On February 8, 2011, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") entered into an Amended and Restated Executive Employment Agreement (the "Amendment") with William T. Kerr covering Mr. Kerrs employment as President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company. The Amendment replaces an Executive Employment Agreement between the Company and Mr. Kerr dated February 11, 2010 (the "Original Agreement") and extends the expiration of the term of Mr. Kerrs employment from January 10, 2012 (the "Initial Term") until January 10, 2013 (the "Extended Term"). Mr. Kerrs base salary remains $800,000. Other material differences between the Amendment and the Original Agreement are set forth below. Long-Term Incentive In connection with the Amendment, the Compensation and Human Resources Committee of the Companys Board of Directors (the "Compensation Committee") has granted to Mr. Kerr a 2011 long-term incentive award with a value equal to $1,600,000 on the date of grant, to be divided into 33% performance-based cash and 67% performance-based deferred stock units which will vest only upon satisfaction of applicable performance objectives established by the Compensation Committee and which will be payable only after Mr. Kerrs separation from service. The long-term incentive award to Mr. Kerr also is subject to the accelerated vesting terms described below with regard to potential payment upon early termination. The equity awards will vest and/or become exercisable in accordance with the Companys customary terms. However, to the extent more favorable to Mr. Kerr (except in the case of a termination for Cause) the following special acceleration terms will apply. Upon termination of employment as a result of Mr. Kerrs death or disability outstanding equity awards will accelerate. Upon a termination of Mr. Kerrs employment by the Company without Cause, upon Mr. Kerrs Retirement, or upon Mr. Kerr ceasing to be employed for any reason (other than Cause) after the Extended Term, any performance based awards will require satisfaction of the applicable performance objectives but will not be prorated for partial years of service. Upon Mr. Kerrs resignation before the end of the Extended Term other than in connection with his Retirement, all unvested awards will be forfeited. Upon any termination of Mr. Kerrs employment by the Company for Cause, all vested and unvested awards will be forfeited. The new terms apply only to awards made on or after February 8, 2011. Severance If Mr. Kerrs employment is terminated without Cause, Mr. Kerrs Retirement (as defined below) occurs, or Mr. Kerr resigns for Position Diminishment (as defined below), he will be entitled to receive as severance an amount equal to: (i) base salary for the remainder of the Extended Term (plus an additional amount equal to the annual base salary if the termination of employment occurs on or before December 31, 2011), paid in accordance with the Companys standard payroll practices over the remainder of the Extended Term, and (ii) a bonus component. If the annual bonus for the year of termination is determined by the Compensation Committee under a program intended to qualify as performance-based for purposes of Section 162(m) of the Internal Revenue Code (an "Exempt Bonus"), the bonus component will be determined under the factors for such bonus, with such adjustments as the Compensation Committee makes under such factors (including the ability to adjust downwards but not upwards), but such amount will not be prorated for any partial year of service. If the annual bonus for the year of termination is not intended to be an Exempt Bonus, the bonus component will be equal to the annual base salary, but not prorated for any partial year of service. If, within 12 months following a Change of Control (as defined in the Company 2008 Equity Compensation Plan), Mr. Kerrs employment ends on a termination without Cause or for Position Diminishment, in lieu of the severance described in the preceding paragraph, Mr. Kerr will be entitled to receive an aggregate amount equal to 250% of annual base salary plus 250% of his target annual bonus paid in equal installments over a 24 month period in accordance with the Companys standard payroll policies and procedures. For purposes of the Amendment, "Retirement" means Mr. Kerrs voluntary resignation upon his replacement as Chief Executive Officer and his completion of a post-replacement transition period of 90 days or a shorter period at the Boards request; provided, however, that Mr. Kerr may not initiate his resignation before the Board approves his replacement and have such resignation treated as Retirement and "Retirement" for this purpose only applies on or before January 10, 2012. For purposes of the Amendment, "Position Diminishment" means a material reduction in Mr. Kerrs responsibilities, duties, or authority as in effect immediately before a Change in Control or as of the effective date of the Amendment where such reduction occurs on or after January 11, 2012 and before the end of the Extended Term. In order to receive any severance benefits or accelerated vesting provided under the Amendment, Mr. Kerr must execute a release in the form provided by the Company of all legally-releasable claims that Mr. Kerr may then have against the Company and any of its affiliates and must continue to comply with the noncompetition and other restrictive covenants. The foregoing summary of the Amendment is qualified in its entirety by the full terms and conditions of the Amendment, a copy of which will be filed as an exhibit to the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the period ended December 31, 2010 and is incorporated herein by reference. 2011 Non-Equity Incentive Plan On February 8, 2011, the Compensation Committee approved a non-equity incentive plan for the Companys executive officers for 2011, which would be payable in early 2012 (the "Incentive Plan"). The Incentive Plan provides for an annual cash payment that is linked to performance based upon the Companys diluted earnings per share (weighted 60%), quality of the Companys ratings services (weighted 20%), as well as a personal component, which is tied directly to each individual executives performance during the year (weighted 20%). For each component the Compensation Committee established threshold performance goals. The Incentive Plan provides for a target cash payment for each executive officer, expressed as a percentage of base salary. The target Incentive Plan payment for Mr. Kerr is equal to 100% of his base salary pursuant to the Amendment, and the target Incentive Plan payments for other executive officers range from 50-60% of base salary. Awards under the Incentive Plan can vary from 0% to 200% of the target amount, subject to minimum thresholds of performance and depending on the Compensation Committees assessment of performance against the goals. The Compensation Committee has negative discretion to eliminate or reduce the amount of any award under the Incentive Plan. 2011 Long-Term Incentive Plan Also on February 8, 2011, the Compensation Committee established the performance objectives and other terms of the Companys 2011 Long-Term Incentive Plan (the "2011 LTI Plan") for officers of the Company. The targeted opportunity for the Companys executive officers, other than Mr. Kerr, is divided into the following three components: (i) non-qualified stock options (representing approximately 33% of the total opportunity), (ii) performance-based restricted stock units (representing approximately 34% of the total opportunity), and (iii) performance cash awards (representing approximately 33% of the total opportunity). The target 2011 LTI Plan opportunity for executive officers other than Mr. Kerr ranges from 100% to 125% of 2011 base salary. Pursuant to the Amendment described above, the 2011 LTI Plan opportunity for Mr. Kerr is equal to 200% of his 2011 base salary. The number of non-qualified stock options will be based on the value of each option determined using the Companys standard Black-Scholes valuation model. The exercise price of each stock option will be equal to the closing price of the Companys common stock on the grant date and the options will vest ratably in three equal annual installments beginning on the first anniversary of the grant date. The restricted stock units contain a one-year performance period. The restricted stock units will expire without vesting if the one-year performance goal is not satisfied by the first anniversary of the date of grant. If the performance goal is met, the grant will become vested as to one-fourth of the RSUs on each of the four one-year anniversaries of the date of grant, provided that the recipient remains an employee or service provider to the Company through those dates. The performance goal requires return on invested capital (as defined in the 2011 LTI Plan) to be 12 percent or higher. For Mr. Kerr only, the restricted stock units will be in the form of deferred stock units that contain the same performance measure, but which will be payable only upon his separation from service. The performance cash award will be based on the Companys achievement of cumulative diluted earnings per share over a three year performance period with an additional payout if the Companys compound annual growth rate over a three year performance period reaches a specified percentage. The amount of the performance cash award may range from 0% to 200% of the performance cash award opportunity based on the achievement of specified results. The non-qualified stock options, restricted stock units, and performance cash awards will be made pursuant to the Companys 2008 Equity Compensation Plan. In addition to the awards described above, on February 8, 2011, the Compensation Committee granted Mr. Kerr 900 deferred stock units, which vested immediately but are payable only upon his separation from service.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. announcing extension of Employment Agreement with Chief Executive Officer William T. Kerr, dated February 14, 2011
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

PRESS INFORMATION
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
COLUMBIA, MD; February 14, 2011  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced an extension of its employment agreement with William T. Kerr, President and Chief Executive Officer, that extends Mr. Kerr's employment as CEO through January 10, 2013. The term of his existing agreement would otherwise have expired January 10, 2012.
"In the past year, Bill has led Arbitron through extraordinary events. Thanks to his guidance and to the hard work of the people at Arbitron, the Company is now better positioned to enhance the competitiveness of its radio ratings services, to enter new markets and deploy its resources for long-term growth," said Philip Guarascio, Chairman of the Board, Arbitron Inc., in announcing the extension.
"To help fulfill the potential of the Company and of the senior management team he has helped to shape, the Board has asked Bill to continue to serve as Arbitron's CEO for an additional year," said Mr. Guarascio.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter(PPM) and PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
TM
Portable People Meter, PPM and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2011 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, our ability to expand our business in new markets, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, competition, the impact of increased costs of data collection including cell phone household recruitment and targeted in-person recruitment, the current global economic recession and the upheaval in the credit markets and financial services industry, litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our ability to successfully identify, consummate and integrate appropriate acquisitions, and our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2009 Annual Report on
Form 10-K
. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20110216070255.txt.gz
TIME:20110216070255
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 16, 2011, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release reporting fourth quarter and full year 2010 financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. announcing Fourth Quarter and Full Year 2010 Financial Results dated February 16, 2011
The information in this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Information
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky
Press Contact
Arbitron Inc.
: Kim Myers
410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the fourth quarter and full year ended December 31, 2010.
Columbia MD, February 16, 2011
Net income for the fourth quarter 2010 was $15.6 million compared with $12.6 million for the fourth quarter of 2009. Earnings per share (diluted) for the fourth quarter 2010 were $0.57, an increase of 21.3 percent, compared with $0.47 per share (diluted) for the fourth quarter of 2009.
As reported last year, net income for the fourth quarter of 2009 included a one-time tax benefit of $4.7 million, or $0.17 per share (diluted), related to a favorable state tax ruling received by the Company during that quarter.
Net income for the full year 2010 increased to $44.5 million compared with $42.2 million in 2009. Earnings per share (diluted) for the full year 2010 were $1.64, an increase of 3.8 percent, compared with $1.58 per share (diluted) in 2009.
Excluding the 2009 fourth quarter tax benefit from the fourth quarter and full year 2009 results, earnings per share (diluted) increased 90 percent in the fourth quarter of 2010 and 16 percent for the full year 2010.
Additional Fourth Quarter Financial Highlights
The Company reported revenue of $111.7 million during the fourth quarter of 2010, an increase of 10.0 percent as compared to revenue of $101.5 million during the fourth quarter of 2009. Revenue in the quarter increased primarily due to the continued commercialization of the Portable People Meter (PPM) radio ratings service.
TM
TM
Costs and expenses for the fourth quarter decreased by 2.8 percent, from $95.3 million in 2009 to $92.7 million in 2010, primarily as a result of cost savings stemming from continued efficiencies in various corporate overhead areas as well as reduced legal expenses compared to last year. These savings offset planned cost increases due to the commercialization of the Portable People Meter radio ratings service in 15 additional markets during 2010.
Earnings before interest, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA) for the fourth quarter of 2010 was $32.8 million, an increase of 66.3 percent compared with EBITDA of $19.7 million for the fourth quarter of 2009.
Additional Full Year 2010 Financial Highlights
For the full year ended December 31, 2010, revenue was $395.4 million, an increase of 2.7 percent versus revenue of $385.0 million for the same period in 2009.
During 2010, the increase in revenue realized from the ongoing transition to the PPM radio ratings service was partially offset by a number of previously disclosed factors, including the impact of certain customers who were subscribers in 2009 but reduced their level of service or did not subscribe in all periods of 2010.
Costs and expenses for the full year decreased by 0.1 percent, from $330.1 million in 2009 to $329.7 million in 2010.
EBITDA for the full year increased 16.8 percent to $100.3 million in 2010 from $85.8 million in 2009.
Said William T. Kerr, President and Chief Executive Officer:
Management Comment on 2010 Results
"In 2010, we accomplished many of the goals that we established for the Company for the year, which I outlined during our fourth quarter earnings call last year, shortly after assuming my role as chief executive officer.
"Specifically, we completed the scheduled commercialization of the Portable People Meter radio ratings service, addressed issues and concerns raised by the PPM Coalition and other customers, established the framework to leverage our PPM technology and panel for growth, and continued to enhance and evolve senior management to better position the Company for long-term success. And as we announced in December, we renewed our contract with our largest customer, Clear Channel, through December of 2016.
"Looking forward, we intend to focus on opportunities for growth by developing integrated measures of the media experience and its impact on consumers. As the foundation of these efforts, we will work to enhance the competitiveness of our radio ratings services by continuing to increase the quality and value of our core service and by creating new services for radio's expanding digital strategies.
"We will also work to enter new markets by further developing our capabilities in cross-platform services, as well as in media and marketing analytics.
"By pursuing opportunities to drive additional top-line growth by leveraging our existing PPM and diary platforms and by continuously seeking cost efficiencies, we believe we can continue to invest appropriately in the quality of our services while increasing margins. We expect to deploy our financial and other resources with the goal of building long-term value for our customers, our employees and our shareholders.
Arbitron is reiterating its revenue and EPS guidance for 2011.
2011 Guidance
Arbitron continues to expect 2011 revenue to increase between 6 percent and 8 percent over its 2010 revenue. The Company anticipates 2011 earnings per share (diluted) between $1.90 and $2.05, an increase of 16 percent to 25 percent over 2010 earnings per share (diluted) of $1.64.
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time today, Wednesday, February 16, 2011.
Earnings Conference Call: Schedule and Access
The Company invites you to listen to the call toll-free by dialing (888) 562-3356. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing (973) 582-2700. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 34012063. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com and www.streetevents.com.
A replay of the call will be available from 1:00 p.m. on February 16, 2011 through 11:59 p.m. on February 23, 2011. To access the replay, please call (toll free) 800-642-1687 in the United States, or 706-645-9291 if you're calling from outside of the United States. To access the replay, users will need to enter the following code: 34012063.
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to either net income as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter and PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
Portable People Meter
TM
, PPM
TM
and PPM 360
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2009, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(2) Arbitron's management believes that presenting EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization), both non-GAAP financial measures, as supplemental information helps investors, analysts, and others, if they so choose, in understanding and evaluating Arbitron's operating performance in some of the same manners that management does because EBIT and EBITDA exclude certain items that are not directly related to Arbitron's core operating performance. Arbitron's management references these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing current performance and making decisions about internal budgets, resource allocation and financial goals.
EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, and depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered substitutes either for net income as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. EBIT margin and EBITDA margin are calculated as a percentage of revenue.
Note: The December 31, 2009 Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet is derived from the audited Balance Sheet included in the Company's
Form 10-K
for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20110302163305.txt.gz
TIME:20110302163305
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On February 8, 2011, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") announced that Richard J. Surratt, age 50, had been named Executive Vice President, Finance of the Company effective as of February 6, 2011 and that the Company intended to transition Mr. Surratt into the role of Chief Financial Officer as soon as is practicable. Effective as of February 28, 2011, the Board of Directors of the Company appointed Mr. Surratt as Executive Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer of the Company. Mr. Surratt succeeds Sean R. Creamer, who was promoted in June 2010 to Executive Vice President, U.S. Media Services, responsible for the Company's radio and cross-platform services and operations. The material terms of Mr. Surratts offer letter and retention agreement are summarized in the Form 8-K filed by the Company on February 8, 2011.
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
Effective as of February 28, 2011, the Board of Directors of the Company appointed Richard J. Surratt as Executive Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer. A copy of the press release announcing the appointment is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated March 2, 2011 announcing the appointment of Richard J. Surratt as Executive Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Company Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced that its Board of Directors has appointed Richard J. Surratt to the position of Executive Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer.
COLUMBIA, MD; March 2, 2011 
Mr. Surratt succeeds Sean R. Creamer, who was promoted in June 2010 to Executive Vice President, U.S. Media Services, responsible for the Company's radio and cross-platform services and operations.
Mr. Surratt joined Arbitron on February 6, 2011 as Executive Vice President, Finance.
From 2007 to 2009, Mr. Surratt was President and Chief Executive Officer at Voyager Learning Company, a K-12 education software company. Richard joined Voyager Learning in 2005 as Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.
From 1999 to 2005, Mr. Surratt worked as Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer at Atlantic Coast Airlines Holdings, Inc., a publicly traded company that operated regional airline Independence Air.
Prior to Atlantic Coast Airlines Holdings, Mr. Surratt held positions at Mobil Corporation from 1991 to 1999, including Director, Mergers and Acquisitions Group; Treasurer, Latin America; Senior Associate  Global Capital Markets; and Senior Financial Analyst.
Mr. Surratt received an M.B.A. from Stanford Graduate School of Business, Stanford, CA; an M.S., Fluid Mechanics and Thermal Sciences from The George Washington University, Washington, D.C. and a B.S. Marine Engineering Systems from U.S. Merchant Marine Academy, Kings Point, New York.
Mr. Surratt is a Director of Cambium Learning Group, Inc., (NASDAQ: ABCD), a Dallas- based education solutions company.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter (PPM) and PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
TM
Portable People Meter, PPM and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20110331085029.txt.gz
TIME:20110331085029
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On February 8, 2011, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") announced that Richard J. Surratt, age 50, had been named Executive Vice President, Finance of the Company effective as of February 6, 2011 and that the Company intended to transition Mr. Surratt into the role of Chief Financial Officer as soon as is practicable. Effective as of February 28, 2011, the Board of Directors of the Company appointed Mr. Surratt as Executive Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer of the Company. Mr. Surratt succeeds Sean R. Creamer, who was promoted in June 2010 to Executive Vice President, U.S. Media Services, responsible for the Company's radio and cross-platform services and operations. The material terms of Mr. Surratts offer letter and retention agreement are summarized in the Form 8-K filed by the Company on February 8, 2011.
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
Effective as of February 28, 2011, the Board of Directors of the Company appointed Richard J. Surratt as Executive Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer. A copy of the press release announcing the appointment is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated March 2, 2011 announcing the appointment of Richard J. Surratt as Executive Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Company Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced that its Board of Directors has appointed Richard J. Surratt to the position of Executive Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer.
COLUMBIA, MD; March 2, 2011 
Mr. Surratt succeeds Sean R. Creamer, who was promoted in June 2010 to Executive Vice President, U.S. Media Services, responsible for the Company's radio and cross-platform services and operations.
Mr. Surratt joined Arbitron on February 6, 2011 as Executive Vice President, Finance.
From 2007 to 2009, Mr. Surratt was President and Chief Executive Officer at Voyager Learning Company, a K-12 education software company. Richard joined Voyager Learning in 2005 as Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.
From 1999 to 2005, Mr. Surratt worked as Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer at Atlantic Coast Airlines Holdings, Inc., a publicly traded company that operated regional airline Independence Air.
Prior to Atlantic Coast Airlines Holdings, Mr. Surratt held positions at Mobil Corporation from 1991 to 1999, including Director, Mergers and Acquisitions Group; Treasurer, Latin America; Senior Associate  Global Capital Markets; and Senior Financial Analyst.
Mr. Surratt received an M.B.A. from Stanford Graduate School of Business, Stanford, CA; an M.S., Fluid Mechanics and Thermal Sciences from The George Washington University, Washington, D.C. and a B.S. Marine Engineering Systems from U.S. Merchant Marine Academy, Kings Point, New York.
Mr. Surratt is a Director of Cambium Learning Group, Inc., (NASDAQ: ABCD), a Dallas- based education solutions company.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter (PPM) and PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
TM
Portable People Meter, PPM and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20110426070351.txt.gz
TIME:20110426070351
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 26, 2011, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release reporting first quarter 2011 financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated April 26, 2011
The information in this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Columbia MD, April 26, 2011  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2011.
Net income for the quarter increased 18.2 percent to $16.2 million, or $0.59 per share (diluted), compared with $13.7 million, or $0.51 per share (diluted), for the first quarter of 2010.
For the first quarter of 2011, the Company reported revenue of $100.9 million, an increase of 5.2 percent compared to revenue of $95.9 million during the first quarter of 2010. Revenue for the quarter benefited from the commercialization of the Portable People Meter (PPM) ratings service in 15 markets in the second half of 2010, which completed the Company's 48-market PPM commercialization plan, and from the ongoing transition to PPM service pricing
TM
TM
Costs and expenses for the first quarter 2011 increased by 1.5 percent, to $71.8 million from $70.7 million in the first quarter 2010. The incremental costs compared to last year related to the Portable People Meter markets commercialized in the second half of 2010, partially offset by the elimination of costs associated with operating the diary service in those markets.
Operating income in the first quarter 2011 increased 15.5 percent, to $29.1 million from $25.2 million in the first quarter 2010.
EBIT (earnings before interest and income tax expense) for the first quarter 2011 was $26.6 million, an increase of 17.2 percent compared with EBIT of $22.7 million for the first quarter of 2010. The Company's EBIT margin for the first quarter 2011 increased to 26.3 percent from 23.6 percent in the first quarter of 2010.
EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) was $33.9 million in the first quarter of 2011, an increase of 16.1 percent compared with EBITDA of $29.2 million in the first quarter of 2010. The Company's EBITDA margin for the first quarter 2011 increased to 33.6 percent from 30.4 percent in the first quarter of 2010.
Said William T. Kerr, President and Chief Executive Officer:
Management Comment on First Quarter 2011 Results
"In the first quarter, we earned Media Rating Council accreditation of the data produced by our Portable People Meter service in 11 additional markets. Thanks to the impact of our continuous improvement programs on the quality of our samples and services, a total of 14 PPM markets now display the MRC double checkmark' symbol.
"We also made progress in our cross-platform initiatives. CBS and Turner Sports used our PPM out-of-home ratings service for the 2011 NCAA Men's Division I Basketball Championship to demonstrate the significant lift that away-from-home television viewing can deliver. And, as previously announced, the Coalition for Innovative Media Measurement selected Arbitron for a proof-of-concept pilot to measure television, Internet and mobile users. Both of these initiatives provide tangible evidence of the traction and credibility we believe we are gaining in this rapidly evolving marketplace.
"For the balance of 2011, we still expect revenue to grow faster than costs. Because we have fully commercialized the PPM service in all 48 markets, we anticipate margin expansion as our costs stabilize and as we continue to benefit from the phase in of pricing for our PPM service."
Arbitron is reiterating its revenue and earnings per share guidance for 2011.
2011 Full-Year Guidance
For the full year 2011, Arbitron continues to expect revenue to increase between six percent and eight percent compared to 2010 revenue of $395.4 million.
The Company continues to anticipate 2011 earnings per share (diluted) to be between $1.90 and $2.05, an increase of 16 percent to 25 percent over 2010 earnings per share (diluted) of $1.64.
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time, today, April 26, 2011. The Company invites you to listen to the call toll-free by dialing (888) 562-3356. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing (973) 582-2700. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 56351035. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com and www.streetevents.com.
Earnings Conference Call: Schedule and Access
A replay of the call will be available from 1:00 p.m. on April 26, 2011 through 11:59 p.m. on May 3, 2011. To access the replay, please call (toll free) 800-642-1687 in the United States, or (706) 645-9291 from outside of the United States. Enter the following code to access the replay: 56351035.
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to either net income as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product purchase patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter and PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
Portable People Meter
TM
PPM
TM
and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Media Rating Council and the "double checkmark" logo design are registered marks of the Media Rating Council.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2010, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(2) Arbitron's management believes that presenting EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization), both non-GAAP financial measures, as supplemental information helps investors, analysts, and others, if they so choose, in understanding and evaluating Arbitron's operating performance in some of the same manners that management does because EBIT and EBITDA exclude certain items that are not directly related to Arbitron's core operating performance. Arbitron's management references these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing current performance and making decisions about internal budgets, resource allocation and financial goals.
EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, and depreciation and amortization to net income.
EBIT margin and EBITDA margin are calculated as percentages of revenue.
EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered substitutes either for net income as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
Note: The December 31, 2010 Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet is derived from the audited Balance Sheet included in the Company's
Form 10-K
for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20110526160512.txt.gz
TIME:20110526160512
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
On May 24, 2011, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") held its 2011 Annual Meeting of Stockholders. The certified results of the matters voted upon at the meeting, which are more fully described in the Company's proxy statement, are as follows:
Although the vote is non-binding, the Board of Directors values the opinion of our stockholders.  In light of the voting results on this proposal, the Board has determined that the Company will hold the advisory vote on executive compensation annually until the next stockholder vote on the frequency of holding an advisory vote on executive compensation.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20110713083538.txt.gz
TIME:20110713083538
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(d) On July 12, 2011, Ronald G. Garriques, age 47, was appointed to the Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") to serve until the next annual meeting of stockholders of the Company, or until his earlier death, resignation or removal. Additional information about Mr. Garriques is included in the Companys press release issued on July 13, 2011, which is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. Mr. Garriques will participate in the Companys previously disclosed Non-Employee Director Incentive Program. In connection with joining the Companys Board of Directors, on July 12, 2011, Mr. Garriques received a one-time grant of 4,500 deferred stock units, which deferred stock units will vest in three equal installments of 1,500 deferred stock units over a three-year period and will be payable no sooner than six months following Mr. Garriques termination of service as a director of the Company. The award is in the form of the Companys standard Form of 2008 Equity Compensation Plan Director Deferred Stock Unit Agreement - Initial Grant under the Arbitron Inc. 2008 Equity Compensation Plan, filed as Exhibit 10.24 to the Companys Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010, filed on February 24, 2011.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated July 13, 2011
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
Columbia, MD; July 13, 2011  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE:ARB) today announced that Ronald G. Garriques, former President of Dell Inc.'s Communication Solutions Group, has been appointed to the Arbitron Board of Directors, effective Tuesday, July 12, 2011, to serve until the next annual meeting of stockholders.
"Ron brings to Arbitron significant expertise in mobile technology as well as international business development and operations, further expanding the capabilities of the Board in these critical areas," said Philip Guarascio, Chairman of the Arbitron Board of Directors.  "As mobile devices reshape how consumers utilize all forms of media, Ron's years of direct experience in this rapidly evolving consumer arena will be invaluable to Arbitron as the company moves forward with its cross-platform measurement initiatives."  
Mr. Garriques joined Dell Inc., a publicly traded technology company, in February 2007 as president of its Global Consumer Business.  In this role he drove the direct, online, retail and distribution channels worldwide.  Ron also drove the overall consumer product line including the Alienware, Adamo, XPS, Studio, Inspiron and Dimension computing product lines and the Streak and Venue mobile product lines. Mr. Garriques currently consults for Dell, and in June 2011 he became the Chief Executive Officer and Chairman of Gee Holdings LLC, a private company.  
Prior to his tenure at Dell, Mr. Garriques was an Executive Vice President at Motorola and President, Mobile Devices Business from October 2004 through February 2007.  Prior, he served as General Manager, Personal Communications Sector, for the company's European, Middle Eastern, African and South Asian operations.  Ron joined Motorola in 1998 and played multiple roles in program management, product management and engineering of Motorola's platform of wireless products.  
From 1986 to 1998, Mr. Garriques worked for ATT/Lucent Technologies where he held leadership roles in product management, engineering, customer technical support and deployment of Wireless Infrastructure for the global markets.  
Mr.  Garriques has an MBA from the Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania, an MS in Mechanical Engineering from Stanford University, and a BS in Mechanical Engineering from Boston University.  Ron is a Trustee of Boston University and sits on the College of Engineering's Board of Advisors.
 
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter (PPM) and PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
TM
Portable People Meter, PPM and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20110721072619.txt.gz
TIME:20110721072619
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 21, 2011, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release reporting second quarter 2011 financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated July 21, 2011
The information in this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky
Press Contacts
Arbitron Inc.
: Kim Myers
410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Columbia MD, July 21, 2011  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2011.
The Company reported revenue of $95.7 million, an increase of 8.4 percent as compared to revenue of $88.3 million during the second quarter of 2010. The revenue increase was due primarily to the commercialization of the Portable People Meter (PPM) radio ratings service in the final 15 markets in the second half of 2010, the continued phase-in of contracted PPM price increases and the PPM ratings contract signed with Univision in November 2010.
TM
TM
Costs and expenses for the second quarter increased by 1.1 percent, from $87.7 million in 2010 to $88.7 million in 2011.
For the second quarter of 2011, net income was $7.6 million, an increase of 99.6 percent compared with $3.8 million for the second quarter of 2010. Earnings per share (diluted) was $0.27 for the quarter versus $0.14 for the second quarter of 2010.
Earnings before interest, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA) for the quarter was $19.7 million, an increase of 52.5 percent compared with EBITDA of $12.9 million for the second quarter of 2010. EBITDA margin for the second quarter increased from 14.6 percent to 20.6 percent.
For the six months ended June 30, 2011, revenue was $196.6 million, an increase of 6.7 percent versus revenue of $184.2 million for the same period in 2010.
Costs and expenses for the six months ended June 30, 2011 increased by 1.3 percent, from $158.4 million to $160.5 million.
Net income for the first six months of 2011 increased 35.8 percent to $23.8 million compared with $17.5 million in 2010. Earnings per share (diluted) for the first six months of 2011 was $0.86 compared with $0.65 for the first six months of 2010.
EBITDA increased 27.3 percent from $42.1 million in the first six months of 2010 to $53.6 million for the same period in 2011, with EBITDA margins of 22.9 percent and 27.3 percent, respectively.
Said William T. Kerr, President and Chief Executive Officer:
Management Comment on Second Quarter 2011 Results
"In the second quarter, Starcom MediaVest and ZenithOptimedia signed a multi-year contract renewal for radio ratings and software. These two agencies are part of Publicis Groupe, one of the largest brand communications organizations in the world. The renewal covers eight affiliated agencies, which, in the aggregate, place hundreds of millions of ad dollars on local and national radio outlets.
"In our cross-platform efforts, we recently signed a leading broadcaster to a cross-platform study of audiences to its radio and television outlets in a top-ten market. We continue to see strong interest in our cross-platform initiatives and believe this new contract shows we are moving in the right direction.
"We've also made good progress during the first half of the year on the development of a total audience measurement service, combining both over-the-air and Internet audio listening. This planned new service would be the first combined audience measurement of both over-the-air radio audiences and Internet audio audiences with the latter based on server-side metrics for streamed radio broadcasts and pure-play Internet audio programming. The market has shown significant interest in this new service and we anticipate our digital radio service, when launched, will address an important market need for a total audience measurement service.
"Finally, we continue to work on improving margins in our radio ratings business and those efforts paid off with higher EBIT and EBITDA margins in the first half of 2011 compared to 2010. Because we have fully commercialized the PPM service in all 48 planned markets, we also anticipate finishing the full year at higher EBIT and EBITDA margins than 2010 as revenue continues to benefit from phase-in of contracted PPM price increases while the costs associated with commercializing PPM markets are behind us."
2011 Guidance
Arbitron is reiterating its revenue and earnings per share guidance for 2011.
For the full year 2011, Arbitron continues to expect revenue to increase between six percent and eight percent compared to 2010 revenue of $395.4 million.
The Company continues to anticipate 2011 earnings per share (diluted) of between $1.90 and $2.05, an increase of 16 percent to 25 percent over earnings per share (diluted) of $1.64 for 2010.
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time, today, July 21, 2011.
Earnings Conference Call: Schedule and Access
The Company invites you to listen to the call toll-free by dialing (800) 826-1884. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing (216) 672-5602. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 80083493. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com and www.streetevents.com.
A replay of the call will be available from 1:00 p.m. on July 21, 2011 through 11:59 p.m. on July 28, 2011. To access the replay, please call (toll free) (800) 642-1687 in the United States, or (706) 645-9291 if you're calling from outside of the United States. To access the replay, users will need to enter the following code: 80083493.
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to either net income as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is a media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable and out-of-home  as well as advertisers and advertising agencies. Arbitron's core businesses are measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of local market consumers; and providing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter and PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
Portable People Meter
TM
, PPM
TM
and PPM 360
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2010, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measure, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measure, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(2) Arbitron's management believes that presenting EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization), both non-GAAP financial measures, as supplemental information helps investors, analysts, and others, if they so choose, in understanding and evaluating Arbitron's operating performance in some of the same manners that management does because EBIT and EBITDA exclude certain items that are not directly related to Arbitron's core operating performance. Arbitron's management references these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing current performance and making decisions about internal budgets, resource allocation and financial goals.
EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, and depreciation and amortization to net income.
EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered substitutes either for net income as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
Note: The December 31, 2010 Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet is derived from the audited Balance Sheet included in the Company's
Form 10-K
for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20110728163410.txt.gz
TIME:20110728163410
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On July 28, 2011, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") announced that it had acquired Zokem Oy, a Finland-based mobile audience and analytics firm, for a payment of approximately $11.7 million in cash at closing with possible additional incremental cash payments through 2014 of up to $12 million based on future financial performance. The Company also disclosed selected financial impacts of the acquisition and reiterated its full-year 2011 revenue and earnings per share (diluted) guidance. A copy of the press release announcing the acquisition is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated July 28, 2011
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Columbia, MD; July 28, 2011  Arbitron Inc., (NYSE: ARB) announced today that it has acquired Zokem Oy, a Finland-based mobile audience measurement and analytics firm for a payment of approximately $11.7 million in cash at closing with possible additional incremental cash payments through 2014 of up to $12 million based on future financial performance.
Zokem provides custom and syndicated mobile research panels, plug-and-play mobile media measurement tools and software building blocks for mobile device tracking to the leading companies in the marketing research, wireless, Internet, media and marketing industries.
Through its proprietary and passive mobile application, Zokem customers can track and interpret consumer use of mobile devices and media. The technology also provides information on network performance and effectiveness of mobile ad campaigns. Zokem currently operates panels in 14 global markets and has relationships with a number of the largest mobile industry participants around the world.
Zokem will operate as Arbitron Mobile, which will be led by Dr. Hannu Verkasalo, Zokem founder and CEO, and will report to Sean Creamer, executive vice president, U.S. Media Services for Arbitron.
"To better position themselves in the global media marketplace, advertisers, content providers and mobile operators are more eager than ever to understand how consumers are using mobile devices," said William T. Kerr, president and chief executive officer, Arbitron Inc. "The acquisition of Zokem enhances the mobile audience measurement capabilities we gained through our previous purchase of the IMMI technology assets and through the continuing development of our Portable People Meter technology. Zokem also provides Arbitron with valuable new resources for our growing cross-platform initiatives."
TM
"Arbitron's expertise in survey methodology, its currency panels for media measurement and its established sales channels are a tremendous complement to Zokem's mobile technology, mobile expertise and international footprint. We will be in a strong position to capitalize on these assets while continuing to work with our existing partners," said Hannu Verkasalo, founder and chief executive officer, Zokem Oy. "We are already delivering unique and valuable insights to advertisers and media buyers around the world who want a better understanding of how consumers rely on their mobile devices and services. Arbitron Mobile is now better positioned to enhance and expand these insights. For Zokem's management, employees, customers and investors, this acquisition is a welcome step forward."
The Company expects that the acquisition of Zokem will reduce its 2011 earnings by $0.07 to $0.09 per share (diluted.) Transaction costs and transaction related amortization expenses are expected to account for $0.04 per share (diluted) of the estimated $0.07 to $0.09 earnings per share (diluted) impact.
Arbitron is reiterating its revenue and earnings per share guidance for 2011.
For the full year 2011, Arbitron continues to expect revenue to increase between six percent and eight percent compared to 2010 revenue of $395.4 million.
The Company continues to anticipate 2011 earnings per share (diluted) of between $1.90 and $2.05, an increase of 16 percent to 25 percent over earnings per share (diluted) of $1.64 for 2010.
About Zokem
Zokem is a market leader in next-generation mobile analytics, offering a 360 view of the mobile consumer through passive on-device measurements. With 10 years of experience in the field, Zokem has been growing due to rapid adoption of mobile devices such as smartphones and tablets with an accompanying shift of ad dollars to mobile advertising. Zokem conducts custom research projects for product development, consumer insights and benchmarking purposes and operates opt-in mobile research panels in 14 major markets globally. Zokem partners with the top firms in the field, including China Mobile and Nokia Siemens Networks, to interpret the world's fast growing mass medium  mobile. Zokem has offices in Espoo, Finland as well as sales representatives in London, Paris, New York City and Singapore.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the mediaradio, television, cable and out-of-home; the mobile industry as well as advertising agencies and advertisers around the world. Arbitron's businesses include: measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of U.S. consumers; providing mobile audience measurement and analytics in the United States, Europe, Asia and Australia, and developing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data.
The Company has developed the Portable People Meter  (PPM) and the PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
TM
Portable People Meter, PPM and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2011 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, our ability to successfully integrate acquired operations, diversions of management resources, expenses incurred in financing the acquisition, differing levels of management and internal control effectiveness at the acquired entity, other unanticipated problems and liabilities, changes in the market, potential downturns in economic conditions, foreign exchange fluctuations, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and other international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2010 Annual Report on
Form 10-K
. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20110805162751.txt.gz
TIME:20110805162751
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On July 28, 2011, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") announced it had acquired Zokem Oy, and issued a press release announcing, among other things, that the consideration included payment of approximately $11.7 million in cash at closing with possible additional incremental cash payments through 2014 of up to $12 million based on future financial performance. The Company is filing this Form 8-K/A to clarify that the up to $12 million in possible additional incremental cash payments could be paid through 2015 based on future financial performance. Except as specifically modified hereby, all other information in the press release remains unchanged.
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20110811070529.txt.gz
TIME:20110811070529
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(c) On August 10, 2011, the Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") appointed Sean R. Creamer, 46, as Executive Vice President, Chief Operating Officer. Mr. Creamer has held various roles within the Company since 2005. Mr. Creamer joined Arbitron in August 2005 as Executive Vice President, Finance and Planning. In November 2005, Mr. Creamer was named Chief Financial Officer and maintained that responsibility through March 2011. In June 2010, Mr. Creamer was named Executive Vice President, U.S. Media Services, responsible for the Company's radio and cross-platform services and operations. The Company has determined that there are no related person transactions between it and Mr. Creamer within the meaning of Item 404(a) of Regulation S-K. Additional information about the appointment is included in the Companys press release issued on August 11, 2011, which is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated August 11, 2011
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
COLUMBIA, MD; August 11, 2011  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that Sean R. Creamer has been named to the newly created position of Executive Vice President, Chief Operating Officer. Most recently, Mr. Creamer served as Executive Vice President, U.S. Media Services.
In this expanded role, Creamer assumes overall operational and financial responsibility for Arbitron's core businesses, and is charged with executing the Company's cross-platform, digital and mobile growth strategies in the United States and in international markets. In addition to his current leadership of the Company's product and operations organizations, he adds oversight for the Arbitron research, information technology, engineering, sales and marketing groups.
Sean will continue to report to Arbitron President and Chief Executive Officer, William T. Kerr.
"Sean has consistently demonstrated a high level of executive acumen, a strong customer focus and a broad business perspective that makes this expanded role a logical next step as we continue to evolve our senior management team," said Mr. Kerr. "This promotion acknowledges Sean's abilities and significant contributions to date, and, I believe, also positions the Company extremely well for its future leadership needs."
"The Board has enthusiastically endorsed Sean as Arbitron's chief operating officer," said Philip Guarascio, Chairman of Arbitron's Board of Directors. "We are counting on Sean to deliver on the financial and operational goals that Bill has established for the company as we continue to develop the long-term top management structure."
In June 2010, Sean Creamer was named Executive Vice President, U.S. Media Services, responsible for the Company's radio and cross-platform services and operations.
Sean Creamer joined Arbitron in August 2005 as Executive Vice President, Finance and Planning. In November 2005, he was named Chief Financial Officer and maintained that responsibility through March 2011. Immediately prior to joining Arbitron, Mr. Creamer was Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Laureate Education, Inc. During his nine-year tenure with Laureate, Sean was responsible for financial planning and analysis, accounting, budgeting, investor relations, real estate, risk management, tax and treasury functions.
Previously, Sean held a number of financial positions of increasing responsibility at Mobil Corporation and Price Waterhouse.
Sean received a B.S. in Accounting from St. Joseph's University in Philadelphia and an M.S. in Taxation from Georgetown University.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the mediaradio, television, cable and out-of-home; the mobile industry as well as advertising agencies and advertisers around the world. Arbitron's businesses include: measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of U.S. consumers; providing mobile audience measurement and analytics in the United States, Europe, Asia and Australia, and developing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data.
The Company has developed the Portable People Meter  (PPM) and the PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
TM
Portable People Meter, PPM and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2011 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, our ability to successfully integrate acquired operations, diversions of management resources, expenses incurred in financing the acquisition, differing levels of management and internal control effectiveness at the acquired entity, other unanticipated problems and liabilities, changes in the market, potential downturns in economic conditions, foreign exchange fluctuations, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and other international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2010 Annual Report on
Form 10-K
. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20110825170220.txt.gz
TIME:20110825170220
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(e) On August 10, 2011, the Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") appointed Sean R. Creamer, as Executive Vice President, Chief Operating Officer. In connection with this promotion, on August 23, 2011, the Compensation and Human Resources Committee of the Board of Directors (the "Compensation Committee") increased Mr. Creamers annual base salary to $500,000, and Mr. Creamer will be eligible to receive an annual incentive bonus equal to 70% of his annual base salary upon meeting applicable performance criteria set by the Compensation Committee. For performance exceeding such applicable performance criteria, the annual incentive bonus may be increased up to a maximum of 140% of annual base salary, at the sole discretion of the Compensation Committee. The increase in annual base salary and annual incentive bonus eligibility will be prorated for 2011. The Compensation Committee also granted Mr. Creamer 66,418 stock options with respect to the Companys common stock, par value $0.50, which stock options will vest and become exercisable in three equal annual installments on the first, second, and third anniversary of the date of grant. The stock option award was made pursuant to the Companys standard 2008 Equity Compensation Plan Non-Statutory Stock Option Agreement, provided, however that if Mr. Creamers employment terminates as a result of his Retirement (as defined in the Stock Option Agreement), the option will continue to vest and will remain exercisable for its full 10 year term. Mr. Creamer is not currently Retirement eligible. The form of Option Agreement will be filed with the Companys Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended September 30, 2011.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20111025070807.txt.gz
TIME:20111025070807
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 25, 2011, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release reporting third quarter 2011 financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated October 25, 2011
The information in this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky
Press Contacts
Arbitron Inc.
: Kim Myers
410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
For Immediate Release
Columbia MD, October 25, 2011  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2011.
The Company reported revenue of $105.6 million, an increase of 6.1 percent as compared to revenue of $99.5 million during the third quarter of 2010. Revenue increased on a quarter over quarter basis primarily as a result of commercializing the Portable People Meter (PPM) radio ratings service in new markets during the fourth quarter 2010 as well as the continued phase-in of contracted PPM price increases.
TM
TM
Costs and expenses for the third quarter of 2011 were $77.2 million, a decrease of 1.8 percent from $78.6 million for the same period in 2010.
Earnings Before Interest, Income Tax Expense, Depreciation and Amortization (EBITDA) for the quarter was $33.6 million, an increase of 32.4 percent compared with EBITDA of $25.4 million for the third quarter of 2010. The Company's EBITDA margin in the third quarter 2011 was 31.8 percent, an increase of 630 basis points from the EBITDA margin of 25.5 percent in the third quarter of 2010.
For the third quarter of 2011, net income was $15.4 million, compared with $11.3 million for the third quarter of 2010. Earnings per share (diluted) was $0.55 for the quarter versus $0.42 for the third quarter of 2010, an increase of 31 percent.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2011, revenue was $302.2 million, an increase of 6.5 percent as compared to revenue of $283.7 million for the same period in 2010.
Costs and expenses for the nine months ended September 30, 2011 were $237.7 million, an increase of 0.3 percent versus the same period in 2010.
EBITDA was $87.2 million in the first nine months of 2011, an increase of 29.2 percent from $67.5 million for the same period in 2010. EBITDA margin in the first nine months of 2011 was 28.8 percent, an increase of 500 basis points from 23.8 percent for the same period in 2010.
Net income for the nine-month period increased to $39.2 million from $28.9 million in 2010. Earnings per share (diluted) for the first nine months of 2011 was $1.42 compared with $1.07 per share (diluted) for the first nine months of 2010, an increase of 32.7 percent.
Said William T. Kerr, President and Chief Executive Officer:
Management Comment on Third Quarter 2011 Activities and Results
"In July, we acquired Zokem Oy, a Finland-based mobile audience measurement and analytics firm. This acquisition further enhances our mobile measurement capabilities, which will be valuable for our future cross-platform initiatives.
"We continue to make promising steps in establishing ourselves in the market for cross-platform services. A proof-of-concept project awarded to Arbitron by the Coalition for Innovative Media Measurement (CIMM) to use a single-source panel to measure television, Internet and mobile usage is now up and running. We expect to deliver the first three-screen media insights to the members of CIMM in the fourth quarter.
"As we identify, and as appropriate, invest in these growth initiatives, we also continue to maintain and improve the quality of our radio ratings services. These efforts include the expansion of targeted in-person recruitment in our PPM markets, initiatives to improve the representation of cell phone households in our diary and PPM samples and research into a web-based alternative to the paper and pencil diary."
Arbitron is reiterating its revenue and earnings per share guidance for 2011.
2011 Guidance
For the full year 2011, Arbitron continues to expect revenue will increase between six percent and eight percent versus 2010 revenue.
Earnings per share for the full year 2011 is expected to be between $1.90 and $2.05 per share (diluted.)
For the year, the Company continues to expect the 2011 impact of the Zokem acquisition and related operating losses to reduce earnings by $0.07 to $0.09 per share (diluted), which is contemplated in the earnings guidance above.
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time on Tuesday, October 25, 2011.
Earnings Conference Call: Schedule and Access
The Company invites you to listen to the call toll-free by dialing (800) 826-1884. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing (216) 672-5602. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 15106489. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com and www.streetevents.com.
A replay of the call will be available from 1:00 p.m. on October 25, 2011 through 11:59 p.m. on November 1, 2011. To access the replay, please call (toll free) (855) 859-2056 in the United States, or (404) 537-3406 if you're calling from outside of the United States. To access the replay, users will need to enter the following code: 15106489
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to either net income as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measure, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the mediaradio, television, cable and out-of-home; the mobile industry as well as advertising agencies and advertisers around the world. Arbitron's businesses include: measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of U.S. consumers; providing mobile audience measurement and analytics in the United States, Europe, Asia and Australia, and developing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has developed the Portable People Meter  (PPM) and the PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
TM
Portable People Meter
TM
, PPM
TM
and PPM 360
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2010, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measure, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measure, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(2) Arbitron's management believes that presenting EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization), both non-GAAP financial measures, as supplemental information helps investors, analysts, and others, if they so choose, in understanding and evaluating Arbitron's operating performance in some of the same manners that management does because EBIT and EBITDA exclude certain items that are not directly related to Arbitron's core operating performance. Arbitron's management references these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing current performance and making decisions about internal budgets, resource allocation and financial goals.
EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, and depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered substitutes either for net income as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
Note: The December 31, 2010 Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet is derived from the audited Balance Sheet included in the Company's
Form 10-K
for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20111122080556.txt.gz
TIME:20111122080556
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On November 21, 2011 , Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") entered into a $150 million senior unsecured credit facility with JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association as Administrative Agent, U.S. Bank National Association and Citibank, N.A. as Co-Syndication Agents, J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, as Sole Bookrunner and Sole Lead Arranger, and a syndicate of lenders from time to time party thereto. The Credit Agreement (as defined below) expires on November 21, 2016. The description of the Credit Agreement (the "Credit Agreement") set forth below is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Credit Agreement, a copy of which is attached as Exhibit 10.1 hereto and is incorporated by reference herein. The Credit Agreement also provides access to up to an additional $75 million of financing through an expansion feature under which the aggregate commitment of the lenders or additional lenders thereto may be increased up to $225 million, subject to the availability of additional commitments. The credit facility includes a $20 million swing line commitment and a $20 million commitment for issuance of letters of credit. Borrowings under the credit facility bear interest at one of the two following rates, at the Companys option: (1) the Alternate Base Rate (the "ABR") plus the Applicable Rate, or (2) the Adjusted LIBO Rate plus the Applicable Rate; provided that all Swing Line Loans (as defined in the Credit Agreement) bear interest at the ABR plus the Applicable Rate. The ABR is equal to the greatest of: (i) the rate of interest publicly announced by JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as its prime rate in effect at its principal office in New York; (ii) the federal funds rate effective rate in effect from time to time plus  of 1%; and (iii), and the Adjusted LIBO Rate for a one month interest period on such day plus 1%. The Adjusted LIBO Rate is equal to the rate at which Eurodollar deposits in the London interbank market for the applicable borrowing period are quoted on the Reuters Screen LIBOR01 page multiplied by the statutory reserve rate. The Applicable Rate varies between 1.05% and 1.40% for Eurodollar Borrowings (as defined in the Credit Agreement), and between 0.05% and 0.40% for ABR Borrowings (as defined in the Credit Agreement), based upon a ratio, determined as of the end of each of the Companys fiscal quarters ending on and after the date of the Credit Agreement of (i) Consolidated Total Indebtedness (as defined in the Credit Agreement) minus the amount by which the sum of cash, cash equivalents and Permitted Investments (as defined in the Credit Agreement) maintained by the Company and the Guarantors as of the end of such fiscal quarter exceeds $30 million, if at all, to (ii) Consolidated EBITDA (as defined in the Credit Agreement) for the trailing four fiscal quarters. The Credit Agreement contains customary representations, warranties, conditions precedent, events of default, indemnities and affirmative and negative covenants, including covenants that, among other things, require the Company to maintain certain leverage and interest coverage ratios, and restrict the ability of the Company to: incur indebtedness; incur liens; sell or otherwise dispose of assets, including capital stock of subsidiaries; enter into mergers or consolidations; enter into transactions with affiliates; and use proceeds of borrowings under the Credit Agreement for other than permitted uses. These covenants are subject to a number of important exceptions and qualifications. Certain changes in control of the Company would constitute an event of default under the Credit Agreement. The proceeds from the credit facility will be used for working capital requirements and general corporate purposes, which may include refinancing its existing credit facility, permitted acquisitions and share repurchases. A copy of a press release announcing the signing of the Credit Agreement is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 2.03 Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
The information set forth in Item 1.01 of this Current Report on Form 8-K, "Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement," is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 5.03 Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year.
On November 16, 2011, the Board of Directors of the Company approved amendments to Article II, Section 8 of the Companys Bylaws to provide that in an uncontested election if a director nominee receives a greater number of votes "withheld" from his or her election than votes "for" that director nominees election, the nominee shall promptly offer his or her resignation to the Board. Thereafter, the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee, consisting of independent directors (which will specifically exclude any director who is required to offer his or her own resignation) shall consider all relevant factors and recommend to the Board the action to be taken with respect to such offered resignation, and the Board will consider whether to accept the resignation or take other action. A copy of the Third Amended and Restated Bylaws is filed as Exhibit 3.1 and incorporated herein by reference. The discussion provided in this Item is qualified in its entirety by reference to such Exhibit.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 3.1 Third Amended and Restated Bylaws of Arbitron Inc., effective as of November 16, 2011 Exhibit 10.1 Credit Agreement dated as of November 22, 2011 by and among Arbitron Inc., JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as Administrative Agent, U.S. Bank National Association and Citibank, N.A. as Co-Syndication Agents, J.P. Morgan Securities LLC as Sole Bookrunner and Sole Lead Arranger, and the Lenders party thereto Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated November 22, 2011
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

The registered office of Arbitron Inc. (the "Corporation") in the State of Delaware shall be located in the City of Wilmington, County of New Castle. The executive offices of the Corporation shall be located in the City of Columbia, Howard County, State of Maryland. The Corporation may have such other offices, either within or without the States of Delaware and Maryland, as the Board of Directors may designate or as the business of the Corporation may require from time to time.
An annual meeting of the stockholders shall be held for the purpose of electing directors at such date, time and place, either inside or outside of the State of Delaware, as may be designated by the Board of Directors from time to time. Any other proper business may be transacted at the annual meeting.
Section 1. Annual Meeting
.
Special meetings of stockholders may be held for any purpose or purposes and may be called at any time by the Chairman, by the Board of Directors, or by a committee of the Board of Directors that has been duly designated by the Board of Directors and whose powers and authority, as expressly provided in a resolution of the Board of Directors, include the power to call such meetings, but such special meetings may not be called by any other person or persons.
Section 2. Special Meetings
.
Meetings of stockholders shall be held at such place as may be designated by the person or persons calling the meeting. The Board of Directors may, in its sole discretion, determine that the meeting shall not be held at any place, but may instead be held solely by means of remote communication, in accordance with provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law. If no designation is made, meetings of stockholders shall be held at the executive offices of the Corporation in New York.
Section 3. Place of Meeting
.
Written notice stating the place, if any, date and hour of the meeting, the means of remote communication, if any, by which stockholders and proxyholders may be deemed to be present in person and vote at such meeting, and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given not less than 10 nor more than 60 days before the date of the meeting to each stockholder entitled to vote at such meeting. If mailed, notice is given when deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at the address that appears on the records of the Corporation. Such notice shall be given in accordance with, and shall be deemed effective as set forth in, Sections 222 and 232 (or any successor section or sections) of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
Section 4. Notice of Meeting
.
(A) In order to determine the stockholders entitled to notice and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, or entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights, or entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion or exchange of stock or for the purpose of any other lawful action other than stockholder action by written consent, the Board of Directors may fix, in advance, a record date, which shall not be less than 10 nor more than 60 days before the date of such meeting, nor more than 60 days prior to any other action. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting unless the Board of Directors shall elect to fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
Section 5. Fixing Date for Determination of Stockholders of Record
.
(B) In order that the Corporation may determine the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which date shall not be more than 10 days after the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. Any stockholder of record seeking to have the stockholders authorize or take corporate action by written consent shall, by written notice to the Secretary of the Corporation, request the Board of Directors to fix a record date. The Board of Directors shall promptly, but in all events within 10 days after the date on which such a request is received, adopt a resolution fixing the record date. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors within 10 days of the date on which such a request is received, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required by applicable law, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware or its executive offices, or to any officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the book in which proceedings of stockholders meetings are recorded, and in each such case directed to the attention of the Secretary of the Corporation. Delivery shall be by hand or by certified mail, return receipt requested. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors and prior action by the Board of Directors is required by applicable law, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the date on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
The officer or agent having charge of the stock transfer records for shares of the Corporation shall compile, at least ten days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting, or any adjournment thereof, arranged in alphabetical order, with the address of (but not the electronic mail address or other electronic contact information, unless the Board of Directors so directs) and the number of shares held by each stockholder. This list, for a period of ten days prior to such meeting, shall be open to examination by any stockholder for any purpose germane to the meeting: (i) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of the meeting, or (ii)  during usual business hours at the principal place of business of the Corporation. If the meeting is to be held at a place, then such list shall also be produced and kept open at the time and place of the meeting and shall be subject to the inspection of any stockholder during the whole time of the meeting. If the meeting is to be held solely by means of remote communication, then such list shall also be open to the examination of any stockholder during the whole time of the meeting on a reasonably accessible electronic network, and the information required to access such list shall be provided with the notice of the meeting.
Section 6. Voting Lists
.
Unless otherwise provided by the Delaware General Corporation Law or the Corporation's certificate of incorporation, a majority of the outstanding shares of the Corporation entitled to vote, represented in person or by proxy, shall constitute a quorum at any meeting of stockholders. If less than a majority of the outstanding shares are represented at a meeting, a majority of the shares so represented may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice, except that no meeting shall be adjourned for more than thirty days without further written notice. At such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present or represented, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally noticed. The stockholders present at a duly organized meeting may continue to transact business until adjournment, notwithstanding the withdrawal of enough stockholders to leave less than a quorum.
Section 7. Quorum
.
Except as otherwise provided in the Delaware General Corporation Law, the Corporation's certificate of incorporation, or as otherwise provided in this bylaw, in uncontested elections for director each director shall be elected by the vote of the majority of the votes cast with respect to that director's election at any meeting for the election of directors at which a quorum is present. For purposes of this bylaw, a majority of votes cast shall mean that the number of shares voted "for" a director's election exceeds the number of votes cast "withheld" with respect to that director's election.
Section 8. Required Vote
.
If a nominee for director is not elected and the nominee is an incumbent director, the director shall promptly tender his or her resignation to the Board of Directors, subject to acceptance by the Board of Directors. The Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee will make a recommendation to the Board of Directors as to whether to accept or reject the tendered resignation, or whether any other action should be taken. The Board of Directors will act on the tendered resignation, taking into account the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee's recommendation, and publicly disclose (by a press release, a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission or other broadly disseminated means of communication) its decision regarding the tendered resignation and the rationale behind the decision within 90 days from the date of the certification of the election results. The Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee in making its recommendation, and the Board of Directors in making its decision, may each consider any factors or other information that they consider appropriate and relevant. The director who tenders his or her resignation will not participate in the recommendation of the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee or the decision of the Board of Directors with respect to his or her resignation.
If a director's resignation is accepted by the Board of Directors pursuant to this bylaw, or if a nominee for director is not elected and the nominee is not an incumbent director, then the Board of Directors may fill the resulting vacancy pursuant to the provisions of Section 8 of Article III of these bylaws or may decrease the size of the Board of Directors pursuant to the provisions of Section 2 of Article III of these bylaws.
In all contested elections for director a plurality of the votes of shares present in person or represented by proxy at the meeting and entitled to vote on the election of directors shall be sufficient to elect. For purposes of these bylaws, a "contested election" means an election of directors (i) for which the Secretary of the Corporation has received a notice that a stockholder has nominated a person for election to the Board of Directors in compliance with Section 13 of Article II of these bylaws, and (ii) such nomination has not been withdrawn at least five days prior to the date the Corporation first mails the notice of meeting for such meeting to stockholders. All other elections and questions shall, unless otherwise provided by express provision of the Delaware General Corporation Law, the Corporation's certificate of incorporation, or these bylaws, be decided by the affirmative vote of a majority of the shares of stock present in person or represented by proxy at the meeting and entitled to vote on the subject matter in question.
Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act on the stockholder's behalf by proxy, and such authority may be granted by any means authorized or permitted by express provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law. No such proxy shall be voted or acted upon after three years from its date, unless the proxy provides for a longer period.
Section 9. Proxies
.
Subject to Article IV of the Corporation's certificate of incorporation, each outstanding share entitled to vote shall be entitled to one vote (which shall not be divisible) upon each matter submitted to a vote at a meeting of stockholders.
Section 10. Voting of Shares
.
Every stockholder shall have the right to vote in person or by proxy for the number of shares of stock held by said stockholder for each director to be elected. No cumulative voting for directors shall be permitted.
Section 11. No Cumulative Voting
.
(A) At any annual meeting of stockholders, only such business shall be conducted, and only such proposals shall be acted on, as are properly brought before the meeting. In order for business to be properly brought before the meeting, the business must be either (1) specified in the notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto) given by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, (2) otherwise properly brought before the meeting by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (3) otherwise properly brought before the meeting by a stockholder. In addition to any other applicable requirements, for business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder, the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary of the Corporation. To be timely, a stockholder's notice must be delivered to or mailed and received at the principal executive offices of the Corporation, not less than 90 days nor more than 120 days prior to the meeting; , , that in the event that less than 100 days' notice or prior public disclosure of the date of the meeting is given or made to stockholders, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so received not later than the close of business on the 10th day following the day on which such notice of the date of the annual meeting was mailed or such public disclosure was made, whichever first occurs. A stockholder's notice to the Secretary shall set forth as to each matter the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting (a) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting and the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting, (b) the name and record address of the stockholder proposing such business, (c) the class and number of shares of the Corporation which are beneficially owned by the stockholder, and (d) any material interest of the stockholder in such business.
Section 12. Business to be Conducted
.
provided
however
(B) Notwithstanding anything in these bylaws to the contrary, no business shall be conducted at the annual meeting except in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section 12 of Article II, , , that nothing in this Section 12 of Article II shall be deemed to preclude discussion by any stockholder of any business properly brought before the annual meeting.
provided
however
(C) The chairman of the annual meeting shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that business was not properly brought before the meeting in accordance with the provisions of this Section 12 of Article II, and if the chairman should so determine, he or she shall so declare to the meeting and any such business not properly brought before the meeting shall not be transacted.
(D) At any special meeting of the stockholders, only such business shall be conducted as shall have been stated in the notice for the meeting.
. Not less than 90 days nor more than 120 days prior to the date of the annual meeting, any stockholder who intends to make a nomination at the annual meeting shall deliver a notice to the Secretary of the Corporation setting forth (A) as to each nominee whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or reelection as a director, (1) the name, age, business address and residence address of the nominee, (2) the principal occupation or employment of the nominee, (3) the class and number of shares of capital stock of the Corporation which are beneficially owned by the nominee and (4) any other information concerning the nominee that would be required, under the rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission, in a proxy statement soliciting proxies of the election of such nominee; and (B) as to the stockholder giving the notice, (1) the name and record address of the stockholder and (2) the class and number of shares of capital stock of the Corporation which are beneficially owned by the stockholder; , that in the event that less than 100 days' notice or prior public disclosure of the date of the annual meeting is given or made to stockholders, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not later than the close of business on the 10th day following the day on which such notice of the date of the meeting was mailed or such public disclosure was made, whichever first occurs. Such notice shall include a signed consent to serve as a director of the Corporation, if elected, of each such nominee. The Corporation may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as may reasonably be required by the Corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as a director of the Corporation.
Section 13. Stockholder Nomination of Directors
provided, however
The affairs, property and business of the Corporation shall be managed by its Board of Directors.
Section 1. General Powers
.
Except as otherwise provided in the Corporation's certificate of incorporation, the number of directors of the Corporation shall be as determined from time to time by resolution of the Board of Directors. The directors shall be elected at the annual meeting of the stockholders, except as provided in Section 8 of this Article III, and each director shall hold office until the next annual meeting of stockholders and until his or her successor shall have been elected and qualified, or until his or her earlier death, resignation or removal. Directors need not be residents of the State of Delaware or stockholders of the Corporation.
Section 2. Number, Tenure, Election and Qualifications
.
Regular meetings of the Board of Directors may be held at such places inside or outside the State of Delaware and at such times as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine by resolution, and if so determined notices thereof need not be given.
Section 3. Regular Meetings
.
Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be held at any time or place inside or outside the State of Delaware whenever called by or at the request of the Chairman or any two directors. The person or persons who call or request a special meeting of the Board of Directors may fix the time and place for holding such special meeting.
Section 4. Special Meetings
.
Notice of any special meeting shall be delivered at least two hours previously thereto by written notice delivered personally or mailed to each director at his or her business address, or by telecopy, facsimile or electronic transmission. If mailed, such notice shall be deemed to be delivered on the third business day after it is deposited in the United States mail so addressed, with postage thereon prepaid. If notice be given by telecopy, facsimile or electronic transmission, such notice shall be deemed to be delivered upon transmission by sender to the addressee's telecopier, facsimile machine or computer. Any director may waive notice of any meeting before or after the time stated therein. Except as set forth below, the waiver must be in writing, signed by the director entitled to the notice, or made by electronic transmission by the director entitled to the notice.
Section 5. Notice
.
The attendance of a director at a meeting, in person or by telephone as provided by law, shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except where a director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the notice or waiver of notice of such meeting.
At any meeting of the Board of Directors, a majority of the directors then in office shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, but if less than such majority is present at a meeting, in person or by telephone as provided by law, a majority of the directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice.
Section 6. Quorum
.
The act of the majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors.
Section 7. Manner of Acting
.
Except as otherwise provided in the Corporation's certificate of incorporation, any vacancy occurring in the Board of Directors by reason of death, resignation, disqualification or other cause, or resulting from any increase in the authorized number of directors, may be filled by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors then in office, though less than a quorum, or by a sole remaining director. A director elected to fill a vacancy shall hold office until the next annual meeting of stockholders and until a successor shall have been elected and qualified, or until his or her earlier death, resignation or removal.
Section 8. Vacancies
.
. The compensation of directors shall be fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors or any committee delegated such authority by the Board of Directors. Such resolution shall not preclude any director from serving the Corporation in any other capacity and receiving compensation therefor.
Section 9
Compensation.
. A director of the Corporation who is present at a meeting of the Board of Directors at which action on any corporate matter is taken shall be presumed to have assented to the action taken unless his or her dissent shall be entered in the minutes of the meeting or unless he or she shall file a written dissent to such action with the person acting as the secretary of the meeting before the adjournment thereof or shall forward such dissent by registered mail to the Secretary of the Corporation immediately after the adjournment of the meeting. Such right to dissent shall not apply to a director who voted in favor of such action.
Section 10
Presumption of Assent
.
Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors, or any committee thereof, may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board or committee as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, or by electronic transmission, and the writing or electronic transmission is delivered to the Corporation for inclusion in the minutes of proceedings of the Board or committee.
Section 11. Action by Directors in Lieu of Meeting
.
Members of the Board of Directors may participate in a meeting of the Board by any communication by means of which all participating directors can simultaneously hear each other during the meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.
Section 12. Telephonic Meetings.
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, elect a Chairman, who shall perform such duties as may be assigned by the Board of Directors from time to time, and shall, when present, preside at all meetings of the stockholders and of the Board of Directors. The Chairman shall serve in such capacity at the pleasure of the Board of Directors or until his or her earlier resignation, death or removal.
Section 13. Chairman of the Board of Directors
.
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint any person who has served as, but no longer is, a director of the Corporation to the position of director emeritus. A director emeritus shall serve at the pleasure of the Board of Directors, and shall provide such advice and counsel to the Board of Directors as may be requested by the Chairman. A director emeritus may attend meetings of the Board of Directors, but shall not vote at such meetings. Where such a person is also a former Chairman of the Board, he or she may also be named chairman emeritus.
Section 14. Director Emeritus
.
The Board of Directors may appoint from among its members committees composed of two or more directors, to serve at the pleasure of the Board of Directors. In addition, the Board of Directors may establish additional committees composed of directors and members of management of the Corporation.
Section 1. Number, Tenure and Qualifications.
The Board of Directors may delegate to committees appointed under Section 1 of this Article IV any of the powers of the Board of Directors, except as prohibited by the Delaware General Corporation Law.
Section 2. Powers.
The notice and other procedures for committee meetings shall be the same as for special meetings of the Board of Directors.
Section 3. Meetings.
The Board of Directors shall have the power at any time to change the membership of any committee, to fill all vacancies or to dissolve any such committee.
Section 4. Vacancies.
The officers of the corporation shall be a Chief Executive Officer, a President, a Chief Financial Officer, a Secretary and a Treasurer, each of whom shall be elected by the Board of Directors. The Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer may also elect or appoint Vice Presidents and such other officers as it may deem necessary or desirable. Any person may hold more than one office at one time.
Section 1. Number and Election
.
The officers of the Corporation shall hold office until their successors are chosen and qualify or until their earlier death, resignation or removal. Any officer may be removed with or without cause at any time by the Board of Directors or Chief Executive Officer, whichever appointed such officer. Removal of an officer shall be without prejudice to his or her contract rights, if any.
Section 2. Term of Office
.
The Chief Executive Officer, subject to the provisions of these bylaws and to the direction of the Board of Directors, shall have ultimate authority for decisions relating to the general management and control of the business and affairs of the Corporation. The Chief Executive Officer shall perform such other duties as may be assigned by the Board of Directors from time to time and shall, in the absence of the Chairman of the Board of Directors, preside at all meetings of the stockholders and of the Board of Directors.
Section 3. Chief Executive Officer
.
. The President shall be the chief operating officer and, subject to the provisions of these bylaws and to the direction of the Board of Directors and the Chief Executive Officer, shall have such powers and shall perform such duties as may be assigned by the Board of Directors or by the Chief Executive Officer from time to time.
Section 4. President
Each Vice President shall have such powers and shall perform such duties as may be assigned to the Vice President by the Board of Directors or by the Chief Executive Officer from time to time.
Section 5. The Vice Presidents
.
The Chief Financial Officer shall be the principal financial officer of the Corporation, with principal responsibility for the financial affairs of the Corporation, and, subject to the provisions of these bylaws and to the direction of the Board of Directors and the Chief Executive Officer, shall have such powers and shall perform such duties as may be assigned by the Board of Directors or Chief Executive Officer from time to time.
Section 6. Chief Financial Officer.
The Secretary shall keep the minutes of the stockholders' and Board of Directors' meetings; see that all notices are duly given in accordance with the provisions of law and of these bylaws; be custodian of the corporate records and of the seal of the Corporation; keep or cause to be kept a register of the mailing address of each stockholder; have general charge of the stock transfer records of the Corporation; and in general perform all duties incident to the office of Secretary and such other duties as from time to time may be assigned to the Secretary by the Board of Directors or by the Chief Executive Officer.
Section 7. The Secretary and Assistant Secretaries
.
An Assistant Secretary shall have such powers and shall perform such duties as may be assigned by the Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer or the Secretary from time to time.
The Treasurer shall have charge and custody of and be responsible for all funds and securities of the Corporation; receive and give receipts for monies due and payable to the Corporation from any source whatsoever; deposit all such monies in the name of the Corporation for safekeeping in appropriate banks, trust companies or other depositories; and in general perform all of the duties incident to the office of the Treasurer and such other duties as from time to time may be assigned by the Board of Directors or by the Chief Executive Officer.
Section 8. The Treasurer and Assistant Treasurers
.
An Assistant Treasurer shall have such powers and shall perform such duties as may be assigned by the Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer or the Treasurer from time to time.
The compensation of the officers shall be fixed from time to time by the Board of Directors, or by any committee of the Board of Directors or any officer of the Corporation delegated such authority by the Board of Directors.
Section 9. Compensation.
To the maximum extent permitted by law, the Company shall indemnify any Eligible Person (as defined below) (including such person's heirs, executors and personal representatives) against any and all Amounts (as defined below) incurred or imposed in connection with, or which result from, any Proceeding (as defined below) (other than a proceeding initiated by such person) in which such person is or may become involved by reason of being an Eligible Person.
Section 1. Indemnification Rights
.
In connection with any Proceeding, the Company may advance Expenses (as defined below) to any Eligible Person upon receipt of an undertaking by or on behalf of such person to repay such advance if it shall ultimately be determined that such person is not entitled to indemnification by the Company.
Section 2. Advancement of Expenses
.
The rights provided in this Article shall not be deemed exclusive of any other right or rights to which any Eligible Person may be entitled under any agreement, vote of stockholders, or otherwise.
Section 3. Rights Not Exclusive
.
For purposes of this Article:
Section 4. Definitions
.
(A) "Amounts" shall include judgments, penalties, fines, amounts paid in settlement, and Expenses.
(B) "Company" shall mean the Corporation and any corporation at least a majority of whose voting securities having ordinary voting power for the election of directors (other than securities having such voting power only by reason of the occurrence of a contingency) which is, at the time of alleged events giving rise to the Proceeding, owned by the Corporation and/or one or more of its majority-owned subsidiaries.
(C) "Eligible Person" shall mean:
(1) A director, officer or employee of the Company;
(2) A director, officer or employee of the Company who at the specific written request or resolution of the Board of Directors of the Corporation is, at the time either of the Proceeding and/or of the alleged events giving rise to the Proceeding, serving as a director, officer or employee of any other company, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan or other enterprise;
(3) A fiduciary or co-fiduciary of an employee benefit plan of the Company as those terms are defined in the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974; or
(4) Such other person as may be determined by the Board of Directors from time to time.
(D) "Expenses" shall mean all reasonable attorneys' fees and all other disbursements or expenses of the types customarily incurred in connection with prosecuting, defending, preparing to prosecute or defend, investigating, or preparing to be a witness in a Proceeding.
(E) "Proceeding" shall include any actual, threatened or completed action, suit, arbitration, alternative dispute resolution mechanism, investigation, administrative hearing, or other formal claim that could result or has resulted in personal liability, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative.
The Corporation shall have the express authority to enter into such agreements as the Board of Directors deems appropriate for the indemnification of present or future directors and officers of the Corporation in connection with their service to, or status with, the Corporation or any other corporation, entity or enterprise with whom such person is serving at the express written request of the Corporation.
The shares of the Corporation shall be represented by certificates, provided that the Board of Directors may authorize some or all of any or all classes or series of the Corporation's stock shall be uncertificated. Such certificates, if used, shall be signed by the Chairman, President or any Vice President and by the Treasurer, Assistant Treasurer, Secretary or Assistant Secretary, or by any other officers determined by the Board of Directors in accordance with law.
Section 1. Certificates for Shares
.
Where shares of the Corporation are presented to the Corporation with a request to register transfer, the Corporation shall register the transfer as requested if the certificate representing such shares is endorsed by the appropriate person or persons, reasonable assurance is given that those endorsements are genuine, the Corporation has no duty to inquire into adverse claims or has discharged that duty, applicable law relating to the collection of taxes has been complied with, and the transfer is in fact rightful or is to a bona fide purchaser.
Section 2. Transfer of Shares
.
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall begin on the first day of January and end on the thirty-first day of December, next succeeding.
The Board of Directors may from time to time declare, and the Corporation may pay, dividends on its outstanding shares in the manner and upon the terms and conditions provided by law and the Corporation's certificate of incorporation.
The Board of Directors shall provide a corporate seal which shall be circular in form and shall have inscribed thereon the name of the Corporation, the year of incorporation, 1912, the state of incorporation and the words, "Corporate Seal."
These bylaws may be amended by either (i) the Board of Directors, or (ii) by the holders of eighty percent (80%) of the outstanding shares of stock of the Corporation entitled to vote on such amendment.
#17866 v5

: Schedule 2.01  Commitments Schedule 2.06  Existing Letters of Credit Schedule 3.01  Subsidiaries Schedule 3.06  Disclosed Matters Schedule 6.01  Existing Indebtedness Schedule 6.02  Existing Liens Schedule 6.04  Existing Investments
SCHEDULES
:
EXHIBITS
Exhibit A  Form of Assignment and Assumption Exhibit B  Form of Opinion of Borrower's Outside Counsel Exhibit C  Form of Increasing Lender Supplement Exhibit D  Form of Augmenting Lender Supplement Exhibit E  List of Closing Documents Exhibit F  Form of Subsidiary Guaranty Exhibit G  Form of Compliance Certificate Exhibit H  Form of Note
CREDIT AGREEMENT (this "") dated as of November 21, 2011 among ARBITRON INC., the LENDERS party hereto, JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent and U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION and CITIBANK, N.A., as Co-Syndication Agents.
Agreement
The parties hereto agree as follows:
SECTION 1.01. Defined Terms. As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Alternate Base Rate.
ABR
"" means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, an interest rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) equal to (a) the LIBO Rate for such Interest Period multiplied by (b) the Statutory Reserve Rate.
Adjusted LIBO Rate
"" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders hereunder.
Administrative Agent
"" means an Administrative Questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
"" means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
Affiliate
"" means, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the greatest of (a) the Prime Rate in effect on such day, (b) the Federal Funds Effective Rate in effect on such day plus of 1% and (c) the Adjusted LIBO Rate for a one month Interest Period on such day (or if such day is not a Business Day, the immediately preceding Business Day) plus 1%, that, for the avoidance of doubt, the Adjusted LIBO Rate for any day shall be based on the rate appearing on Reuters Screen LIBOR01 Page (or on any successor or substitute page of such page) at approximately 11:00 a.m. London time on such day. Any change in the Alternate Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted LIBO Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted LIBO Rate, respectively.
Alternate Base Rate
1/2
provided
"" means, with respect to any Lender, the percentage of the total Commitments represented by such Lender's Commitment; that, in the case of Section 2.21 when a Defaulting Lender shall exist, "Applicable Percentage" shall mean the percentage of the total Commitments (disregarding any Defaulting Lender's Commitment) represented by such Lender's Commitment. If the Commitments have terminated or expired, the Applicable Percentages shall be determined based upon the Commitments most recently in effect, giving effect to any assignments and to any Lender's status as a Defaulting Lender at the time of determination.
Applicable Percentage
provided
"" means, for any day, with respect to any Eurodollar Revolving Loan or ABR Revolving Loan, or with respect to the facility fees payable hereunder, as the case may be, the applicable rate per annum set forth below under the caption "Eurodollar Spread", "ABR Spread" or "Facility Fee Rate", as the case may be, based upon the Pricing Ratio applicable on such date:
Applicable Rate
For purposes of the foregoing,
(i) if at any time the Borrower fails to deliver the Financials on or before the date the Financials are due pursuant to Section 5.01, Category 4 shall be deemed applicable for the period commencing five (5) Business Days after such required date of delivery and ending on the date which is five (5) Business Days after the Financials are actually delivered, after which the Category shall be determined in accordance with the table above as applicable;
(ii) adjustments, if any, to the Category then in effect shall be effective five (5) Business Days after the Administrative Agent has received the applicable Financials (it being understood and agreed that each change in Category shall apply during the period commencing on the effective date of such change and ending on the date immediately preceding the effective date of the next such change); and
(iii) notwithstanding the foregoing, Category 1 shall be deemed to be applicable until the Administrative Agent's receipt of the applicable Financials for the Borrower's first fiscal quarter ending after the Effective Date (unless such Financials demonstrate that Category 2, 3 or 4 should have been applicable during such period, in which case such other Category shall be deemed to be applicable during such period) and adjustments to the Category then in effect shall thereafter be effected in accordance with the preceding paragraphs.
In the event that, at any time during which the Commitments are in effect or any of the Obligations remain unpaid (other than contingent indemnity obligations expressly surviving termination hereof), any Financial or Compliance Certificate delivered pursuant to Section 5.01 is shown to be inaccurate and such inaccuracy, if corrected, would have caused the application of a higher Applicable Rate for any period than the Applicable Rate actually applied for such period, then (i) the Borrower shall within five (5) Business Days thereof deliver to the Administrative Agent (for distribution to the Lenders) a corrected Compliance Certificate for such period, (ii) the Applicable Rate for such period shall be recalculated and applied as if the higher Applicable Rate were applicable and (iii) the Borrower shall within five (5) Business Days pay to the Administrative Agent the additional amount of interest and fees owing as a result of such increased Applicable Rate for such period to the extent accrued through the last Interest Payment Date (and any subsequent payments required to be made on any subsequent Interest Payment Date shall also be adjusted accordingly). Nothing contained in this paragraph shall limit or otherwise prejudice the rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders under Section 2.13(c) and Article VII.
"" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 9.04.
Approved Fund
"" means an assignment and assumption agreement entered into by a Lender and an assignee (with the consent of any party whose consent is required by Section 9.04), and accepted by the Administrative Agent, in the form of or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Assignment and Assumption
Exhibit A
"" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 2.20.
Augmenting Lender
"" means the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the earlier of the Maturity Date and the date of termination of the Commitments.
Availability Period
"" means each and any of the following bank services provided to the Borrower or any Subsidiary by any Lender or any of its Affiliates: (a) credit cards for commercial customers (including, without limitation, commercial credit cards and purchasing cards), (b) stored value cards and (c) treasury management services (including, without limitation, controlled disbursement, automated clearinghouse transactions, return items, overdrafts and interstate depository network services).
Banking Services
"" means any agreement entered into by the Borrower or any Subsidiary in connection with Banking Services.
Banking Services Agreement
"" means, with respect to any Person, such Person becomes the subject of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or has had a receiver, conservator, trustee, administrator, custodian, assignee for the benefit of creditors or similar Person charged with the reorganization or liquidation of its business appointed for it, or, in the good faith determination of the Administrative Agent, has taken any action in furtherance of, or indicating its consent to, approval of, or acquiescence in, any such proceeding or appointment, provided that a Bankruptcy Event shall not result solely by virtue of any ownership interest, or the acquisition of any ownership interest, in such Person by a Governmental Authority or instrumentality thereof, provided, further, that such ownership interest does not result in or provide such Person with immunity from the jurisdiction of courts within the United States or from the enforcement of judgments or writs of attachment on its assets or permit such Person (or such Governmental Authority or instrumentality) to reject, repudiate, disavow or disaffirm any contracts or agreements made by such Person.
Bankruptcy Event
"" means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States of America.
Board
"" means Arbitron Inc., a Delaware corporation.
Borrower
"" means (a) Revolving Loans of the same Type, made, converted or continued on the same date and, in the case of Eurodollar Loans, as to which a single Interest Period is in effect or (b) a Swingline Loan.
Borrowing
"" means a request by the Borrower for a Revolving Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.03.
Borrowing Request
"" means any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized or required by law to remain closed; provided that, when used in connection with a Eurodollar Loan, the term "" shall also exclude any day on which banks are not open for dealings in Dollars in the London interbank market.
Business Day
Business Day
"" of any Person means the obligations of such Person to pay rent or other amounts under any lease of (or other arrangement conveying the right to use) real or personal property, or a combination thereof, which obligations are required to be classified and accounted for as capital leases on a balance sheet of such Person under GAAP, and the amount of such obligations shall be the capitalized amount thereof determined in accordance with GAAP.
Capital Lease Obligations
"" means (a) the acquisition of ownership, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, by any Person or group (within the meaning of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and the rules of the SEC thereunder as in effect on the date hereof), of Equity Interests representing more than 33% of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by the issued and outstanding Equity Interests of the Borrower; or (b) occupation of a majority of the seats (other than vacant seats) on the board of directors of the Borrower by Persons who were neither (i) nominated by the board of directors of the Borrower nor (ii) appointed by directors so nominated.
Change in Control
"" means the occurrence, after the date of this Agreement (or with respect to any Lender, if later, the date on which such Lender becomes a Lender), of any of the following: (a) the adoption or taking effect of any law, rule, regulation or treaty, (b) any change in any law, rule, regulation or treaty or in the administration, interpretation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority, or (c) the making or issuance of any request, rules, guideline, requirement or directive (whether or not having the force of law) by any Governmental Authority; , that notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, (i) the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act and all requests, rules, guidelines, requirements and directives thereunder, issued in connection therewith or in implementation thereof, and (ii) all requests, rules, guidelines, requirements and directives promulgated by the Bank for International Settlements, the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision (or any successor or similar authority) or the United States or foreign regulatory authorities, in each case pursuant to Basel III, shall in each case be deemed to be a "Change in Law" regardless of the date enacted, adopted, issued or implemented.
Change in Law
provided
however
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are Revolving Loans or Swingline Loans.
Class
"" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
Code
"" means each of U.S. Bank National Association and Citibank, N.A. in its capacity as co-syndication agent for the credit facility evidenced by this Agreement.
Co-Syndication Agent
"" means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment of such Lender to make Revolving Loans and to acquire participations in Letters of Credit and Swingline Loans hereunder, expressed as an amount representing the maximum aggregate amount of such Lender's Revolving Credit Exposure hereunder, as such commitment may be (a) reduced or terminated from time to time pursuant to Section 2.09, (b) increased from time to time pursuant to Section 2.20 and (c) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to Section 9.04. The initial amount of each Lender's Commitment is set forth on , or in the Assignment and Assumption or other documentation contemplated hereby pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed its Commitment, as applicable. The initial aggregate amount of the Lenders' Commitments is $150,000,000.
Commitment
Schedule 2.01
"" means a certificate of a Financial Officer in the form of .
Compliance Certificate
Exhibit G
"" means Consolidated Net Income to the extent deducted from revenues in determining Consolidated Net Income, (i) Consolidated Interest Expense, (ii) expense for taxes paid or accrued, (iii) depreciation, (iv) amortization, (v) all non-recurring expenses relating to changes in senior management, employee severance and/or litigation or settlement of causes of action against the Loan Parties and all extraordinary cash charges, all in an aggregate amount not to exceed, for purposes of this clause (v) with respect to all such expenses and charges, $5,000,000 per fiscal year, (vi) any non-cash losses, charges or expenses, (vii) costs and expenses incurred in connection with any actual or proposed acquisition, merger, joint venture, issuance of Indebtedness, issuance of equity or disposition, in each case, permitted hereunder and whether or not consummated and in an aggregate amount not to exceed $7,000,000 for any such actual or proposed transaction, (viii) non-cash purchase accounting adjustments in accordance with GAAP and made within nine months following the consummation of any acquisition, (ix) costs and expenses incurred (a) to the extent covered by indemnification or reimbursement provisions in connection with any Permitted Acquisition or (b) to the extent indemnified or reimbursed by a Person that is not an Affiliate of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, in each case, to the extent such costs and expenses are in fact reimbursed by such Person within three months of such incurrence and (x) fees, costs and expenses incurred in connection with the entering into of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents or any amendment or modification thereto (1) to the extent included in Consolidated Net Income, extraordinary non-cash gains and (2) the amount of any subsequent cash payments in respect of any non-cash losses, charges or expenses described in the foregoing clause (vi), all calculated for the Borrower and its Subsidiaries in accordance with GAAP on a consolidated basis; provided that Consolidated EBITDA shall not include or give effect to the income (or loss) of any Person that is not a Subsidiary (i) in which any Person other than the Borrower or any of the Borrower's Subsidiaries has a joint interest or a partnership interest or other ownership interest or (ii) to the extent the Borrower or any of the Borrower's Subsidiaries does not control the Board of Directors or other governing body of such Person or otherwise does not control the declaration of a dividend or other distribution by such Person, except Consolidated EBITDA shall include the income of such Person in each case to the extent of the amount of cash dividends or other cash distributions actually paid to the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries by such Person during such period. For the purposes of calculating Consolidated EBITDA for any period of four consecutive fiscal quarters (each such period, a ""), (i) if at any time during such Reference Period the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall have made any Disposition, the Consolidated EBITDA for such Reference Period shall be reduced by an amount equal to the Consolidated EBITDA (if positive) attributable to the property that is the subject of such Disposition for such Reference Period or increased by an amount equal to the Consolidated EBITDA (if negative) attributable thereto for such Reference Period, and (ii) if during such Reference Period the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall have made an Acquisition, Consolidated EBITDA for such Reference Period shall be calculated after giving effect thereto on a Pro Forma Basis as if such Acquisition occurred on the first day of such Reference Period. As used in this definition, "" means any acquisition of property or series of related acquisitions of property that constitutes (i) assets comprising all or substantially all or any significant portion of a business or operating unit of a business, or (ii) all or substantially all of the common stock or other Equity Interests of a Person; and "" means any sale, transfer or disposition of property or series of related sales, transfers, or dispositions of property.
Consolidated EBITDA
plus,
minus,
Reference Period
Acquisition
Disposition
"" means, with reference to any period, total interest expense (including that attributable to Capital Lease Obligations) of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries for such period with respect to all outstanding Indebtedness of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries (including all commissions, discounts and other fees and charges owed with respect to letters of credit and bankers' acceptance financing and net costs under Swap Agreements in respect of interest rates to the extent such net costs are allocable to such period in accordance with GAAP but excluding fees and expenses incurred in connection with the amendment of this Agreement or the other Loan Documents to the extent constituting interest expense under GAAP), calculated on a consolidated basis for the Borrower and its Subsidiaries for such period in accordance with GAAP.
Consolidated Interest Expense
"" means, with reference to any period, the net income (or loss) of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries calculated in accordance with GAAP on a consolidated basis (without duplication) for such period.
Consolidated Net Income
"" means, as of the date of any determination thereof, total assets of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries calculated in accordance with GAAP on a consolidated basis as of such date.
Consolidated Total Assets
"" means at any time the sum, without duplication, of the aggregate Indebtedness of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries calculated on a consolidated basis as of such time in accordance with GAAP. In calculating Consolidated Total Indebtedness, contingent "earn outs" and similar contingent payment obligations with respect to Acquisitions and constituting Indebtedness shall be excluded therefrom.
Consolidated Total Indebtedness
"" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise. The terms "" and "" have meanings correlative thereto.
Control
Controlling
Controlled
"" means a Borrowing, the issuance of a Letter of Credit, an LC Disbursement or any of the foregoing.
Credit Event
"" means the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank, the Swingline Lender or any other Lender.
Credit Party
"" means any event or condition which constitutes an Event of Default or which upon notice, lapse of any applicable cure period or both would, in each case, as set forth in Article VII, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
Default
"" means any Lender that (a) has failed, within two (2) Business Days of the date required to be funded or paid, to (i) fund any portion of its Loans, (ii) fund any portion of its participations in Letters of Credit or Swingline Loans or (iii) pay over to any Credit Party any other amount required to be paid by it hereunder, unless, in the case of clause (i) above, such Lender notifies the Administrative Agent in writing that such failure is the result of such Lender's good faith determination that a condition precedent to funding (specifically identified and including the particular default, if any) has not been satisfied, (b) has notified the Borrower or any Credit Party in writing, or has made a public statement to the effect, that it does not intend or expect to comply with any of its funding obligations under this Agreement (unless such writing or public statement indicates that such position is based on such Lender's good faith determination that a condition precedent (specifically identified and including the particular default, if any) to funding a loan under this Agreement cannot be satisfied) or generally under other agreements in which it commits to extend credit, (c) has failed, within three (3) Business Days after request by a Credit Party, acting in good faith, to provide a certification in writing from an authorized officer of such Lender that it will comply with its obligations (and is financially able to meet such obligations) to fund prospective Loans and participations in then outstanding Letters of Credit and Swingline Loans under this Agreement, provided that such Lender shall cease to be a Defaulting Lender pursuant to this clause (c) upon such Credit Party's receipt of such certification in form and substance satisfactory to it and the Administrative Agent, or (d) has become the subject of a Bankruptcy Event.
Defaulting Lender
"" means the actions, suits and proceedings and the environmental matters disclosed in Schedule 3.06.
Disclosed Matters
"" or "" refers to lawful money of the United States of America.
Dollars
$
"" means a Subsidiary organized under the laws of a jurisdiction located in the United States of America, other than a Subsidiary which has no material assets other than the Equity Interests of one or more "controlled foreign corporation" under Section 957 of the Code.
Domestic Subsidiary
"" means the date on which the conditions specified in Section 4.01 are satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 9.02).
Effective Date
"" means all laws, rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, orders, decrees, judgments, injunctions, notices or binding agreements issued, promulgated or entered into by any Governmental Authority, relating in any way to the environment, preservation or reclamation of natural resources, the management, release or threatened release of any Hazardous Material or to health and safety matters.
Environmental Laws
"" means any liability, contingent or otherwise (including any liability for damages, costs of environmental remediation, fines, penalties or indemnities), of the Borrower or any Subsidiary directly or indirectly resulting from or based upon (a) violation of any Environmental Law, (b) the generation, use, handling, transportation, storage, treatment or disposal of any Hazardous Materials, (c) exposure to any Hazardous Materials, (d) the release or threatened release of any Hazardous Materials into the environment or (e) any contract, agreement or other consensual arrangement pursuant to which liability is assumed or imposed with respect to any of the foregoing.
Environmental Liability
"" means shares of capital stock, partnership interests, membership interests in a limited liability company, beneficial interests in a trust or other equity ownership interests in a Person, and any warrants, options or other rights entitling the holder thereof to purchase or acquire any of the foregoing.
Equity Interests
"" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time.
ERISA
"" means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that, together with the Borrower, is treated as a single employer under Section 414(b) or (c) of the Code or, solely for purposes of Section 302 of ERISA and Section 412 of the Code, is treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
"" means (a) any "reportable event", as defined in Section 4043 of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder with respect to a Plan (other than an event for which the 30-day notice period is waived); (b) the existence with respect to any Plan of an "accumulated funding deficiency" (as defined in Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA), whether or not waived; (c) the filing pursuant to Section 412(d) of the Code or Section 303(d) of ERISA of an application for a waiver of the minimum funding standard with respect to any Plan; (d) the incurrence by the Borrower or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan; (e) the receipt by the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate from the PBGC or a plan administrator of any notice relating to an intention to terminate any Plan or Plans or to appoint a trustee to administer any Plan; (f) the incurrence by the Borrower or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability with respect to the withdrawal or partial withdrawal from any Plan or Multiemployer Plan; or (g) the receipt by the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, or the receipt by any Multiemployer Plan from the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent or in reorganization, within the meaning of Title IV of ERISA.
ERISA Event
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, means that such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, bears interest at a rate determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate.
Eurodollar
"" has the meaning assigned to such term in Article VII.
Event of Default
"" means a Letter of Credit which includes a provision which automatically extends the expiry date thereof for a specified period unless, within some period of time in advance of the then applicable expiry date thereof, the Administrative Agent gives notice to the beneficiary to the effect that such Letter of Credit will not be so extended.
Evergreen LC
"" means, with respect to the Administrative Agent, any Lender, the Issuing Bank or any other recipient of any payment to be made by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder, (a) income, excise, stamp or franchise taxes, and other similar taxes, fees, duties, withholdings or other charges, imposed on (or measured by) its net income by the United States of America, or by the jurisdiction under the laws of which such recipient is organized or in which its principal office is located or, in the case of any Lender, in which its applicable lending office is located or otherwise as a result of a present or former connection between the applicable lending office and the jurisdiction of the Governmental Authority imposing such tax, (b) any branch profits taxes imposed by the United States of America or any similar tax imposed by any other jurisdiction in which the Borrower is located or in which its principal office is located and (c) in the case of a Foreign Lender (other than an assignee pursuant to a request by the Borrower under Section 2.19(b)), any withholding tax that is imposed on amounts payable to such Foreign Lender resulting from any law in effect (including FATCA) on the date such Foreign Lender becomes a party to this Agreement (or designates a new lending office) or is attributable to such Foreign Lender's failure to comply with Section 2.17(e), except to the extent that such Foreign Lender (or its assignor, if any) was entitled, at the time of designation of a new lending office (or assignment), to receive additional amounts from the Borrower with respect to such withholding tax pursuant to Section 2.17(a).
Excluded Taxes
"" means that certain Credit Agreement dated as of December 20, 2006 between the Borrower, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent, as amended.
Existing Credit Agreement
"" means Sections 1471 through 1474 of the Code, as of the date of this Agreement, and any regulations or official interpretations thereof.
FATCA
"" means, for any day, the weighted average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published on the next succeeding Business Day by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day that is a Business Day, the average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the quotations for such day for such transactions received by the Administrative Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Effective Rate
"" means the chief financial officer, principal accounting officer, treasurer, controller, Vice President Accounting Services or Treasury Manager of the Borrower.
Financial Officer
"" means the annual or quarterly financial statements, and accompanying certificates and other documents, of the Borrower required to be delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or 5.01(b).
Financials
"" means any Lender that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than that in which the Borrower is located. For purposes of this definition, the United States of America, each State thereof and the District of Columbia shall be deemed to constitute a single jurisdiction.
Foreign Lender
"" means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America.
GAAP
"" means the government of the United States of America, any other nation or any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government (including any supra-national bodies such as the European Union or the European Central Bank) and any governmental group or body charged with setting financial accounting or regulatory capital rules or standards (including, without limitation, the Bank for International Settlements or the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision or any successor or similar authority to any of the foregoing).
Governmental Authority
"" of or by any Person (the "") means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness or other obligation of any other Person (the "") in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or other obligation or to purchase (or to advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or other obligation of the payment thereof, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor so as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or other obligation or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty issued to support such Indebtedness or obligation; , that the term Guarantee shall not include endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business. The amount of any Guarantee made by any guarantor shall be deemed to be the lower of (a) an amount equal to the stated or determinable amount of the primary obligation in respect of which such Guarantee is made and (b) the maximum amount for which such guarantor may be liable pursuant to the terms of the instrument embodying such Guarantee, unless (in the case of a primary obligation that is not Indebtedness) such primary obligation and the maximum amount for which such guarantor may be liable are not stated or determinable, in which case the amount of such Guarantee shall be such guarantor's maximum reasonably anticipated liability in respect thereof as reasonably determined by the Borrower in good faith.
Guarantee
guarantor
primary obligor
provided
"" means all explosive or radioactive substances or wastes and all hazardous or toxic substances, wastes or other pollutants, including petroleum or petroleum distillates, asbestos or asbestos containing materials, polychlorinated biphenyls, radon gas, infectious or medical wastes and all other substances or wastes of any nature regulated pursuant to any Environmental Law.
Hazardous Materials
"" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 2.20.
Increasing Lender
"" of any Person means, without duplication, (a) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money or with respect to deposits or advances of any kind, (b) all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments, (c) all obligations of such Person upon which interest charges are customarily paid, (d) all obligations of such Person under conditional sale or other title retention agreements relating to property acquired by such Person, (e) all obligations of such Person in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (excluding accounts payable incurred in the ordinary course of business which are not overdue by more than 60 days), (f) all Indebtedness of others secured by (or for which the holder of such Indebtedness has an existing right, contingent or otherwise, to be secured by) any Lien on property owned or acquired by such Person, whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby has been assumed, (g) all Guarantees by such Person of Indebtedness of others, (h) all Capital Lease Obligations of such Person, (i) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person as an account party in respect of letters of credit and letters of guaranty, (j) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person in respect of bankers' acceptances and (k) all net obligations under Swap Agreements of such Person. The Indebtedness of any Person shall include the Indebtedness of any other entity (including any partnership in which such Person is a general partner) to the extent such Person is liable therefor as a result of such Person's ownership interest in or other relationship with such entity, except to the extent the terms of such Indebtedness provide that such Person is not liable therefor.
Indebtedness
"" means Taxes that are imposed on or with respect to any payment made by the Borrower hereunder other than Excluded Taxes and Other Taxes.
Indemnified Taxes
"" means the Confidential Information Memorandum dated July 2011 relating to the Borrower and the Transactions.
Information Memorandum
"" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 6.11(b).
Interest Coverage Ratio
"" means a request by the Borrower to convert or continue a Revolving Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.08.
Interest Election Request
"" means (a) with respect to any ABR Loan (other than a Swingline Loan), the last day of each March, June, September and December and the Maturity Date, (b) with respect to any Eurodollar Loan, the last day of the Interest Period applicable to the Borrowing of which such Loan is a part and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing with an Interest Period of more than three months' duration, each day prior to the last day of such Interest Period that occurs at intervals of three months' duration after the first day of such Interest Period and the Maturity Date (c) with respect to any Swingline Loan, the day that such Loan is required to be repaid and the Maturity Date.
Interest Payment Date
"" means with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Borrowing and ending on the numerically corresponding day in the calendar month that is one, two, three or six months thereafter (or with the consent of each Lender, nine or twelve months), as the Borrower may elect; , that (i) if any Interest Period would end on a day other than a Business Day, such Interest Period shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing only, such next succeeding Business Day would fall in the next calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day and (ii) any Interest Period pertaining to a Eurodollar Borrowing that commences on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the last calendar month of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the last calendar month of such Interest Period. For purposes hereof, the date of a Borrowing initially shall be the date on which such Borrowing is made and, in the case of a Revolving Borrowing, thereafter shall be the effective date of the most recent conversion or continuation of such Borrowing.
Interest Period
provided
"" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as the issuer of Letters of Credit hereunder, and its successors in such capacity as provided in Section 2.06(i). The Issuing Bank may, in its discretion, arrange for one or more Letters of Credit to be issued by Affiliates of the Issuing Bank, in which case the term "Issuing Bank" shall include any such Affiliate with respect to Letters of Credit issued by such Affiliate.
Issuing Bank
"" means a payment made by the Issuing Bank pursuant to a Letter of Credit.
LC Disbursement
"" means, at any time, the sum of (a) the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit at such time plus (b) the aggregate amount of all LC Disbursements that have not yet been reimbursed by or on behalf of the Borrower at such time. The LC Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total LC Exposure at such time.
LC Exposure
"" means the Persons listed on and any other Person that shall have become a Lender hereunder pursuant to Section 2.20 or pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption, other than any such Person that ceases to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption. Unless the context otherwise requires, the term "Lenders" includes the Swingline Lender.
Lenders
Schedule 2.01
"" means any letter of credit issued pursuant to this Agreement.
Letter of Credit
"" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 6.11(a).
Leverage Ratio
"" means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, the rate appearing on Reuters Screen LIBOR01 Page (or on any successor or substitute page of such service, or any successor to or substitute for such service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such page of such service, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to deposits in Dollars in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two (2) Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period, as the rate for deposits in Dollars with a maturity comparable to such Interest Period. In the event that such rate is not available at such time for any reason, then the "" with respect to such Eurodollar Borrowing for such Interest Period shall be the rate at which deposits in Dollars of $5,000,000 and for a maturity comparable to such Interest Period are offered by the principal London office of the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds in the London interbank market at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two (2) Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period.
LIBO Rate
LIBO Rate
"" means, with respect to any asset, (a) any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, hypothecation, encumbrance, charge or security interest in, on or of such asset, (b) the interest of a vendor or a lessor under any conditional sale agreement, capital lease or title retention agreement (or any financing lease having substantially the same economic effect as any of the foregoing) relating to such asset and (c) in the case of securities, any purchase option, call or similar right of a third party with respect to such securities.
Lien
"" means this Agreement, the Subsidiary Guaranty, any promissory notes executed and delivered pursuant to Section 2.10(e) and any and all other instruments and documents executed and delivered in connection with any of the foregoing.
Loan Documents
"" means, collectively, the Borrower and the Subsidiary Guarantors.
Loan Parties
"" means the loans made by the Lenders to the Borrower pursuant to this Agreement.
Loans
"" means a material adverse effect on (a) the business, assets, property or financial condition of the Borrower and the Subsidiaries taken as a whole, (b) the ability of the Borrower to perform any of its payment obligations under this Agreement or (c) the validity or enforceability of this Agreement or any and all other Loan Documents or the rights or remedies of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders thereunder.
Material Adverse Effect
"" means each Domestic Subsidiary (i) which, as of the most recent fiscal quarter of the Borrower, for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters then ended, for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01, contributed greater than ten percent (10%) of Consolidated EBITDA for such period or (ii) which contributed greater than ten percent (10%) of Consolidated Total Assets as of such date; that, if at any time the aggregate amount of Consolidated EBITDA or Consolidated Total Assets attributable to all Domestic Subsidiaries that are not Material Domestic Subsidiaries exceeds ten percent (10%) of Consolidated EBITDA for any such period or ten percent (10%) of Consolidated Total Assets as of the end of any such fiscal quarter, the Borrower (or, in the event the Borrower has failed to do so within ten (10) days, the Administrative Agent) shall designate sufficient Domestic Subsidiaries as "Material Domestic Subsidiaries" to eliminate such excess, and such designated Subsidiaries shall for all purposes of this Agreement constitute Material Domestic Subsidiaries.
Material Domestic Subsidiaries
provided
"" means Indebtedness (other than the Loans and Letters of Credit), or obligations in respect of one or more Swap Agreements, of any one or more of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $20,000,000. For purposes of determining Material Indebtedness, the "principal amount" of the obligations of the Borrower or any Subsidiary in respect of any Swap Agreement at any time shall be the maximum aggregate amount (giving effect to any netting agreements) that the Borrower or such Subsidiary would be required to pay if such Swap Agreement were terminated at such time.
Material Indebtedness
"" means November 21, 2016.
Maturity Date
"" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc.
Moody's
"" means a multiemployer plan as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA.
Multiemployer Plan
"" means, with respect to any Evergreen LC, the date by which the Issuing Bank must give notice to the beneficiary thereof of the non-renewal of such Evergreen LC in order to avoid the automatic extension of the expiry date thereof.
Non-Extension Date
"" means all unpaid principal of and accrued and unpaid interest on the Loans, all LC Exposure, all accrued and unpaid fees and all expenses, reimbursements, indemnities and other obligations and indebtedness (including interest and fees accruing during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding), obligations and liabilities of any of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries to any of the Lenders, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any indemnified party, individually or collectively, existing on the Effective Date or arising thereafter, direct or indirect, joint or several, absolute or contingent, matured or unmatured, liquidated or unliquidated, secured or unsecured, arising by contract, operation of law or otherwise, arising or incurred under this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents or to the Lenders or any of their Affiliates under any Swap Agreement or any Banking Services Agreement or in respect of any of the Loans made or reimbursement or other obligations incurred or any of the Letters of Credit or other instruments at any time evidencing any thereof.
Obligations
"" means any and all present or future stamp or documentary taxes or any other excise or property taxes, charges or similar levies (other than Excluded Taxes) arising from any payment made hereunder or from the execution, delivery or enforcement of, or otherwise with respect to, this Agreement.
Other Taxes
"" means, with respect to any Lender, any Person as to which such Lender is, directly or indirectly, a subsidiary.
Parent
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04.
Participant
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04.
Participant Register
"" means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA and any successor entity performing similar functions.
PBGC
"" means any acquisition (whether by purchase, merger, consolidation or otherwise) or series of related acquisitions by the Borrower or any Subsidiary of (i) all or substantially all the assets of or (ii) all the Equity Interests in, a Person or division or line of business of a Person, if, at the time of and immediately after giving effect thereto, (a) no Default has occurred and is continuing or would arise after giving effect thereto, (b) such Person or division or line of business is engaged in the same or a similar line of business as the Borrower and the Subsidiaries or a business or businesses reasonably related thereto, (c) the Borrower and the Subsidiaries are in compliance, on a Pro Forma Basis after giving effect to such acquisition, with the covenants contained in Section 6.11 recomputed as of the last day of the most recently ended fiscal quarter of the Borrower for which financial statements are available, as if such acquisition had occurred on the first day of each relevant period for testing such compliance and (d) in the case of an acquisition or merger involving the Borrower or a Subsidiary, the Borrower or such Subsidiary is the surviving entity of such merger and/or consolidation.
Permitted Acquisition
"" means:
Permitted Encumbrances
(a) Liens imposed by law for Taxes that are not yet required to be paid in accordance with Section 5.04;
(b) carriers', warehousemen's, mechanics', materialmen's, repairmen's and other like Liens imposed by law, arising in the ordinary course of business and securing obligations that (i) are not overdue by more than sixty (60) days, (ii) are being contested in good faith or (iii) relate to obligations that are less than $50,000 individually and less than $250,000 in the aggregate;
(c) pledges and deposits made in the ordinary course of business in compliance with workers' compensation, unemployment insurance and other social security laws or regulations;
(d) deposits and other Liens to secure the performance of bids, trade contracts, leases, statutory obligations, surety and appeal bonds, performance bonds and other obligations of a like nature, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
(e) judgment Liens and Liens and deposits relating to appeal bonds in respect of judgments that do not constitute an Event of Default under clause (k) of Article VII;
(f) easements, zoning restrictions, rights-of-way and similar encumbrances on real property imposed by law or arising in the ordinary course of business that do not secure any monetary obligations and do not materially detract from the value of the affected property or interfere with the ordinary conduct of business of the Borrower or any Subsidiary;
(g) (i) Liens arising by virtue of any statutory or common law provision relating to banker's liens, rights of set-off or similar rights and remedies as to deposit accounts or other funds maintained with a creditor depository institution; , that (x) such deposit account is not a dedicated cash collateral account and is not subject to restrictions against access by the Borrower in excess of those set forth by regulations promulgated by the Board and (y) such deposit account is not intended by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries to provide collateral to the depository institution and (ii) Liens of a collection bank arising under Section 4-210 of the Uniform Commercial Code on items in the course of collection; and
provided
(h) leases, licenses, subleases or sublicenses granted to others in the ordinary course of business which do not (i) interfere in any material respect with the business of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, or (ii) secure any Indebtedness;
that the term "Permitted Encumbrances" shall not include any Lien securing Indebtedness for borrowed money.
provided
"" means:
Permitted Investments
(a) direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America, in each case maturing within 36 months from the date of acquisition thereof;
(b) obligations issued by any Federal agency of the United States of America, in each case maturing within 36 months from the date of acquisition thereof;
(c) municipal investments and direct obligations of any State of the United States of America, in each case with a rating of A or higher by S&P and/or A2 or higher by Moody's and a maximum maturity of 36 months (for securities where the interest rate is adjusted periodically (e.g. floating rate securities), the reset date will be used to determine the maturity date);
(d) investments in commercial paper maturing within 270 days from the date of acquisition thereof and having, at such date of acquisition, a rating of A-2 from S&P or P-2 from Moody's;
(e) investments in certificates of deposit, banker's acceptances and time deposits maturing within 36 months from the date of acquisition thereof issued or guaranteed by or placed with, and money market deposit accounts issued or offered by, any domestic office of any commercial bank organized under the laws of the United States of America or any State thereof which has a combined capital and surplus and undivided profits of not less than $500,000,000;
(f) fully collateralized repurchase agreements with a term of not more than 30 days for securities described in clause (a) above and entered into with a financial institution satisfying the criteria described in clause (e) above;
(g) money market funds that (i) comply with the criteria set forth in Securities and Exchange Commission Rule 2a-7 under the Investment Company Act of 1940, (ii) are rated AAA by S&P or Aaa by Moody's and (iii) have portfolio assets of at least $5,000,000,000;
(h) investments in variable rate demand notes with a rating of A or higher by S&P and/or A2 or higher by Moody's and a maximum maturity of one year, for which the reset date will be used to determine the maturity date;
(i) investments in corporate and bank debt including, but not limited to, corporate bonds and loan participations. The minimum rating for such investments must be rated "A-2" and/or "P-2" or have a long term rating of BBB by S&P and/or Baa2 by Moody's respectively; and
(j) other investments made in accordance with the Borrower's investment policy as in effect on the Effective Date in the form previously provided to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders and other immaterial changes thereto.
"" means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
"" means any employee pension benefit plan (other than a Multiemployer Plan) subject to the provisions of Title IV of ERISA or Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA, and in respect of which the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate is (or, if such plan were terminated, would under Section 4069 of ERISA be deemed to be) an "employer" as defined in Section 3(5) of ERISA.
Plan
"" means the ratio, determined as of the end of each of the Borrower's fiscal quarters ending on and after the Borrower's first fiscal quarter ending after the Effective Date, of (i) Consolidated Total Indebtedness , to the extent the sum of cash, cash equivalents (as reflected in the Borrower's then most recent consolidated balance sheet) and Permitted Investments maintained by the Borrower and the Guarantors as of the end of such fiscal quarter exceeds $30,000,000, the amount of such excess to (ii) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of four (4) consecutive fiscal quarters ending with the end of such fiscal quarter, all calculated for the Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis.
Pricing Ratio
minus
"" means the rate of interest per annum publicly announced from time to time by JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as its prime rate in effect at its principal office in New York City; each change in the Prime Rate shall be effective from and including the date such change is publicly announced as being effective.
Prime Rate
"" means, with respect to any event, that the Borrower is in compliance on a   basis with the applicable covenant, calculation or requirement herein recomputed as if the event with respect to which compliance on a Pro Forma Basis is being tested had occurred on the first day of the four fiscal quarter period most recently ended on or prior to such date for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01 (or, prior to the delivery of any such financial statements, ending with the last fiscal quarter included in the financial statements referred to in Section 3.04), and, to the extent applicable, giving effect to the historical earnings and cash flows associated with the assets acquired or disposed of and any related incurrence or reduction of Indebtedness, all in accordance with Article 11 of Regulation S-X under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
Pro Forma Basis
pro
forma
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04.
Register
"" means, with respect to any specified Person, such Person's Affiliates and the respective directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of such Person and such Person's Affiliates.
Related Parties
"" means, at any time, Lenders having Revolving Credit Exposures and unused Commitments representing more than 50% of the sum of the total Revolving Credit Exposures and unused Commitments at such time.
Required Lenders
"" means any dividend or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) with respect to any Equity Interests in the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or any payment (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, cancellation or termination of any such Equity Interests in the Borrower or any Subsidiary or any option, warrant or other right to acquire any such Equity Interests in the Borrower or any Subsidiary.
Restricted Payment
"" means, with respect to any Lender at any time, the sum of the outstanding principal amount of such Lender's Revolving Loans and its LC Exposure and Swingline Exposure at such time.
Revolving Credit Exposure
"" means a Loan made pursuant to Section 2.01.
Revolving Loan
"" means Standard & Poor's Ratings Services, a Standard & Poor's Financial Services LLC business.
S&P
"" means any sale or other transfer of any property or asset by any Person with the intent to lease such property or asset as lessee.
Sale and Leaseback Transaction
"" means the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.
SEC
"" means a fraction (expressed as a decimal), the numerator of which is the number one and the denominator of which is the number one minus the aggregate of the maximum reserve percentages (including any marginal, special, emergency or supplemental reserves) expressed as a decimal established by the Board to which the Administrative Agent is subject for eurocurrency funding (currently referred to as "Eurocurrency Liabilities" in Regulation D of the Board). Such reserve percentages shall include those imposed pursuant to such Regulation D of the Board. Eurodollar Loans shall be deemed to constitute eurocurrency funding and to be subject to such reserve requirements without benefit of or credit for proration, exemptions or offsets that may be available from time to time to any Lender under such Regulation D of the Board or any comparable regulation. The Statutory Reserve Rate shall be adjusted automatically on and as of the effective date of any change in any reserve percentage.
Statutory Reserve Rate
"" means any Indebtedness of the Borrower or any Subsidiary the payment of which is subordinated to payment of the obligations under the Loan Documents.
Subordinated Indebtedness
"" means any document, agreement or instrument evidencing any Subordinated Indebtedness or entered into in connection with any Subordinated Indebtedness.
Subordinated Indebtedness Documents
"" means, with respect to any Person (the "") at any date, any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity the accounts of which would be consolidated with those of the parent in the parent's consolidated financial statements if such financial statements were prepared in accordance with GAAP as of such date, as well as any other corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity of which securities or other ownership interests representing more than 50.5% of the equity or more than 50.5% of the ordinary voting power or, in the case of a partnership, more than 50.5% of the general partnership interests are, as of such date, owned, Controlled or held.
subsidiary
parent
"" means any subsidiary of the Borrower.
Subsidiary
"" means each Material Domestic Subsidiary that is a party to the Subsidiary Guaranty. The Subsidiary Guarantors on the Effective Date are identified as such in hereto.
Subsidiary Guarantor
Schedule 3.01
"" means that certain Guaranty in the form of (including any and all supplements thereto) and executed by each Subsidiary Guarantor, as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time.
Subsidiary Guaranty
Exhibit F
"" means any agreement with respect to any swap, forward, future or derivative transaction or option or similar agreement involving, or settled by reference to, one or more rates, currencies, commodities, equity or debt instruments or securities, or economic, financial or pricing indices or measures of economic, financial or pricing risk or value or any similar transaction or any combination of these transactions; that no phantom stock or similar plan providing for payments only on account of services provided by current or former directors, officers, employees or consultants of the Borrower or the Subsidiaries shall be a Swap Agreement.
Swap Agreement
provided
"" means any and all obligations of the Borrower or any Subsidiary, whether absolute or contingent and howsoever and whensoever created, arising, evidenced or acquired (including all renewals, extensions and modifications thereof and substitutions therefor), under (a) any and all Swap Agreements with a Lender or an affiliate of a Lender, and (b) any and all cancellations, buy backs, reversals, terminations or assignments of any such Swap Agreement transaction.
Swap Obligations
"" means, at any time, the aggregate principal amount of all Swingline Loans outstanding at such time. The Swingline Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Swingline Exposure at such time.
Swingline Exposure
"" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as lender of Swingline Loans hereunder.
Swingline Lender
"" means a Loan made pursuant to Section 2.05.
Swingline Loan
"" means any and all present or future taxes, levies, imposts, duties, deductions, fees, assessments, charges or withholdings imposed by any Governmental Authority.
Taxes
"" means the execution, delivery and performance by the Loan Parties of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, the borrowing of Loans, the use of the proceeds thereof and the issuance of Letters of Credit hereunder.
Transactions
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether the rate of interest on such Loan, or on the Loans comprising such Borrowing, is determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the Alternate Base Rate.
Type
"" means liability to a Multiemployer Plan as a result of a complete or partial withdrawal from such Multiemployer Plan, as such terms are defined in Part I of Subtitle E of Title IV of ERISA.
Withdrawal Liability
SECTION 1.02. . For purposes of this Agreement, Loans may be classified and referred to by Class (, a "Revolving Loan") or by Type (, a "Eurodollar Loan") or by Class and Type (, a "Eurodollar Revolving Loan"). Borrowings also may be classified and referred to by Class (, a "Revolving Borrowing") or by Type (, a "Eurodollar Borrowing") or by Class and Type (, a "Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing").
Classification of Loans and Borrowings
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
SECTION 1.03. . The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined. Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms. The words "include", "includes" and "including" shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase "without limitation". The word "will" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word "shall". The word "law" shall be construed as referring to all statutes, rules, regulations, codes and other laws (including official rulings and interpretations thereunder having the force of law), and all judgments, orders and decrees, of all Governmental Authorities. Unless the context requires otherwise (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document herein shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified (subject to any restrictions on such amendments, restatements, supplements or modifications set forth herein), (b) any definition of or reference to any statute, rule or regulation shall be construed as referring thereto as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (including by succession of comparable successor laws), (c) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Person's successors and assigns (subject to any restrictions on assignment set forth herein) and, in the case of any Governmental Authority, any other Governmental Authority that shall have succeeded to any or all functions thereof, (d) the words "herein", "hereof" and "hereunder", and words of similar import, shall be construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof, (e) all references herein to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, this Agreement and (f) the words "asset" and "property" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights.
Terms Generally
SECTION 1.04. . Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature shall be construed in accordance with GAAP, as in effect from time to time; that, if the Borrower notifies the Administrative Agent that the Borrower requests an amendment to any provision hereof to eliminate the effect of any change occurring after the date hereof in GAAP or in the application thereof on the operation of such provision (or if the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower that the Required Lenders request an amendment to any provision hereof for such purpose), regardless of whether any such notice is given before or after such change in GAAP or in the application thereof, then such provision shall be interpreted on the basis of GAAP as in effect and applied immediately before such change shall have become effective until such notice shall have been withdrawn or such provision amended in accordance herewith. Notwithstanding any other provision contained herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature used herein shall be construed, and all computations of amounts and ratios referred to herein shall be made (i) without giving effect to any election under Accounting Standards Codification 825-10-25 (or any other Accounting Standards Codification or Financial Accounting Standard having a similar result or effect) to value any Indebtedness or other liabilities of the Borrower or any Subsidiary at "fair value", as defined therein, (ii) without giving effect to any treatment of Indebtedness in respect of convertible debt instruments under Accounting Standards Codification 470-20 (or any other Accounting Standards Codification or Financial Accounting Standard having a similar result or effect) to value any such Indebtedness in a reduced or bifurcated manner as described therein, and such Indebtedness shall at all times be valued at the full stated principal amount thereof and (iii) without giving effect to FAS 141R or any subsequent codification thereof with respect to earn-outs or other similar contingent obligations. In addition, any change in GAAP requiring the classification of a financial arrangement not previously classified as a capitalized lease to be classified as a capitalized lease shall be ignored and such financial arrangements shall continue to be treated as currently classified consistent with GAAP as in effect on the date hereof.
Accounting Terms; GAAP
provided
SECTION 2.01. . Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Lender agrees to make Revolving Loans to the Borrower in Dollars from time to time during the Availability Period in an aggregate principal amount that will not result in (a) such Lender's Revolving Credit Exposure exceeding such Lender's Commitment or (b) the sum of the total Revolving Credit Exposures exceeding the total Commitments. Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may borrow, prepay and reborrow Revolving Loans.
Commitments
SECTION 2.02. . (a) Each Revolving Loan (other than a Swingline Loan) shall be made as part of a Borrowing consisting of Revolving Loans made by the Lenders ratably in accordance with their respective Commitments. The failure of any Lender to make any Loan required to be made by it shall not relieve any other Lender of its obligations hereunder; that the Commitments of the Lenders are several and no Lender shall be responsible for any other Lender's failure to make Loans as required. Any Swingline Loan shall be made in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 2.05.
Loans and Borrowings
provided
(b) Subject to Section 2.14, each Revolving Borrowing shall be comprised entirely of ABR Loans or Eurodollar Loans as the Borrower may request in accordance herewith. Each Swingline Loan shall be an ABR Loan. Each Lender at its option may make any Eurodollar Loan by causing any domestic or foreign branch or Affiliate of such Lender to make such Loan (and in the case of an Affiliate, the provisions of Sections 2.14, 2.15, 2.16 and 2.17 shall apply to such Affiliate to the same extent as to such Lender); that any exercise of such option shall not affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay such Loan in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
provided
(c) At the commencement of each Interest Period for any Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $500,000 and not less than $5,000,000. At the time that each ABR Revolving Borrowing is made, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $250,000 and not less than $1,000,000; that an ABR Revolving Borrowing may be in an aggregate amount that is equal to the entire unused balance of the total Commitments or that is required to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by Section 2.06(e). Each Swingline Loan shall be in an amount that is an integral multiple of $250,000 and not less than $500,000. Borrowings of more than one Type and Class may be outstanding at the same time; that there shall not at any time be more than a total of six (6) Eurodollar Revolving Borrowings outstanding.
provided
provided
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, the Borrower shall not be entitled to request, or to elect to convert or continue, any Borrowing if the Interest Period requested with respect thereto would end after the Maturity Date.
SECTION 2.03. . To request a Revolving Borrowing, the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request by telephone (a) in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 1:00 p.m., New York City time, three (3) Business Days before the date of the proposed Borrowing or (b) in the case of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 1:00 p.m., New York City time, one Business Day before the date of the proposed Borrowing; that any such notice of an ABR Revolving Borrowing to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by Section 2.06(e) may be given not later than 1:00 p.m., New York City time, on the date of the proposed Borrowing. Each such telephonic Borrowing Request shall be irrevocable (but may be conditioned upon the closing of a refinancing or a Permitted Acquisition) and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or telecopy to the Administrative Agent of a written Borrowing Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Borrower. Each such telephonic and written Borrowing Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02:
Requests for Revolving Borrowings
provided
(i) the aggregate amount of the requested Borrowing;
(ii) the date of such Borrowing, which shall be a Business Day;
(iii) whether such Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing;
(iv) in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, the initial Interest Period to be applicable thereto, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term "Interest Period"; and
(v) the location and number of the Borrower's account to which funds are to be disbursed, which shall comply with the requirements of Section 2.07.
If no election as to the Type of Revolving Borrowing is specified, then the requested Revolving Borrowing shall be an ABR Borrowing. If no Interest Period is specified with respect to any requested Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one month's duration. Promptly following receipt of a Borrowing Request in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of the amount of such Lender's Loan to be made as part of the requested Borrowing.
SECTION 2.04. .
Intentionally Omitted
SECTION 2.05. . (a) Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Swingline Lender agrees to make Swingline Loans in Dollars to the Borrower from time to time during the Availability Period, in an aggregate principal amount at any time outstanding that will not result in (i) the aggregate principal amount of outstanding Swingline Loans exceeding $20,000,000 or (ii) the sum of the total Revolving Credit Exposures exceeding the total Commitments; provided that the Swingline Lender shall not be required to make a Swingline Loan to refinance an outstanding Swingline Loan. Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may borrow, prepay and reborrow Swingline Loans.
Swingline Loans
(b) To request a Swingline Loan, the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request by telephone (confirmed by telecopy), not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the day of a proposed Swingline Loan. Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the requested date (which shall be a Business Day) and amount of the requested Swingline Loan. The Administrative Agent will promptly advise the Swingline Lender of any such notice received from the Borrower. The Swingline Lender shall make each Swingline Loan available to the Borrower by means of a disbursement by wire transfer to a deposit account of the Borrower at such financial institution as is designated by the Borrower in its request for such Swingline Loan (or, in the case of a Swingline Loan made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.06(e), by remittance to the Issuing Bank) by 3:00 p.m., New York City time, on the requested date of such Swingline Loan.
(c) The Swingline Lender may by written notice given to the Administrative Agent not later than 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on any Business Day require the Lenders to acquire participations on such Business Day in all or a portion of the Swingline Loans outstanding. Such notice shall specify the aggregate amount of Swingline Loans in which Lenders will participate. Promptly upon receipt of such notice, the Administrative Agent will give notice thereof to each Lender, specifying in such notice such Lender's Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Loans. Each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees, upon receipt of notice as provided above, to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the Swingline Lender, such Lender's Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Loans. Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations in Swingline Loans pursuant to this paragraph is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever. Each Lender shall comply with its obligation under this paragraph by wire transfer of immediately available funds, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.07 with respect to Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.07 shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to the Swingline Lender the amounts so received by it from the Lenders. The Administrative Agent shall notify the Borrower of any participations in any Swingline Loan acquired pursuant to this paragraph, and thereafter payments in respect of such Swingline Loan shall be made to the Administrative Agent and not to the Swingline Lender. Any amounts received by the Swingline Lender from the Borrower (or other party on behalf of the Borrower) in respect of a Swingline Loan after receipt by the Swingline Lender of the proceeds of a sale of participations therein shall be promptly remitted to the Administrative Agent; any such amounts received by the Administrative Agent shall be promptly remitted by the Administrative Agent to the Lenders that shall have made their payments pursuant to this paragraph and to the Swingline Lender, as their interests may appear; provided that any such payment so remitted shall be repaid to the Swingline Lender or to the Administrative Agent, as applicable, if and to the extent such payment is required to be refunded to the Borrower for any reason. The purchase of participations in a Swingline Loan pursuant to this paragraph shall not relieve the Borrower of any default in the payment thereof.
mutatis
mutandis
SECTION 2.06. . (a) . Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may request the issuance of Letters of Credit denominated in Dollars for its own account, in a form reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Bank, at any time and from time to time during the Availability Period. In the event of any inconsistency between the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the terms and conditions of any form of letter of credit application or other agreement submitted by the Borrower to, or entered into by the Borrower with, the Issuing Bank relating to any Letter of Credit, the terms and conditions of this Agreement shall control. The letters of credit identified on shall be deemed to be "Letters of Credit" issued on the Effective Date for all purposes of the Loan Documents.
Letters of Credit
General
Schedule 2.06
(b) . To request the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or the amendment, renewal or extension of an outstanding Letter of Credit), the Borrower shall hand deliver or telecopy (or transmit by electronic communication, if arrangements for doing so have been approved by the Issuing Bank) to the Issuing Bank and the Administrative Agent (reasonably in advance of the requested date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension but in any case, notice given not later than 1:00 p.m. New York City time, three Business Days prior to such date shall be deemed sufficient) a notice requesting the issuance of a Letter of Credit, or identifying the Letter of Credit to be amended, renewed or extended, and specifying the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (which shall be a Business Day), the date on which such Letter of Credit is to expire (which shall comply with paragraph (c) of this Section), the amount of such Letter of Credit, the name and address of the beneficiary thereof and such other information as shall be necessary to prepare, amend, renew or extend such Letter of Credit. If requested by the Issuing Bank, the Borrower also shall submit a letter of credit application on the Issuing Bank's standard form in connection with any request for a Letter of Credit. A Letter of Credit shall be issued, amended, renewed or extended only if (and upon issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of each Letter of Credit the Borrower shall be deemed to represent and warrant that), after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (i) the LC Exposure shall not exceed $20,000,000 and (ii) the total Revolving Credit Exposures shall not exceed the total Commitments.
Notice of Issuance, Amendment, Renewal, Extension; Certain Conditions
(c) . Each Letter of Credit shall expire at or prior to the close of business on the earlier of (i) the date one year after the date of the issuance of such Letter of Credit (or, in the case of any renewal or extension thereof, one year after such renewal or extension) and (ii) the date that is five (5) Business Days prior to the Maturity Date; that with the prior consent of the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Bank, such Issuing Bank may issue or extend Evergreen Letters of Credit with a later expiration date (but in no event later than one year beyond the Maturity Date) so long as on or prior to the date that is thirty (30) days prior to the Maturity Date, whether or not an Event of Default exists, the Borrower shall deposit in an account with the Administrative Agent, in the name of the Administrative Agent and for the benefit of the Lenders, an amount in cash equal to 105% of the undrawn amount of all outstanding Evergreen Letters of Credit with an expiration date later than five Business Days prior to the Maturity Date. If the Borrower is required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder as a result of an approaching Maturity Date, such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned (net of any fees and other customary charges and expenses) to the Borrower within three (3) Business Days after all Letters of Credit have expired and all related reimbursement and payment obligations satisfied in full.
Expiration Date
provided
(d) . By the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or an amendment to a Letter of Credit increasing the amount thereof) and without any further action on the part of the Issuing Bank or the Lenders, the Issuing Bank hereby grants to each Lender, and each Lender hereby acquires from the Issuing Bank, a participation in such Letter of Credit equal to such Lender's Applicable Percentage of the aggregate amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit. In consideration and in furtherance of the foregoing, each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the Issuing Bank, such Lender's Applicable Percentage of each LC Disbursement made by the Issuing Bank and not reimbursed by the Borrower on the date due as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section, or of any reimbursement payment required to be refunded to the Borrower for any reason. Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations pursuant to this paragraph in respect of Letters of Credit is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including any amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever.
Participations
(e) . If the Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement in respect of a Letter of Credit, the Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement by paying to the Administrative Agent in Dollars the amount equal to such LC Disbursement, calculated as of the date the Issuing Bank made such LC Disbursement not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the date that such LC Disbursement is made, if the Borrower shall have received notice of such LC Disbursement prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on such date, or, if such notice has not been received by the Borrower prior to such time on such date, then not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on (i) the Business Day that the Borrower receives such notice, if such notice is received prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the day of receipt, or (ii) the Business Day immediately following the day that the Borrower receives such notice, if such notice is not received prior to such time on the day of receipt; that, if such LC Disbursement is not less than $500,000, the Borrower may, subject to the conditions to borrowing set forth herein, request in accordance with Section 2.03 or 2.05 that such payment be financed with an ABR Revolving Borrowing or Swingline Loan in an equivalent amount of such LC Disbursement and, to the extent so financed, the Borrower's obligation to make such payment shall be discharged and replaced by the resulting ABR Revolving Borrowing or Swingline Loan. If the Borrower fails to make such payment when due, the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the applicable LC Disbursement, the payment then due from the Borrower in respect thereof and such Lender's Applicable Percentage thereof. Promptly following receipt of such notice, each Lender shall pay to the Administrative Agent its Applicable Percentage of the payment then due from the Borrower, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.07 with respect to Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.07 shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to the Issuing Bank the amounts so received by it from the Lenders. Promptly following receipt by the Administrative Agent of any payment from the Borrower pursuant to this paragraph, the Administrative Agent shall distribute such payment to the Issuing Bank or, to the extent that Lenders have made payments pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse the Issuing Bank, then to such Lenders and the Issuing Bank as their interests may appear. Any payment made by a Lender pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse the Issuing Bank for any LC Disbursement (other than the funding of ABR Revolving Loans or a Swingline Loan as contemplated above) shall not constitute a Loan and shall not relieve the Borrower of its obligation to reimburse such LC Disbursement.
Reimbursement
provided
mutatis
mutandis
(f) . The Borrower's obligation to reimburse LC Disbursements as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be performed strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement under any and all circumstances whatsoever and irrespective of (i) any lack of validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit or this Agreement, or any term or provision therein, (ii) any draft or other document presented under a Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent or invalid in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect, (iii) payment by the Issuing Bank under a Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or other document that does not comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit, or (iv) any other event or circumstance whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, that might, but for the provisions of this Section, constitute a legal or equitable discharge of, or provide a right of setoff against, the Borrower's obligations hereunder. Neither the Administrative Agent, the Lenders nor the Issuing Bank, nor any of their Related Parties, shall have any liability or responsibility by reason of or in connection with the issuance or transfer of any Letter of Credit or any payment or failure to make any payment thereunder (irrespective of any of the circumstances referred to in the preceding sentence), or any error, omission, interruption, loss or delay in transmission or delivery of any draft, notice or other communication under or relating to any Letter of Credit (including any document required to make a drawing thereunder), any error in interpretation of technical terms or any consequence arising from causes beyond the control of the Issuing Bank; that the foregoing shall not be construed to excuse the Issuing Bank from liability to the Borrower to the extent of any direct damages (as opposed to consequential damages, claims in respect of which are hereby waived by the Borrower to the extent permitted by applicable law) suffered by the Borrower that are caused by the Issuing Bank's failure to exercise care when determining whether drafts and other documents presented under a Letter of Credit comply with the terms thereof. The parties hereto expressly agree that, in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct on the part of the Issuing Bank (as finally determined by a court of competent jurisdiction), the Issuing Bank shall be deemed to have exercised care in each such determination. In furtherance of the foregoing and without limiting the generality thereof, the parties agree that, with respect to documents presented which appear on their face to be in substantial compliance with the terms of a Letter of Credit, the Issuing Bank may, in its sole discretion, either accept and make payment upon such documents without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, or refuse to accept and make payment upon such documents if such documents are not in strict compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit.
Obligations Absolute
provided
(g) . The Issuing Bank shall, promptly following its receipt thereof, examine all documents purporting to represent a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit. The Issuing Bank shall promptly notify the Administrative Agent and the Borrower by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) of such demand for payment and whether the Issuing Bank has made or will make an LC Disbursement thereunder; that any failure to give or delay in giving such notice shall not relieve the Borrower of its obligation to reimburse the Issuing Bank and the Lenders with respect to any such LC Disbursement.
Disbursement Procedures
provided
(h) . If the Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement, then, unless the Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement in full on the date such LC Disbursement is made, the unpaid amount thereof shall bear interest, for each day from and including the date such LC Disbursement is made to but excluding the date that the Borrower reimburses such LC Disbursement, at the rate per annum then applicable to ABR Revolving Loans; that, if the Borrower fails to reimburse such LC Disbursement when due pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section, then Section 2.13(c) shall apply. Interest accrued pursuant to this paragraph shall be for the account of the Issuing Bank, except that interest accrued on and after the date of payment by any Lender pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section to reimburse the Issuing Bank shall be for the account of such Lender to the extent of such payment.
Interim Interest
provided
(i) . The Issuing Bank may be replaced at any time by written agreement among the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the replaced Issuing Bank and the successor Issuing Bank. The Administrative Agent shall notify the Lenders of any such replacement of the Issuing Bank. At the time any such replacement shall become effective, the Borrower shall pay all unpaid fees accrued for the account of the replaced Issuing Bank pursuant to Section 2.12(b). From and after the effective date of any such replacement, (i) the successor Issuing Bank shall have all the rights and obligations of the Issuing Bank under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit to be issued thereafter and (ii) references herein to the term "Issuing Bank" shall be deemed to refer to such successor or to any previous Issuing Bank, or to such successor and all previous Issuing Banks, as the context shall require. After the replacement of an Issuing Bank hereunder, the replaced Issuing Bank shall remain a party hereto and shall continue to have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Bank under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit then outstanding and issued by it prior to such replacement, but shall not be required to issue additional Letters of Credit.
Replacement of Issuing Bank
(j) . If any Event of Default shall occur and be continuing, on the Business Day that the Borrower receives notice from the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders (or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated, Lenders with LC Exposure representing greater than 50% of the total LC Exposure) demanding the deposit of cash collateral pursuant to this paragraph, the Borrower shall deposit in an account with the Administrative Agent, in the name of the Administrative Agent and for the benefit of the Lenders, an amount in cash equal to the amount of the LC Exposure as of such date plus any accrued and unpaid interest thereon; that the obligation to deposit such cash collateral shall become effective immediately, and such deposit shall become immediately due and payable, without demand or other notice of any kind, upon the occurrence of any Event of Default with respect to the Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of Article VII. Such deposit shall be held by the Administrative Agent as collateral for the payment and performance of the Obligations in respect of Letters of Credit. The Administrative Agent shall have exclusive dominion and control, including the exclusive right of withdrawal, over such account. Other than any interest earned on the investment of such deposits, which investments shall be made at the option and sole discretion of the Administrative Agent and at the Borrower's risk and expense, such deposits shall not bear interest. Interest or profits, if any, on such investments shall accumulate in such account. Moneys in such account shall be applied by the Administrative Agent to reimburse the Issuing Bank for LC Disbursements for which it has not been reimbursed and, to the extent not so applied, shall be held for the satisfaction of the reimbursement obligations of the Borrower for the LC Exposure at such time or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated (but subject to the consent of Lenders with LC Exposure representing greater than 50% of the total LC Exposure), be applied to satisfy other Obligations. If the Borrower is required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder as a result of the occurrence of an Event of Default, such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to the Borrower within three (3) Business Days after all Events of Default have been cured or waived.
Cash Collateralization
provided
(k) . The Lenders agree that, while an Evergreen LC is outstanding and prior to the Maturity Date, at the option of the Borrower and upon the written request of the Borrower received by the Issuing Bank (with a copy to the Administrative Agent) no more than fifty (50) days and at least twenty (20) days (or such shorter time as the Issuing Bank may agree in a particular instance) prior to the effective Non-Extension Date thereof, the Issuing Bank shall be entitled to authorize or permit the automatic extension of such Evergreen LC. Each such request from the Borrower for extension of an Evergreen LC shall be in writing and shall specify: (i) the Evergreen LC to be extended; (ii) the proposed effective date of extension of the Evergreen LC (which shall be a Business Day except to the extent it is the expiry date of the applicable Evergreen LC and no action of the Issuing Bank is required on such date); (iii) the revised expiry date of the Evergreen LC (which, subject to Section 2.06(c), shall not be later than the earlier of (A) the date that is one year after the then effective expiry date of such Evergreen LC and (B) the date that is five Business Days prior to the Maturity Date); and (iv) such other matters as the Issuing Bank may reasonably require. The Issuing Bank shall be under no obligation to so extend or permit the extension of any Evergreen LC if the Issuing Bank would have no obligation as of the proposed effective date of extension to issue or amend such Evergreen LC in its extended form under the terms of this Agreement (including Section 4.02). If as of the date twenty (20) days prior to the Non-Extension Date of any Evergreen LC the Issuing Bank would be entitled to authorize the extension of such Evergreen LC in accordance with this Section 2.06(k) upon the request of the Borrower but the Issuing Bank shall not have received a request from the Borrower to cause or permit such extension or a written direction from the Borrower to not cause or permit such extension, the Borrower shall be deemed to have delivered a request to cause the extension of such Letter of Credit. In addition, upon the direction of the Borrower for any Evergreen LC, the Issuing Bank shall give such notice as is necessary to prevent an automatic extension of the expiry date of such Evergreen LC; , , that in no event shall the Issuing Bank have liability to any party thereto for its failure to give such notice if written direction to give such notice is received by the Issuing Bank less than twenty (20) days prior to the Non-Extension Date for such Evergreen LC. The Issuing Bank will provide to the Administrative Agent and the Borrower a copy of any notice of non-extension given to an Evergreen LC beneficiary pursuant to this Section.
Evergreen Letters of Credit
provided
however
SECTION 2.07. . (a) Each Lender shall make each Loan to be made by it hereunder on the proposed date thereof by wire transfer of immediately available funds by 12:00 noon, New York City time, to the account of the Administrative Agent most recently designated by it for such purpose by notice to the Lenders in an amount equal to such Lender's Applicable Percentage; that Swingline Loans shall be made as provided in Section 2.05. The Administrative Agent will make such Loans available to the Borrower by promptly making a disbursement by wire transfer to a deposit account of the Borrower at such financial institution as is designated by the Borrower in the applicable Borrowing Request; that ABR Revolving Loans made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.06(e) shall be remitted by the Administrative Agent to the Issuing Bank.
Funding of Borrowings
provided
provided
(b) Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the proposed date of any Borrowing that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent such Lender's share of such Borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with paragraph (a) of this Section and may, in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the Borrower a corresponding amount. In such event, if a Lender has not in fact made its share of the applicable Borrowing available to the Administrative Agent, then the applicable Lender and the Borrower severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is made available to the Borrower to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at (i) in the case of such Lender, the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation or (ii) in the case of the Borrower, the interest rate applicable to ABR Loans; , that any payment made by the Borrower shall be made without prejudice to any claim the Borrower may have against the Lender failing to make such payment to the Administrative Agent. If such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent, then such amount shall constitute such Lender's Loan included in such Borrowing.
provided
SECTION 2.08. . (a) Each Revolving Borrowing initially shall be of the Type specified in the applicable Borrowing Request and, in the case of a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, shall have an initial Interest Period as specified in such Borrowing Request. Thereafter, the Borrower may elect to convert such Borrowing to a different Type or to continue such Borrowing and, in the case of a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, may elect Interest Periods therefor, all as provided in this Section. The Borrower may elect different options with respect to different portions of the affected Borrowing, in which case each such portion shall be allocated ratably among the Lenders holding the Loans comprising such Borrowing, and the Loans comprising each such portion shall be considered a separate Borrowing. This Section shall not apply to Swingline Borrowings, which may not be converted or continued.
Interest Elections
(b) To make an election pursuant to this Section, the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such election by telephone by the time that a Borrowing Request would be required under Section 2.03 if the Borrower were requesting a Revolving Borrowing of the Type resulting from such election to be made on the effective date of such election. Each such telephonic Interest Election Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or telecopy to the Administrative Agent of a written Interest Election Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Borrower. Notwithstanding any contrary provision herein, this Section shall not be construed to permit the Borrower to elect an Interest Period for Eurodollar Loans that does not comply with Section 2.02(d).
(c) Each telephonic and written Interest Election Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02:
(i) the Borrowing to which such Interest Election Request applies and, if different options are being elected with respect to different portions thereof, the portions thereof to be allocated to each resulting Borrowing (in which case the information to be specified pursuant to clauses (iii) and (iv) below shall be specified for each resulting Borrowing);
(ii) the effective date of the election made pursuant to such Interest Election Request, which shall be a Business Day;
(iii) whether the resulting Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing; and
(iv) if the resulting Borrowing is a Eurodollar Borrowing, the Interest Period to be applicable thereto after giving effect to such election, which Interest Period shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term "Interest Period".
If any such Interest Election Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing but does not specify an Interest Period, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one month's duration.
(d) Promptly following receipt of an Interest Election Request, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of such Lender's portion of each resulting Borrowing.
(e) If the Borrower fails to deliver a timely Interest Election Request with respect to a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing prior to the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto, then, unless such Borrowing is repaid as provided herein, at the end of such Interest Period such Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing. Notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent, at the request of the Required Lenders, so notifies the Borrower, then, so long as an Event of Default is continuing (i) no outstanding Revolving Borrowing may be converted to or continued as a Eurodollar Borrowing and (ii) unless repaid, each Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing at the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto.
SECTION 2.09. . (a) Unless previously terminated, the Commitments shall terminate on the Maturity Date.
Termination and Reduction of Commitments
(b) The Borrower may at any time terminate, or from time to time reduce, the Commitments; that (i) each reduction of the Commitments shall be in an amount that is an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $5,000,000 and (ii) the Borrower shall not terminate or reduce the Commitments if, after giving effect to any concurrent prepayment of the Loans in accordance with Section 2.11, the sum of the Revolving Credit Exposures would exceed the total Commitments.
provided
(c) The Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of any election to terminate or reduce the Commitments under paragraph (b) of this Section at least three (3) Business Days prior to the effective date of such termination or reduction, specifying such election and the effective date thereof. Promptly following receipt of any notice, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each notice delivered by the Borrower pursuant to this Section shall be irrevocable; that a notice of termination of the Commitments delivered by the Borrower may state that such notice is conditioned upon the effectiveness of other credit facilities or other receipt of funds, in which case such notice may be revoked by the Borrower (by notice to the Administrative Agent on or prior to the specified effective date) if such condition is not satisfied. Any termination or reduction of the Commitments shall be permanent. Each reduction of the Commitments shall be made ratably among the Lenders in accordance with their respective Commitments.
provided
SECTION 2.10. . (a) The Borrower hereby unconditionally promises to pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Revolving Loan on the Maturity Date and (ii) to the Swingline Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Swingline Loan on the earlier of the Maturity Date and the first date after such Swingline Loan is made that is the 15 or last day of a calendar month and is at least two (2) Business Days after such Swingline Loan is made; that on each date that a Revolving Borrowing is made, the Borrower shall repay all Swingline Loans then outstanding.
Repayment of Loans; Evidence of Debt
th
provided
(b) Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice an account or accounts evidencing the indebtedness of the Borrower to such Lender resulting from each Loan made by such Lender, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
(c) The Administrative Agent shall maintain accounts in which it shall record (i) the amount of each Loan made hereunder, the Class and Type thereof and the Interest Period applicable thereto, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from the Borrower to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Administrative Agent hereunder for the account of the Lenders and each Lender's share thereof.
(d) The entries made in the accounts maintained pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) of this Section shall be evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded therein; that the failure of any Lender or the Administrative Agent to maintain such accounts or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay the Loans in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
prima
facie
provided
(e) Any Lender may request that Loans made by it be evidenced by a promissory note. In such event, the Borrower shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a promissory note payable to the order of such Lender (or, if requested by such Lender, to such Lender and its registered assigns) substantially in the form of . Thereafter, the Loans evidenced by such promissory note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after assignment pursuant to Section 9.04) be represented by one or more promissory notes in such form payable to the order of the payee named therein (or, if such promissory note is a registered note, to such payee and its registered assigns).
Exhibit H
SECTION 2.11. .
Prepayment of Loans
(a) The Borrower shall have the right at any time and from time to time to prepay any Borrowing in whole or in part, subject to prior notice in accordance with paragraph (b) of this Section.
(b) The Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent (and, in the case of prepayment of a Swingline Loan, the Swingline Lender) by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) of any prepayment hereunder (i) in the case of prepayment of a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, not later than 1:00 p.m., New York City time, three (3) Business Days before the date of prepayment, (ii) in the case of prepayment of an ABR Revolving Borrowing, not later than 1:00 p.m., New York City time, one Business Day before the date of prepayment or (iii) in the case of prepayment of a Swingline Loan, not later than 1:00 p.m., New York City time, on the date of prepayment. Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the prepayment date and the principal amount of each Borrowing or portion thereof to be prepaid; that, if a notice of prepayment is given in connection with a conditional notice of termination of the Commitments as contemplated by Section 2.09, then such notice of prepayment may be revoked if such notice of termination is revoked in accordance with Section 2.09. Promptly following receipt of any such notice relating to a Revolving Borrowing, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each partial prepayment of any Revolving Borrowing shall be in an amount that would be permitted in the case of an advance of a Revolving Borrowing of the same Type as provided in Section 2.02. Each prepayment of a Revolving Borrowing shall be applied ratably to the Loans included in such prepaid Borrowing. Prepayments shall be accompanied by (i) accrued interest to the extent required by Section 2.13 and (ii) break funding payments pursuant to Section 2.16.
provided
SECTION 2.12. . (a) The Borrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a facility fee, which shall accrue at the Applicable Rate on the daily amount of the Commitment of such Lender (whether used or unused) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the date on which such Commitment terminates; that, if such Lender continues to have any Revolving Credit Exposure after its Commitment terminates, then such facility fee shall continue to accrue on the daily amount of such Lender's Revolving Credit Exposure from and including the date on which its Commitment terminates to but excluding the date on which such Lender ceases to have any Revolving Credit Exposure. Accrued facility fees shall be payable in arrears on the last day of March, June, September and December of each year and on the date on which the Commitments terminate, commencing on the first such date to occur after the date hereof; that any facility fees accruing after the date on which the Commitments terminate shall be payable on demand. All facility fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
Fees
provided
provided
(b) The Borrower agrees to pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a participation fee with respect to its participations in Letters of Credit, which shall accrue at the same Applicable Rate used to determine the interest rate applicable to Eurodollar Revolving Loans on the average daily amount of such Lender's LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date on which such Lender's Commitment terminates and the date on which such Lender ceases to have any LC Exposure and (ii) to the Issuing Bank for its own account a fronting fee, which shall accrue at the rate of 0.125% per annum on the average daily amount of the LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) attributable to Letters of Credit issued by the Issuing Bank during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date of termination of the Commitments and the date on which there ceases to be any LC Exposure, as well as the Issuing Bank's standard fees and commissions with respect to the issuance, amendment, cancellation, negotiation, transfer, presentment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or processing of drawings thereunder. Unless otherwise specified above, participation fees and fronting fees accrued through and including the last day of March, June, September and December of each year shall be payable on the third (3) Business Day following such last day, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date; that all such fees shall be payable on the date on which the Commitments terminate and any such fees accruing after the date on which the Commitments terminate shall be payable on demand. Any other fees payable to the Issuing Bank pursuant to this paragraph shall be payable within ten (10) days after demand. All participation fees and fronting fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
rd
provided
(c) The Borrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for its own account, fees payable in the amounts and at the times separately agreed upon between the Borrower and the Administrative Agent.
(d) All fees payable hereunder shall be paid on the dates due, in immediately available funds, to the Administrative Agent (or to the Issuing Bank, in the case of fees payable to it) for distribution, in the case of facility fees and participation fees, to the Lenders. Fees paid shall not be refundable under any circumstances.
SECTION 2.13. . (a) The Loans comprising each ABR Borrowing (including each Swingline Loan) shall bear interest at the Alternate Base Rate plus the Applicable Rate.
Interest
(b) The Loans comprising each Eurodollar Borrowing shall bear interest at the Adjusted LIBO Rate for the Interest Period in effect for such Borrowing plus the Applicable Rate.
(c) Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any principal of or interest on any Loan or any fee or other amount payable by the Borrower hereunder is not paid when due, whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise, such overdue amount shall bear interest, after as well as before judgment, at a rate per annum equal to (i) in the case of overdue principal of any Loan, 2% plus the rate otherwise applicable to such Loan as provided in the preceding paragraphs of this Section or (ii) in the case of any other amount, 2% plus the rate applicable to ABR Loans as provided in paragraph (a) of this Section.
(d) Accrued interest on each Loan shall be payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date for such Loan and, in the case of Revolving Loans, upon termination of the Commitments; that (i) interest accrued pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section shall be payable on demand, (ii) in the event of any repayment or prepayment of any Loan (other than a prepayment of an ABR Revolving Loan prior to the end of the Availability Period), accrued interest on the principal amount repaid or prepaid shall be payable on the date of such repayment or prepayment and (iii) in the event of any conversion of any Eurodollar Revolving Loan prior to the end of the current Interest Period therefor, accrued interest on such Loan shall be payable on the effective date of such conversion.
provided
(e) All interest hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days, except that interest computed by reference to the Alternate Base Rate at times when the Alternate Base Rate is based on the Prime Rate shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year), and in each case shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day). The applicable Alternate Base Rate, Adjusted LIBO Rate or LIBO Rate shall be determined by the Administrative Agent, and such determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
SECTION 2.14. . If prior to the commencement of any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Borrowing:
Alternate Rate of Interest
(a) the Administrative Agent determines (which determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error and shall not be based on an arbitrary or capricious determination) that adequate and reasonable means do not exist for ascertaining the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the LIBO Rate, as applicable, for such Interest Period; or
(b) the Administrative Agent is reasonably advised by the Required Lenders that the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the LIBO Rate, as applicable, for such Interest Period will not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to such Lenders (or Lender) of making or maintaining their Loans (or its Loan) included in such Borrowing for such Interest Period;
then the Administrative Agent shall give notice thereof to the Borrower and the Lenders by telephone or telecopy as promptly as practicable thereafter and, until the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower and the Lenders that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer exist, (i) any Interest Election Request that requests the conversion of any Revolving Borrowing to, or continuation of any Revolving Borrowing as, a Eurodollar Borrowing shall be ineffective and any such Eurodollar Borrowing shall be automatically converted to an ABR Borrowing on the last day of the then current Interest Period applicable thereto and (ii) if any Borrowing Request requests a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be made as an ABR Borrowing. The Administrative Agent shall promptly advise the Borrower of any such alternate interest rate and shall provide a calculation and explanation of the circumstances described in the foregoing clauses (a) and (b).
SECTION 2.15. . If any Change in Law shall:
Increased Costs
(i) impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit, compulsory loan, insurance charge or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended by, any Lender (except any such reserve requirement reflected in the Adjusted LIBO Rate) or the Issuing Bank;
(ii) impose on any Lender or the Issuing Bank or the London interbank market any other condition, cost or expense affecting this Agreement or Eurodollar Loans made by such Lender or any Letter of Credit or participation therein; or
(iii) subject the Administrative Agent, any Lender, the Issuing Bank or any other recipient of any payments to be made by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder to any Taxes on its loans, loan principal, letters of credit, commitments, or other obligations, or its deposits, reserves, other liabilities or capital attributable thereto (other than (A) Indemnified Taxes, (B) Excluded Taxes or (C) Other Taxes);
and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Person of making or maintaining any Loan or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan or to increase the cost to such Person of participating in, issuing or maintaining any Letter of Credit or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Person, whether of principal, interest or otherwise, then the Borrower will pay to such Lender Person such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Person for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
(b) If any Lender or the Issuing Bank determines that any Change in Law regarding capital requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's capital or on the capital of such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement or the Loans made by, or participations in Letters of Credit held by, such Lender, or the Letters of Credit issued by the Issuing Bank, to a level below that which such Lender or the Issuing Bank or such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's policies and the policies of such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time the Borrower will pay to such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or the Issuing Bank or such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's holding company for any such reduction suffered.
(c) A certificate of a Lender or the Issuing Bank setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Lender or the Issuing Bank or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Borrower shall pay such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, the amount shown as due on any such certificate within ten (10) days after receipt thereof.
(d) Failure or delay on the part of any Lender or the Issuing Bank to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's right to demand such compensation; that the Borrower shall not be required to compensate a Lender or the Issuing Bank pursuant to this Section for any increased costs or reductions incurred more than 180 days prior to the date that such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, notifies the Borrower of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's intention to claim compensation therefor; that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the 180-day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof.
provided
provided
further
SECTION 2.16. . In the event of (a) the payment of any principal of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto (including as a result of an Event of Default or as a result of any prepayment pursuant to Section 2.11), (b) the conversion of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto, (c) the failure to borrow, convert, continue or prepay any Eurodollar Loan on the date specified in any notice delivered pursuant hereto (regardless of whether such notice may be revoked under Section 2.11(b) and is revoked in accordance therewith) or (d) the assignment of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto as a result of a request by the Borrower pursuant to Section 2.19, then, in any such event, the Borrower shall compensate each Lender for the loss, cost and expense attributable to such event. Such loss, cost or expense to any Lender shall be deemed to include an amount determined by such Lender to be the excess, if any, of (i) the amount of interest which would have accrued on the principal amount of such Loan had such event not occurred, at the Adjusted LIBO Rate that would have been applicable to such Loan, for the period from the date of such event to the last day of the then current Interest Period therefor (or, in the case of a failure to borrow, convert or continue, for the period that would have been the Interest Period for such Loan), over (ii) the amount of interest which would accrue on such principal amount for such period at the interest rate which such Lender would bid were it to bid, at the commencement of such period, for deposits in Dollars of a comparable amount and period from other banks in the eurodollar market. A certificate of any Lender setting forth any amount or amounts that such Lender is entitled to receive pursuant to this Section shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Borrower shall pay such Lender the amount shown as due on any such certificate within ten (10) days after receipt thereof.
Break Funding Payments
SECTION 2.17. . (a) Any and all payments by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder shall be made free and clear of and without deduction for any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes; that if the Borrower shall be required to deduct any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes from such payments, then (i) the sum payable shall be increased as necessary so that after making all required deductions (including deductions applicable to additional sums payable under this Section) the Administrative Agent, Lender or Issuing Bank (as the case may be) receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deductions been made, (ii) the Borrower shall make such deductions and (iii) the Borrower shall pay the full amount deducted to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
Taxes
provided
(b) In addition, the Borrower shall pay any Other Taxes to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
(c) The Borrower shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, each Lender and the Issuing Bank, within ten (10) days after written demand therefor, for the full amount of any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes paid by the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, on or with respect to any payment by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder (including Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to amounts payable under this Section) and any penalties, interest and reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority. A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to the Borrower by a Lender or the Issuing Bank, or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender or the Issuing Bank, shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
(d) As soon as practicable after any payment of Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes by the Borrower to a Governmental Authority, the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent the original or a certified copy of a receipt issued by such Governmental Authority evidencing such payment, a copy of the return reporting such payment or other evidence of such payment reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
(e) Any Foreign Lender that is entitled to an exemption from or reduction of withholding tax under the law of the jurisdiction in which the Borrower is located, or any treaty to which such jurisdiction is a party, with respect to payments under this Agreement shall deliver to the Borrower (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), at the time or times prescribed by applicable law, such properly completed and executed documentation prescribed by applicable law or reasonably requested by the Borrower as will permit such payments to be made without withholding or at a reduced rate.
(f) If the Administrative Agent or a Lender determines, in its sole discretion, that it has received a refund of any Taxes as to which it has been indemnified by the Borrower or with respect to which the Borrower has paid additional amounts pursuant to Section 2.15 or this Section 2.17, it shall pay over such refund to the Borrower (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made, or additional amounts paid, by the Borrower under Section 2.15 or this Section 2.17 with respect to Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses of the Administrative Agent or such Lender and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund); provided, that the Borrower, upon the request of the Administrative Agent or such Lender, agrees to repay the amount paid over to the Borrower (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) to the Administrative Agent or such Lender in the event the Administrative Agent or such Lender is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority. This Section shall not be construed to require the Administrative Agent or any Lender to make available its Tax returns (or any other information relating to its Taxes which it deems confidential) to the Borrower or any other Person.
(g) Each Lender shall severally indemnify the Administrative Agent for any Taxes (but, in the case of any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes, only to the extent that the Borrower has not already indemnified the Administrative Agent for such Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes and without limiting the obligation of the Borrower to do so) attributable to such Lender that are paid or payable by the Administrative Agent in connection with this Agreement and any reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such amounts were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority. The indemnity under this Section 2.17(g) shall be paid within ten (10) days after the Administrative Agent delivers to the applicable Lender a certificate stating the amount so paid or payable by the Administrative Agent. Such certificate shall be conclusive of the amount so paid or payable absent manifest error.
(h) If a payment made to a Lender under this Agreement would be subject to U.S. federal withholding tax imposed by FATCA if such Lender were to fail to comply with the applicable reporting requirements of FATCA (including those contained in Section 1471(b) or 1472(b) of the Code, as applicable), such Lender shall deliver to the Borrower and the Administrative Agent, at the time or times prescribed by law and at such time or times reasonably requested by the Borrower or the Administrative Agent, such documentation prescribed by applicable law (including as prescribed by Section 1471(b)(3)(C)(i) of the Code) and such additional documentation reasonably requested by the Borrower or the Administrative Agent as may be necessary for the Borrower and the Administrative Agent to comply with its obligations under FATCA, to determine that such Lender has or has not complied with such Lender's obligations under FATCA and, as necessary, to determine the amount to deduct and withhold from such payment. Solely for purposes of this Section 2.17(h), "FATCA" shall include any amendments made to FATCA after the date of this Agreement.
SECTION 2.18. .
Payments Generally; Pro Rata Treatment; Sharing of Set-offs
(a) The Borrower shall make each payment required to be made by it hereunder (whether of principal, interest, fees or reimbursement of LC Disbursements, or of amounts payable under Section 2.15, 2.16 or 2.17, or otherwise) prior to 1:00 p.m., New York City time on the date when due, in immediately available funds, without set-off or counterclaim. Any amounts received after such time on any date may, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day for purposes of calculating interest thereon. All such payments shall be made to the Administrative Agent at its offices at 10 South Dearborn Street, 7 Floor, Chicago, Illinois 60603, except payments to be made directly to the Issuing Bank or Swingline Lender as expressly provided herein and except that payments pursuant to Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03 shall be made directly to the Persons entitled thereto. The Administrative Agent shall distribute any such payments received by it for the account of any other Person to the appropriate recipient promptly following receipt thereof. If any payment hereunder shall be due on a day that is not a Business Day, the date for payment shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day, and, in the case of any payment accruing interest, interest thereon shall be payable for the period of such extension. All payments hereunder shall be made in Dollars.
th
(b) If at any time insufficient funds are received by and available to the Administrative Agent to pay fully all amounts of principal, unreimbursed LC Disbursements, interest and fees then due hereunder, such funds shall be applied (i) first, towards payment of interest and fees then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of interest and fees then due to such parties, and (ii) second, towards payment of principal and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of principal and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due to such parties.
(c) If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of or interest on any of its Revolving Loans or participations in LC Disbursements or Swingline Loans resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Revolving Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans and accrued interest thereon than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Revolving Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of principal of and accrued interest on their respective Revolving Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans; provided that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by the Borrower pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans to any assignee or participant, other than to the Borrower or any Subsidiary or Affiliate thereof (as to which the provisions of this paragraph shall apply). The Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against the Borrower rights of set-off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of the Borrower in the amount of such participation.
(d) Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from the Borrower prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lenders or the Issuing Bank hereunder that the Borrower will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that the Borrower has made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may, in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to the Lenders or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, the amount due. In such event, if the Borrower has not in fact made such payment, then each of the Lenders or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand the amount so distributed to such Lender or Issuing Bank with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation.
(e) If any Lender shall fail to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to Section 2.05(c), 2.06(d) or (e), 2.07(b), 2.18(d) or 9.03(c), then the Administrative Agent may, in its discretion (notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof), (i) apply any amounts thereafter received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Lender and for the benefit of the Administrative Agent, the Swingline Lender or the Issuing Bank to satisfy such Lender's obligations to it under any such Section until all such unsatisfied obligations are fully paid and/or (ii) hold any such amounts in a segregated account as cash collateral for, and application to, any future funding obligations of such Lender under any such Section; in the case of each of clauses (i) and (ii) above, in any order as determined by the Administrative Agent in its discretion.
SECTION 2.19. . (a) If any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.15, or if the Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.17, then such Lender shall use reasonable efforts to designate a different lending office for funding or booking its Loans hereunder or to assign its rights and obligations hereunder to another of its offices, branches or affiliates, if, in the judgment of such Lender, such designation or assignment (i) would eliminate or reduce amounts payable pursuant to Section 2.15 or 2.17, as the case may be, in the future and (ii) would not subject such Lender to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to such Lender. Each Lender also agrees to use its commercially reasonable efforts to make such designation or assignment prior to the occurrence of any circumstance described in Section 2.15 or 2.17 in the event it has knowledge of such circumstance prior to its occurrence or as soon thereafter as it becomes aware thereof. The Borrower hereby agrees to pay all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by any Lender in connection with any such designation or assignment.
Mitigation Obligations; Replacement of Lenders
(b) If (i) any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.15, (ii) the Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.17 or (iii) any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the Borrower may, at its sole expense and effort, upon notice to such Lender and the Administrative Agent, require such Lender to assign and delegate, without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in Section 9.04), all its interests, rights and obligations under the Loan Documents to an assignee that shall assume such obligations (which assignee may be another Lender, if a Lender accepts such assignment); that (i) the Borrower shall have received the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, which consent shall not unreasonably be withheld, (ii) such Lender shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans, accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder, from the assignee (to the extent of such outstanding principal and accrued interest and fees) or the Borrower (in the case of all other amounts) and (iii) in the case of any such assignment resulting from a claim for compensation under Section 2.15 or payments required to be made pursuant to Section 2.17, such assignment will result in a reduction in such compensation or payments. A Lender shall not be required to make any such assignment and delegation if, prior thereto, as a result of a waiver by such Lender or otherwise, the circumstances entitling the Borrower to require such assignment and delegation cease to apply.
provided
SECTION 2.20. . The Borrower may from time to time elect to increase the Commitments in minimum increments of $5,000,000 so long as, after giving effect thereto, the aggregate amount of the Commitments does not exceed $225,000,000. The Borrower may arrange for any such increase to be provided by one or more Lenders (each Lender so agreeing to an increase in its Commitment, an ""), or by one or more new banks, financial institutions or other entities (each such new bank, financial institution or other entity, an ""), to increase their existing Commitments, or extend Commitments, as the case may be; that (i) each Augmenting Lender, shall be subject to the approval of the Borrower and the Administrative Agent (not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed) and (ii) (x) in the case of an Increasing Lender, the Borrower and such Increasing Lender execute an agreement substantially in the form of hereto, and (y) in the case of an Augmenting Lender, the Borrower and such Augmenting Lender execute an agreement substantially in the form of hereto. No consent of any Lender (other than the Lenders participating in the increase) shall be required for any increase in Commitments pursuant to this Section 2.20. Increases and new Commitments created pursuant to this Section 2.20 shall become effective on the date agreed by the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and the relevant Increasing Lenders or Augmenting Lenders and the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender thereof. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no increase in the Commitments (or in the Commitment of any Lender), shall become effective under this paragraph unless, (i) on the proposed date of the effectiveness of such increase, the conditions set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of Section 4.02 shall be satisfied or waived by the Required Lenders and the Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate to that effect dated such date and executed by a Financial Officer of the Borrower and (ii) the Administrative Agent shall have received documents consistent with those delivered on the Effective Date as to the corporate power and authority of the Borrower to borrow hereunder after giving effect to such increase. On the effective date of any increase in the Commitments, (i) each relevant Increasing Lender and Augmenting Lender shall make available to the Administrative Agent such amounts in immediately available funds as the Administrative Agent shall determine, for the benefit of the other Lenders, as being required in order to cause, after giving effect to such increase and the use of such amounts to make payments to such other Lenders, each Lender's portion of the outstanding Revolving Loans of all the Lenders to equal its Applicable Percentage of such outstanding Revolving Loans, and (ii) the Borrower shall be deemed to have repaid and reborrowed all outstanding Revolving Loans as of the date of any increase in the Commitments (with such reborrowing to consist of the Types of Revolving Loans, with related Interest Periods if applicable, specified in a notice delivered by the Borrower in accordance with the requirements of Section 2.03). The deemed payments made pursuant to clause (ii) of the immediately preceding sentence shall be accompanied by payment of all accrued interest on the amount prepaid and, in respect of each Eurodollar Loan, shall be subject to indemnification by the Borrower pursuant to the provisions of Section 2.16 if the deemed payment occurs other than on the last day of the related Interest Periods. Nothing contained in this Section 2.20 shall constitute, or otherwise be deemed to be, a commitment on the part of any Lender to increase its Commitment hereunder at any time.
Expansion Option
Increasing Lender
Augmenting Lender
provided
Exhibit C
Exhibit D
SECTION 2.21. . Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the following provisions shall apply for so long as such Lender is a Defaulting Lender:
Defaulting Lenders
(a) fees shall cease to accrue on the Commitment of such Defaulting Lender pursuant to Section 2.12(a);
(b) the Commitment and Revolving Credit Exposure of such Defaulting Lender shall not be included in determining whether the Required Lenders have taken or may take any action hereunder (including any consent to any amendment, waiver or other modification pursuant to Section 9.02); , that this clause (b) shall not apply to the vote of a Defaulting Lender in the case of an amendment, waiver or other modification requiring the consent of such Lender or each Lender affected thereby;
provided
(c) if any Swingline Exposure or LC Exposure exists at the time such Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender then:
(i) all or any part of the Swingline Exposure and LC Exposure of such Defaulting Lender shall be reallocated among the non-Defaulting Lenders in accordance with their respective Applicable Percentages but only to the extent the sum of all non-Defaulting Lenders' Revolving Credit Exposures plus such Defaulting Lender's Swingline Exposure and LC Exposure does not exceed the total of all non-Defaulting Lenders' Commitments;
(ii) if the reallocation described in clause (i) above cannot, or can only partially, be effected, the Borrower shall within one (1) Business Day following notice by the Administrative Agent (x) , prepay such Swingline Exposure and (y) , cash collateralize for the benefit of the Issuing Bank only the Borrower's obligations corresponding to such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure (after giving effect to any partial reallocation pursuant to clause (i) above) in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 2.06(j) for so long as such LC Exposure is outstanding;
first
second
(iii) if the Borrower cash collateralizes any portion of such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure pursuant to clause (ii) above, the Borrower shall not be required to pay any fees to such Defaulting Lender pursuant to Section 2.12(b) with respect to such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure during the period such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure is cash collateralized;
(iv) if the LC Exposure of the non-Defaulting Lenders is reallocated pursuant to clause (i) above, then the fees payable to the Lenders pursuant to Section 2.12(b) shall be adjusted in accordance with such non-Defaulting Lenders' Applicable Percentages; and
(v) if all or any portion of such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure is neither reallocated nor cash collateralized pursuant to clause (i) or (ii) above, then, without prejudice to any rights or remedies of the Issuing Bank or any other Lender hereunder, all facility fees that otherwise would have been payable to such Defaulting Lender (solely with respect to the portion of such Defaulting Lender's Commitment that was utilized by such LC Exposure) and letter of credit fees payable under Section 2.12(b) with respect to such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure shall be payable to the Issuing Bank until and to the extent that such LC Exposure is reallocated and/or cash collateralized; and
(d) so long as such Lender is a Defaulting Lender, the Swingline Lender shall not be required to fund any Swingline Loan and the Issuing Bank shall not be required to issue, amend or increase any Letter of Credit, unless it is satisfied that the related exposure and the Defaulting Lender's then outstanding LC Exposure will be 100% covered by the Commitments of the non-Defaulting Lenders and/or cash collateral will be provided by the Borrower in accordance with Section 2.21(c), and participating interests in any such newly made Swingline Loan or any newly issued or increased Letter of Credit shall be allocated among non-Defaulting Lenders in a manner consistent with Section 2.21(c)(i) (and such Defaulting Lender shall not participate therein).
If (i) a Bankruptcy Event with respect to a Parent of any Lender shall occur following the date hereof and for so long as such event shall continue or (ii) the Swingline Lender or the Issuing Bank has a good faith belief that any Lender has defaulted in fulfilling its obligations under one or more other agreements in which such Lender commits to extend credit, the Swingline Lender shall not be required to fund any Swingline Loan and the Issuing Bank shall not be required to issue, amend or increase any Letter of Credit, unless the Swingline Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, shall have entered into arrangements with the Borrower or such Lender, satisfactory to the Swingline Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, to defease any risk to it in respect of such Lender hereunder.
In the event that the Administrative Agent, the Borrower, the Swingline Lender and the Issuing Bank each agrees that a Defaulting Lender has adequately remedied all matters that caused such Lender to be a Defaulting Lender, then the Swingline Exposure and LC Exposure of the Lenders shall be readjusted to reflect the inclusion of such Lender's Commitment and on such date such Lender shall purchase at par such of the Loans of the other Lenders (other than Swingline Loans) as the Administrative Agent shall determine may be necessary in order for such Lender to hold such Loans in accordance with its Applicable Percentage.
The Borrower represents and warrants to the Lenders that:
SECTION 3.01. . Each of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries is duly organized, validly existing and, to the extent such concept applies to such entity, in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization, has all requisite power and authority to carry on its business as now conducted and, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, is qualified to do business in, and is in good standing in, every jurisdiction where such qualification is required. hereto (as supplemented from time to time) identifies, as of the Effective Date, each Subsidiary, noting whether such Subsidiary is a Material Domestic Subsidiary, the jurisdiction of its incorporation or organization, as the case may be, the percentage of issued and outstanding shares of each class of its capital stock or other equity interests owned by the Borrower and the other Subsidiaries and, if such percentage is not 100% (excluding directors' qualifying shares as required by law), a description of each class issued and outstanding. All of the outstanding shares of capital stock and other equity interests of each Subsidiary are validly issued and outstanding and fully paid and nonassessable and all such shares and other equity interests indicated on as owned by the Borrower or another Subsidiary are owned, beneficially and of record, by the Borrower or any Subsidiary free and clear of all Liens (other than Permitted Liens).
Organization; Powers; Subsidiaries
Schedule 3.01
Schedule 3.01
SECTION 3.02. . The Transactions are within the Borrower's corporate powers and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate and, if required, stockholder action. This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by the Borrower and constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of the Borrower, enforceable in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer or conveyance, reorganization, moratorium or other laws affecting creditors' rights generally and subject to general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law.
Authorization; Enforceability
SECTION 3.03. . The Transactions (a) do not require any consent or approval of, registration or filing with, or any other action by, any Governmental Authority, except such as have been obtained or made and are in full force and effect, (b) will not violate any applicable law or regulation or the charter, by-laws or other organizational documents of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries or any order of any Governmental Authority, (c) will not violate or result in a default under any indenture, material agreement or other material instrument binding upon the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries or its assets, or give rise to a right thereunder to require any payment to be made by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, and (d) will not result in the creation or imposition of any Lien on any asset of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries.
Governmental Approvals; No Conflicts
SECTION 3.04. . (a) The Borrower has heretofore furnished to the Lenders its consolidated balance sheet and statements of income, stockholders equity and cash flows (i) as of and for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010 reported on by KPMG LLP, independent public accountants, and (ii) as of and for the fiscal quarter and the portion of the fiscal year ended March 31, 2011, certified by its chief financial officer. Such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position and results of operations and cash flows of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of such dates and for such periods in accordance with GAAP, subject to year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes in the case of the statements referred to in clause (ii) above.
Financial Condition; No Material Adverse Change
(b) Since December 31, 2010, there has been no material adverse change in the business, assets, property or financial condition, of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
SECTION 3.05. . (a) Each of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries has good title to, or valid leasehold interests in, all its real and personal property material to its business, except for minor defects in title that do not interfere with its ability to conduct its business as currently conducted or to utilize such properties for their intended purposes. There are no Liens on any of the real or personal properties of the Borrower or any Subsidiary except for Liens permitted by Section 6.02.
Properties
(b) Each of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries owns, or is licensed to use, all trademarks, tradenames, copyrights, patents and other intellectual property material to its business, and the use thereof by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries does not infringe upon the rights of any other Person, except for any such infringements that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
SECTION 3.06. . (a) There are no actions, suits, proceedings or investigations by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority pending against or, to the knowledge of the Borrower, threatened against or affecting the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries (i) as to which there is a reasonable possibility of an adverse determination and that, if adversely determined, could reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material Adverse Effect (other than the Disclosed Matters) or (ii) that involve this Agreement or the Transactions. There are no labor controversies pending against or, to the knowledge of the Borrower, threatened against or affecting the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries (i) which could reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material Adverse Effect, or (ii) that involve this Agreement or the Transactions.
Litigation and Environmental Matters
(b) Except for the Disclosed Matters and except with respect to any other matters that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, neither the Borrower nor any of its Subsidiaries (i) has failed to comply with any Environmental Law or to obtain, maintain or comply with any permit, license or other approval required under any Environmental Law, (ii) has become subject to any Environmental Liability, (iii) has received notice of any claim with respect to any Environmental Liability or (iv) knows of any basis for any Environmental Liability.
(c) Since the date of this Agreement, there has been no change in the status of the Disclosed Matters that, individually or in the aggregate, has resulted in, or could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. As of the Effective Date, neither the Borrower nor any Subsidiary is party or subject to any law, regulation, rule or order, or any obligation under any agreement or instrument, that has a Material Adverse Effect.
SECTION 3.07. . Each of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries is in compliance with all laws, regulations and orders of any Governmental Authority applicable to it or its property and all indentures, material agreements and other material instruments binding upon it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. The parties hereto acknowledge and agree that any failure to file financial statements with the Securities and Exchange Commission when required under applicable law and regulation will not, by itself, be deemed to be a breach of this Section 3.07 if the Borrower files such financial statements within the time periods described in Sections 5.01 and 5.01 (b), as applicable.
Compliance with Laws and Agreements
SECTION 3.08. . Neither the Borrower nor any of its Subsidiaries is an "investment company" as defined in, or subject to regulation under, the Investment Company Act of 1940.
Investment Company Status
SECTION 3.09. . Each of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries has timely filed or caused to be filed all Tax returns and reports required to have been filed and has paid or caused to be paid all Taxes required to have been paid by it, except (a) Taxes that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as applicable, has set aside on its books adequate reserves or (b) to the extent that the failure to do so could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Taxes
SECTION 3.10. . No ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that, when taken together with all other such ERISA Events for which liability is reasonably expected to occur, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
ERISA
SECTION 3.11. . The Borrower has disclosed to the Lenders all agreements, instruments and corporate or other restrictions to which it or any of its Subsidiaries is subject, and all other matters known to it, that, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Information Memorandum nor any of the other reports, financial statements, certificates or other information (excluding pro formas, budgets, projections and general industry and economic information) furnished by or on behalf of the Borrower to the Administrative Agent or any Lender in connection with the negotiation of this Agreement or delivered hereunder (taken as a whole and as modified or supplemented by other information so furnished) contains any material misstatement of material fact or omits to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not materially misleading in light of the circumstances under which such statements are made; that, with respect to all forecasted financial information and projections, the Borrower represents only that such information was prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed to be reasonable at the time of preparation thereof (it being understood that actual results may differ from such forecasted financial information or projections and such differences may be material).
Disclosure
provided
SECTION 3.12. . No part of the proceeds of any Loan have been used or will be used, whether directly or indirectly, for any purpose that entails a violation of any of the Regulations of the Board, including Regulations T, U and X.
Federal Reserve Regulations
SECTION 3.13. . No Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing.
No Default
SECTION 4.01. . The obligations of the Lenders to make Loans and of the Issuing Bank to issue Letters of Credit hereunder shall not become effective until the date on which each of the following conditions is satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 9.02):
Effective Date
(a) The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received from (i) each party hereto either (A) a counterpart of this Agreement signed on behalf of such party or (B) written evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include telecopy or electronic transmission of a signed signature page of this Agreement) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Agreement and (ii) duly executed copies of the Loan Documents, all in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel and as further described in the list of closing documents attached as .
Exhibit E
(b) The Administrative Agent shall have received a favorable written opinion (addressed to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders and dated the Effective Date) of Paul Hastings LLP, counsel for the Borrower, substantially in the form of . The Borrower hereby requests such counsel to deliver such opinion.
Exhibit B
(c) The Administrative Agent shall have received such documents and certificates as the Administrative Agent or its counsel may reasonably request relating to the organization, existence and good standing of the initial Loan Parties, the authorization of the Transactions and any other legal matters relating to such Loan Parties, the Loan Documents or the Transactions, all in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel and as further described in the list of closing documents attached as .
Exhibit E
(d) The Administrative Agent shall have received all fees and other amounts due and payable on or prior to the Effective Date, including, to the extent invoiced, reimbursement or payment of all expenses required to be reimbursed or paid by the Borrower hereunder.
(e) The Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate, dated the Effective Date and signed by the President, a Vice President or a Financial Officer of the Borrower, confirming compliance with the conditions set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of Section 4.02.
The Administrative Agent shall notify the Borrower and the Lenders of the Effective Date, and such notice shall be conclusive and binding.
SECTION 4.02. . The obligation of each Lender to make a Loan on the occasion of any Borrowing (other than the conversion or continuation of any Loan), and of the Issuing Bank to issue, amend, renew or extend any Letter of Credit, is subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
Each Credit Event
(a) The representations and warranties of the Borrower set forth in this Agreement shall be true and correct in all material respects on and as of the date of such Borrowing or the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable (except any such representation or warranty that expressly relates to or is made expressly as of a specific earlier date, in which case such representation or warranty shall be true and correct in all material respects with respect to or as of such specific earlier date).
(b) At the time of and immediately after giving effect to such Borrowing or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
Each Borrowing (other than the conversion or continuation of any Loan) and each issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of a Letter of Credit shall be deemed to constitute a representation and warranty by the Borrower on the date thereof as to the matters specified in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this Section.
Until the Commitments have expired or been terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder shall have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit shall have expired, terminated or been cash collateralized in accordance herewith and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
SECTION 5.01. . The Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
Financial Statements and Other Information
(a) within the earlier of (x) the date on which such financial statements are delivered by the Borrower to the Securities and Exchange Commission and (y) one hundred twenty (120) days after the end of each fiscal year of the Borrower, its audited consolidated balance sheet and related statements of operations, stockholders' equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all reported on by KPMG LLP or other independent public accountants of recognized national standing (without a "going concern" or like qualification or exception and without any qualification or exception as to the scope of such audit) to the effect that such consolidated financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied;
(b) commencing with the first fiscal quarter ending after the Effective Date, within the earlier of (x) the date on which such financial statements are delivered by the Borrower to the Securities and Exchange Commission and (y) sixty (60) days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year of the Borrower, its consolidated balance sheet and related statements of operations, stockholders' equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such fiscal quarter and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year;
(c) (x) with respect to any delivery of financial statements under clause (a) above, on the earlier of (i) 15 days following the date on which the Borrower delivers such financial statements to the Securities and Exchange Commission and (ii) one hundred twenty (120) days after the end of each fiscal year of the Borrower and (y) with respect to any delivery of financial statements under clause (b) above commencing with the first fiscal quarter ending after the Effective Date, on the earlier of (i) 15 days following the date on which the Borrower delivers such financial statements to the Securities and Exchange Commission and (ii) sixty (60) days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year of the Borrower, a Compliance Certificate: (A) certifying (1) such quarterly financial statements as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes and (2) as to whether a Default has occurred and, if a Default has occurred, specifying the details thereof and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto, (B) setting forth reasonably detailed calculations demonstrating compliance with Section 6.11 and (C) stating whether any change in GAAP or in the application thereof has occurred since the date of the audited financial statements referred to in Section 3.04 and, if any such change has occurred, specifying the effect of such change on the financial statements accompanying such certificate;
(d) promptly after the same become publicly available, copies of all periodic and other reports, proxy statements and other materials filed by the Borrower or any Subsidiary with the Securities and Exchange Commission, or any Governmental Authority succeeding to any or all of the functions of said Commission other than Forms 3 and 4 and responses to inquiries of said commission, or with any national securities exchange, or distributed by the Borrower to its shareholders generally, as the case may be;
(e) not more than thirty (30) days after the end of each fiscal year of the Borrower, a copy of a budget (including a projected consolidated balance sheet, income statement and statement of cash flows) of the Borrower for the upcoming fiscal year in form reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent; and
(f) promptly following any request therefor, such other information regarding the operations, business affairs and financial condition of the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or compliance with the terms of this Agreement, as the Administrative Agent or any Lender may reasonably request.
The parties hereto acknowledge and agree that the forms of the financial statements filed by the Borrower with the Securities and Exchange Commission as part of its annual 10-K or quarterly 10-Q filings shall be satisfactory forms for purposes of complying with financial statement delivery requirements under Sections 5.01(a) and 5.01(b) respectively.
Documents required to be delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or (b) may be delivered electronically and if so delivered, shall be deemed to have been delivered on the date (i) on which the Borrower posts such documents, or provides a link thereto on the Borrower's website on the Internet; or (ii) on which such documents are posted on the Borrower's behalf on an Internet or intranet website, if any, to which each Lender and the Administrative Agent have access (whether a commercial, third-party website or whether sponsored by the Administrative Agent); that: (i) the Borrower shall deliver paper copies of such documents to the Administrative Agent or any Lender that requests the Borrower to deliver such paper copies until a written request to cease delivering paper copies is given by the Administrative Agent or such Lender and (ii) the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent and each Lender (by telecopier or electronic mail) of the posting of any such documents and, to the extent requested by the Administrative Agent, provide to the Administrative Agent by electronic mail electronic versions (, soft copies) of such documents. Notwithstanding anything contained herein, in every instance the Borrower shall be required to provide paper copies of the certificates required by Section 5.01(c) to the Administrative Agent. Except for such certificates, the Administrative Agent shall have no obligation to request the delivery or to maintain copies of the documents referred to above, and in any event shall have no responsibility to monitor compliance by the Borrower with any such request for delivery, and each Lender shall be solely responsible for requesting delivery to it or maintaining its copies of such documents.
provided
i.e.
SECTION 5.02. . The Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent for distribution to each Lender prompt written notice of the following:
Notices of Material Events
(a) the occurrence of any Default;
(b) the filing or commencement of any action, suit or proceeding by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority against or affecting the Borrower or any Affiliate thereof that, if adversely determined, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect;
(c) the occurrence of any ERISA Event that, alone or together with any other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect; and
(d) any other development that results in, or could reasonably be expected to result in, a Material Adverse Effect.
Each notice delivered under this Section shall be accompanied by a statement of a Financial Officer or other executive officer of the Borrower setting forth the details of the event or development requiring such notice and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
SECTION 5.03. . The Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, do or cause to be done all things necessary to preserve, renew and keep in full force and effect its legal existence and the rights, licenses, permits, privileges and franchises material to the conduct of its business; that the foregoing shall not prohibit any merger, consolidation, liquidation or dissolution permitted under Section 6.03.
Existence; Conduct of Business
provided
SECTION 5.04. . The Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, pay its Tax liabilities that, if not paid, could result in a Material Adverse Effect before the same shall become delinquent or in default, except where (a) the validity or amount thereof is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings, (b) the Borrower or such Subsidiary has set aside on its books adequate reserves with respect thereto in accordance with GAAP and (c) the failure to make payment pending such contest could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Payment of Obligations
SECTION 5.05. . The Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, (a) keep and maintain all property material to the conduct of its business in good working order and condition, ordinary wear and tear and casualty and condemnation excepted, and (b) maintain, with reputable insurance companies, insurance in such amounts and against such risks as are customarily maintained by companies engaged in the same or similar businesses operating in the same or similar locations.
Maintenance of Properties; Insurance
SECTION 5.06. . The Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, keep proper books of record and account in which full, true and correct entries in all material respects are made of all material dealings and transactions in relation to its business and activities. The Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, permit any representatives designated by the Administrative Agent (or any Lender present with the Administrative Agent), upon reasonable prior notice, to visit and inspect its properties, to examine and make extracts from its books and records, and to discuss its affairs, finances and condition with its officers and independent accountants (provided, that representatives of the Borrower shall be permitted to be present at all meeting with the Borrower's accountants), all at such reasonable times and as often as reasonably requested; , that as long as no Event of Default is then in effect and notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, all of the Lenders and the Administrative Agent shall be limited to one (1) such on-site inspection in the aggregate among all of them, and so long as no Event of Default is then in effect, the Borrower will have no obligations to reimburse any expense incurred in connection with any of the foregoing.
Books and Records; Inspection Rights
provided
SECTION 5.07. . The Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, (i) comply with all laws, rules, regulations and orders of any Governmental Authority applicable to it or its property (including without limitation Environmental Laws) and (ii) perform in all material respects its obligations under material agreements to which it is a party, in each case except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. The parties hereto acknowledge and agree that any failure to file financial statements with the Securities and Exchange Commission when required under applicable law and regulation will not, by itself, be deemed to be a breach of this Section 5.07 if the Borrower files such financial statements within the time periods described in Sections 5.01 and 5.01 (b), as applicable.
Compliance with Laws; Compliance with Agreements
SECTION 5.08. . The proceeds of the Loans will be used only to finance the working capital needs, and for general corporate purposes, including Permitted Acquisitions, refinancing existing Indebtedness, capital expenditures of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries and Restricted Payments permitted under this Agreement. No part of the proceeds of any Loan will be used, whether directly or indirectly, for any purpose that entails a violation of any of the regulations of the Board, including Regulations T, U and X.
Use of Proceeds and Letters of Credit
SECTION 5.09. . As promptly as possible but in any event within thirty (30) days (or such later date as may be agreed upon by the Administrative Agent) after any Person becomes a Subsidiary that qualifies as a Subsidiary Guarantor pursuant to the definition of "Material Domestic Subsidiary" or any Subsidiary qualifies independently as, or is designated by the Borrower or the Administrative Agent as, a Subsidiary Guarantor pursuant to the definition of "Material Domestic Subsidiary", the Borrower shall provide the Administrative Agent with written notice thereof and shall cause each such Subsidiary which also qualifies as a Material Domestic Subsidiary to deliver to the Administrative Agent the Subsidiary Guaranty (or a joinder thereto in a form contemplated thereby) pursuant to which such Subsidiary agrees to be bound by the terms and provisions thereof, such Subsidiary Guaranty to be accompanied by appropriate corporate resolutions, other corporate documentation and legal opinions in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel. If any Domestic Subsidiary acting as a Subsidiary Guarantor ceases to be a Material Domestic Subsidiary and/or is no longer required to act as a Subsidiary Guarantor pursuant to the definition of Material Domestic Subsidiary and this Section 5.09 (as demonstrated in each case to the reasonable satisfaction of the Administrative Agent), then such Subsidiary shall be released from the Subsidiary Guaranty promptly following the request of the Borrower.
Subsidiary Guaranty
Until the Commitments have expired or terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit have expired, terminated or been cash collateralized in accordance herewith and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
SECTION 6.01. . The Borrower will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Indebtedness, except:
Indebtedness
(a) Indebtedness created under the Loan Documents;
(b) Indebtedness existing on the date hereof and set forth in and extensions, renewals and replacements of any such Indebtedness with Indebtedness of a similar type that does not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof (other than by the amount of any accrued and unpaid expenses, fees and expenses);
Schedule 6.01
(c) intercompany Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.04(b);
(d) Guarantees by the Borrower of Indebtedness of any Subsidiary and by any Subsidiary of Indebtedness of the Borrower or any other Subsidiary;
(e) Indebtedness of the Borrower or any Subsidiary incurred to finance the acquisition, construction or improvement of any fixed or capital assets, including Capital Lease Obligations and any Indebtedness assumed in connection with the acquisition of any such assets or secured by a Lien on any such assets (and the proceeds thereof) prior to, or within 90 days after, the acquisition thereof (including the acquisition of such assets through the purchase of capital stock or other equity interests of a Person holding such assets), and extensions, renewals and replacements of any such Indebtedness that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof (other than by the amount of any accrued and unpaid expenses, fees and expenses); that (i) such Indebtedness is incurred prior to or within ninety (90) days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement and (ii) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (e) shall not exceed $30,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
(f) Indebtedness of the Borrower or any Subsidiary as an account party in respect of trade letters of credit;
(g) Indebtedness of the Borrower or any Subsidiary Guarantor secured by a Lien on any asset of the Borrower or any Subsidiary; that the aggregate outstanding principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (g) shall not in the aggregate exceed $25,000,000 at any time;
provided
(h) obligations of the Borrower or any Subsidiary arising under any Swap Agreement permitted under Section 6.05.
(i) Indebtedness of any Subsidiary of the Borrower which is not a Subsidiary Guarantor; that the aggregate outstanding principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (i) shall not in the aggregate exceed $30,000,000 at any time;
provided
(j) other unsecured Indebtedness (including unsecured Subordinated Indebtedness) of the Borrower or any Subsidiary Guarantor not otherwise permitted by this Section 6.01 so long as the Borrower is in compliance, on a Pro Forma Basis after giving effect to the incurrence of such Indebtedness, with the financial covenants contained in Section 6.11;
(k) contingent liabilities arising out of endorsements of checks and other negotiable instruments for deposit or collection in the ordinary course of business;
(l) Indebtedness incurred in the ordinary course of business in connection with the financing of insurance premiums; and
(m) Indebtedness incurred in the ordinary course of business relating to overdraft protection and netting services.
SECTION 6.02. . The Borrower will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any property or asset now owned or hereafter acquired by it, except:
Liens
(a) Permitted Encumbrances;
(b) any Lien on any property or asset of the Borrower or any Subsidiary existing on the date hereof and set forth in ; provided that (i) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or asset of the Borrower or any Subsidiary and (ii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the date hereof and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof (plus the amount of any accrued and unpaid expenses, fees and expenses);
Schedule 6.02
(c) any Lien existing on any property or asset prior to the acquisition thereof by the Borrower or any Subsidiary or existing on any property or asset of any Person that becomes a Subsidiary after the date hereof prior to the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary; provided that (i) such Lien is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such acquisition or such Person becoming a Subsidiary, as the case may be, (ii) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or assets of the Borrower or any Subsidiary (excluding by way of merger) and (iii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the date of such acquisition or the date such Person becomes a Subsidiary, as the case may be, and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof (plus the amount of any accrued and unpaid expenses, fees and expenses);
(d) Liens on fixed or capital assets acquired, constructed or improved by the Borrower or any Subsidiary; that (i) such security interests secure Indebtedness permitted by clause (e) of Section 6.01, (ii) such security interests and the Indebtedness secured thereby are incurred prior to or within ninety (90) days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement and (iii) such security interests shall not apply to any other property or assets of the Borrower or any Subsidiary (other than proceeds of such fixed or capital asset);
provided
(e) Liens in connection with Indebtedness permitted by clauses (g) or (i) of Section 6.01;
(f) Liens securing Indebtedness owed to the Borrower or any Subsidiary Guarantor by any Subsidiary that is not a Domestic Subsidiary;
(g) rights of holders of notes or debentures issued by the Borrower or any Subsidiary in deposits placed in trust to legally or "in substance" defease such notes or debentures;
(h) Liens consisting of pledges of cash collateral or government securities to secure, on a mark-to-market basis, obligations under Swap Agreements, so long as the aggregate value of such collateral does not exceed $7,500,000 at any one time outstanding;
(i) Liens arising from filing precautionary Uniform Commercial Code financing statements regarding leases;
(j) Liens solely on any cash earnest money deposits made by the Borrower or any Subsidiary in connection with any letter of intent or purchase agreement permitted hereunder;
(k) Liens on insurance proceeds and premium rebates incurred in the ordinary course of business in connection with the financing of insurance premiums;
(l) Liens in favor of customs and revenue authorities which secure payment of customs duties in connection with the importation of goods; and
(m) other Liens not specifically listed above securing obligations (not constituting Indebtedness for borrowed money) not to exceed $1,000,000 outstanding at any one time in the aggregate.
SECTION 6.03. . (a) The Borrower will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, merge into or consolidate with any other Person, or permit any other Person to merge into or consolidate with it, or sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of (in one transaction or in a series of transactions) all or any of its assets, or any of the Equity Interests of any of its Subsidiaries (in each case, whether now owned or hereafter acquired), or liquidate or dissolve:
Fundamental Changes
(i) any Subsidiary or other Person may merge into the Borrower in a transaction in which the Borrower is the surviving corporation;
(ii) any Subsidiary or Person may merge into any Subsidiary in a transaction in which the surviving entity is a Subsidiary (provided that any such merger involving a Subsidiary Guarantor must result in a Subsidiary Guarantor as the surviving entity); that any such merger involving a Person that is not a wholly owned Subsidiary immediately prior to such merger shall not be permitted unless also permitted by Section 6.04;
provided
(iii) the Borrower or any Subsidiary may sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of its assets to the Borrower or to another Loan Party;
(iv) any Subsidiary may liquidate or dissolve if the Borrower determines in good faith that such liquidation or dissolution is in the best interests of the Borrower and is not materially disadvantageous to the Lenders;
(v) the Borrower and its Subsidiaries may (A) sell inventory and excess damaged, obsolete or worn out assets, in each case in the ordinary course of business, (B) make payments for property and services used by the Borrower or any Subsidiary in the ordinary course of business, (C) the sale or other disposition of cash and Permitted Investments and the unwinding of Swap Agreements, (D) make any disposition resulting from a casualty or condemnation of property or assets and (E) make any disposition of overdue accounts receivable in the ordinary course of business in connection with the compromise or collection thereof;
(vi) the Borrower and its Subsidiaries may enter into Sale and Leaseback Transactions permitted under Section 6.10;
(vii) the Borrower or any Subsidiary may sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of its assets so long as the assets sold or disposed of pursuant to this clause (vii) in any fiscal year of the Borrower do not exceed, in the aggregate, ten percent (10%) of Consolidated Total Assets as of the beginning of such fiscal year;
(viii) loans, advances, guarantees and investments in joint ventures to the extent any such joint venture is engaged in a business satisfying the requirements of Section 6.03(b);
(ix) dispositions of assets expressly permitted by Sections 6.02, 6.04, 6.06 or 6.07;
(x) leases, licenses, subleases or sublicenses entered into in the ordinary course of business, to the extent they do not materially interfere with the business of the Borrower or any Subsidiary.
(b) The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, engage to any material extent in any business other than businesses of the type conducted by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries on the date of execution of this Agreement and businesses reasonably related thereto.
SECTION 6.04. . The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, purchase, hold or acquire (including pursuant to any merger or consolidation with any Person that was not a wholly owned Subsidiary prior to such merger or consolidation) any capital stock, evidences of indebtedness or other securities (including any option, warrant or other right to acquire any of the foregoing) of, make or permit to exist any loans or advances to, Guarantee any obligations of, or make or permit to exist any investment or any other interest in, any other Person, or purchase or otherwise acquire (in one transaction or a series of transactions) any Person or any assets of any other Person constituting a business unit, except:
Loans, Advances, Guarantees and Acquisitions
(a) Permitted Acquisitions;
(b) (i) loans, advances or other investments made by the Borrower to any Subsidiary Guarantor and made by any Subsidiary Guarantor to the Borrower or any other Subsidiary Guarantor, (ii) loans, advances or other investments made by any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party to another Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party or to any Loan Party and (iii) investments by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries in their respective Subsidiaries outstanding on the date hereof;
(c) Guarantees constituting Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01;
(d) loans and advances made by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries to their officers and employees for moving, relocation and travel expenses and other similar expenditures, in each case in the ordinary course of business, so long as the aggregate outstanding principal amount thereof does not exceed $1,000,000 at any time;
(e) Swap Obligations arising under Swap Agreements permitted under Section 6.05;
(f) Permitted Investments;
(g) investments (including debt obligations) received in connection with (i) the bankruptcy or reorganization of suppliers and customers and in good faith settlement of delinquent obligations of, and other disputes with, customers and suppliers arising in the ordinary course of business and (ii) the disposition of assets permitted under Section 6.03;
(h) loans by the Borrower to officers, directors and employees of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries in connection with their purchase of capital stock of the Borrower, so long as no cash is paid by the Borrower to any such Persons in connection with such purchase;
(i) transactions permitted under Section 6.03(a)(viii);
(j) so long as no Default exists or would occur after giving effect thereto, other investments not otherwise permitted by clauses (a) through (i) above in an aggregate outstanding principal amount not to exceed $40,000,000 at any time;
(k) other loans, advances and guarantees not otherwise permitted by this Section 6.04 so long as the aggregate outstanding principal amount thereof does not exceed $40,000,000 at any time;
(l) Guarantees of obligations of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries (to the extent such obligations do not constitute Indebtedness);
(m) deposits and pledges permitted under Section 6.02;
(n) investments consisting of extensions of credit in the nature of accounts receivable or notes receivable from the grant of trade credit in the ordinary course of business;
(o) certificates of deposit of the type not otherwise described in the definition of Permitted Investments and in an aggregate amount not to exceed $250,000 (plus interest accrued thereon) at any time; and
(p) Investments existing on the Effective Date set forth on .
Schedule 6.04
SECTION 6.05. . The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, enter into any Swap Agreement, except (a) Swap Agreements entered into to hedge or mitigate risks to which the Borrower or any Subsidiary has actual exposure (other than those in respect of Equity Interests of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries), and (b) Swap Agreements entered into in order to effectively cap, collar or exchange interest rates (from fixed to floating rates, from one floating rate to another floating rate or otherwise) with respect to any interest-bearing liability or investment of the Borrower or any Subsidiary.
Swap Agreements
SECTION 6.06. . The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, sell, lease or otherwise transfer any property or assets to, or purchase, lease or otherwise acquire any property or assets from, or otherwise engage in any other transactions with, any of its Affiliates, except (a) in the ordinary course of business at prices and on terms and conditions not less favorable to the Borrower or such Subsidiary than could be obtained on an arm's-length basis from unrelated third parties, (b) transactions between or among the Borrower and its wholly owned Subsidiaries not involving any other Affiliate, (c) transactions permitted under Sections 6.01, 6.02 and 6.04, (d) any transaction with any joint venture described in Section 6.03(viii) to the extent the Borrower or Subsidiary in good faith believes that such transaction is reasonably advisable to facilitate the operations of such joint venture and the financial returns to the Borrower and its Subsidiaries and (e) any Restricted Payment permitted by Section 6.07.
Transactions with Affiliates
SECTION 6.07. . The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, declare or make, or agree to pay or make, directly or indirectly, any Restricted Payment, except (a) the Borrower may declare and pay dividends with respect to its Equity Interests payable solely in additional shares of its common stock or payable solely in shares of that class of Equity Interests to the holders of that class, (b) Subsidiaries may declare and pay dividends ratably with respect to their Equity Interests, (c) the Borrower may make Restricted Payments pursuant to and in accordance with stock option plans or other benefit plans for management or employees of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, (d) the Borrower and its Subsidiaries may make any other Restricted Payment so long as (i) no Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing or would arise after giving effect thereto and (ii) the Borrower and the Subsidiaries are in compliance on a Pro Forma Basis, both before and immediately after giving effect to such Restricted Payment, with the covenants contained in Section 6.11, (e) repurchases of Equity Interests in the Borrower deemed to occur upon exercise of stock options, warrants or other rights to acquire Equity Interests if such Equity Interests represent a portion of the exercise price of such options or warrants; and (f) the payment of any dividend or distribution within 60 days after the declaration thereof, if at the date of declaration such payment would have complied with the provisions of this Agreement.
Restricted Payments
SECTION 6.08. . The Borrower will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly voluntarily prepay, defease or in substance defease, purchase, redeem, retire or otherwise acquire prior to its stated maturity, any Subordinated Indebtedness, or any Indebtedness from time to time outstanding under the Subordinated Indebtedness Documents, at any time prior to the Maturity Date (except to the extent permitted under the applicable subordination agreement governing such Subordinated Indebtedness). Furthermore, the Borrower will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, amend the Subordinated Indebtedness Documents or any document, agreement or instrument evidencing any Indebtedness incurred pursuant to the Subordinated Indebtedness Documents (or any replacements, substitutions, extensions or renewals thereof) or pursuant to which such Indebtedness is issued in any manner which is adverse in any material respect to the Administrative Agent or the Lenders, without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent (except to the extent permitted under the applicable subordination agreement governing such Subordinated Indebtedness).
Subordinated Indebtedness and Amendments to Subordinated Indebtedness Documents
SECTION 6.09. . The Borrower will not, nor will it permit any of its Subsidiaries to, change its fiscal year from the basis in effect on the Effective Date.
Changes in Fiscal Year
SECTION 6.10. . The Borrower shall not, nor shall it permit any Subsidiary to, enter into any Sale and Leaseback Transaction, other than Sale and Leaseback Transactions (a) in respect of which the net cash proceeds received in connection therewith does not exceed $25,000,000 in the aggregate during any fiscal year of the Borrower, determined on a consolidated basis for the Borrower and its Subsidiaries or (b) relating to property (i) owned by the Borrower or a Subsidiary for less then 180 days prior to the consummation of such Sale and Leaseback Transaction or (ii) otherwise acquired with the intention of making it subject to a Sale and Leaseback Transaction.
Sale and Leaseback Transactions
SECTION 6.11. .
Financial Covenants
(a) . The Borrower will not permit the ratio (the ""), determined as of the end of each of its fiscal quarters ending on and after the Effective Date, of (i) Consolidated Total Indebtedness to (ii) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of four (4) consecutive fiscal quarters ending with the end of such fiscal quarter, all calculated for the Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, to be greater than 3.25 to 1.0.
Maximum Leverage Ratio
Leverage Ratio
(b) . The Borrower will not permit the ratio (the ""), determined as of the end of each of its fiscal quarters ending on and after the Effective Date, of (i) Consolidated EBITDA to (ii) Consolidated Interest Expense paid or payable in cash, in each case, for the period of four (4) consecutive fiscal quarters ending with the end of such fiscal quarter, all calculated for the Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, to be less than 3.0 to 1.0.
Minimum Interest Coverage Ratio
Interest Coverage Ratio
If any of the following events ("") shall occur:
Events of Default
(a) the Borrower shall fail to pay any principal of any Loan or any reimbursement obligation in respect of any LC Disbursement when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at the due date thereof or at a date fixed for prepayment thereof or otherwise;
(b) the Borrower shall fail to pay any interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount (other than an amount referred to in clause (a) of this Article) payable under this Agreement or any other Loan Document, when and as the same shall become due and payable, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of three (3) Business Days;
(c) any representation or warranty made or deemed made by or on behalf of the Borrower or any Subsidiary in or in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any amendment or modification hereof or thereof or waiver hereunder or thereunder, or in any report, certificate, financial statement or other document furnished pursuant to or in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any amendment or modification thereof or waiver thereunder (other than forecasted financial information and projections), shall prove to have been incorrect in any material respect when made or deemed made;
(d) (i) the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in Section 5.02, 5.03 (with respect to the Borrower's existence), 5.08 or 5.09 or in Article VI or (ii) any Loan Document shall for any reason not be or shall cease to be in full force and effect with respect to any Loan Party or is declared to be null and void, or any Loan Party takes any action for the purpose of terminating, repudiating or rescinding any Loan Document or any of its obligations thereunder;
(e) the Borrower or any Subsidiary Guarantor, as applicable, shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in this Agreement (other than those specified in clause (a), (b) or (d) of this Article) or any other Loan Document, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of thirty (30) days after notice thereof from the Administrative Agent to the Borrower (which notice will be given at the request of any Lender);
(f) the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall fail to make any payment (whether of principal or interest and regardless of amount) in respect of any Material Indebtedness (other than Indebtedness incurred under this Agreement), when and as the same shall become due and payable (after giving effect to any grace period thereunder), and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of five (5) Business Days;
(g) any event or condition occurs that results in any Material Indebtedness becoming due prior to its scheduled maturity or that enables or permits (with or without the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both) the holder or holders of any Material Indebtedness or any trustee or agent on its or their behalf (after giving effect to any grace period thereunder) to cause any Material Indebtedness to become due, or to require the prepayment, repurchase, redemption or defeasance thereof, prior to its scheduled maturity; that this clause (g) shall not apply to secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of the voluntary sale or transfer or involuntary disposition of the property or assets securing such Indebtedness;
provided
(h) an involuntary proceeding shall be commenced or an involuntary petition shall be filed seeking (i) liquidation, reorganization or other relief in respect of the Borrower or any Subsidiary or its debts, or of a substantial part of its assets, under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect or (ii) the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for the Borrower or any Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, and, in any such case, such proceeding or petition shall continue undismissed for sixty (60) days or an order or decree approving or ordering any of the foregoing shall be entered;
(i) the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall (i) voluntarily commence any proceeding or file any petition seeking liquidation, reorganization or other relief under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect, (ii) consent to the institution of, or fail to contest in a timely and appropriate manner, any proceeding or petition described in clause (h) of this Article, (iii) apply for or consent to the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for the Borrower or any Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, (iv) file an answer admitting the material allegations of a petition filed against it in any such proceeding, (v) make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors or (vi) take any action for the purpose of effecting any of the foregoing;
(j) the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall become unable, admit in writing its inability or fail generally to pay its debts as they become due;
(k) one or more judgments for the payment of money in an aggregate amount in excess of $20,000,000 shall be rendered against the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any combination thereof and the same shall remain undischarged for a period of thirty (30) consecutive days during which execution shall not be effectively stayed, or a judgment creditor shall obtain a levy upon or seize any assets of the Borrower or any Subsidiary to enforce any such judgment;
(l) an ERISA Event shall have occurred that, in the reasonable opinion of the Required Lenders, when taken together with all other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect; or
(m) a Change in Control shall occur;
then, and in every such event (other than an event with respect to the Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article), and at any time thereafter during the continuance of such event, the Administrative Agent may, and at the request of the Required Lenders shall, by notice to the Borrower, take either or both of the following actions, at the same or different times: (i) terminate the Commitments, and thereupon the Commitments shall terminate immediately, and (ii) declare the Loans then outstanding to be due and payable in whole (or in part, in which case any principal not so declared to be due and payable may thereafter be declared to be due and payable), and thereupon the principal of the Loans so declared to be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other Obligations of the Borrower accrued hereunder and under the other Loan Documents, shall become due and payable immediately, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower; and in case of any event with respect to the Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article, the Commitments shall automatically terminate and the principal of the Loans then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other Obligations accrued hereunder and under the other Loan Documents, shall automatically become due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower.
Each of the Lenders and the Issuing Bank hereby irrevocably appoints the Administrative Agent as its agent and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions on its behalf, including execution of the other Loan Documents, and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms of the Loan Documents, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.
The bank serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender as any other Lender and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent, and such bank and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to and generally engage in any kind of business with the Borrower or any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof as if it were not the Administrative Agent hereunder.
The Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth in the Loan Documents. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (a) the Administrative Agent shall not be subject to any fiduciary or other implied duties, regardless of whether a Default has occurred and is continuing, (b) the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or exercise any discretionary powers, except discretionary rights and powers expressly contemplated by the Loan Documents that the Administrative Agent is required to exercise in writing as directed by the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 9.02), and (c) except as expressly set forth in the Loan Documents, the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to disclose, and shall not be liable for the failure to disclose, any information relating to the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries that is communicated to or obtained by the bank serving as Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates in any capacity. The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 9.02) or in the absence of its own gross negligence or willful misconduct. The Administrative Agent shall be deemed not to have knowledge of any Default unless and until written notice thereof is given to the Administrative Agent by the Borrower or a Lender, and the Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in or in connection with any Loan Document, (ii) the contents of any certificate, report or other document delivered hereunder or in connection with any Loan Document, (iii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth in any Loan Document, (iv) the validity, enforceability, effectiveness or genuineness of any Loan Document or any other agreement, instrument or document, or (v) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in Article IV or elsewhere in any Loan Document, other than to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent.
The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely upon, and shall not incur any liability for relying upon, any notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or sent by the proper Person. The Administrative Agent also may rely upon any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to be made by the proper Person, and shall not incur any liability for relying thereon. The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Borrower), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts.
The Administrative Agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers by or through any one or more sub-agents appointed by the Administrative Agent. The Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers through their respective Related Parties. The exculpatory provisions of the preceding paragraphs shall apply to any such sub-agent and to the Related Parties of the Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent, and shall apply to their respective activities in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein as well as activities as Administrative Agent.
Subject to the appointment and acceptance of a successor Administrative Agent as provided in this paragraph, the Administrative Agent may resign at any time by notifying the Lenders, the Issuing Bank and the Borrower. Upon any such resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right subject, at any time at which no Event of Default is in effect, to the prior written consent of the Borrower (which shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed), in consultation with the Borrower, to appoint a successor. If no successor shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within thirty (30) days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agent may, on behalf of the Lenders and the Issuing Bank, appoint a successor Administrative Agent which shall be a bank with an office in New York, New York, or an Affiliate of any such bank. Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder by a successor, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring Administrative Agent, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder. The fees payable by the Borrower to a successor Administrative Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed between the Borrower and such successor. After the Administrative Agent's resignation hereunder, the provisions of this Article and Section 9.03 shall continue in effect for the benefit of such retiring Administrative Agent, its sub-agents and their respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while it was acting as Administrative Agent.
Each Lender acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement. Each Lender also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking action under or based upon this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any related agreement or any document furnished hereunder or thereunder.
None of the Lenders, if any, identified in this Agreement as a Co-Syndication Agent shall have any right, power, obligation, liability, responsibility or duty under this Agreement other than those applicable to all Lenders as such. Without limiting the foregoing, none of such Lenders shall have or be deemed to have a fiduciary relationship with any Lender. Each Lender hereby makes the same acknowledgments with respect to the relevant Lenders in their respective capacities as Co-Syndication Agents as it makes with respect to the Administrative Agent in the preceding paragraph.
SECTION 9.01. . (a) Except in the case of notices and other communications expressly permitted to be given by telephone (and subject to paragraph (b) below), all notices and other communications provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or overnight courier service, mailed by certified or registered mail or sent by telecopy, as follows:
Notices
(i) if to the Borrower, to it at 9705 Patuxent Woods Drive, Columbia, Maryland 21046, Attention of Richard Surratt, Chief Financial Officer (Telecopy No. (410) 312-8613; Telephone No. (410) 312-8000), with a copy (in the case of a notice of Default) to: Paul Hastings LLP, 191 N. Wacker, 30th Floor, Chicago, IL 60606, Attention of Louis Hernandez (Telecopy No. (312-499-6100);
(ii) if to the Administrative Agent, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Loan and Agency Services Group, 10 South Dearborn Street, Floor 07, Attention of Margaret Seweryn (Telecopy No. (312) 385-7098), with a copy to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., 277 Park Avenue, 23 Floor, New York, New York 10172, Attention of Anthony Galea (Telecopy No. (866) 682-7113);
rd
(iii) if to the Issuing Bank, to it at JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Loan and Agency Services Group, 10 South Dearborn Street, Floor 07, Attention of Margaret Seweryn (Telecopy No. (312) 385-7098);
(iv) if to the Swingline Lender, to it at JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Loan and Agency Services Group, 10 South Dearborn Street, Floor 07, Attention of Margaret Seweryn (Telecopy No. (312) 385-7098); and
(v) if to any other Lender, to it at its address (or telecopy number) set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire.
(b) Notices and other communications to the Lenders hereunder may be delivered or furnished by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent; provided that the foregoing shall not apply to notices pursuant to Article II unless otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent and the applicable Lender. The Administrative Agent or the Borrower may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it; provided that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications.
(c) Any party hereto may change its address or telecopy number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other parties hereto. All notices and other communications given to any party hereto in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement shall be deemed to have been given on the date of receipt.
SECTION 9.02. . (a) No failure or delay by the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender in exercising any right or power hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power. The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and the Lenders hereunder and under the other Loan Documents are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have. No waiver of any provision of this Agreement or consent to any departure by the Borrower therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the making of a Loan or issuance of a Letter of Credit shall not be construed as a waiver of any Default, regardless of whether the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the Issuing Bank may have had notice or knowledge of such Default at the time.
Waivers; Amendments
(b) Neither this Agreement nor any provision hereof may be waived, amended or modified except pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Borrower and the Required Lenders or by the Borrower and the Administrative Agent with the consent of the Required Lenders; that no such agreement shall (i) increase the Commitment of any Lender without the written consent of such Lender, (ii) reduce the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement or reduce the rate of interest thereon (other than the waiver or termination of the application of the default rate of interest contemplated by Section 2.13(c)), or reduce any fees payable hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender directly affected thereby, (iii) postpone the scheduled date of payment of the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement, or any interest thereon, or any fees payable hereunder, or reduce the amount of, waive or excuse any such payment, or postpone the scheduled date of expiration of any Commitment, without the written consent of each Lender directly affected thereby, (iv) change Section 2.18(b) or (c) in a manner that would alter the pro rata sharing of payments required thereby, without the written consent of each Lender, (v) change any of the provisions of this Section or the definition of "Required Lenders" or any other provision hereof specifying the number or percentage of Lenders required to waive, amend or modify any rights hereunder or make any determination or grant any consent hereunder without the written consent of each Lender or (vi) release all or substantially all of the Subsidiary Guarantors from their obligations under the Subsidiary Guaranty, without the written consent of each Lender; that no such agreement shall amend, modify or otherwise affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender hereunder without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, as the case may be.
provided
provided
further
(c) If, in connection with any proposed waiver, amendment or modification of any of the provisions of this Agreement as contemplated by clauses (i) through (vi) of Section 9.02(b), the consent of the Required Lenders is obtained but the consent of one or more of such other Lenders whose consent is required is not obtained, then the Borrower may, at its sole expense and effort, upon notice to such Lender and the Administrative Agent, require such Lender to assign and delegate, without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in ), all its interests, rights and obligations under this Agreement to an assignee that shall assume such obligations (which assignee may be another Lender, if a Lender accepts such assignment) and shall grant its consent to the proposed waiver, amendment or modification; , that (i) the Borrower shall have received the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent (and if a Commitment is being assigned, the Issuing Bank), which consent shall not unreasonably be withheld, and (ii) such Lender shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans, accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder, from the assignee (to the extent of such outstanding principal and accrued interest and fees) or the Borrower (in the case of all other amounts).
Section 9.04
provided
(d) Notwithstanding the foregoing, this Agreement and any other Loan Document may be amended (or amended and restated) with the written consent of the Required Lenders, the Administrative Agent and the Borrower to each relevant Loan Document (x) to add one or more credit facilities to this Agreement and to permit extensions of credit from time to time outstanding thereunder and the accrued interest and fees in respect thereof to share ratably in the benefits of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents with the Revolving Loans and the accrued interest and fees in respect thereof and (y) to include appropriately the Lenders holding such credit facilities in any determination of the Required Lenders and Lenders; , that for the avoidance of doubt, this Section 9.02(d) shall not be deemed to refer to increases in Commitments effected pursuant to Section 2.20.
provided
(e) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein the Administrative Agent may, with the consent of the Borrower only, amend, modify or supplement this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents to cure any ambiguity, omission, mistake, defect or inconsistency.
SECTION 9.03. . (a) The Borrower shall pay (i) all reasonable and documented out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent and its Affiliates, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel for the Administrative Agent, in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein, the preparation and administration of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions hereof or thereof (whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby shall be consummated), (ii) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Issuing Bank in connection with the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any demand for payment thereunder and (iii) all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender, in connection with the enforcement or protection of its rights in connection with this Agreement and any other Loan Document, including its rights under this Section, or in connection with the Loans made or Letters of Credit issued hereunder, including all such out-of-pocket expenses incurred during any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans or Letters of Credit; , however, that in no event shall the Borrower be required to reimburse the Lenders for more than one counsel to the Administrative Agent (and up to one local counsel in each applicable jurisdiction and regulatory counsel) and one counsel for all of the other Lenders (and up to one local counsel in each applicable jurisdiction and regulatory counsel), unless a Lender or its counsel determines that it would create actual or potential conflicts of interest to not have individual counsel, in which case each Lender may have its own counsel which shall be reimbursed in accordance with the foregoing.
Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver
provided
(b) The Borrower shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and each Lender, and each Related Party of any of the foregoing Persons (each such Person being called an "") against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related expenses, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee, incurred by or asserted against any Indemnitee arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the execution or delivery of any Loan Document or any agreement or instrument contemplated thereby, the performance by the parties hereto of their respective obligations thereunder or the consummation of the Transactions or any other transactions contemplated hereby, (ii) any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds therefrom (including any refusal by the Issuing Bank to honor a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit if the documents presented in connection with such demand do not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit), (iii) any actual or alleged presence or release of Hazardous Materials on or from any property owned or operated by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, or any Environmental Liability related in any way to the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory, whether brought by a third party or by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto; that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by final and nonappealable judgment to have resulted from (i) the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnitee or that of its Related Parties or (ii) a material breach in bad faith of the express obligations of such Indemnitee under the Loan Documents pursuant to a claim made by the Borrower. No claim may be made under this Section 9.03(b) for the payment of any expense that is not otherwise reimbursable under Section 9.03(a).
Indemnitee
provided
(c) To the extent that the Borrower fails to pay any amount required to be paid by it to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender under paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section, each Lender severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, as the case may be, such Lender's Applicable Percentage (determined as of the time that the applicable unreimbursed expense or indemnity payment is sought) of such unpaid amount (it being understood that the Borrower's failure to pay any such amount shall not relieve the Borrower of any default in the payment thereof); that the unreimbursed expense or indemnified loss, claim, damage, liability or related expense, as the case may be, was incurred by or asserted against the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender in its capacity as such.
provided
(d) To the extent permitted by applicable law, no party hereto shall assert, and each party hereto hereby waives, any claim against any other party hereto, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby or thereby, the Transactions, any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof; that nothing contained in this sentence shall limit the Borrower's obligations under Section 9.03.
provided
(e) All amounts due under this Section shall be payable not later than fifteen (15) days after written demand therefor.
SECTION 9.04. . (a) The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of the Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit), except that (i) the Borrower may not assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of each Lender (and any attempted assignment or transfer by the Borrower without such consent shall be null and void) and (ii) no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer its rights or obligations hereunder except in accordance with this Section. Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person (other than the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of the Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit), Participants (to the extent provided in paragraph (c) of this Section) and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the Related Parties of each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and the Lenders) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
Successors and Assigns
(b) (i) Subject to the conditions set forth in paragraph (b)(ii) below, any Lender may assign to one or more assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it) with the prior written consent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld, it being understood and agreed that it shall be reasonable for the Borrower to withhold consent for an assignment to an assignee if such assignee is a Foreign Lender which would require the Borrower to withhold amounts in respect of interest payments to such Foreign Lender) of:
(A) the Borrower (provided that the Borrower shall be deemed to have consented to any such assignment unless it shall object thereto by written notice to the Administrative Agent within five (5) Business Days after having received notice thereof); provided, further, that no consent of the Borrower shall be required for an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender, an Approved Fund or, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, any other assignee;
(B) the Administrative Agent; and
(C) the Issuing Bank.
(ii) Assignments shall be subject to the following additional conditions:
(A) except in the case of an assignment to a Lender or an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund or an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lender's Commitment or Loans of any Class, the amount of the Commitment or Loans of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent) shall not be less than $5,000,000 unless each of the Borrower and the Administrative Agent otherwise consent, that no such consent of the Borrower shall be required if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing;
provided
(B) each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement, provided that this clause shall not be construed to prohibit the assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lender's rights and obligations in respect of one Class of Commitments or Loans;
(C) the parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500 payable by either the assignee or assignor;
(D) the assignee, if it shall not be a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire in which the assignee designates one or more credit contacts to whom all syndicate-level information (which may contain material non-public information about the Borrower and its affiliates and their Related Parties or their respective securities) will be made available and who may receive such information in accordance with the assignee's compliance procedures and applicable laws, including Federal and state securities laws; and
(E) the assignee shall not be a natural person or the Borrower or any Subsidiary or Affiliate of the Borrower.
For the purposes of this Section 9.04(b), the term "" has the following meaning:
Approved Fund
"" means any Person (other than a natural person) that is engaged in making, purchasing, holding or investing in bank loans and similar extensions of credit in the ordinary course of its business and that is administered or managed by (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender or (c) an entity or an Affiliate of an entity that administers or manages a Lender.
Approved Fund
(iii) Subject to acceptance and recording thereof pursuant to paragraph (b)(iv) of this Section, from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption the assignee thereunder shall be a party hereto and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03). Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this Section 9.04 shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Section.
(iv) The Administrative Agent, acting for this purpose as an agent of the Borrower, shall maintain at one of its offices a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Commitment of, and principal amount of the Loans and LC Disbursements owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the ""). The entries in the Register shall be conclusive, and the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and the Lenders may treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary. The Register shall be available for inspection by the Borrower, the Issuing Bank and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
Register
(v) Upon its receipt of a duly completed Assignment and Assumption executed by an assigning Lender and an assignee, the assignee's completed Administrative Questionnaire (unless the assignee shall already be a Lender hereunder), the processing and recordation fee referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section and any written consent to such assignment required by paragraph (b) of this Section, the Administrative Agent shall accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information contained therein in the Register; that if either the assigning Lender or the assignee shall have failed to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to Section 2.05(c), 2.06(d) or (e), 2.07(b), 2.18(d) or 9.03(c), the Administrative Agent shall have no obligation to accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information therein in the Register unless and until such payment shall have been made in full, together with all accrued interest thereon. No assignment shall be effective for purposes of this Agreement unless it has been recorded in the Register as provided in this paragraph.
provided
(c) (i) Any Lender may, without the consent of the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, sell participations to one or more banks or other entities (a "") in all or a portion of such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans owing to it); provided that (A) such Lender's obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (B) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (C) the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and the other Lenders shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement. Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce this Agreement and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first proviso to Section 9.02(b) that affects such Participant. Subject to paragraph (c)(ii) of this Section, the Borrower agrees that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.15, 2.16 and 2.17 to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to paragraph (b) of this Section. To the extent permitted by law, each Participant also shall be entitled to the benefits of Section 9.08 as though it were a Lender, provided such Participant agrees to be subject to Section 2.18(c) as though it were a Lender.
Participant
provided
(ii) A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under Section 2.15 or 2.17 than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Borrower's prior written consent. A Participant that would be a Foreign Lender if it were a Lender shall not be entitled to the benefits of Section 2.17 unless the Borrower is notified of the participation sold to such Participant and such Participant agrees, for the benefit of the Borrower, to comply with Section 2.17(e) and be subject to Section 2.17(f) as though it were a Lender (it being understood that the documentation required under Section 2.17(e) shall be delivered to the participating Lender). Each Lender that sells a participation shall, acting solely for this purpose as an agent of the Borrower, maintain a register on which it enters the name and address of each Participant and the principal amounts (and stated interest) of each Participant's interest in the obligations under this Agreement (the "Participant Register"); that no Lender shall have any obligation to disclose all or any portion of the Participant Register to any Person (including the identity of any Participant or any information relating to a Participant's interest in the obligations under this Agreement) except to the extent that such disclosure is necessary to establish that such interest is in registered form under Section 5f.103-1(c) of the United States Treasury Regulations. The entries in the Participant Register shall be conclusive absent manifest error, and such Lender shall treat each person whose name is recorded in the Participant Register as the owner of such participation for all purposes of this Agreement notwithstanding any notice to the contrary.
provided
(d) Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including without limitation any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank, and this Section shall not apply to any such pledge or assignment of a security interest; provided that no such pledge or assignment of a security interest shall release a Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
SECTION 9.05. . All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Loan Parties in the Loan Documents and in the certificates or other instruments delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be considered to have been relied upon by the other parties hereto and shall survive the execution and delivery of the Loan Documents and the making of any Loans and issuance of any Letters of Credit, regardless of any investigation made by any such other party or on its behalf and notwithstanding that the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or incorrect representation or warranty at the time any credit is extended hereunder, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount payable under this Agreement or any other Loan Document is outstanding and unpaid or any Letter of Credit is outstanding and so long as the Commitments have not expired or terminated. The provisions of Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03 and Article VIII shall survive and remain in full force and effect regardless of the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, the repayment of the Loans, the expiration or termination of the Letters of Credit and the Commitments or the termination of this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any provision hereof or thereof.
Survival
SECTION 9.06. . This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. This Agreement, the other Loan Documents and any separate letter agreements with respect to fees payable to the Administrative Agent constitute the entire contract among the parties relating to the subject matter hereof and supersede any and all previous agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof. Except as provided in Section 4.01, this Agreement shall become effective when it shall have been executed by the Administrative Agent and when the Administrative Agent shall have received counterparts hereof which, when taken together, bear the signatures of each of the other parties hereto, and thereafter shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by facsimile or other electronic imaging shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
Counterparts; Integration; Effectiveness
SECTION 9.07. . Any provision of any Loan Document held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions hereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Severability
SECTION 9.08. . If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender and each of its Affiliates is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final, but excluding deposit accounts used for payroll, employee benefits, trust accounts, tax withholding, escrow accounts or similar fiduciary accounts) at any time held and other obligations at any time owing by such Lender or Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of the Borrower or any Subsidiary Guarantor against any of and all of the Obligations held by such Lender, irrespective of whether or not such Lender shall have made any demand under the Loan Documents but only to the extent such Obligations are due and owing. The rights of each Lender under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) which such Lender may have.
Right of Setoff
SECTION 9.09. . (a) This Agreement shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the law of the State of New York.
Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process
(b) Each party hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to any Loan Document, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court. Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law. Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document against any Loan Party or its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
(c) Each party hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection which it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document in any court referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section. Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
(d) Each party to this Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 9.01. Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
SECTION 9.10. . EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT, ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY OR THEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER THEORY). EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL
SECTION 9.11. . Article and Section headings and the Table of Contents used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and shall not affect the construction of, or be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Headings
SECTION 9.12. . Each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and the Lenders agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the Information (as defined below), except that Information may be disclosed (a) to its and its Affiliates' directors, officers, employees and agents, including accountants, legal counsel and other advisors (it being understood that the Persons to whom such disclosure is made will be informed of the confidential nature of such Information and instructed to keep such Information confidential), (b) to the extent requested by any regulatory authority (including any self-regulatory authority, such as the National Association of Insurance Commissioners), (c) to the extent required by applicable laws or regulations or by any subpoena or similar legal process, (d) to any other party to this Agreement, (e) in connection with the exercise of any remedies under this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any suit, action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document or the enforcement of rights hereunder or thereunder, (f) subject to an agreement containing provisions substantially the same as those of this Section, to (i) any assignee of or Participant in, or any prospective assignee of or Participant in, any of its rights or obligations under this Agreement or (ii)any actual or prospective counterparty (or its advisors) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to the Borrower and its obligations, (g) with the consent of the Borrower or (h) to the extent such Information (i) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this Section or (ii) becomes available to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender on a non-confidential basis from a source other than the Borrower. For the purposes of this Section, "Information" means all information received from the Borrower relating to the Borrower or its business, other than any such information that is available to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender on a non-confidential basis prior to disclosure by the Borrower. Any Person required to maintain the confidentiality of Information as provided in this Section shall be considered to have complied with its obligation to do so if such Person has exercised the same degree of care to maintain the confidentiality of such Information as such Person would accord to its own confidential information. The provisions of this Section 9.12 shall survive termination of the Commitments hereunder and shall remain in effect until the date that is one (1) year from the date of termination of the Commitments hereunder.
Confidentiality
EACH LENDER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT INFORMATION AS DEFINED IN SECTION 9.12 FURNISHED TO IT PURSUANT TO THIS AGREEMENT MAY INCLUDE MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION CONCERNING THE BORROWER AND ITS SUBSIDIARIES OR THEIR RESPECTIVE SECURITIES, AND CONFIRMS THAT IT HAS DEVELOPED COMPLIANCE PROCEDURES REGARDING THE USE OF MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION AND THAT IT WILL HANDLE SUCH MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THOSE PROCEDURES AND APPLICABLE LAW, INCLUDING FEDERAL AND STATE SECURITIES LAWS.
ALL INFORMATION, INCLUDING REQUESTS FOR WAIVERS AND AMENDMENTS, FURNISHED BY THE BORROWER OR THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT PURSUANT TO, OR IN THE COURSE OF ADMINISTERING, THIS AGREEMENT WILL BE SYNDICATE-LEVEL INFORMATION, WHICH MAY CONTAIN MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION ABOUT THE BORROWER AND THE OTHER LOAN PARTIES OR THEIR RESPECTIVE SECURITIES) AND ITS SECURITIES. ACCORDINGLY, EACH LENDER REPRESENTS TO THE BORROWER AND THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT THAT IT HAS IDENTIFIED IN ITS ADMINISTRATIVE QUESTIONNAIRE A CREDIT CONTACT WHO MAY RECEIVE INFORMATION THAT MAY CONTAIN MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH ITS COMPLIANCE PROCEDURES AND APPLICABLE LAW
SECTION 9.13. . Each Lender that is subject to the requirements of the USA PATRIOT Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)) (the "Act") hereby notifies each Loan Party that pursuant to the requirements of the Act, it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies such Loan Party, which information includes the name and address of such Loan Party and other information that will allow such Lender to identify such Loan Party in accordance with the Act.
USA PATRIOT Act
SECTION 9.14. .
Releases of Subsidiary Guarantors
(a) A Subsidiary Guarantor shall automatically be released from its obligations under the Subsidiary Guaranty upon the consummation of any transaction permitted by this Agreement as a result of which such Subsidiary Guarantor ceases to be a Subsidiary; that, if so required by this Agreement, the Required Lenders shall have consented to such transaction and the terms of such consent shall not have provided otherwise. In connection with any termination or release pursuant to this Section, the Administrative Agent shall (and is hereby irrevocably authorized by each Lender to) execute and deliver to any Loan Party, at such Loan Party's expense, all documents that such Loan Party shall reasonably request to evidence such termination or release. Any execution and delivery of documents pursuant to this Section shall be without recourse to or warranty by the Administrative Agent.
provided
(b) Further, the Administrative Agent may (and is hereby irrevocably authorized by each Lender to), upon the request of the Borrower, release any Subsidiary Guarantor from its obligations under the Subsidiary Guaranty if such Subsidiary Guarantor is no longer a Material Domestic Subsidiary or in connection with a disposition permitted under Section 6.03.
(c) At such time as the principal and interest on the Loans, all LC Disbursements, the fees, expenses and other amounts payable under the Loan Documents and the other Obligations (other than obligations under any Swap Agreement or any Banking Services Agreement, and other Obligations expressly stated to survive such payment and termination) shall have been paid in full, the Commitments shall have been terminated and no Letters of Credit shall be outstanding, the Subsidiary Guaranty and all obligations (other than those expressly stated to survive such termination) of each Subsidiary Guarantor thereunder shall automatically terminate, all without delivery of any instrument or performance of any act by any Person.
SECTION 9.15. . Each of the signatories hereto that is also a party to the Existing Credit Agreement hereby agrees that, as of the Effective Date, all of the commitments to extend credit under the Existing Credit Agreement will be terminated automatically and any and all required notice periods in connection with such termination are hereby waived and of no further force and effect.
Termination of Commitments Under Existing Credit Agreement
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
ARBITRON INC., as the Borrower
By: Name: Richard J. Surratt Title: Executive Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., individually as a Lender, as the Swingline Lender, as the Issuing Bank and as Administrative Agent
/s/ Richard J. Surratt
By: Name: Anthony Galea Title: Vice President U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, individually
/s/ Anthony Galea
as a Lender and as a Co-Syndication Agent
By: Name: Steven L. Sawyer Title: Vice President CITIBANK, N.A., individually as a Lender and as a Co- Syndication Agent
/s/ Steven L. Sawyer
By: Name: Jorge Guigou Title: Senior Vice President BANK OF AMERICA, N.A., as a Lender
/s/ Jorge Guigou
By: Name: Mary K. Giermek Title: Senior Vice President Citizens Bank of Pennsylvania, as a Lender
/s/ Mary K. Giermek
By: Name: Devon Starks Title: Senior Vice President PNC BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as a Lender
/s/ Devon Starks
By: Name: John E. Hehr Title: Senior Vice President BRANCH BANKING AND TRUST COMPANY, as a Lender
/s/ John E. Hehr
By: Name: Glenn A. Page Title: Senior Vice President THE COLUMBIA BANK, as a Lender
/s/ Glenn A. Page
By: Name: Baxter M. Phillips, Jr. Title: Senior Vice President
/s/ Baxter M. Phillips, Jr.

Press
Information
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK; November 22, 2011  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced it has entered into a five-year, $150.0 million unsecured revolving credit facility. This credit facility replaces Arbitron's existing $150.0 million revolving credit facility, which was scheduled to mature in December 2011.
The facility will be available for working capital requirements and general corporate purposes, which may include permitted acquisitions, share repurchases, and payment of dividends.
The credit facility has been arranged by J.P. Morgan Securities LLC and includes an expansion feature of up to an additional $75 million.
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the mediaradio, television, cable and out-of-home; the mobile industry as well as advertising agencies and advertisers around the world. Arbitron's businesses include: measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of U.S. consumers; providing mobile audience measurement and analytics in the United States, Europe, Asia and Australia, and developing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data.
About Arbitron
The Company has developed the Portable People Meter  (PPM) and the PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
TM
Portable People Meter, PPM and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2011 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, our ability to successfully integrate acquired operations, diversions of management resources, expenses incurred in financing the acquisition, differing levels of management and internal control effectiveness at the acquired entity, other unanticipated problems and liabilities, , changes in the market, potential downturns in economic conditions, foreign exchange fluctuations, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, , litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and other international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2010 Annual Report on
Form 10-K
. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20111129160604.txt.gz
TIME:20111129160604
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On October 28, 2011, Carol Hanley, Executive Vice President, Chief Sales and Marketing Officer, Steven M. Smith, Executive Vice President, Service Operations, and Timothy T. Smith, Executive Vice President, Business Development and Strategy, and Chief Legal Officer of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company"), each established an individual stock trading plan in accordance with the requirements specified in Rule 10b5-1(c) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (each, a "Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan"). Additionally, on October 28, 2011, Larry Kittelberger, a member of the Companys Board of Directors and Chairman of its Compensation and Human Resources and Technology Strategy Committees established a Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan. On November 9, 2011, Richard Post, a member of the Companys Board of Directors and Chairman of its Audit Committee established a Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan. On November 10, 2011, Philip Guarascio, Chairman of the Companys Board of Directors and Chairman of its Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee, established a Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan. On November 25, 2011, V. Scott Henry, Executive Vice President, Technology Solutions, and Sean Creamer, Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer, each established individual Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plans. Each Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan was adopted during an authorized trading period and when none of Mr. Guarascio, Mr. Creamer, Ms. Hanley, Mr. Henry, Mr. Kittelberger, Mr. Post, Mr. Smith, or Mr. Smith was in possession of material non-public information regarding the Company or its securities. Each of the individuals established their respective Rule 10b5-1 Trading plan in order to diversify their investment portfolio and for tax planning purposes. Transactions under these Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plans will be publicly reported to the Securities and Exchange Commission in accordance with applicable securities laws, rules and regulations. Sean Creamer Under the terms of Mr. Creamers Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan, an authorized third-party broker will sell shares of Company common stock beginning in February 2012. Mr.Creamer's Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan covers the sale of up to approximately 23,400 shares of Company common stock. This Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan is scheduled to terminate no later than January 2013. Philip Guarascio Under the terms of Mr. Guarascios Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan, an authorized third-party broker will sell shares of Company common stock beginning in January 2012. Mr. Guarascios Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan covers the sale of up to approximately 15,700 shares of Company common stock. This Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan is scheduled to terminate no later than June 2012. Carol Hanley Under the terms of Ms. Hanleys Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan, an authorized third-party broker will sell shares of Company common stock beginning in December 2011. Ms. Hanleys Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan covers the sale of up to approximately 21,900 shares of Company common stock. This Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan is scheduled to terminate no later than May 2012. V. Scott Henry Under the terms of Mr. Henrys Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan, an authorized third-party broker will sell shares of Company common stock beginning in February 2012. Mr. Henrys Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan covers the sale of up to approximately 58,300 shares of Company common stock. This Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan is scheduled to terminate no later than November 2012. Larry Kittelberger Under the terms of Mr. Kittelbergers Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan, an authorized third-party broker will sell shares of Company common stock beginning in December 2011. Mr. Kittelbergers Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan covers the sale of up to approximately 75,300 shares of Company common stock. This Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan is scheduled to terminate no later than March 2013. Richard Post Under the terms of Mr. Posts Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan, an authorized third-party broker will sell shares of Company common stock beginning in February 2012. Mr. Posts Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan covers the sale of up to approximately 96,500 shares of Company common stock. This Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan is scheduled to terminate no later than February 2013. Steven M. Smith Under the terms of Mr. Smiths Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan, an authorized third-party broker will sell shares of Company common stock at monthly intervals beginning in December 2011. Mr. Smiths Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan covers the sale of up to approximately 38,200 shares of Company common stock. This Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan is scheduled to terminate no later than December 31, 2012. Timothy T. Smith Under the terms of Mr. Smiths Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan, an authorized third-party broker will sell shares of Company common stock at monthly intervals beginning in December 2011. Mr. Smiths Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan covers the sale of up to approximately 25,000 shares of Company common stock. This Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan is scheduled to terminate no later than December 2012.
The information in this Item 7.01 shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20120201090340.txt.gz
TIME:20120201090340
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On February 1, 2012, Arbitron Inc. issued a status update regarding its Media Rating Council accreditation of Portable People Meter markets. A copy of the press release announcing the status update is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated February 1, 2012
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
COLUMBIA, MD  February 1, 2012  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today issued the following statement regarding the Media Rating Council (MRC) accreditation status of the radio ratings data produced by the Arbitron Portable People Meter (PPM) radio ratings service in 48 local markets.
TM
Arbitron has been informed by the MRC that it has withdrawn the accreditation of the monthly AQH radio ratings data produced by the PPM service in five markets: Cleveland, Portland OR, Riverside-San Bernardino, Salt Lake City-Ogden-Provo, and Tampa-St. Petersburg-Clearwater.
Nine PPM markets remain accredited by MRC: Atlanta, Cincinnati, Houston (DMA), Kansas City, Milwaukee-Racine, Minneapolis-St. Paul, Philadelphia, Phoenix, and St. Louis.
The MRC accreditation status in the remaining PPM markets is unchanged. Those 34 markets continue to be unaccredited.
"Consistent with our long-standing priorities, we will work to retain accreditation where we have it, to regain accreditation where it was withdrawn and to achieve accreditation in our remaining PPM markets," said Gregg Lindner, executive vice president, Service Innovation and Chief Research Officer, Arbitron Inc. "As always, we will continue our work with the MRC in order to address their concerns."
Arbitron currently plans to have all 48 PPM markets undergo new MRC audits in 2012.
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the mediaradio, television, cable and out-of-home; the mobile industry as well as advertising agencies and advertisers around the world. Arbitron's businesses include: measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of U.S. consumers; providing mobile audience measurement and analytics in the United States, Europe, Asia and Australia, and developing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has developed the Portable People Meter (PPM) and the PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
About the Media Rating Council
The Media Rating Council is a non-profit industry association, established in 1964, composed of leading television, radio, print and internet companies, as well as advertisers, advertising agencies and trade associations whose goal is to ensure measurement services that are valid, reliable and effective. Measurement services desiring MRC accreditation are required to disclose to their customers all methodological aspects of their service; comply with the MRC Minimum Standards for Media Rating Research; and submit to MRC-designed audits to authenticate and illuminate their procedures. In addition, the MRC membership actively pursues research issues they consider priorities in an effort to improve the quality of research in the marketplace. Currently approximately 70 research products are audited by the MRC. Additional information about MRC can be found at .
http://www.mediaratingcouncil.org/
Portable People Meter, PPM
TM
and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Media Rating Council and the "double checkmark" logo design are registered marks of the Media Rating Council.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2012 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, our ability to successfully integrate acquired operations, diversions of management resources, expenses incurred in financing the acquisition, differing levels of management and internal control effectiveness at the acquired entity, other unanticipated problems and liabilities, , changes in the market, potential downturns in economic conditions, foreign exchange fluctuations, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, , litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and other international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2010 Annual Report on Form 10-K. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20120214070315.txt.gz
TIME:20120214070315
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 14, 2012, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release reporting fourth quarter and full year 2011 financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On February 14, 2012, the Company announced that its Board of Directors has authorized a program under which the Company may repurchase up to $100 million in shares of the Company's common stock at then-prevailing market prices over a period of up to two years ending February 9, 2014. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated February 14, 2012 regarding fourth quarter and full year 2011 financial results Exhibit 99.2 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated February 14, 2012 regarding a stock repurchase program
The information in Items 2.02 and 7.01 of this Form 8-K and the attached Exhibits shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall they be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Arbitron Inc. 412-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the fourth quarter and full year ended December 31, 2011.
Columbia MD, February 14, 2012
Computed in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), net income for the fourth quarter 2011 was $14.1 million, or $0.51 per share (diluted), compared with $15.6 million, or $0.57 per share (diluted) for the fourth quarter of 2010.
Net income for the fourth quarter of 2011 was reduced by a $3.5 million pre-tax, non-cash impairment charge associated with the Company's minority stake in a privately-held media research firm as well as a $2.1 million pre-tax operating loss for Arbitron Mobile Oy (previously known as Zokem Oy), which was acquired in July 2011.
Net income for the full year 2011 increased 19.8 percent to $53.3 million compared with $44.5 million in 2010. GAAP earnings per share (diluted) for the full year 2011 were $1.93 compared with $1.64 per share (diluted) in 2010.
Excluding the fourth quarter impairment charge and expenses and operating losses from Arbitron Mobile for comparability purposes, earnings per share (diluted) for the fourth quarter and full year 2011 would have been $0.64 and $2.10, respectively representing year-over-year increases of 10.5 percent for the quarter and 28.1 percent for the year.
The Company reported revenue of $120.1 million during the fourth quarter of 2011, an increase of 7.6 percent compared to revenue of $111.7 million during the fourth quarter of 2010. Revenue in the quarter benefited from the continued phase-in of contracted price increases for the Company's Portable People Meter (PPM) radio ratings services and increases in the sales of discretionary services.
Additional Fourth Quarter 2011 Financial Highlights
TM
TM
Costs and expenses for the fourth quarter increased 7.3 percent, from $92.7 million in 2010 to $99.5 million in 2011. The increase was primarily due to increased cost of revenue associated with providing PPM and Diary services, operating costs incurred by Arbitron Mobile, as well as year-over-year increases in performance and share-based compensation.
Operating income in the quarter was $20.7 million, an increase of 8.8 percent compared to fourth quarter 2010 operating income of $19.0 million.
Net income for the fourth quarter 2011 was $14.1 million compared with $15.6 million for the fourth quarter of 2010. The impairment charge reduced earnings per share (diluted) for the fourth quarter and full year 2011 by $0.07 per share (diluted). Operating results of Arbitron Mobile reduced earnings by $0.06 per share (diluted) in the fourth quarter.
Earnings before interest, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA) for the fourth quarter of 2011 was $32.0 million compared with EBITDA of $32.8 million for the fourth quarter of 2010. The impairment charge reduced EBITDA by $3.5 million and the operating results of Arbitron Mobile reduced EBITDA by $2.1 million in the fourth quarter.
For the full-year ended December 31, 2011, revenue was $422.3 million, an increase of 6.8 percent compared to revenue of $395.4 million for 2010.
Additional Full Year 2011 Financial Highlights
Costs and expenses for the full year 2011 were $337.2 million, an increase of $7.5 million or 2.3 percent compared to costs of $329.7 million in 2010. The increase was primarily due to increased cost of revenue associated with providing PPM and Diary services, operating costs incurred by Arbitron Mobile, as well as year-over-year increases in performance and share-based compensation.
Operating income for the full year 2011 was $85.1 million, an increase of 29.6 percent compared to full year 2010 operating income of $65.7 million.
Net income for the full year 2011 was $53.3 million, an increase of 19.8 percent compared with $44.5 million in 2010.
EBITDA for the full year 2011 was $119.1 million an increase of 18.8 percent compared to $100.3 million in 2010. The impairment charge reduced EBITDA by $3.5 million and the operating results of Arbitron Mobile reduced EBITDA by $3.9 million for the full year 2011.
Said William T. Kerr, President and Chief Executive Officer:
Management Comment on 2011 Results
"In 2011, we made significant progress toward achieving the objectives we outlined during last year's call: growth in our core revenue, improved margins in the wake of the full commercialization of our PPM radio ratings service, and entry into new markets in the US and overseas.
"Importantly, we were able to expand our margins while making investments in both the quality of our core services and in our growth strategies such as digital radio, cross platform and mobile measurement.
"For 2012 and beyond, we see our basic strategies as unchanged. We will pursue opportunities to improve performance and deliver compelling returns by leveraging our existing PPM and diary platforms, by continuing to seek out cost efficiencies and by deploying our financial and other resources to cultivate new markets. We will pursue these strategies with the goal of building long-term value for our customers, our employees and our shareholders."
In 2012, Arbitron intends to provide supplemental financial information and guidance to improve investor visibility into its operations and into its investments in the Company's growth initiatives.
2012 Guidance
Arbitron expects 2012 revenue to increase between 5 percent and 7 percent over its 2011 revenue of $422.3 million. Arbitron's cross platform initiative and Arbitron Mobile are expected to account for $4 million to $7 million of the Company's 2012 revenue compared to $1.5 million in 2011.
The Company anticipates 2012 earnings per share (diluted) between $2.15 and $2.30, an increase of 8 percent to 15 percent over comparable 2011 earnings per share (diluted) of $2.00, which excludes the impact of the 4 quarter 2011 impairment charge of $0.07 per share (diluted.) These estimates include anticipated net investment of approximately $12 million pre-tax in Arbitron's cross platform initiatives and Arbitron Mobile in 2012.
th
Stock repurchase program announced
Separately, the Company today announced its Board of Directors has authorized a stock repurchase program to repurchase up to $100 million of the Company's common shares. Arbitron expects the shares may be purchased from time to time in either open market or private transactions, in accordance with applicable insider trading and other securities laws and regulations, at then-prevailing market prices over a period of up to two years ending February 9, 2014.
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time today, Tuesday, February 14, 2012.
Earnings Conference Call: Schedule and Access
The Company invites you to listen to the call toll-free by dialing (877) 262-6702. The conference call can be accessed from outside of the United States by dialing (443) 863-7301. To participate, users will need to use the following code: . The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com and www.streetevents.com.
45005360
A replay of the call will be available from 2:00 p.m. on February 14, 2012 through 11:59 p.m. on February 21, 2012. To access the replay, please call (toll free) (855) 859-2056 in the United States, or (404) 537-3406 if you're calling from outside of the United States. To access the replay, users will need to enter the following code: .
45005360
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to either net income as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the mediaradio, television, cable and out-of-home; the mobile industry as well as advertising agencies and advertisers around the world. Arbitron's businesses include: measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of U.S. consumers; providing mobile audience measurement and analytics in the United States, Europe, Asia and Australia, and developing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has developed the Portable People Meter (PPM) and the PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
Portable People Meter
TM
, PPM
TM
and PPM 360
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2010, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(2) Arbitron's management believes that presenting EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization), both non-GAAP financial measures, as supplemental information helps investors, analysts, and others, if they so choose, in understanding and evaluating Arbitron's operating performance in some of the same manners that management does because EBIT and EBITDA exclude certain items that are not directly related to Arbitron's core operating performance. Arbitron's management references these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing current performance and making decisions about internal budgets, resource allocation and financial goals.
EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, and depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered substitutes either for net income as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. EBIT margin and EBITDA margin are calculated as a percentage of revenue.
Note: The December 31, 2010 Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet is derived from the audited Balance Sheet included in the Company's
Form 10-K
for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010.

Exhibit 99.2
Press Information
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239
thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500
kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced that its Board of Directors has authorized a program under which the company may repurchase up to $100 million in shares of the company's common stock.
NEW YORK, February 14, 2012 
The company expects the shares of common stock may be purchased from time to time in either open market or private transactions, in accordance with applicable insider trading and other securities laws and regulations, at then-prevailing market prices over a period of up to two years ending February 9, 2014.
The exact timing and amount of purchases will depend on market conditions. No assurance can be given as to when during the authorized period any shares will be repurchased or as to whether and to what extent any share repurchase will be consummated.
As of December 31, 2011 the company had approximately 27,289,800 shares outstanding.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the mediaradio, television, cable and out-of-home; the mobile industry as well as advertising agencies and advertisers around the world. Arbitron's businesses include: measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of U.S. consumers; providing mobile audience measurement and analytics in the United States, Europe, Asia and Australia, and developing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has developed the Portable People Meter (PPM) and the PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
Portable People Meter
TM
, PPM
TM
and PPM360
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2012 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, our ability to successfully integrate acquired operations, diversions of management resources, expenses incurred in financing the acquisition, differing levels of management and internal control effectiveness at the acquired entity, other unanticipated problems and liabilities, changes in the market, potential downturns in economic conditions, foreign exchange fluctuations, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, , litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and other international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2010 Annual Report on
Form 10-K
. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20120301164525.txt.gz
TIME:20120301164525
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(e) 2012 Non-Equity Incentive Plan On February 28, 2012, the Compensation and Human Resources Committee (the "Committee") of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") approved the Companys 2012 non-equity incentive plan for executive officers, which would be payable in early 2013 (the "Incentive Plan"). Provided that the Companys return on invested capital for the twelve months ending December 31, 2012 exceeds 12%, the Committee may make cash Incentive Plan awards to each executive officer in an amount between 0% and 200% of the executive officers target award under the Incentive Plan. The target Incentive Plan award for the Companys Chief Executive Officer, William T. Kerr, is equal to 100% of his 2012 base salary of $800,000 under his Amended and Restated Executive Employment Agreement, effective as of February 8, 2011, and the target Incentive Plan award for other executive officers range from 50-70% of 2012 base salary. If the threshold return on invested capital goal is satisfied, the Committee may exercise its discretion in awarding a cash payment that is linked to performance based upon the Companys diluted earnings per share (weighted 70%), which may be adjusted by the Committee to exclude the impact of extraordinary or non-recurring items, and quality of the Companys ratings services (weighted 30%), which award may be increased or decreased depending on the Committees assessment of each individual executives performance during the year. Awards under the Incentive Plan can vary from 0% to 200% of the target amount, subject to minimum thresholds of performance and depending on the Committees assessment of performance against the goals. The Committee has negative discretion to eliminate or reduce the amount of any award under the Incentive Plan. 2012 Long-Term Incentive Plan Also on February 28, 2012, the Committee established the performance objectives and other terms of the Companys 2012 Long-Term Incentive Plan (the "2012 LTI Plan") for certain executive officers of the Company. The targeted opportunity for the Companys participating executive officers, other than Mr. Kerr, is divided into two components: (i) non-qualified stock options (representing approximately 50% of the total opportunity) and (ii) performance-based restricted stock units (representing approximately 50% of the total opportunity). Of the executives other than Mr. Kerr who are participating in the 2012 LTI Plan, the target 2012 LTI Plan opportunity is within a range from 50% to 125% of 2012 base salary. The number of non-qualified stock options will be based on the value of each option determined using the Companys standard Black-Scholes valuation model. The exercise price of each stock option will be equal to the closing price of the Companys common stock on the grant date and the options will vest ratably in three equal annual installments beginning on the first anniversary of the grant date. The restricted stock units ("RSUs") contain a one-year performance period. The RSUs will expire without vesting if the one-year performance goal is not satisfied by the first anniversary of the date of grant. If the performance goal is met, the grant will become vested as to one-fourth of the RSUs on each of the four one-year anniversaries of the date of grant, provided that the recipient remains an employee or service provider to the Company through those dates. The performance goal requires the Companys return on invested capital during the twelve months ending December 31, 2012 to be 12 percent or higher. For Mr. Kerr, the Committee approved an LTI Plan award equal to 250% of his 2012 base salary. For Mr. Kerr only, the 2012 LTI award is entirely in the form of performance-based deferred stock units that contain the same performance measure as the performance-based restricted stock units granted to the executives, but which will be payable only upon his separation from service. The Committee also approved an additional award to Mr. Kerr of fully vested deferred stock units with a grant date fair value of $40,000. The non-qualified stock options, performance-based restricted stock units, deferred stock units, and performance-based deferred stock units will be made pursuant to the Companys 2008 Equity Compensation Plan.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20120312112537.txt.gz
TIME:20120312112537
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On March 12, 2012, Arbitron Inc. is scheduled to present at the Credit Suisse 14th Annual Global Services Conference, which will take place at The Phoenician, Scottsdale, Arizona. A copy of the slide show presentation to be made at the conference is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
 
The following exhibit relating to Item 7.01 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Exhibit Index
 



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20120313160439.txt.gz
TIME:20120313160439
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On March 12, 2012, Luis Nogales, a member of the Companys Board of Directors, established a Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan. The Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan was adopted during an authorized trading period when Mr. Nogales was not in possession of material non-public information regarding the Company or its securities. Mr. Nogales Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan covers the exercise of stock options that would otherwise expire during 2012 and 2013 and the sale of shares of Company common stock acquired upon the exercise. Transactions under the Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plans will be publicly reported to the Securities and Exchange Commission in accordance with applicable securities laws, rules and regulations. Under the terms of Mr. Nogales Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan, an authorized third-party broker will sell shares of Company common stock beginning in May 2012. Mr. Nogales Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan covers the sale of up to approximately 10,800 shares of Company common stock. This Rule 10b5-1 Trading Plan is scheduled to terminate no later than February 2013.
The information in this Item 7.01 shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20120326170346.txt.gz
TIME:20120326170346
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On March 26, 2012, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") announced it has entered into a settlement with the Attorney General of the State of California, the Los Angeles City Attorney and the San Francisco City Attorney, which has resolved all allegations against the Company in a lawsuit that was filed on March 21, 2012 in the Superior Court of the State of California, County of San Francisco relating to the marketing and commercialization of the Arbitron Portable People MeterTM radio ratings service in Los Angeles, Riverside-San Bernardino, Sacramento, San Diego, San Francisco and San Jose, California. A copy of the press release announcing the settlement and the Companys commitments relating to the settlement is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated March 26, 2012
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
COLUMBIA, MD; March 26, 2012  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that it has entered into a settlement with the Attorney General of the State of California, the Los Angeles City Attorney and the San Francisco City Attorney, which has resolved all allegations against Arbitron in a lawsuit that was filed on March 21, 2012 in the Superior Court of the State of California, County of San Francisco relating to the marketing and commercialization of the Arbitron Portable People Meter (PPM) radio ratings service in Los Angeles, Riverside-San Bernardino, Sacramento, San Diego, San Francisco and San Jose, California.
TM
TM
As part of the settlement, Arbitron has agreed to continue a number of measures already an integral part of the company's current PPM methodology and of its continuous improvement program for the Portable People Meter ratings services in all markets. These measures include the already completed transition to address-based sample frames, cell-phone-only sampling rates, reporting country of origin for Hispanic households and certain other sample performance and demographic information to subscribers by individual zip code, continuing efforts to maintain or achieve specific in-tab rates and Sample Performance Indicators, and continuing the company's commitment to using all reasonable measures to achieve Media Rating Council (MRC) accreditation for the data produced by the PPM ratings service in all California markets.
These commitments are generally consistent with the company's agreements with other states and are in force through December 31, 2014, or until MRC accreditation is granted, whichever comes first. The Company also agreed to pay a total of $400,000 in settlement of all claims and costs.
The settlement was finalized on March 26, 2012 with the filing of a Final Judgment Pursuant to Stipulation in the Superior Court of the State of California, County of San Francisco. The parties reached the agreement to resolve without litigation all allegations raised by California. The agreement is not an admission of fault or concession of liability or wrongdoing by Arbitron regarding any allegations of law or fact alleged in the Complaint, and Arbitron denies such allegations.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the mediaradio, television, cable and out-of-home; the mobile industry as well as advertising agencies and advertisers around the world. Arbitron's businesses include: measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of U.S. consumers; providing mobile audience measurement and analytics in the United States, Europe, Asia and Australia, and developing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data.
The Company has developed the Portable People Meter (PPM) and the PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
Portable People Meter, PPM and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Media Rating Council is a registered mark of the Media Rating Council.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2012 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, our ability to successfully integrate acquired operations, diversions of management resources, expenses incurred in financing the acquisition, differing levels of management and internal control effectiveness at the acquired entity, other unanticipated problems and liabilities, , changes in the market, potential downturns in economic conditions, foreign exchange fluctuations, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, , litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and other international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2011 Annual Report on Form 10-K. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20120411163418.txt.gz
TIME:20120411163418
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On April 11, 2012, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") announced Richard J. Surratt will be leaving the Company. He will remain Chief Financial Officer through May 11, 2012, and will remain an employee of the Company through June 8, 2012. Sean R. Creamer, the Companys Chief Operating Officer, will serve as interim Chief Financial Officer effective May 11, 2012 until the Company appoints a new Chief Financial Officer A copy of the press release announcing the departure of the Companys Chief Financial Officer is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated April 11, 2012
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
COLUMBIA, MD; April 11, 2012  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that Richard J. Surratt will be leaving the company for personal reasons.
Mr. Surratt will continue as Chief Financial Officer through May 11, 2012 and will remain as an employee of the company through June 8, 2012.
Sean R. Creamer, in addition to his current responsibilities as executive vice president, Chief Operating Officer, will take on the role of interim Chief Financial Officer upon Mr. Surratt's resignation.
Arbitron has engaged the firm of Crist|Kolder Associates to conduct the search for a new chief financial officer.
"I want to thank Richard for his contributions to Arbitron and wish him well," said Bill Kerr, President and Chief Executive Officer, Arbitron Inc.
Sean Creamer was executive vice president, Chief Financial Officer of Arbitron from November 2005 through February 2011. He was named executive vice president, Chief Operating Officer in August 2011.
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the mediaradio, television, cable and out-of-home; the mobile industry as well as advertising agencies and advertisers around the world. Arbitron's businesses include: measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of U.S. consumers; providing mobile audience measurement and analytics in the United States, Europe, Asia and Australia, and developing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has developed the Portable People Meter  (PPM) and the PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
TM
Portable People Meter, PPM and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2012 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, the current global economic recession and the upheaval in the credit markets and financial services industry, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, our ability to successfully commercialize our Portable People Meter service, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, our ability to successfully identify, consummate and integrate appropriate acquisitions, the impact of increased costs of data collection including a trend toward increasing incidence of cell phone-only households, litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2011 Annual Report on Form 10-K. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20120419070204.txt.gz
TIME:20120419070204
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 19, 2012, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release reporting first quarter 2012 financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated April 19, 2012
The information in this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky
Press Contact
Arbitron Inc.
: Kim Myers
410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Columbia MD, April 19, 2012  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2012.
Net income for the quarter increased 9.6 percent to $17.8 million, or $0.64 per share (diluted), compared with $16.2 million, or $0.59 per share (diluted), for the first quarter of 2011.
For the first quarter of 2012, the Company reported revenue of $106.4 million, an increase of 5.5 percent compared to revenue of $100.9 million during the first quarter of 2011. Revenue for the quarter benefited primarily from annual rate increases, including the continued phase-in of contracted price increases for the Company's Portable People Meter (PPM) service.
TM
TM
Costs and expenses for the first quarter 2012 increased by 4.7 percent to $75.2 million from $71.8 million in the first quarter 2011. Approximately $2.8 million of the increase was due to costs associated with Arbitron Mobile, which was acquired in July 2011, and to planned incremental investments in cross platform initiatives. The net pre-tax investment during the first quarter of 2012 in our cross platform initiatives and Arbitron Mobile, was $3.0 million, compared to $1.0 million in the first quarter last year.
Operating income in the first quarter 2012 increased 7.4 percent, to $31.2 million from $29.1 million in the first quarter 2011.
EBIT (earnings before interest and income tax expense) for the first quarter 2012 was $28.9 million, an increase of 8.7 percent compared with EBIT of $26.6 million for the first quarter of 2011. The Company's EBIT margin for the first quarter 2012 increased to 27.1 percent from 26.3 percent in the first quarter of 2011.
EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) was $36.6 million in the first quarter of 2012, an increase of 8.1 percent compared with EBITDA of $33.9 million in the first quarter of 2011. The Company's EBITDA margin for the first quarter 2012 increased to 34.4 percent from 33.6 percent in the first quarter of 2011.
Said William T. Kerr, President and Chief Executive Officer:
Management Comment on First Quarter 2012 Results
"Our results and our activities in the first quarter are well aligned with our long standing priorities for enhancing our core services and for generating revenue growth."
"We unveiled our marketing mix modeling service at the recent Advertising Research Foundation convention. We expect to have the complete service up, running and ready to improve radio's visibility among the top agency media planners by the middle of the summer."
"Digital radio remains a key priority as we continue our work to follow radio onto its new digital platforms in order to quantify this growing audience segment thereby enabling customers to monetize it."
"Our cross platform initiatives continue to demonstrate the value that our unique personal, passive and portable measurement technologies can bring to this emerging marketplace."
"Finally, with the launch of a new, syndicated mobile measurement panel, Arbitron Mobile is moving to expand its footprint here in the United States," said Mr. Kerr.
Arbitron is reiterating its revenue and earnings per share guidance for 2012.
2012 Full-Year Guidance
Arbitron expects 2012 revenue to increase between 5 percent and 7 percent over its 2011 revenue of $422.3 million. Arbitron's cross platform initiative and Arbitron Mobile are expected to account for $4 million to $7 million of the Company's 2012 revenue compared to $1.5 million in 2011.
The Company anticipates 2012 earnings per share (diluted) between $2.15 and $2.30, an increase of 8 percent to 15 percent over comparable 2011 earnings per share (diluted) of $2.00, which excludes the impact of an impairment charge of $0.07 per share (diluted) taken in the 4 quarter 2011. These estimates include anticipated net investment of approximately $12 million pre-tax in Arbitron's cross platform initiatives and Arbitron Mobile in 2012.
th
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 Eastern Time, Thursday April 19.
Earnings Conference Call: Schedule and Access
am
The Company invites you to listen to the call toll-free by dialing (877) 262-6702. The conference call can be accessed from outside the United States by dialing (443) 863-7301. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 68568491. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com and www.streetevents.com.
A replay of the call will be available from 1:00 on April 19, 2012, through 11:59 on April 26, 2012. To access the replay, please call (toll-free) (855) 859-2056 in the United States or (404) 537-3406 if you're calling from outside of the United States. Replay listeners will need to enter the following code: 68568491.
pm
pm
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to either net income as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the mediaradio, television, cable, and out-of-home; the mobile industry; as well as advertising agencies and advertisers around the world. Arbitron's businesses include: measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media, and product patterns of U.S. consumers; providing mobile audience measurement and analytics in the United States, Europe, Asia, and Australia; and developing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data.
About Arbitron
The Company has developed the Portable People Meter (PPM) and the PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
Portable People Meter
TM
PPM
TM
and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2011, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(2) Arbitron's management believes that presenting EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization), both non-GAAP financial measures, as supplemental information helps investors, analysts, and others, if they so choose, in understanding and evaluating Arbitron's operating performance in some of the same manners that management does because EBIT and EBITDA exclude certain items that are not directly related to Arbitron's core operating performance. Arbitron's management references these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing current performance and making decisions about internal budgets, resource allocation and financial goals.
EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, and depreciation and amortization to net income.
EBIT margin and EBITDA margin are calculated as percentages of revenue.
EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered substitutes either for net income as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
Note: The December 31, 2011 Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet is derived from the audited Balance Sheet included in the Company's
Form 10-K
for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20120514161131.txt.gz
TIME:20120514161131
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
Effective as of May 11, 2012, the Board of Directors of the Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") appointed Sean R. Creamer, age 47, the Companys Executive Vice President, Chief Operating Officer, to serve as Executive Vice President, Chief Operating Officer and Chief Financial Officer of the Company. Mr. Creamer will remain the Companys Chief Financial Officer until such time as the Company appoints a new Chief Financial Officer. Mr. Creamer has served in the following positions with the Company:  Executive Vice President, Chief Operating Officer, from August 2011 to May 2012;  Executive Vice President U.S. Media Services, from February 2011 to August 2011;  Executive Vice President, U.S. Media Services and Chief Financial Officer, from April 2010 to February 2011;  Executive Vice President of Finance and Chief Financial Officer, from November 2005 to April 2010; and  Executive Vice President Finance, from September 2005 to November 2005. Previously, the Company announced Richard J. Surratt will be leaving the Company and will cease service as Chief Financial Officer effective May 11, 2012. Mr. Surratt will remain an employee of the Company until June 8, 2012. In connection with the commencement of his employment Mr. Surratt entered into an Executive Retention Agreement with the Company effective February 6, 2011 (the "Retention Agreement"). Provided that he enters into a Separation Agreement and Release following the termination of his employment on June 8, 2012, Mr. Surratt will be entitled to receive the following compensation under the terms of the Retention Agreement: (i) an amount equal to twelve times his monthly base salary multiplied by 1.55 ($620,000), payable in accordance with the Companys standard payroll practices; (ii) a prorated bonus component for 2012, payable in 2013, which bonus component will be determined based on the Companys Compensation and Human Resource Committees assessment of corporate performance under the Companys 2012 non-equity incentive plan; (iii) provided that he and his qualified beneficiaries are eligible and elect to continue coverage under the Companys group health plans under the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 (COBRA), the Company will pay the employer-equivalent premiums for such COBRA coverage for a period of twelve (12) months, or until the expiration of the COBRA continuation period, whichever occurs first; and (iv) certain outplacement services not to exceed $50,000. The foregoing description of the Retention Agreement does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the actual terms of the Retention Agreement, a form of which was filed as Exhibit 10.52 to the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010. The foregoing description of the Separation Agreement and Release does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the actual terms of the Separation Agreement and Release, which is expected to be filed as an exhibit to the Companys Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended August 30, 2012.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20120524161718.txt.gz
TIME:20120524161718
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
On May 22, 2012, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") held its 2012 Annual Meeting of Stockholders. The certified results of the matters voted upon at the meeting, which are more fully described in the Company's proxy statement, are as follows:
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20120718170347.txt.gz
TIME:20120718170347
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On July 18, 2012, Arbitron Inc. issued a status update regarding its Media Rating Council accreditation of Portable People Meter markets. A copy of the press release announcing the status update is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press Information
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
COLUMBIA, MD; July 18, 2012  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced that the Media Rating Council Inc. (MRC) has accredited the radio average-quarter-hour monthly ratings data produced by the Portable People Meter (PPM) ratings service in five additional markets: Los Angeles, Tampa-St. Petersburg-Clearwater, Baltimore, Riverside-San Bernardino, and San Antonio.
TM
Three of the marketsLos Angeles, Baltimore and San Antonioare being granted MRC accreditation for the first time.
Two marketsRiverside-San Bernardino and Tampa-St. Petersburg-Clearwater are regaining accreditation, which had been withdrawn by the MRC in January 2012.
The MRC has also voted to continue accreditation in nine marketsAtlanta, Cincinnati, Houston, Kansas City, Milwaukee-Racine, Minneapolis-St. Paul, Philadelphia, Phoenix, and St. Louis.
In total, 14 markets can now display the MRC double checkmark logo for the radio average-quarter-hour monthly ratings data produced by the Portable People Meter radio ratings service.
The MRC voted to not grant accreditation at this time in the remaining 34 PPM markets, and therefore PPM data in those markets continue to be unaccredited.
"We are pleased the MRC has recognized the progress we have made; at the same time we understand there is still work to be done," said Gregg Lindner, executive vice president, Service Innovation and Chief Research Officer, Arbitron Inc. "We will continue our efforts to maintain the MRC double checkmarks in our currently accredited PPM markets and to achieve service-wide accreditation for all PPM markets."
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the mediaradio, television, cable and out-of-home; the mobile industry as well as advertising agencies and advertisers around the world. Arbitron's businesses include: measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of U.S. consumers; providing mobile audience measurement and analytics in the United States, Europe, Asia and Australia, and developing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has developed the Portable People Meter (PPM) and the PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
The Media Rating Council is a non-profit industry association, established in 1964, composed of leading television, radio, print and internet companies, as well as advertisers, advertising agencies and trade associations whose goal is to ensure measurement services that are valid, reliable and effective. Measurement services desiring MRC accreditation are required to disclose to their customers all methodological aspects of their service; comply with the MRC ; and submit to MRC-designed audits to authenticate and illuminate their procedures. In addition, the MRC membership actively pursues research issues they consider priorities in an effort to improve the quality of research in the marketplace. Currently approximately 70 research products are audited by the MRC. Additional information about MRC can be found at .
About the Media Rating Council
Minimum Standards for Media Rating Research
http://www.mediaratingcouncil.org/
Portable People Meter, PPM
and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Media Rating Council and the "double checkmark" logo design are registered marks of the Media Rating Council.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2012 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, our ability to successfully integrate acquired operations, diversions of management resources, expenses incurred in financing the acquisition, differing levels of management and internal control effectiveness at the acquired entity, other unanticipated problems and liabilities, , changes in the market, potential downturns in economic conditions, foreign exchange fluctuations, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, , litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and other international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2011 Annual Report on Form 10-K. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20120719160231.txt.gz
TIME:20120719160231
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
As previously disclosed, Richard J. Surratt ceased serving as the Chief Financial Officer of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") on May 11, 2012. Mr. Surratts employment with the Company ended June 8, 2012. On July 13, 2012, Mr. Surratt and the Company entered into a Separation Agreement and Release (the "Release") pursuant to which Mr. Surratt has released the Company from any and all claims arising out of or related to his employment by the Company. The release of claims will become effective if not revoked by Mr. Surratt within seven days after execution. Execution of the Release was a condition to Mr. Surratts right to receive compensation under to the terms of an Executive Retention Agreement with the Company effective February 6, 2011 (the "Retention Agreement"). A summary of Mr. Surratts compensation under the Retention Agreement was disclosed on a Form 8-K filed with the SEC on May 14, 2012 and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the actual terms of the Retention Agreement, a form of which was filed as Exhibit 10.52 to the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010. The description of Release contained herein is qualified in its entirety by reference to the actual terms of the Release, which is expected to be filed as an exhibit to the Companys Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended September 30, 2012.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20120815080358.txt.gz
TIME:20120815080358
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On August 15, 2012, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release announcing its intention to appoint Debra Delman as the Companys Executive Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer effective as of August 28, 2012. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated August 15, 2012 The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
COLUMBIA, MD; August 15, 2012  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) announced today that Debra Delman, 54, will be appointed Executive Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer, effective August 28, 2012. Ms. Delman will report directly to William T. Kerr, President and Chief Executive Officer.
Ms. Delman will succeed Sean Creamer, who has served as interim Chief Financial Officer since May 2012.
"Debra is a talented and capable senior financial executive with extensive experience in the radio, media and entertainment industries. She understands our business and our customers well, and will be a valuable addition to the Arbitron executive staff," said Mr. Kerr.
Since 2009, Ms. Delman has been Senior Vice President, Strategic Operations and Finance for National Public Radio Inc., and was recently appointed Chief Strategy Officer.
From 2005 to 2009, Ms. Delman was Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer for Discovery Networks International, a unit of Discovery Communications Inc., a NASDAQ-listed company. From 2001 to 2004, she worked as Corporate Vice President, Finance at Hearst-Argyle Television, Inc.
Ms. Delman also served as Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, for Emmis International, as Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, Manager Media International, Bangkok, Thailand and as an Investment Analyst at Daiwa Securities of America. She worked early in her career at Chemical Bank and W.R. Grace and Co.
Ms. Delman received an M.B.A. from Pace University, Lubin Graduate School of Business; and a B.S. in Business Administration and Accounting from the University of Hartford.
Ms. Delman will be based in Columbia, Maryland.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, and out-of-home; the mobile industry; as well as advertising agencies and advertisers around the world. Arbitron businesses include: measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media, and product patterns of U.S. consumers; providing mobile audience measurement and analytics in the United States, Europe, Asia, and Australia; and developing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The company has developed the Portable People Meter(PPM) and PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
Portable People Meter, PPM
and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2012 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, our ability to successfully integrate acquired operations, diversions of management resources, expenses incurred in financing the acquisition, differing levels of management and internal control effectiveness at the acquired entity, other unanticipated problems and liabilities, changes in the market, potential downturns in economic conditions, foreign exchange fluctuations, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, , litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and other international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in Arbitron Inc.'s SEC filings, including the 2011 Annual Report on
Form 10-K
. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20120829163452.txt.gz
TIME:20120829163452
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On August 28, 2012 Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") announced Debra Delman, age 54, was appointed Executive Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer of the Company. From June 2012 to the present, Ms. Delman served as Senior Vice President, Chief Strategy Officer of National Public Radio, Inc., a not-for-profit corporation whose purposes are to produce, acquire, and distribute non-commercial educational programming. From June 2009 to June 2012, Ms. Delman served as Senior Vice President, Strategic Operations and Finance, National Public Radio, Inc. From January 2005 to June 2009, Ms. Delman served as Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Discovery Networks International, a unit of Discovery Communications, Inc., a NASDAQ-listed global nonfiction multimedia and entertainment company. Sean R. Creamer will continue to serve as the Companys Executive Vice President, Chief Operating Officer. On August 28, Mr. Creamer was also elected to the Companys Board of Directors to serve until the next annual meeting of stockholders of the Company, or until his earlier death, resignation or removal. The Company has determined that there are no related person transactions between it and Ms. Delman within the meaning of Item 404(a) of Regulation S-K. Offer Letter The Company and Ms. Delman have entered into a letter agreement (the "Offer Letter"), dated as of July 26, 2012, covering Ms. Delmans employment by the Company. Salary and Incentive Compensation Pursuant to the terms and conditions of the Offer Letter, the Company will pay Ms. Delman an annual base salary of $400,000 and Ms. Delman will be eligible to receive an annual incentive bonus equal to 55% of her annual base salary upon meeting applicable performance criteria set by the Compensation and Human Resources Committee of the Companys Board of Directors (the "Compensation Committee"). For performance exceeding such applicable performance criteria, the annual incentive bonus may be increased to an amount in excess of the target bonus up to a maximum of 110% of annual base salary, at the sole discretion of the Compensation Committee. Equity Grant On August 28, the Company granted to Ms. Delman an equity award valued at $500,000, with the award determined by the Compensation Committee as a mix of (i) 50% performance-based restricted stock units, which will vest only upon satisfaction of applicable performance objectives to be established by the Compensation Committee, and (ii) 50% stock options, each with respect to the Companys common stock, par value $0.50 (the "Common Stock"). The value for the restricted stock units was determined by dividing the target value for the restricted stock units by the Common Stocks fair market value on August 28 and the value of the options was determined using the Companys standard Black-Scholes assumptions applied as of August 28. Benefits Ms. Delman will, to the extent eligible, be entitled to participate at a level commensurate with her position in all employee welfare, benefit, and retirement plans and programs the Company provides to its executives in accordance with Company policies. Ms. Delman will work at the Companys Columbia, Maryland headquarters. The foregoing summary of the Offer Letter is qualified in its entirety by the full terms and conditions of the agreement. It is expected the Offer Letter will be filed as an exhibit to the Companys Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2012 and is incorporated herein by reference. Executive Retention Agreement Effective August 27, 2012, Ms. Delman entered into an Executive Retention Agreement (the "Agreement") with the Company on terms similar to other Company executives, which provides for severance payments under certain circumstances. The Companys obligation to provide any severance or other payments under the Agreement is conditioned on receiving a release of claims and enhanced non-competition, non-recruitment, and non-disparagement obligations. Termination without Cause; Position Diminishment The Agreement provides that if Ms. Delmans employment is terminated on or before August 25, 2013: (A) by the Company other than for cause, or (B) by the executive for Position Diminishment (as defined below), Ms. Delman would receive a cash payment in an amount equal to the sum of: (i) 12 times Ms. Delmans monthly base salary multiplied by 1.6 ("reference compensation"), plus (ii) a prorated bonus component for the year of termination. If the annual bonus for the year of termination was determined under a program intended to qualify as performance-based for purposes of Section 162(m) of the Internal Revenue Code, the bonus component, if any, would be paid when other executives of the Company receive their bonuses under comparable arrangements but, in any event, between January 1 and April 30 of the year following the year with respect to which it is earned. Payment would be made as though Ms. Delman had remained employed, with the bonus component determined under the factors for such annual bonus, with such adjustment as the Compensation Committee makes under those factors (using its negative discretion), including proration for a partial year of service. If the annual bonus for the year of termination was not intended to be an exempt bonus, the bonus component would be Ms. Delmans target bonus, paid in the timing provided above, prorated for the partial year of service. In addition to the cash payment described above, provided she and her qualified beneficiaries are eligible and elect to continue coverage under the Companys group health plans under the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 (COBRA), the Company would pay the employer-equivalent premiums for such COBRA coverage for a period of twelve (12) months, or until the expiration of the COBRA continuation period, whichever occurs first and provide certain outplacement services not to exceed $50,000 For purposes of the Agreement, "Position Diminishment" means: (i) a material reduction in reporting responsibilities, duties, or authority, (ii) a relocation of the principal place of employment to a location more than 50 miles from its then current location and that increases the distance from Ms. Delmans primary residence by more than 50 miles, or (iii) a material reduction in annual base salary, other than reductions that are generally applicable to peers as executive officers. Ms. Delman may only resign as a result of a Position Diminishment and be eligible to receive severance payments if: Ms. Delman provides notice that she considers the Position Diminishment grounds to resign and actually ceases employment, if the Position Diminishment is not cured by the Company, by six months following the date of Position Diminishment. Change in Control If, within 12 months following a Change in Control (as defined below), Ms. Delmans employment ends on a termination without cause or she resigns for Position Diminishment, the Company would (i) increase the cash severance payment to 24 times reference compensation, (ii) increase the period of paid COBRA coverage to 18 months, and (iii) accelerate the vesting and exercisability of any then outstanding equity compensation (provided that if the acceleration would cause a distribution of shares of the Companys common stock at a time not permitted by Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code, the distribution would be delayed until permitted by Section 409A). The foregoing summary of the Agreement is qualified in its entirety by the full terms and conditions of the agreement. The form of Agreement will be filed as an exhibit to the Companys Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2012 and is incorporated herein by reference. appointment On August 28, Sean R. Creamer was elected to the Companys Board of Directors to serve until the next annual meeting of stockholders of the Company, or until his earlier death, resignation or removal. Because he is an employee of the Company, Mr. Creamer will not receive any additional compensation for his service on the Board of Directors. A copy of the press release announcing Mr. Creamers appointment is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. announcing addition of Sean R. Creamer to the Board
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
COLUMBIA, MD; August 29, 2012  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced that Sean R. Creamer, Executive Vice President, Chief Operating Officer, has been appointed to the Arbitron Board of Directors, effective August 28, 2012, to serve until the next annual meeting of stockholders.`
"Sean will bring to the Board his keen awareness of the media and marketing information landscape and of the company's opportunities for expansion," said Philip Guarascio, Chairman of Arbitron's Board of Directors. "Together with his understanding of Arbitron's businesses, growth strategies, talents and resources, Sean will be a valuable addition to the Board as the company moves forward with its plans to further enhance the value and utility of its core radio services and to develop new sources of revenue in the emerging mobile and cross-platform markets. Appointing Sean to the Arbitron Board is also the next appropriate step in the company's continued evolution of its executive team."
Sean Creamer has been Executive Vice President, Chief Operating Officer, since August 2011. Sean is responsible for Arbitron's core ?businessesratings, qualitative and softwareand for the execution of the Company's global cross-platform, digital and mobile growth strategies.
In June 2010, Sean Creamer was named Executive Vice President, U.S. Media Services, responsible for the Company's radio and cross-platform services and operations.
Sean Creamer joined Arbitron in August 2005 as Executive Vice President, Finance and Planning. In November 2005, he was named Chief Financial Officer and maintained that responsibility through March 2011. Sean also served as interim Chief Financial Officer from May to August 2012.
Prior to joining Arbitron, Sean was Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Laureate Education, Inc., then a NASDAQ-listed company. During his nine-year tenure with Laureate, Sean was responsible for financial planning and analysis, accounting, budgeting, investor relations, real estate, risk management, tax and treasury functions.
Previously, Sean held a number of financial positions of increasing responsibility at Mobil Corporation and Price Waterhouse. Sean received a B.S. in Accounting from St. Joseph's University in Philadelphia and an M.S. in Taxation from Georgetown University.
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the mediaradio, television, cable and out-of-home; the mobile industry as well as advertising agencies and advertisers around the world. Arbitron's businesses include: measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of U.S. consumers; providing mobile audience measurement and analytics in the United States, Europe, Asia and Australia, and developing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data.
About Arbitron
The Company has developed the Portable People Meter  (PPM) and the PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
For additional information, please visit:
http://www.arbitron.com
Portable People Meter, PPM
and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20121024070312.txt.gz
TIME:20121024070312
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 24, 2012, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release reporting third quarter 2012 financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated October 24, 2012
The information in this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky
Press Contact
Arbitron Inc.
: Kim Myers
410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Columbia MD, October 24, 2012  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2012.
Net income for the third quarter 2012 increased to $15.8 million, or $0.59 per share (diluted), compared with $15.4 million, or $0.55 per share (diluted), for the third quarter of 2011, an increase in earnings per share (diluted) of 7.3 percent.
Reported results for the third quarter included a pre-tax, non-cash charge of $0.9 million or $0.02 per share (diluted), related to certain internal-use software deemed impaired as a result of enhancements to our cross-platform methodologies.
The Company reported revenue of $114.3 million, an increase of 8.3 percent over revenue of $105.6 million in the third quarter of 2011. Contributing to the third quarter revenue increase: the nearly completed phase-in of contracted price increases for the Portable People Meter (PPM) service as well as annual escalators in the Company's multi-year radio ratings contracts.
TM
Costs and expenses for the third quarter increased by 11.4 percent to $86.1 million in 2012 from $77.2 million in 2011. Factors contributing to the growth of third quarter costs include the previously announced incremental costs associated with in-person recruitment, address-based sampling and cell-phone household sampling as well as increased investments in Arbitron Mobile and the previously noted impairment charge.
Earnings before interest, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA) for the quarter was $33.5 million, a decrease of 0.2 percent compared with EBITDA of $33.6 million for the third quarter of 2011. The impairment charge reduced third quarter EBITDA by $0.9 million.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2012, net income increased 11.2 percent to $43.6 million compared with $39.2 million in 2011. Earnings per share (diluted) for the first nine months of 2012 increased 13.4 percent to $1.61 compared with $1.42 for the first nine months of 2011.
Revenue for the first nine months of 2012 was $325.1 million, an increase of 7.6 percent compared to revenue of $302.2 million for the same period in 2011.
Costs and expenses for the nine months ended September 30, 2012 increased by 7.3 percent to $255.0 million from $237.7 million.
EBITDA increased 7.5 percent to $93.7 million in the first nine months of 2012 from $87.2 million for the same period in 2011, with EBITDA margins of 28.8 percent in both periods. The third quarter impairment charge reduced EBITDA in the first nine months of 2012 by $0.9 million.
Said William T. Kerr, President and Chief Executive Officer:
Management Comment on Third Quarter 2012 Results
"In the third quarter, we announced that Arbitron and comScore will work together on a groundbreaking cross-platform initiative for ESPN.
"We are working to integrate census-level data from PCs, mobile devices, and television set-top boxes with the personal, passive and single-source measurement capabilities of our PPM technology. We plan to track and report the consumption of video, audio and display content across radio, television, PCs, smartphones, and tablets. Our goal is a new methodology that the media and marketing industry can embrace as the template for the future of cross-platform measurement.
"This initiative is a strong validation of our strategy for cross-platform, and is a direct outcome of the pioneering work Arbitron delivered in our cross-platform pilot for the Coalition for Innovative Media Measurement (CIMM).
"Also in the third quarter, we continued to grow our revenue and earnings as we maintained our investments in the value and utility of our core services and continued to invest in the opportunities presented by the emerging markets of mobile and cross-platform."
Arbitron is reiterating its revenue and earnings per share guidance for 2012.
2012 Full-Year Guidance
Arbitron expects 2012 revenue to increase between 5 percent and 7 percent over its 2011 revenue of $422.3 million.
The Company anticipates 2012 earnings per share (diluted) between $2.15 and $2.30, an increase of 8 percent to 15 percent over comparable 2011 earnings per share (diluted) of $2.00, which excludes the impact of an impairment charge of $0.07 per share (diluted) taken in the fourth quarter 2011.
Arbitron will host a conference call at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time, today, October 24, 2012.
Earnings Conference Call: Schedule and Access
The Company invites you to listen to the call toll-free by dialing (877) 262-6702. The conference call can be accessed from outside the United States by dialing (443) 863-7301. To participate, users will need to use the following code: 36602545. The call will also be available live on the Internet at the following sites: www.arbitron.com and www.streetevents.com.
A replay of the call will be available from 1:00 on October 24, 2012, through 11:59 on October 31, 2012. To access the replay, please call (toll-free) (855) 859-2056 in the United States or (404) 537-3406 if you're calling from outside of the United States. Replay listeners will need to enter the following code: 36602545.
pm
pm
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to either net income as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the mediaradio, television, cable, and out-of-home; the mobile industry; as well as advertising agencies and advertisers around the world. Arbitron's businesses include: measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media, and product patterns of U.S. consumers; providing mobile audience measurement and analytics in the United States, Europe, Asia, and Australia; and developing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data.
About Arbitron
The Company has developed the Portable People Meter (PPM) and the PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
Portable People Meter
TM
, PPM
and PPM 360
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2011, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measure, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measure, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(2) Arbitron's management believes that presenting EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization), both non-GAAP financial measures, as supplemental information helps investors, analysts, and others, if they so choose, in understanding and evaluating Arbitron's operating performance in some of the same manners that management does because EBIT and EBITDA exclude certain items that are not directly related to Arbitron's core operating performance. Arbitron's management references these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing current performance and making decisions about internal budgets, resource allocation and financial goals.
EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, and depreciation and amortization to net income.
EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered substitutes either for net income as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
Note: The December 31, 2011 Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet is derived from the audited Balance Sheet included in the Company's
Form 10-K
for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20121213171543.txt.gz
TIME:20121213171543
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On December 13, 2012 Arbitron Inc. ("Arbitron") issued a press release announcing the retirement of William T. Kerr in January 2013 and that Sean R. Creamer would succeed Mr. Kerr as President and Chief Executive Officer of Arbitron. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated herein by reference. Retirement of William T. Kerr The retirement of William T. Kerr as Arbitrons President and Chief Executive Officer is expected to take effect on January 1, 2013, at which time his successor will assume the position of President and Chief Executive Officer. Following his retirement as President and Chief Executive Officer, Mr. Kerr will remain a member of the Arbitron Board of Directors. Appointment of Sean R. Creamer Arbitron has announced the appointment of Sean R. Creamer, aged 48, as President and Chief Executive Officer. Mr. Creamer is expected to assume the position of President and Chief Executive Officer on January 1, 2013, upon the retirement of Mr. Kerr. Since August 2011 Mr. Creamer has served as Executive Vice President, Chief Operating Officer of Arbitron and, since August 2012 a member of the Board of Directors. In June 2010 Arbitron named Mr. Creamer Executive Vice President, U.S. Media Services. Mr. Creamer joined Arbitron in September 2005 as Executive Vice President, Finance and Planning. In November 2005, he was named Chief Financial Officer and maintained that responsibility through March 2011 and, on an interim basis, from May 2012 through August 2012. Mr. Creamer and the company have entered into an offer letter dated December 13, 2012 regarding his promotion to President and Chief Executive Officer. Mr. Creamer will be entitled to annual base salary of $580,000 when he becomes President and Chief Executive Officer. The Compensation and Human Resources Committee of the Arbitron Board of Directors (the "Compensation Committee") will review base salary annually. Mr. Creamer will also be eligible to earn an annual incentive bonus under Arbitrons Non-Equity Incentive Plan with a target bonus level of 100% of his annual base salary and a maximum of 200% of annual base salary. Mr. Creamer will be eligible for long-term incentive awards, which may be granted to Mr. Creamer at such times and in such amounts as the Compensation Committee may determine. In connection with Mr. Creamers assumption of the positions of President and Chief Executive Officer Arbitron will grant to Mr. Creamer an equity award with an expected value equal to approximately 250% of his new annual base salary. The equity award will be in the form of restricted stock units and will vest quarterly over a three year period, assuming continued employment. Mr. Creamer and the company have also entered into an Amended and Restated Executive Retention Agreement effective December 13, 2012 (the "Amended Retention Agreement"), which replaces an Executive Retention Agreement with Mr. Creamer currently in place and scheduled to expire in August 2013. The Amended Retention Agreement will remain in effect through the second anniversary of the effective date, except in the event of the change in control of the company during the term, in which case it will remain in effect through the later of (i) the second anniversary of the effective date or (ii) twelve months following a change in control. The Amended Retention Agreement provides for severance payments under certain circumstances, including termination without cause or resignation for good reason, enhanced severance following a change in control of Arbitron, and accelerated vesting of outstanding equity awards upon a termination without cause during a specified period following a change in control of Arbitron. Arbitron has determined there are no related person transactions between it and Mr. Creamer within the meaning of Item 404(a) of Regulation S-K. Arbitron expects to file the offer letter and the Amended Retention Agreement as exhibits to its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012 and the descriptions of each document contained herein is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the respective document.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated December 13, 2012
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
COLUMBIA, MD; December 13, 2012  The Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced plans to appoint Sean R. Creamer, 48, President and Chief Executive Officer, effective January 1, 2013. Upon his appointment, Mr. Creamer will succeed William T. Kerr, 71, who has announced his intention to retire as President and Chief Executive Officer on January 1, 2013.
"The Board of Directors and I are very pleased to welcome Sean as President and CEO of Arbitron," said Philip Guarascio, Chairman of Arbitron's Board of Directors. "Sean is a seasoned media and marketing executive with years of leadership experience at Arbitron. We would like to thank Bill Kerr on behalf of everyone at Arbitron for his many contributions to the company as President and CEO."
William Kerr said: "An important priority throughout my three-year tenure as Arbitron CEO has been to build a strong team of senior executives. In his time as Chief Operating Officer, as head of U.S Media Services and as CFO, Sean has consistently demonstrated he possesses the skills, temperament and vision necessary to lead Arbitron."
Mr. Kerr will continue to serve on the Arbitron Board of Directors.
About Sean Creamer
Sean Creamer has been Executive Vice President, Chief Operating Officer, since August 2011, responsible for Arbitron core businessesratings, qualitative, and softwareand for the execution of the Company's global cross-platform, digital, and mobile growth strategies.
Mr. Creamer was appointed to the Arbitron Board of Directors in August 2012.
In June 2010, Sean was named Executive Vice President, U.S. Media Services, responsible for the Company's radio and cross-platform services and operations.
Sean joined Arbitron in September 2005 as Executive Vice President, Finance and Planning. In November 2005, he was named Chief Financial Officer and maintained that responsibility through March 2011 and, on an interim basis, from May 2012 through August 2012.
Prior to joining Arbitron, Sean was Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Laureate Education, Inc., then a NASDAQ-listed company.
A native of Rockville, Maryland, Sean is a graduate of Gonzaga College High School in Washington, D.C., St. Joseph's University in Philadelphia and Georgetown University in Washington D.C. He currently resides in Olney, Maryland with his wife, Lisa, and their three children.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the mediaradio, television, cable and out-of-home; the mobile industry as well as advertising agencies and advertisers around the world. Arbitron's businesses include: measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of U.S. consumers; providing mobile audience measurement and analytics in the United States, Europe, Asia and Australia, and developing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has developed the Portable People Meter  (PPM) and the PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
Portable People Meter, PPM
and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2012 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies such as the joint cross-platform measurement service with comScore, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including Arbitron's 2011 Annual Report on
Form 10-K
. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20121218172042.txt.gz
TIME:20121218172042
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
On December 17, 2012, Arbitron Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger (the "Merger Agreement") with Nielsen Holdings N.V., a Dutch public company with limited liability () ("Parent"), and TNC Sub I Corporation, a Delaware corporation and an indirect wholly owned subsidiary of Parent ("Merger Sub").
naamloze vennootschap
Merger Agreement
Pursuant to the terms of the Merger Agreement, subject to the satisfaction or waiver of certain conditions set forth in the Merger Agreement, Merger Sub will be merged with and into the Company (the "Merger"), and the Company will become an indirect wholly-owned subsidiary of Parent at the effective time of the Merger (the "Effective Time"). At the Effective Time, each share of the common stock of the Company, par value $0.50 per share (the "Common Stock"), issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time (other than shares held by the Company, Parent, Merger Sub or any Company stockholders who perfect their statutory rights of appraisal under Delaware law) will be converted into the right to receive $48.00 in cash (the "Merger Consideration").
The boards of directors of each of the Company and Parent have approved the Merger Agreement and the Merger.
The Merger Agreement includes customary representations, warranties and covenants by the parties. The Company has agreed, among other things, to operate its business in the ordinary course until the Merger is consummated. The Company has agreed not to solicit or initiate discussions with third parties regarding other proposals to acquire the Company and has agreed to certain restrictions on its ability to respond to such proposals, subject to the fulfillment of the fiduciary duties of the Company's board of directors. In addition, certain covenants require each of the parties to use reasonable best efforts to cause the Merger to be consummated.
Consummation of the Merger is subject to various customary closing conditions, including, (i) the receipt of the Company Stockholder Approval (as defined in the Merger Agreement), (ii) the absence of any law, injunction, judgment or ruling enjoining or prohibiting the Merger, (iii) the accuracy of the representations and warranties made by the parties, (iv) the performance by the parties in all material respects of their covenants, obligations and agreements under the Merger Agreement and (v) the expiration or early termination of the waiting period applicable to the Merger under the Hart-Scott Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, as amended. Consummation of the Merger is not subject to any financing contingencies.
The Merger Agreement contains certain termination rights and provides that upon termination of the Merger Agreement by the Company or Parent upon specified conditions, including a termination prior to the requisite stockholder approval of the Merger by the Company to accept a "Superior Company Proposal" (as defined in the Merger Agreement) or by Parent upon a change in the recommendation of the Company's board of directors, the Company will be required to pay Parent a termination fee of $32.7 million, and upon termination of the Merger Agreement by the Company or Parent upon specified conditions (including a failure to satisfy certain conditions relating to antitrust laws or Parent's breach of certain of its covenants related to its efforts to obtain antitrust approvals), Parent will be required to pay the Company a termination fee of $131.0 million. In addition, subject to certain exceptions and limitations, either party may terminate the Merger Agreement if the Merger is not consummated by October 1, 2013 (as such date may be extended under certain circumstances).
The foregoing description of the Merger Agreement does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Merger Agreement, a copy of which is filed as Exhibit 2.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
The Merger Agreement has been included to provide investors and stockholders with information regarding its terms. It is not intended to provide any other factual information about the Company, Parent or Merger Sub. The Merger Agreement contains representations and warranties that the parties made to and solely for the benefit of each other. The assertions embodied in the representations and warranties in the Merger Agreement are qualified by information contained in the confidential disclosure letter that the Company delivered to Parent in connection with signing the Merger Agreement. This confidential disclosure letter contains information that modifies, qualifies and
creates exceptions to the representations and warranties set forth in the Merger Agreement. Investors are not third-party beneficiaries under the Merger Agreement and should not rely on such representations and warranties as characterizations of the actual state of facts or circumstances. Moreover, information concerning the subject matter of such representations and warranties may change after the date of the Merger Agreement, which subsequent information may or may not be fully reflected in the Company's or Parent's public disclosures.
Forward Looking Statements:
This written communication includes information that could constitute forward-looking statements made pursuant to the safe harbor provision of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements may be identified by words such as "will", "expect", "should", "could", "shall" and similar expressions. These statements are subject to risks and uncertainties concerning Parent's proposed acquisition of the Company, the Company's expected financial performance, as well as the Company's strategic and operational plans and actual results and events could differ materially from what presently is expected. The potential risks and uncertainties include the possibility that the transaction will not close or that the closing may be delayed; the possibility that the Company may be unable to obtain stockholder approval as required for the transaction or that the other conditions to the closing of the transaction may not be satisfied; the transaction may involve unexpected costs, liabilities or delays; the outcome of any legal proceedings related to the transaction; the occurrence of any event, change or other circumstances that could give rise to the termination of the transaction agreement; general economic conditions; conditions in the markets Parent and the Company are engaged in; behavior of customers, suppliers and competitors (including their reaction to the transaction); technological developments; as well as legal and regulatory rules affecting Parent's and the Company's business and specific risk factors discussed in other releases and public filings made by Parent and the Company (including the their respective filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC")). This list of factors is not intended to be exhaustive. Such forward-looking statements only speak as of the date of this written communication, and we assume no obligation to update any written or oral forward-looking statement made by us or on our behalf as a result of new information, future events, or other factors.
Additional Information and Where You Can Find It:
Investors may obtain free copies of the proxy statement when it becomes available, as well as other filings containing information about the Company, without charge, at the SEC's Internet site (www.sec.gov). These documents may also be obtained for free from the Company's Investor Relations web site (http://www.arbitron.com/investors) or by directing a request to the Company at: Arbitron Inc., 9705 Patuxent Woods Drive, Columbia, Maryland 21046.
In connection with the proposed acquisition by Parent of the Company pursuant to the terms of an Agreement and Plan of Merger by and among the Company, Parent, and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Parent, the Company will file a proxy statement with the SEC. Investors are urged to read the proxy statement (including all amendments and supplements to it) because it will contain important information.
The Company and its directors and executive officers and other members of management and employees are potential participants in the solicitation of proxies from the Company's stockholders in respect of the proposed transaction.
Information regarding the Company's directors and executive officers is available in the Company's proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of stockholders, filed with the SEC on April 12, 2012. Additional information regarding the interests of such potential participants in the proposed transaction will be included in the proxy statement to be filed with the SEC in connection with the proposed transaction.
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
The Company entered into a Waiver and Amendment of Executive Retention Agreement effective December 17, 2012 (collectively, the "Amendments") with each of Debra Delman, Carol Hanley, Gregg Lindner and Timothy T. Smith (the "Executives"), which amend the Executives' existing Executive Retention Agreements with the Company, as previously amended (as previously amended, the "Existing Agreements").
Each Executive's Existing Agreement is currently set to expire in August 2013. The Amendments extend the terms of the Existing Agreements of Debra Delman and Gregg Lindner through December 16, 2014 and Carol Hanley and Timothy T. Smith through the later of December 16, 2014 and the date that is 12 months following the date of a change in control of the Company that occurs prior to December 16, 2014. The Existing Agreements, as amended by the Amendments, provide for severance payments under certain circumstances, including termination without cause or resignation as a result of position diminishment and enhanced severance following a change in control of the Company.
The Company expects to file the Amendments as exhibits to its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012. The foregoing description of the Amendments does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Amendments.
Item 7.01. Regulation FD Disclosure.
The Company and Parent issued a joint press release on December 18, 2012 regarding the matters described in Item 1.01 of this Current Report on Form 8-K. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
A copy of the joint investor presentation of the Company and Parent, dated December 18, 2012, regarding the matters described in Item 1.01 of this Current Report on Form 8-K is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
As provided in General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K, the information in this Item 7.01 and Exhibit 99.1 and Exhibit 99.2 incorporated herein shall not be deemed to be "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, nor shall it be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 2.1
EXECUTION VERSION
 
 
 
 
 
 
(this "") dated as of December 17, 2012, among Nielsen Holdings N.V., a Netherlands company (""), TNC Sub I Corporation, a Delaware corporation and a wholly owned subsidiary of Parent (""), and Arbitron Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "").
THIS AGREEMENT AND PLAN OF MERGER
Agreement
Parent
Merger Sub
Company
, the respective Boards of Directors of Parent, Merger Sub and the Company have approved the acquisition of the Company by Parent on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement;
WHEREAS
, the respective Boards of Directors of Parent, Merger Sub and the Company have approved this Agreement and the merger (the "") of Merger Sub into the Company, on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth herein;
WHEREAS
Merger
, the Company Board (as defined below) has, subject to the terms of this Agreement, resolved to recommend adoption of this Agreement by the stockholders of the Company; and
WHEREAS
, Parent, Merger Sub and the Company desire to make certain representations, warranties, covenants and agreements in connection with the Merger and also to prescribe various conditions to the Merger.
WHEREAS
the parties hereto agree as follows:
NOW, THEREFORE,
1.01 . On the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement, and in accordance with the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (the ""), Merger Sub shall be merged with and into the Company at the Effective Time. At the Effective Time, the separate corporate existence of Merger Sub shall cease and the Company shall continue as the surviving corporation (the "").
The Merger
DGCL
Surviving Corporation
1.02 . The closing (the "") of the Merger shall take place at the offices of Morrison & Foerster LLP, 1650 Tysons Boulevard, Suite 400, McLean, Virginia, at 9:00 a.m. (Eastern Time) no later than the third (3rd) Business Day following the satisfaction (or, to the extent permitted by Law, waiver by all parties hereto) of the conditions set forth in Article VII (other than those that by their terms are to be satisfied or waived at the Closing) (such date, the ""), or at such other time and date as shall be agreed upon in writing among Parent and the Company; , , that if the Marketing Period has not ended on or prior to the Original Date and Parent requests, in writing, an extension of the Original Date, the Closing shall occur on the date following the satisfaction or waiver of such conditions that is the earlier to occur of (a) such date during the Marketing Period specified by Parent on no fewer than three Business Days' written notice to the Company, and (b) the first Business Day following the end of the Marketing Period. The date on which the Closing occurs is referred to in this Agreement as the "".
Closing
Closing
Original Date
provided
however
Closing Date
 
1.03 . On the Closing Date, the parties hereto shall duly file with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware a certificate of merger (the ""), executed in accordance with the relevant provisions of the DGCL, and shall make all other filings or recordings required under the DGCL. The Merger shall become effective at such time as the Certificate of Merger is duly filed with such Secretary of State of the State of Delaware, or at such other time as Parent and the Company shall agree and specify in the Certificate of Merger (the time that the Merger becomes effective being the "").
Effective Time
Certificate of Merger
Effective Time
1.04 . The Merger shall have the effects set forth herein and in Section 259 of the DGCL. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing and subject thereto, at the Effective Time, all the property, rights, privileges, immunities, powers and franchises of the Company and Merger Sub shall vest in the Surviving Corporation and all debts, liabilities and duties of the Company and Merger Sub shall become the debts, liabilities and duties of the Surviving Corporation.
Effects
1.05 .
Certificate of Incorporation and Bylaws
(a) The certificate of incorporation of the Company (the ""), as in effect immediately prior to the Effective Time, shall be amended at the Effective Time to read in the form of and, as so amended, shall be the certificate of incorporation of the Surviving Corporation until thereafter changed or amended as provided therein or by applicable Law.
Company Certificate
Exhibit A
(b) The bylaws of the Company (the ""), as in effect immediately prior to the Effective Time, shall be amended at the Effective Time so as to read in their entirety in the form of the bylaws of Merger Sub as in effect immediately prior to the Effective Time (which shall contain such provisions as are necessary to give full effect to the exculpation and indemnification provided for in Section 6.07) and, as so amended, shall be the bylaws of the Surviving Corporation until thereafter changed or amended as provided therein or by applicable Law.
Company Bylaws
1.06 . The directors of Merger Sub immediately prior to the Effective Time shall, from and after the Effective Time, be the directors of the Surviving Corporation until their successors have been duly elected or appointed and qualified or until their earlier death, resignation or removal in accordance with the certificate of incorporation and bylaws of the Surviving Corporation.
Directors
1.07 . The officers of the Company immediately prior to the Effective Time shall, from and after the Effective Time, be the officers of the Surviving Corporation until their successors have been duly elected or appointed and qualified or until their earlier death, resignation or removal in accordance with the certificate of incorporation and bylaws of the Surviving Corporation.
Officers
2.01 . At the Effective Time, by virtue of the Merger and without any action on the part of the holder of any shares of the common stock of the Company, par value $0.50 per share (the "") or any shares of capital stock of Merger Sub:
Effect on Capital Stock
Company Common Stock
(a) . Each share of capital stock of Merger Sub issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be automatically converted into and become one fully paid and nonassessable share of common stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Surviving Corporation.
Capital Stock of Merger Sub
 
(b) . Each share of the Company Common Stock that is owned by the Company, Parent or Merger Sub immediately prior to the Effective Time shall no longer be outstanding and shall automatically be canceled and shall cease to exist, and no consideration shall be delivered or deliverable in exchange therefor.
Cancelation of Treasury Stock and Parent-Owned Stock
(c) .
Conversion of the Company Common Stock
(i) Subject to Sections 2.01(b) and 2.01(d), each share of the Company Common Stock issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be automatically converted into the right to receive an amount equal to $48.00 per share of the Company Common Stock, in cash and without interest (the "").
Merger Consideration
(ii) As of the Effective Time, all such shares of the Company Common Stock shall no longer be outstanding and shall automatically be canceled and shall cease to exist, and each holder of a certificate, or evidence of shares held in book-entry form, representing any such shares of the Company Common Stock (a "") shall cease to have any rights with respect thereto, except the right to receive the Merger Consideration upon surrender of such Certificate in accordance with Section 2.02, without interest.
Certificate
(iii) As provided in Section 2.02(h), the right of any holder of a Certificate to receive the Merger Consideration shall be subject to and reduced by the amount of any withholding that is required under applicable Tax Laws.
(d) . Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, shares of the Company Common Stock that are outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time and that are held by any person who is entitled to demand and properly demands appraisal of such shares of Company Common Stock ("") pursuant to, and who complies in all respects with, Section 262 of the DGCL ("") shall not be converted into the right to receive the Merger Consideration as provided in Section 2.01(c), but rather the holders of Appraisal Shares shall be entitled to payment of the fair value of such Appraisal Shares in accordance with Section 262; , , that if any such holder shall fail to perfect or otherwise shall waive, withdraw or lose the right to appraisal under Section 262, then the right of such holder to be paid the fair value of such holder's Appraisal Shares shall cease and such Appraisal Shares shall be deemed to have been converted as of the Effective Time into, and to have become exchangeable solely for the right to receive, the Merger Consideration as provided in Section 2.01(c). The Company shall serve prompt notice to Parent of any demands received by the Company for appraisal of any shares of the Company Common Stock. The Company shall give Parent the opportunity to participate in all negotiations and proceedings with respect to such demands. Prior to the Effective Time, the Company shall not, without the prior written consent of Parent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed), make any payment with respect to, settle or offer to settle, or waive any failure to timely deliver a written demand or timely take any other action with respect to any such demands, or agree to do any of the foregoing.
Appraisal Rights
Appraisal Shares
Section 262
provided
however
 
2.02 .
Exchange of Certificates
(a) . Prior to the Effective Time, Parent shall select a bank or trust company reasonably acceptable to the Company to act as paying agent (the "") for the payment of the Merger Consideration upon surrender of Certificates. At or prior to the Effective Time, Parent shall, or shall cause the Surviving Corporation to, deposit with the Paying Agent to be held in trust for the benefit of holders of Certificates all of the cash necessary to pay for the shares of the Company Common Stock converted into the right to receive the Merger Consideration pursuant to Section 2.01(c) (such cash being hereinafter referred to as the ""). Parent shall, or shall cause the Surviving Corporation to, promptly deposit additional funds with the Paying Agent in an amount equal to any deficiency in the amount required to make such payment.
Paying Agent
Paying Agent
Exchange Fund
(b) . Promptly after the Effective Time (and in any event within two (2) Business Days), the Surviving Corporation or Parent shall cause the Paying Agent to mail to each holder of record of a Certificate that immediately prior to the Effective Time represented shares of the Company Common Stock that were converted into the right to receive the Merger Consideration pursuant to Section 2.01, (i) a letter of transmittal (which shall be in customary form and have such other provisions as Parent and the Company shall reasonably agree and which shall specify that delivery shall be effected, and risk of loss and title to the Certificates shall pass, only upon proper delivery of the Certificates, or affidavits of loss in lieu thereof as provided in Section 2.02(g), to the Paying Agent) and (ii) instructions for effecting the surrender of the Certificates in exchange for the Merger Consideration. Upon surrender of a Certificate to the Paying Agent for cancelation, together with such letter of transmittal, duly completed and validly executed, and such other documents as may reasonably be required by the Paying Agent, the holder of such Certificate shall be entitled to receive in exchange therefor the amount of Merger Consideration into which the shares of the Company Common Stock theretofore represented by such Certificate shall have been converted pursuant to Section 2.01, and the Certificate so surrendered shall forthwith be canceled. In the event of a transfer of ownership of the Company Common Stock that is not registered in the transfer records of the Company, payment may be made to a person other than the person in whose name the Certificate so surrendered is registered, if such Certificate shall be properly endorsed or otherwise be in proper form for transfer and the person requesting such payment shall pay any transfer or other Taxes required by reason of the payment to a person other than the registered holder of such Certificate or establish to the satisfaction of Parent that such Tax has been paid or is not applicable. Until surrendered as contemplated by this Section 2.02, each Certificate shall be deemed at any time after the Effective Time to represent only the right to receive upon such surrender the amount of Merger Consideration, without interest, into which the shares of the Company Common Stock theretofore represented by such Certificate have been converted pursuant to Section 2.01. No interest shall be paid or accrue on the cash payable upon surrender of any Certificate.
Exchange Procedure
(c) . The Merger Consideration paid in accordance with the terms of this Article II upon conversion of any shares of the Company Common Stock shall be deemed to have been paid in full satisfaction of all rights pertaining to such shares of the Company Common Stock, , , to the Surviving Corporation's obligation to pay any dividends or to make any other distributions with a record date prior to the Effective Time that may have been declared or made by the Company on such shares of
No Further Ownership Rights in the Company Common Stock
subject
however
 
the Company Common Stock in accordance with the terms of this Agreement or prior to the date of this Agreement and that remain unpaid at the Effective Time; and after the Effective Time there shall be no further registration of transfers on the stock transfer books of the Surviving Corporation of shares of the Company Common Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time. If, after the Effective Time, any Certificates are presented to the Surviving Corporation or the Paying Agent for any reason, they shall be canceled and exchanged as provided in this Article II.
(d) . Any portion of the Exchange Fund that remains undistributed to the holders of the Company Common Stock for twelve (12) months after the Effective Time shall be delivered to Parent upon demand, and any holder of the Company Common Stock who has not theretofore complied with this Article II shall thereafter look only to Parent and the Surviving Corporation (subject to abandoned property, escheat or similar Laws) as general creditors thereof with respect to the payment of its claim for Merger Consideration, without any interest thereon.
Termination of Exchange Fund
(e) . None of Parent, Merger Sub, the Surviving Corporation, the Company or the Paying Agent shall be liable to any person in respect of any cash from the Exchange Fund delivered to a public official pursuant to any applicable abandoned property, escheat or similar Law. If any Certificate has not been surrendered prior to the date on which the Merger Consideration in respect of such Certificate would otherwise escheat to or become the property of any Governmental Entity, any such Merger Consideration in respect of such Certificate shall, to the extent permitted by applicable Law, become the property of the Surviving Corporation, free and clear of all claims or interest of any person previously entitled thereto.
No Liability
(f) . The Paying Agent shall invest any cash included in the Exchange Fund, as directed by Parent; that such investments shall be in obligations of or guaranteed by the United States of America, in commercial paper obligations rated P-1 or A-1 or better by Moody's Investors Service, Inc. or Standard & Poor's Corporation, respectively, or a combination of the foregoing and, in any such case, no such instrument shall have a maturity exceeding three (3) months, or in money market funds having a rating in the highest investment category granted by a recognized credit rating agency at the time of investment. Any interest and other income resulting from such investments shall be paid to, or as directed by, Parent. In no event, however, shall such investment or any such payment of interest or income delay the receipt by holders of Certificates of the Merger Consideration, or otherwise impair such holders' rights hereunder.
Investment of Exchange Fund
provided
(g) . If any Certificate shall have been lost, stolen, defaced or destroyed, upon the making of an affidavit of that fact in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Paying Agent by the person claiming such Certificate to be lost, stolen, defaced or destroyed and, if required by the Surviving Corporation, the posting by such person of a bond in such reasonable and customary amount as the Surviving Corporation may direct as indemnity against any claim that may be made against it with respect to such Certificate, the Paying Agent shall pay the Merger Consideration in respect of such lost, stolen, defaced or destroyed Certificate.
Lost Certificates
(h) . Parent, the Surviving Corporation or the Paying Agent, as applicable, shall be entitled to deduct and withhold from the consideration otherwise payable
Withholding Rights
 
pursuant to this Agreement to any holder of shares of the Company Common Stock or any holder of a Company Stock-Based Award, such amounts as Parent, the Surviving Corporation or the Paying Agent is required to deduct and withhold with respect to the making of such payment under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "") or any provision of state, local or foreign Tax Law. To the extent that amounts are so withheld and paid over to the appropriate Governmental Entity by Parent, the Surviving Corporation or the Paying Agent, such withheld amounts shall be treated for all purposes of this Agreement as having been paid to the holder of shares of the Company Common Stock or the holder of a Company Stock-Based Award, as the case may be, in respect of which such deduction and withholding was made by Parent, the Surviving Corporation or the Paying Agent.
Code
Except as set forth in (i) the Company SEC Documents filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission ("") and publicly available since January 1, 2010 but prior to the date of this Agreement (the "") or (ii) the corresponding sections of the letter, dated as of the date of this Agreement, from the Company to Parent and Merger Sub (the ""), the Company represents and warrants to Parent and Merger Sub that:
SEC
Filed Company SEC Documents
Company Disclosure Letter
3.01 . Each of the Company and each of its wholly-owned subsidiaries (the "") is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction in which it is organized (in the case of good standing, to the extent the concept is recognized by such jurisdiction) and has full corporate power and authority to own, lease or otherwise hold and operate its properties and assets and to conduct its businesses as presently conducted, except with respect to the Company Subsidiaries, where the failure to be so organized, existing or in good standing or have such power or authority, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect. Each of the Company and each Company Subsidiary is duly qualified or licensed to do business and is in good standing (to the extent the concept is recognized by such jurisdiction) in each jurisdiction where the nature of its business or its ownership, leasing or operation of its properties makes such qualification or licensing necessary, except where the failure to be so qualified or licensed or to be in good standing, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect. The Company has made available to Parent, prior to the date of this Agreement, complete and accurate copies of the Company Certificate and Company Bylaws, in each case as amended to the date hereof. The Company Certificate and Company Bylaws so made available are in full force and effect, and the Company is not in violation of such Company Certificate or Company Bylaws.
Organization, Standing and Power
Company Subsidiaries
3.02 .
Company Subsidiaries; Equity Interests
(a) All of the outstanding shares of capital stock of each Company Subsidiary have been validly issued and are fully paid and nonassessable and are owned by the Company, by another Company Subsidiary or by the Company and another Company Subsidiary, free and clear of all pledges, liens, charges, mortgages, encumbrances and security interests of any kind or nature whatsoever (collectively, "") and free of any restriction on the right to vote, sell or otherwise dispose of such capital stock or other equity interests.
Liens
(b) Except for its interests in the Company Subsidiaries, the Company does not own, directly or indirectly, any capital stock, membership interest, partnership interest, joint venture interest or other equity or voting interest in any person.
 
3.03 .
Capital Structure
(a) The authorized capital stock of the Company consists of 500,000,000 shares of the Company Common Stock and 750,000 shares of preferred stock, par value $100.00 per share (the "", and, together with the Company Common Stock, the ""). At the close of business on December 12, 2012 (the ""), (a) 26,173,968 shares of the Company Common Stock (which includes no shares of the Company Common Stock subject to vesting or other forfeiture conditions or repurchase by the Company (such shares, the "")) were issued and outstanding, (b) 6,164,495 shares of the Company Common Stock were held by the Company in its treasury, (c) no shares of the Company Common Stock were held by any Company Subsidiary, (d) 2,041,713 shares of the Company Common Stock were subject to outstanding Company Stock Options, 522,386.1933 shares of the Company Common Stock were subject to outstanding Company RSUs and Company DSUs, and 2,893,383 additional shares of the Company Common Stock were reserved and available for issuance pursuant to the Company Stock Plans, (e) no shares of Company Preferred Stock were issued or outstanding and (f) no other shares of capital stock or other voting securities of the Company were issued, reserved for issuance or outstanding. Except for shares of Company Common Stock issued upon exercise, vesting or settlement of Company Stock-Based Awards set forth above, no additional shares of Company Common Stock have been issued and no additional Company Stock-Based Awards have been granted between the Measurement Date and the date of this Agreement. There are no bonds, debentures, notes or other indebtedness of the Company having the right to vote (or convertible into, or exchangeable for, securities having the right to vote) on any matters on which holders of the Company Common Stock may vote (""). Except as set forth above, as of the date of this Agreement, there are no options, warrants, rights, convertible or exchangeable securities, commitments, or undertakings of any kind to which the Company or any Company Subsidiary is a party or by which any of them is bound (i) obligating the Company or any Company Subsidiary to issue, deliver or sell, or cause to be issued, delivered or sold, additional shares of capital stock or other equity interests in, or any security convertible or exercisable for or exchangeable into any capital stock of or other equity interest in, the Company or of any Company Subsidiary or any Voting Company Debt or (ii) obligating the Company or any Company Subsidiary to issue, grant, extend or enter into any such option, warrant, security, commitment or undertaking. All of the outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company have been validly issued and are fully paid and nonassessable.
Company Preferred Stock
Company Capital Stock
Measurement Date
Company Restricted Stock
Voting Company Debt
(b) Except as set forth above, as of the date of this Agreement, there are no restricted shares, restricted share units, stock appreciation rights, performance shares, performance share units, contingent value rights, "phantom" stock or similar securities or rights that are derivative of, or provide economic benefits based, directly or indirectly, on the value or price of, any capital stock of, or other voting securities or ownership interests in, the Company or any Company Subsidiary. There are no (i) voting trusts, voting agreements, proxies or other similar agreements
 
or understandings to which the Company or any Company Subsidiary is a party or by which the Company or any Company Subsidiary is bound with respect to the voting of any shares of capital stock of the Company or any Company Subsidiary or (ii) contractual obligations or commitments of any character to which the Company or any Company Subsidiary is a party or by which the Company or any Company Subsidiary is bound restricting the transfer of, or requiring the registration for sale of, any shares of capital stock of the Company or any Company Subsidiary.
3.04 .
Authority; Execution and Delivery; Enforceability
(a) The Company has all requisite corporate power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and to consummate the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement (collectively, the ""). The execution and delivery by the Company of this Agreement and the consummation by the Company of the Transactions have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of the Company, and no other corporate actions on the part of the Company are necessary to authorize this Agreement and to consummate the Transactions, subject to receipt of the Company Stockholder Approval. The Company has duly executed and delivered this Agreement, and, assuming due authorization, execution and delivery by Parent and Merger Sub, this Agreement constitutes the Company's legal, valid and binding obligation, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms, except that such enforceability may be (i) limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent conveyance, reorganization, moratorium and other similar laws of general application relating to or affecting creditors' rights generally and (ii) subject to general equitable principles (whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law) and any implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing (clauses (i) and (ii), the "").
Transactions
Bankruptcy and Equity Exception
(b) The Board of Directors of the Company (the ""), at a meeting duly called and held, duly adopted resolutions by a unanimous vote of all directors (i) approving and declaring advisable this Agreement, the Merger and the other Transactions, (ii) determining that the terms of the Merger and the other Transactions are advisable, fair to and in the best interests of the stockholders of the Company, (iii) directing that the Company submit the adoption of this Agreement to a vote by the Company's stockholders at a special meeting of the stockholders, (iv) recommending that the Company's stockholders adopt this Agreement (the "") and (v) approving this Agreement and the Merger for purposes of Section 203 of the DGCL such that, subject to the accuracy of the representations set forth in Section 4.08, no stockholder approval (other than the Company Stockholder Approval (as defined below)) shall be required to consummate the Merger or the other Transactions or to permit the Company to perform its obligations hereunder, which resolutions have not as of the date hereof been subsequently rescinded, modified or withdrawn in any way.
Company Board
Company Recommendation
(c) Assuming the accuracy of the representations in Section 4.08, the only vote of holders of any class or series of Company Capital Stock necessary to adopt this Agreement and approve the Merger and the other Transactions is (i) assuming the Ownership Condition is satisfied, the affirmative vote of the holders of two-thirds of the outstanding Company Common Stock or (ii) if the Ownership Condition is not satisfied, the affirmative vote required under Article VIII of the Company Certificate (such applicable vote under this Section 3.04(c), the "").
Company Stockholder Approval
 
3.05 .
No Conflicts; Consents
(a) The execution and delivery by the Company of this Agreement do not, and the consummation of the Merger and the other Transactions and compliance with the terms hereof will not, conflict with, or result in any violation or breach of or default (with or without notice or lapse of time, or both) under, or give rise to a right of, or result in, termination, cancelation or acceleration of any obligation or to loss of a material benefit under, or result in the creation of any Lien upon any of the properties or assets of the Company or any Company Subsidiary under, any provision of (i) the Company Certificate, the Company Bylaws or the comparable charter or organizational documents of any Company Subsidiary, (ii) any loan or credit agreement, debenture, contract, lease, license, indenture, note, bond, mortgage, agreement, concession, franchise or other obligation, commitment or instrument (a "") to which the Company or any Company Subsidiary is a party or by which any of their respective properties, rights or assets is bound or (iii) subject to the filings and other matters referred to in Section 3.05(b), any Federal, state, local or foreign judgment, injunction, order, writ, ruling or decree ("") or any Federal, state, local or foreign statute, law, code, ordinance, rule or regulation ("") applicable to the Company or any Company Subsidiary or their respective properties, rights or assets, other than, in the case of clauses (ii) and (iii) above, any such items that, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.
Contract
Judgment
Law
(b) No consent, approval, license, permit, order or authorization ("") of, or registration, declaration or filing with, or permit from, any Federal, state, local or foreign government or any court of competent jurisdiction, administrative, regulatory or other governmental agency, authority or commission, other governmental authority or instrumentality or any non-governmental self-regulatory agency, authority or commission, domestic or foreign (a ""), is required to be obtained or made by or with respect to the Company or any Company Subsidiary in connection with the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement or the consummation of the Transactions, other than (i) compliance with and filings under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, as amended (the ""), (ii) the filing with the SEC of (A) a proxy statement relating to the adoption of this Agreement by the Company's stockholders (the ""), and (B) such reports under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, together with the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder (the "") as may be required in connection with this Agreement, the Merger and the other Transactions, (iii) such filings as may be required under any state securities Laws, (iv) the filing of the Certificate of Merger with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware and appropriate documents with the relevant authorities of the other jurisdictions in which the Company is qualified to do business, (v) such filings as may be required in connection with the Taxes described in Section 6.10, (vi) such filings as may be required under the rules and regulations of the New York Stock Exchange and (vii) such other items that, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.
Consent
Governmental Entity
HSR Act
Proxy Statement
Exchange Act
3.06 .
SEC Documents; Financial Statements; Undisclosed Liabilities
(a) The Company has timely filed or furnished, as applicable, all reports, schedules, forms, statements and other documents with the SEC required to be filed or furnished, as applicable, by the Company since January 1, 2010 under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, together with the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder (the "") and the
Securities Act
 
Exchange Act (such documents, together with any documents and information incorporated therein by reference and together with any documents filed during such period by the Company with the SEC on a voluntary basis on Current Reports on Form 8-K, the "").
Company SEC Documents
(b) As of its respective date, each of the Company SEC Documents complied as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the Exchange Act, the Securities Act and the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (including the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, ""), as the case may be, and the rules and regulations of the SEC promulgated thereunder applicable to such Company SEC Document, each as in effect on the date so filed. As of their respective dates (or, if amended prior to the date hereof, as of the date of such amendment), except to the extent revised or superseded by a later filed Company SEC Document prior to the date hereof, none of the Company SEC Documents contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
SOX
(c) Each of the financial statements (including the related notes) of the Company as of December 31, 2009, 2010 and 2011 and September 30, 2012 and in each case for the periods then ended included in the Company SEC Documents (or incorporated therein by reference) complied as to form at the time it was filed in all material respects with the applicable accounting requirements and the published rules and regulations of the SEC with respect thereto in effect at the time of filing, has been prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States ("") in all material respects (except, in the case of unaudited financial statements, as permitted by the rules and regulations of the SEC) applied on a consistent basis during the periods involved (except as may be indicated in the notes thereto) and fairly presented in all material respects the consolidated financial position of the Company and its consolidated subsidiaries as of the dates thereof and the consolidated results of their operations and cash flows for the periods shown (subject, in the case of unaudited financial statements, to normal year-end audit adjustments, to the absence of notes and to any other adjustments described therein, including in any notes thereto).
GAAP
(d) None of the Company or any Company Subsidiary has any liabilities or obligations of any nature (whether accrued, absolute, known or unknown, contingent or otherwise) except liabilities, obligations, conditions or circumstances (i) to the extent disclosed and provided for in the most recent financial statements included in the Filed Company SEC Documents, (ii) related to the future performance (but not breach) of any Contract in the ordinary course of business, (iii) incurred or arising in the ordinary course of business since the date of the most recent financial statements included in the Filed Company SEC Documents or in connection with the Transactions, (iv) of a subject matter covered by any of the other representations and warranties of the Company set forth in this Agreement (other than the representation and warranty contained in the first sentence of Section 3.08), (v) disclosed in Section 3.06(d) of the Company Disclosure Letter or (vi) as would not reasonably be likely to, individually or in the aggregate, have a Company Material Adverse Effect.
(e) The Company has established and maintained a system of internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Rule 13a-15 under the Exchange Act). Such internal controls provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of the Company's financial reporting and
 
the preparation of the Company's financial statements for external purposes in accordance with GAAP. Since January 1, 2012, the Company's principal executive officer and its principal financial officer have disclosed to the Company's auditors and the audit committee of the Company Board (i) all known significant deficiencies in the design or operation of internal controls over financial reporting that are reasonably likely to adversely affect in any material respect the Company's ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information and have identified for the Company's auditors any material weaknesses in internal controls, and (ii) any known fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in the Company's internal controls.
(f) The Company has established and maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as such term is defined in Rule 13a-15 under the Exchange Act); such disclosure controls and procedures are designed to ensure that material information relating to the Company required to be disclosed in reports the Company files under the Exchange Act is recorded and made known to the individuals responsible for the preparation of the Company's filings with the SEC and other public disclosure documents. The Company has evaluated the effectiveness of the Company's disclosure controls and procedures and, to the extent required by applicable Law, presented in any applicable Company SEC Document that is a report on Form 10-K or Form 10-Q or any amendment thereto its conclusions about the effectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures as of the end of the period covered by such report or amendment based on such evaluation; and, to the extent required by applicable Law, disclosed in such report or amendment any change in the Company's internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the period covered by such report or amendment that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the Company's internal control over financial reporting.
(g) Each of the principal executive officer of the Company and the principal financial officer of the Company (or each former principal executive officer of the Company and each former principal financial officer of the Company, as applicable) has made all certifications required by Rule 13a-14 or 15d-14 under the Exchange Act and Sections 302 and 906 of SOX with respect to the Company SEC Documents, and the statements contained in such certifications are true and accurate. For purposes of this Agreement, "principal executive officer" and "principal financial officer" shall have the meanings given to such terms in SOX. Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has outstanding, or has arranged any outstanding, "extensions of credit" to directors or executive officers in violation of SOX.
3.07 . None of the information supplied or to be supplied by the Company for inclusion or incorporation by reference in the Proxy Statement will, at the date that it is first mailed to the Company's stockholders or at the time of the Company Stockholders Meeting, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading. The Proxy Statement, at the date such materials are first mailed to the Company's stockholders and at the time of the Company Stockholders Meeting, will comply as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations thereunder, except that no representation or warranty is made by the Company with respect to statements made or incorporated by reference therein based on information supplied by Parent or Merger Sub or any of their respective Representatives for inclusion or incorporation by reference therein.
Information Supplied
 
3.08 . From January 1, 2012, there has not been any Event that, individually or together with any other Event, has had or would reasonably be likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect. From October 1, 2012, (a) except in connection with this Agreement and the Transaction or as expressly contemplated or permitted by this Agreement, the Company and each Company Subsidiary has conducted its respective business in all material respects only in the ordinary course of business and (b) there has not been any action taken or committed to be taken by the Company or any Company Subsidiary which, if taken following entry by the Company into this Agreement, would have required the consent of Parent pursuant to Sections 5.01(iv), 5.01(vi), 5.01(vii), 5.01(viii), 5.01(ix), 5.01(x) or 5.01(xii).
Absence of Certain Changes or Events
3.09 .
Taxes
(a) Each of the Company and each Company Subsidiary has filed, or has caused to be filed on its behalf, all material Tax Returns required to have been filed by it (giving effect to all applicable extensions), and all such Tax Returns are true, complete and accurate, except to the extent any failure to file or any inaccuracies in any filed Tax Returns would not reasonably be likely to result in a material increase in Tax liabilities to the Company and the Company Subsidiaries over Tax liabilities reported on Tax Returns required to have been filed. All Taxes shown to be due on such Tax Returns, or material Taxes otherwise required to have been paid by the Company or any Company Subsidiary, have been timely paid in full. There are no Liens for Taxes on the assets of the Company or any Company Subsidiary, other than Liens for Taxes not yet due and payable, that are payable without penalty or that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings.
(b) The most recent financial statements included in the Filed Company SEC Documents reflect, to the extent required by GAAP, a reserve for all Taxes payable by the Company or the Company Subsidiaries (in addition to any reserve for deferred Taxes to reflect timing differences between book and Tax items) for all taxable periods and portions thereof through the closing date of such financial statements. Except as would not reasonably be likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect, since the closing date of such financial statements, none of the Company or any Company Subsidiary has made, changed or revoked any Tax election, elected or changed any method of accounting for Tax purposes, amended any Tax Return, surrendered any right to claim a refund of Taxes, settled or compromised any claim by a Governmental Entity in respect of Taxes, or entered into any contractual obligation in respect of Taxes with any Governmental Entity.
(c) Except as would not reasonably be likely to result in a material increase in Tax liabilities to the Company and the Company Subsidiaries over Tax liabilities reported on filed Tax Returns, (i) no deficiency with respect to a material amount of any Taxes has been proposed, asserted or assessed against the Company or any Company Subsidiary that has not since been finally resolved, (ii) no audit or other proceeding with respect to Taxes due from the Company or any Company Subsidiary, or any Tax Return of the Company or any Company Subsidiary, is pending, being conducted or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened by any Governmental Entity and (iii) and no agreement has been entered into by or on behalf of the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries that has continuing effect to extend the statute of limitations for assessment or collection of any Tax for which the Company or any Company Subsidiary may be liable.
 
(d) Except as would not reasonably be likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect, the Company and each Company Subsidiary has complied with all Tax Laws relating to (i) the classification for Federal income Tax purposes of service providers as independent contractors or employees and (ii) Tax information reporting and withholding (and payment to the appropriate Governmental Entity) of all Taxes required to be withheld (including such reporting and withholding in connection with payments for services).
(e) (i) Except for agreements solely among or between the Company and the Company Subsidiaries, none of the Company or the Company Subsidiaries is or has been a party to or is bound by or currently has any liability or obligation under any Tax allocation, Tax sharing or similar agreement or arrangement, and (ii) none of the Company or the Company Subsidiaries has been included on a consolidated, combined, unitary or similar basis with other entities (other than solely among the Company and the Company Subsidiaries) that have been or will be required to compute their Tax liability by filing Tax Returns on such a basis.
(f) None of the Company or any Company Subsidiary has constituted either a "distributing corporation" or a "controlled corporation" in a distribution of stock intended to qualify under Section 355 of the Code in the five (5) years prior to the date of this Agreement.
(g) None of the Company or any Company Subsidiary has entered into any closing agreement pursuant to Section 7121 of the Code, or any similar provision of state, local or foreign Law, the terms of which would apply to the computation of Tax liability for any taxable period of the Company or any Company Subsidiary that has not yet been filed.
(h) The Company has not been during the applicable period specified in Section 897(c)(1)(A)(ii) of the Code, a "United States real property holding corporation" within the meaning of Section 897(c)(2) of the Code.
(i) None of the Company or any Company Subsidiary has been a beneficiary of or participated in any "listed transaction" described in Treasury Regulations Section 1.6011-4(b)(2) that was, is, or to the knowledge of the Company will be, required to be disclosed under Treasury Regulations Section 1.6011-4.
(j) None of the Company or any Company Subsidiary has any liability for the Taxes of any person under Treasury Regulations Section 1.1502-6 (or any similar provision of state, local or foreign Law) (other than as a result of being included in consolidated, combined, unitary or similar filings of a group of entities of which the Company was the common parent).
(k) Since the ending date of the most recent financial statements included in the Filed Company SEC Documents, none of the Company or any Company Subsidiary has taken any action not in accordance with past practice that would have the effect of deferring to any material extent a measure of Tax from a period (or portion thereof) ending on or before the Closing Date to a period (or portion thereof) beginning after the Closing Date.
(l) For purposes of this Agreement:
"" or "" means any tax or duty or similar governmental fee, levy, assessment or charge, of any kind whatsoever, imposed by a Governmental Entity together with any interest, fines, penalties, additions to tax or additional amounts arising with respect to the foregoing, and any interest on any of the foregoing.
Tax
Taxes
 
"" means any return, declaration, report, claim for refund, information return or statement in connection with any Tax that is required to have been with a Governmental Entity responsible for the administration of Taxes, including any schedule or attachment thereto, and including any amendment thereof.
Tax Return
3.10 . Section 3.10 of the Company Disclosure Letter contains a list, as of the date hereof, of all collective bargaining agreements to which the Company or any Company Subsidiary is a party. Since January 1, 2010, none of the Company or any Company Subsidiary has experienced any material strikes, work stoppages, slowdowns, lockouts or, to the knowledge of the Company, union organization attempts, and, to the knowledge of the Company, there is no such item threatened against the Company or any Company Subsidiary. Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is in material breach of any collective bargaining agreement or other agreement established with employees or a group thereof or representatives thereof.
Labor Relations
3.11 .
Employee Benefits
(a) Section 3.11(a) of the Company Disclosure Letter contains a list, as of the date hereof, of each Company Benefit Plan. To the knowledge of the Company, each Company Benefit Plan has been administered in material compliance with its terms and applicable Law and otherwise complies with applicable Law in all material respects. The Company has made available to Parent true, complete and correct copies of (i) each Company Benefit Plan or other plan set forth in Section 3.11(a) of the Company Disclosure Letter (or, in the case of any such Company Benefit Plan that is unwritten, a description thereof), (ii) the most recent summary plan description for each such plan for which such summary plan description is required and (iii) the most recent actuarial valuation reports for each such plan for which such valuation report is prepared. Section 3.11(a) of the Company Disclosure Letter contains a list of all Company Stock Options, Company RSUs, Company DSUs and Company Restricted Stock outstanding under the Company Stock Plans as of the date hereof.
(b) Section 3.11(b) of the Company Disclosure Letter contains a list, as of the date hereof, of all material written Company Benefit Agreements.
(c) All Company Benefit Plans intended to be qualified within the meaning of Section 401(a) of the Code have applied for, received, or are entitled to rely on favorable determination or opinion letters from the Internal Revenue Service, to the effect that such Company Benefit Plans are so qualified and exempt from Federal income Taxes under Section 401(a) of the Code.
(d) None of the Company, any Company Subsidiaries, any ERISA Affiliate or any predecessor thereof contributes to, or has in the past six (6) years contributed to, or has or had any liability or obligation in respect of, any Multiemployer Plan.
(e) With respect to each Company Benefit Plan (i) none of the Company, any Company Subsidiaries nor any ERISA Affiliate has any unsatisfied liability under Title IV of ERISA, (ii) to the knowledge of the Company, no condition exists that presents a material risk to
 
the Company or any ERISA Affiliate of incurring a material liability under Title IV of ERISA and (iii) to the knowledge of the Company, the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation has not instituted proceedings under Section 4042 of ERISA to terminate any Company Benefit Plan and, to the knowledge of the Company, no condition exists that presents a material risk that such proceedings will be instituted.
(f) Except (i) as contemplated by Section 6.04 of this Agreement or (ii) as set forth in Section 3.11(f) of the Company Disclosure Letter, no Company Benefit Plan or Company Benefit Agreement exists that, as a result of the execution of this Agreement, shareholder approval of this Agreement, or the Transactions (whether alone or in connection with any subsequent event(s): (w) will entitle any employee to severance pay or any increase in severance pay upon any termination of employment after the date of this Agreement, (x) will result in the acceleration of the time of payment or vesting or result in any payment or funding (through a grantor trust or otherwise) of compensation or benefits under, increase the amount payable or result in any other material obligation pursuant to, any of the Company Benefit Plans or Company Benefit Agreements, (y) will cause the Company to record additional compensation expense on its income statement with respect to any outstanding stock option or other equity-based award or (z) could result in payments under any of the Company Benefit Plans or Company Benefit Agreements which would not be deductible under Section 280G of the Code.
(g) Each Company Benefit Plan that is or has ever been a "nonqualified deferred compensation plan" (within the meaning of Section 409A(d)(1) of the Code) is, in all material respects, in documentary and operational compliance with Section 409A of the Code and associated Treasury Department guidance.
(h) As used in this Agreement, the term "" means each Company Stock Plan, and each bonus, pension, profit sharing, deferred compensation, incentive compensation, retirement, vacation, severance, disability, death benefit, hospitalization, medical or other material plan, program or arrangement, whether or not subject to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended (""), that is sponsored, maintained or contributed to by the Company or any Company Subsidiary for the benefit of any current or former employee, officer or director of the Company or any Company Subsidiary, other than (i) any "multiemployer plan" (within the meaning of Section 3(37) of ERISA) (a ""), (ii) any plan, program or arrangement mandated by applicable Law or (iii) any Company Benefit Agreement. The term "" means each individual employment, retention, severance, change in control or termination agreement between the Company or any Company Subsidiary and any current or former employee, officer or director of the Company or any Company Subsidiary, other than any agreement mandated by applicable Law. The term "" means any entity that, together with the Company, would be treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Code.
Company Benefit Plan
ERISA
Multiemployer Plan
Company Benefit Agreement
ERISA Affiliate
3.12 . There are no claims, suits, actions, hearings, arbitrations, mediations or proceedings pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened (including "cease and desist" letters or requests to take a patent license) against the Company or any Company Subsidiary or any of their respective assets, rights or properties or any of the officers or directors of the Company, except, for those that, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be
Litigation
 
likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect. There is no Judgment outstanding against the Company or any Company Subsidiary or any of their respective assets, rights or properties that, individually or in the aggregate, would reasonably be likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect. The Company has not received any written notification of, and to the knowledge of the Company there is no, investigation, audit or inquiry by any Governmental Entity involving the Company or any Company Subsidiary or any of their respective assets, rights or properties that, individually or in the aggregate, would reasonably be likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.
3.13 .
Compliance with Applicable Laws
(a) Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary is in violation of, and since January 1, 2012, neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has been given written notice of or been charged with any violation of, any Law or order of any Governmental Entity or any Judgment (or any of its own policies with respect to privacy, personal information and data security), except for any such violations that would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect. The Company and each Company Subsidiary has all permits, authorizations, approvals, registrations, certificates, orders, waivers and variances (each, a "") necessary to operate its properties and other assets and conduct its business as presently conducted except those the absence of which would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect, and there has occurred no default under, or violation of, any such Permit, except for those violations which would not reasonably be likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect. To the knowledge of the Company, neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has received notice that any such Permit will be terminated or modified or cannot be renewed in the ordinary course of business.
Permit
(b) To the knowledge of the Company, none of the Company, any Company Subsidiary, or any of their employees, directors or agents is, or since January 1, 2010, has been, in violation of any Law applicable to its business, properties or operations and relating to: (1) the use of corporate funds relating to political activity or for the purpose of obtaining or retaining business; (2) payments to government officials or employees from corporate funds; or (3) bribes, rebates, payoffs, influence payments, or kickbacks, except, in each case, for those violations which would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.
(c) To the knowledge of the Company, (a) it is in compliance in all material respects with the United States Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977, as amended (the "") and any other United States and foreign Laws concerning corrupt payments; and (b) the Company has not been investigated by any Governmental Entity with respect to, or given notice by a Governmental Entity of, any violation by the Company of the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act or any other United States or foreign Laws concerning corrupt payments.
Foreign Corrupt Practices Act
3.14 .
Environmental Matters
(a) Except as, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect, (i) the Company and the Company Subsidiaries are in
 
compliance with all applicable Environmental Laws, and none of the Company or any Company Subsidiary has received any written communication alleging that the Company or any Company Subsidiary is in violation of, or has any liability under, any Environmental Law or Environmental Permit, (ii) to the knowledge of the Company, each of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries has obtained and is operating in compliance with all Environmental Permits, and all such Environmental Permits are currently in effect, and none of the Company or any Company Subsidiary has been notified in writing of any adverse change in the terms and conditions of such Environmental Permits, (iii) there is no Environmental Claim pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against the Company or any Company Subsidiary and (iv) to the knowledge of the Company, there has been no Release by the Company or any Company Subsidiary of any Hazardous Material at, on, in, under, to or from any real property currently or, during the period of ownership or lease by the Company or any Company Subsidiary, formerly owned or leased by the Company or any Company Subsidiary that would reasonably be likely to result in material liability under any Environmental Law for the Company or any Company Subsidiary.
(b) For purposes of this Agreement, (i) the term "" means any (A) biohazardous material, (B) petroleum product, derivative or by-product, radon, urea formaldehyde foam insulation, polychlorinated biphenyls, radioactive materials or toxic mold or fungi, or (C) other chemical, material, substance or waste that in relevant form, quantity or concentration is regulated as "hazardous" or "toxic" under any Environmental Law; (ii) the term "" means any Law or Judgment relating to pollution, contamination or the cleanup, protection or restoration of the environment or natural resources, or human health as it relates to the exposure to hazardous or toxic substances; (iii) the term "" means any administrative, regulatory or judicial action, suit, proceeding, order, claim, directive, Lien, or written notice, demand or request by or from any Governmental Entity or any other person alleging liability relating to or arising out of any Environmental Law or Environmental Permit, including a Release of, or human exposure to, any Hazardous Material; (iv) the term "" means any Permit required under any applicable Environmental Law for the Company or the Company Subsidiaries to conduct its respective businesses as currently conducted; and (v) the term "" means any release, spill, emission, leaking, pumping, emitting, depositing, discharging, injecting, escaping, leaching, dispersing, dumping, pouring, disposing or migrating into, onto or through the environment (including ambient air, surface water, ground water, land surface or subsurface strata).
Hazardous Material
Environmental Law
Environmental Claim
Environmental Permit
Release
(c) Notwithstanding any other representations and warranties in this Agreement, the representations and warranties in this Section 3.14 are the only representations and warranties in this Agreement with respect to Environmental Laws, Hazardous Materials or any other environmental matter.
3.15 .
Title to Properties
(a) Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary owns any real property. Section 3.15(a) of the Company Disclosure Letter sets forth a true and complete list of all leases or subleases of real property (the "") to which the Company and/or the Company Subsidiaries are parties, identifying the address and use thereof. True, correct and complete copies of the Leases have been delivered or made available to Parent prior to the date hereof and such Leases have not been amended or modified since that date. The Company and each Company Subsidiary
Leases
 
has complied with the terms of all Leases, except for such failure to comply that individually or in the aggregate has not had and would not reasonably be likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has received or provided any written notice of any event or occurrence that has resulted or could result (with or without the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both) in a default with respect to any Lease, which defaults individually or in the aggregate have had or would reasonably be likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.
(b) Except as, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect, the Company and the Company Subsidiaries have good, valid and marketable title to, or valid leasehold interests in or other comparable contract rights in or relating to the Leases and all of personal properties that are material to the Company's business on a consolidated basis, and all such Leases and personal properties, other than personal properties in which the Company or any Company Subsidiary has a leasehold interest or other comparable contract right, are free and clear of all Liens, except (i) Liens for Taxes not yet due and payable, that are payable without penalty or that are being contested in good faith and for which reserves have been established to the extent required by GAAP, (ii) Liens for assessments and other governmental charges or landlords', carriers', warehousemen's, mechanics', repairmen's, workers' and similar Liens incurred in the ordinary course of business, consistent with past practice, in each case for sums not yet due and payable or due but not delinquent or being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings, (iii) Liens incurred in the ordinary course of business, consistent with past practice, in connection with workers' compensation, unemployment insurance and other types of social security or to secure the performance of tenders, statutory obligations, surety and appeal bonds, bids, leases, government contracts, performance and return of money bonds and similar obligations and (iv) Liens incurred in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice that are not reasonably likely to adversely interfere in a material way with the use of the properties or assets encumbered thereby (collectively, "").
Permitted Liens
3.16 .
Intellectual Property
(a) Section 3.16(a)(i) of the Company Disclosure Letter lists all issued patents, registered trademarks and registered domain names and pending applications for patents and trademarks owned by (as opposed to licensed to) the Company or any Company Subsidiary (together with all registered copyrights and applications for copyright registrations, the ""). Section 3.16(a)(ii) of the Company Disclosure Letter lists all material agreements ("") pursuant to which the Company or any Company Subsidiary has received a license or sub-license or is granted other rights with respect to any material item of Intellectual Property (excluding any commercial off-the-shelf software products with annual fees of less than $15,000 per user); and Section 3.16(a)(iii) of the Company Disclosure Letter lists all material agreements (""; together with the Material Inbound IP Agreement, the "") pursuant to which the Company or any Company Subsidiary has licensed to any third parties the right to use or granted any third parties any other rights with respect to any material item of Intellectual Property (other than non-exclusive distributor, reseller, dealer and customer agreements entered into in the ordinary course of business).
Company Registered Intellectual Property
Material Inbound IP Agreements
Material Outbound IP Agreements
Material IP Agreements
 
(b) Except as set forth in Section 3.16(b) of the Company Disclosure Letter, (i) the Company or the Company Subsidiaries exclusively own, free of all Liens (other than Permitted Liens), and known adverse interests or claims, all Company Registered Intellectual Property and own or have the right to use all Intellectual Property necessary for the operation of the business of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries as conducted as of the Closing Date; (ii) to the knowledge of the Company, no person is infringing or misappropriating any material items of the Company's or the Company Subsidiaries' proprietary Intellectual Property, such that the occurrence of any of the foregoing has had a Company Material Adverse Effect; (iii) to the knowledge of the Company, none of the material items of the Company's or the Company Subsidiaries' proprietary Intellectual Property necessary for the operation of the business of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries as conducted as of the Closing Date has been misappropriated by the Company or any Company Subsidiary; (iv) to the knowledge of the Company, all patents, registered trademarks and registered copyrights owned by the Company or any Company Subsidiary are valid and subsisting; (v) all of the Material IP Agreements are valid and binding agreements on the Company; (vi) neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary is in material default under any Material Inbound IP Agreement; (vii) to the knowledge of the Company, no third party is in material default under any Material Outbound IP Agreement; (viii) to the knowledge of the Company, there is no proceeding pending that challenges the legality, validity, enforceability or ownership of any material items of the Company's or the Company Subsidiaries' proprietary Intellectual Property; (ix) all persons who created, invented or contributed to the Company Registered Intellectual Property or other material proprietary Intellectual Property of the Company and/or the Company Subsidiaries have assigned to the Company in writing all of their rights in same that do not vest initially in the Company and/or the Company Subsidiaries by operation of law; (x) no other person has the current or contingent right to access or possess any material proprietary source code of the Company or the Company Subsidiaries; (xi) to the knowledge of the Company, the Company and the Company Subsidiaries' conduct of their businesses as currently conducted does not materially infringe the Intellectual Property rights of any person; and (xii) the Company and each Company Subsidiary have taken steps that are customary and reasonable in their industry to protect and preserve (A) the confidentiality of all trade secrets and other Confidential Information of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries and (B) the security and continuous operation of their material software, networks, websites and systems (and the data therein), except to the extent that the failure to take such steps has not had a Company Material Adverse Effect.
(c) For purposes of this Agreement, "" means (A) patents and patent applications, (B) trademarks, service marks and trade names, together with any registrations and applications in connection therewith, (C) copyrights, copyrighted works and any registrations and applications in connection therewith, (D) trade secrets and (E) registered rights to use web site domain names.
Intellectual Property
3.17 .
Contracts
(a) For purposes of this Agreement, a "" shall mean:
Material Contract
(i) any Contract that would be required to be filed by the Company as a "material contract" pursuant to Item 601(b)(10) of Regulation S-K under the Securities Act;
 
(ii) any Contract containing covenants binding upon the Company or the Company Subsidiaries that materially restrict the ability of the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries (or that, following the consummation of the Merger, would materially restrict the ability of the Surviving Corporation or its affiliates) to compete in any business or geographic area or with any person;
(iii) any Contract in connection with any acquisition or disposition pursuant to which the Company or any Company Subsidiary is subject to continuing indemnification or "earn-out" obligations (whether related to environmental matters, tax matters or otherwise), in each case, that would reasonably be likely to result in payments by the Company or any Company Subsidiary in excess of $1,000,000;
(iv) any Contract for the acquisition, sale, lease or license of material properties, rights or assets of the Company or the Company Subsidiaries outside the ordinary course of business (by merger, purchase or sale of assets or stock or otherwise) entered into since January 1, 2011;
(v) any Contract that limits or purports to limit in any material respect the ability of the Company to incur indebtedness, pay dividends or own, operate, sell, transfer, place a lien on, pledge or otherwise dispose of any material assets;
(vi) any Contract for capital expenditures or the acquisition or construction of fixed assets which requires annual aggregate future payments in excess of $250,000;
(vii) any Contract pursuant to which the Company or any Company Subsidiary has entered into a partnership or joint venture with any other person (other than the Company or any Company Subsidiary);
(viii) any collective bargaining agreement;
(ix) any Contract (other than purchase orders in the ordinary course of business that are terminable or cancelable without penalty on 90 days' notice or less) under which the Company or any Company Subsidiary is a purchaser of goods and services which, pursuant to the terms thereof, requires payments by the Company or any Company Subsidiary in excess of $250,000 per annum;
(x) any Contract relating to any indebtedness for borrowed money of the Company or any Company Subsidiary (whether incurred, assumed, guaranteed or secured by any asset) or under which the Company or any Company Subsidiary has, directly or indirectly, made any loan, capital contribution to, or other investment in, any person (other than in the Company or any Company Subsidiary and other than (A) extensions of credit in the ordinary course of business and (B) investments in marketable securities in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice); or
(xi) any Contract with a top ten customer of the Company and its Subsidiaries by revenue for the twelve months ended November 30, 2012.
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, any Contract set forth in Sections 3.16(a)(ii) or 3.16(a)(iii) of the Company Disclosure Letter shall not be a Material Contract.
(b) Section 3.17 of the Company Disclosure Letter sets forth a list of all Material Contracts as of the date of this Agreement. Each of the Material Contracts is valid, binding and enforceable on the Company or the Company Subsidiaries, as the case may be, and, to the knowledge of the Company, each other party thereto and is in full force and effect, except for such failures to be valid, binding or enforceable or to be in full force and effect as, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect and except that such enforceability may be limited by the Bankruptcy and Equity Exception. Each of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries and, to the knowledge of the Company, each of the counterparties thereto has complied with the terms and conditions of the Material Contracts and is not (with or without notice or lapse of time, or both) in breach or default thereunder, in each case except as would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect. No party to any Material Contract has given the Company or any Company Subsidiary written notice of its intention to cancel, terminate, materially change the scope of rights under or fail to renew (other than in accordance with the terms thereof) any Material Contract and neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary, nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any other party to any Material Contract, has repudiated in writing any material provision thereof.
3.18 . All material insurance policies of the Company and each Company Subsidiary are in full force and effect, all premiums due and payable through the date hereof under all such policies have been paid and the Company and each Company Subsidiary are otherwise in compliance in all respects with the terms of such policies, except for such failures to be in full force and effect, to pay any premiums or to be in compliance that would not reasonably be likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect. As of the date hereof, no outstanding written notice of cancellation or termination has been received with respect to any such insurance policy, other than in connection with ordinary renewals.
Insurance
3.19 . None of the Company or any Company Subsidiary, on the one hand, is a party to any transaction or Contract between the Company or any Company Subsidiary, on the one hand, and with any affiliate, stockholder that beneficially owns 5% or more of the Company's outstanding common stock or director or executive officer of the Company or any Company Subsidiary, on the other hand, and no event has occurred since the date of the Company's last proxy statement to its stockholders that, in each case would be required to be reported by the Company pursuant to Item 404 of Regulation S-K promulgated by the SEC.
Interested Party Transactions
3.20 . Neither the Company nor any of its affiliates, officers, directors or employees has employed any broker or finder or incurred any liability for any brokerage fees, commissions, financial advisor fees, finder's fees or similar fees or commissions in connection with the Transactions except that the Company has employed Guggenheim Securities, LLC and Signal Hill Capital Group LLC as its financial advisors, whose fees and expenses will be paid by the Company in accordance with the Company's agreement with such firms. The Company has delivered to Parent complete and accurate copies of all Contracts under which any such fees or expenses are payable and all indemnification and other Contracts related to the engagement of the persons to whom such fees are payable.
Brokers
 
3.21 . The Company Board has received the opinion of each of Guggenheim Securities, LLC and Signal Hill Capital Group LLC, dated as of the date of this Agreement, to the effect that, as of such date, the Merger Consideration to be received in the Merger by the holders of the Company Common Stock is fair to such holders from a financial point of view.
Opinion of Financial Advisor
3.22 . Assuming the accuracy of the representations in Section 4.08 and the satisfaction of the Ownership Condition, the Company has taken all action necessary to exempt the Merger, this Agreement and the other Transactions from Section 203 of the DGCL. No state anti-takeover statute or regulation (including Section 203 of the DGCL), nor any takeover-related provision in the Company Certificate (including Article VIII thereof) or Company Bylaws, would (i) prohibit or restrict the ability of the Company to perform its obligations under this Agreement or any related agreement or, subject to the receipt of the Company Stockholder Approval, the Certificate of Merger or its ability to consummate the Merger or the other Transactions, (ii) have the effect of invalidating or voiding this Agreement or, subject to the receipt of the Company Stockholder Approval, the Certificate of Merger or any provision hereof or thereof or (iii) assuming the satisfaction of the Ownership Condition, subject Parent or Merger Sub to any impediment or condition in connection with the exercise of any of its rights under this Agreement or the Certificate of Merger.
State Takeover Laws; Company Certificate Provisions
3.23 . The Company acknowledges and agrees that, except for the representations and warranties expressly set forth in this Agreement (a) neither Parent nor Merger Sub makes, or has made, any representation or warranty relating to itself or its business or otherwise in connection with the Merger and the Company is not relying on any representation or warranty except for those expressly set forth in this Agreement, (b) no person has been authorized by Parent or Merger Sub to make any representation or warranty relating to itself or its business or otherwise in connection with the Merger, and if made, such representation or warranty must not be relied upon by the Company as having been authorized by such party and (c) any estimates, projections, predictions, data, financial information, memoranda, presentations or any other materials or information provided or addressed to the Company or any of its Representatives are not and shall not be deemed to be or include representations or warranties unless any such materials or information are the subject of any express representation or warranty set forth in Article IV.
No Other Representations and Warranties
Parent and Merger Sub, jointly and severally, represent and warrant to the Company that:
4.01 . Each of Parent and Merger Sub is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction in which it is organized (in the case of good standing, to the extent the concept is recognized by such jurisdiction) and has full corporate power and authority to own, lease or otherwise hold and operate its properties, rights and assets and to conduct its businesses as presently conducted, except where the failure to be so organized, existing or in good standing or have such power and authority, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be likely to have a Parent
Organization, Standing and Power
 
Material Adverse Effect. In this Agreement, the term "" means any Event that prevents or materially delays Parent or Merger Sub from performing its obligations under this Agreement in any material respect or the consummation of the Merger and the other Transactions. Each of Parent and Merger Sub is duly qualified or licensed to do business and is in good standing (to the extent the concept is recognized by such jurisdiction) in each jurisdiction where the nature of its business or its ownership, leasing or operation of its properties make such qualification or licensing necessary, except where the failure to be so qualified or licensed or to be in good standing, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be likely to have a Parent Material Adverse Effect.
Parent Material Adverse Effect
4.02 .
Merger Sub
(a) Since the date of its incorporation, Merger Sub has not carried on any business, conducted any operations or incurred any liabilities or obligations other than the execution of this Agreement, the performance of its obligations hereunder and matters ancillary thereto (including the Financing).
(b) The authorized capital stock of Merger Sub consists of 1,000 shares of common stock, par value $0.01 per share, all of which have been validly issued, are fully paid and nonassessable and are owned by a wholly-owned subsidiary of Parent free and clear of any Lien.
4.03 . Each of Parent and Merger Sub has all requisite corporate power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and to consummate the Transactions. The execution and delivery by each of Parent and Merger Sub of this Agreement and the consummation by it of the Transactions have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of Parent and Merger Sub, and, subject to the succeeding sentence, no other corporate actions on its part are necessary to authorize this Agreement, except for the adoption of this Agreement by the sole stockholder of Merger Sub, which will occur promptly following the execution of this Agreement by the parties hereto. Except as set forth in the immediately preceding sentence, neither the approval or adoption of this Agreement nor the consummation of the Merger or the other Transactions requires any approval of the stockholders of Parent. Each of Parent and Merger Sub has duly executed and delivered this Agreement, and, assuming due authorization, execution and delivery by the Company, this Agreement constitutes its legal, valid and binding obligation, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms, except that such enforceability may be limited by Bankruptcy and Equity Exception.
Authority; Execution and Delivery; Enforceability
4.04 .
No Conflicts; Consents
(a) The execution and delivery by each of Parent and Merger Sub of this Agreement do not, and the consummation of the Merger and the other Transactions and compliance with the terms hereof will not, conflict with, or result in any violation or breach of or default (with or without notice or lapse of time, or both) under, or give rise to a right of, or result in, termination, cancelation or acceleration of any obligation or loss of a material benefit under, or result in the creation of any Lien upon any of the properties, rights or assets of Parent or any of Parent's subsidiaries under, any provision of (i) the charter or organizational documents of Parent, Merger Sub or any of Parent's subsidiaries, (ii) any Contract to which Parent or any of Parent's subsidiaries is a party or by which any of their respective properties, rights or assets is bound or
 
(iii) subject to the filings and other matters referred to in Section 4.04(b), any Judgment or Law applicable to Parent or any of Parent's subsidiaries or their respective properties, rights or assets, other than, in the case of clauses (ii) and (iii) above, any such items that, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be likely to have a Parent Material Adverse Effect.
(b) No Consent of, or registration, declaration or filing with, any Governmental Entity is required to be obtained or made by or with respect to Parent or any of Parent's subsidiaries in connection with the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement or the consummation of the Transactions, other than (i) compliance with and filings under the HSR Act, (ii) the filing with the SEC of such reports under the Exchange Act as may be required in connection with this Agreement, the Merger and the other Transactions, (iii) the filing of the Certificate of Merger with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware, (iv) such filings as may be required in connection with the Taxes described in Section 6.10, (v) such filings as may be required under the rules and regulations of the New York Stock Exchange and (vi) such other items that would not reasonably be likely to, individually or in the aggregate, have a Parent Material Adverse Effect.
4.05 . None of the information supplied or to be supplied by Parent or Merger Sub specifically for inclusion or incorporation by reference in the Proxy Statement will, at the date it is first mailed to the Company's stockholders or at the time of the Company Stockholders Meeting, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading, except that no representation or warranty is made by Parent or Merger Sub with respect to statements made or incorporated by reference therein based on information supplied by the Company or any of its Representatives specifically for inclusion or incorporation by reference therein.
Information Supplied
4.06 . Neither Parent nor Merger Sub, nor any of their respective officers, directors or employees has employed any broker or finder or incurred any liability for any brokerage fees, commissions, financial advisor fees, finder's fees or similar fees or commissions in connection with the Transactions except JPMorgan, whose fees and expenses will be paid by Parent in accordance with the Parent's agreement with such firm.
Brokers
4.07 . There is no suit, action or proceeding pending or, to the knowledge of Parent, threatened against Parent or any subsidiary of Parent that, individually or in the aggregate, would reasonably be likely to have a Parent Material Adverse Effect. There is no Judgment outstanding against Parent or any subsidiary of Parent or any of their respective assets that, individually or in the aggregate, would reasonably be likely to have a Parent Material Adverse Effect. Parent has not received any written notification of, and to the knowledge of Parent there is no, investigation by any Governmental Entity involving Parent or any subsidiary of Parent or any of their respective assets that, individually or in the aggregate, would reasonably be likely to have a Parent Material Adverse Effect.
Absence of Litigation
4.08 . None of Parent or Parent's subsidiaries or controlled affiliates owns any Company Common Stock or holds any rights to acquire any Company Common Stock except pursuant to this Agreement. Neither Parent nor Merger Sub is, nor at any time during the last three (3) years has been, an "interested stockholder" of the Company as defined in Section 203 of the DGCL.
Ownership of the Company Common Stock
 
4.09 . Parent has delivered to the Company a true, correct and complete copy, as of the date of this Agreement, of an executed commitment letter (including all exhibits, schedules and amendments thereto in effect as of the date of this Agreement), dated as of December 17, 2012 (the "") from JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC (the ""), pursuant to which, and subject to the terms and conditions thereof, the Financing Sources party thereto have agreed and committed to provide the debt financing set forth therein (the ""). The Commitment Letter has not been amended, restated or otherwise modified or waived prior to the date of this Agreement and the commitments contained in the Commitment Letter have not been withdrawn, modified or rescinded in any respect prior to the date of this Agreement. As of the date of this Agreement, the Commitment Letter is in full force and effect and is the valid, binding and enforceable obligation of Parent and, to the knowledge of Parent, the other parties thereto (except for the Bankruptcy and Equity Exception). There are no conditions precedent to the funding of the full amount of the Financing, other than as expressly set forth in or contemplated by the Commitment Letter. Subject to the terms and conditions of the Commitment Letter, the net proceeds contemplated from the Financing, together with other financial resources of Parent, including cash on hand of Parent and the Company on the Closing Date, will, in the aggregate, be sufficient for the satisfaction of all of Parent's obligations under this Agreement, including the payment of any amounts required to be paid by Parent or Merger Sub pursuant to Article I and Article II and of all fees and expenses required to be paid by Parent or Merger Sub and reasonably expected to be incurred in connection herewith. Parent has fully paid all fees required to be paid prior to the date of this Agreement pursuant to the Commitment Letter. As of the date of this Agreement, no event has occurred which, with or without notice, lapse of time or both, would or would reasonably be expected to constitute a default or breach on the part of Parent or Merger Sub or, to the knowledge of Parent, any other parties thereto, under the Commitment Letter. As of the date of this Agreement, Parent is not aware of any fact, occurrence or condition that makes any of the assumptions or statements set forth in the Commitment Letter inaccurate in any material respect, nor does it have any reason to believe that any of the conditions to the Financing will not be satisfied or that the Financing will not be available to Parent or Merger Sub on the date of the Closing.
Financing
Commitment Letter
Financing Sources
Financing
4.10 . Except for the letters, dated as of the date hereof, with the individuals identified on Section 6.05(c) of the Company Disclosure Letter and except as expressly provided or expressly contemplated in this Agreement, neither Parent nor any of its controlled affiliates has entered into any agreement, arrangement or understanding (in each case, whether oral or written), or authorized, committed or agreed to enter into any agreement, arrangement or understanding (in each case, whether oral or written), pursuant to which: (i) any stockholder of the Company would be entitled to receive consideration of a different amount or nature than the Merger Consideration or pursuant to which any stockholder of the Company agrees to vote to adopt this Agreement or the Merger or agrees to vote against any Superior Company Proposal; (ii) as of the date hereof, any third party has agreed to provide, directly or indirectly, equity capital to Parent or the Company to finance in whole or in part the Merger; or (iii) as of the date hereof, any current employee of the Company has agreed to (x) remain as an employee of the Company or any Company Subsidiary following the Effective Time (other than pursuant to any employment Contracts in effect as of the date hereof), (y) contribute or roll over any portion of such employee's shares of Company Common Stock, or any Company Stock-Based Awards to the Company or any Company Subsidiary or Parent or any of its affiliates or (z) receive any capital stock or equity securities of the Company or any Company Subsidiary or Parent or any of its affiliates.
Absence of Certain Agreements
 
4.11 . Parent and Merger Sub each acknowledge and agree that, except for the representations and warranties expressly set forth in this Agreement (a) the Company does not make, or has not made, any representation or warranty relating to itself or its business or otherwise in connection with the Merger and Parent and Merger Sub are not relying on any representation or warranty except for those expressly set forth in this Agreement or in the Company Disclosure Letter, (b) no person has been authorized by the Company to make any representation or warranty relating to itself or its business or otherwise in connection with the Merger, and if made, such representation or warranty must not be relied upon by Parent or Merger Sub as having been authorized by such party and (c) any estimates, projections, predictions, data, financial information, memoranda, presentations or any other materials or information provided or addressed to Parent, Merger Sub or any of their Representatives are not and shall not be deemed to be or include representations or warranties unless any such materials or information are the subject of any express representation or warranty set forth in Article III or contained elsewhere in this Agreement or in the Company Disclosure Letter.
No Other Representations and Warranties
5.01 . Except for matters set forth in Section 5.01 of the Company Disclosure Letter, otherwise expressly contemplated by this Agreement, permitted by this Section 5.01 or required by Law, from the date of this Agreement until the Effective Time, the Company shall, and shall cause each Company Subsidiary to, conduct its respective business in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice and, to the extent consistent therewith, use reasonable best efforts to preserve intact its current business organization and goodwill, keep available the services of its current officers, key employees and consultants and keep and preserve its present relationships with customers, suppliers, licensors, licensees, distributors and others having material business dealings with it. In addition, and without limiting the generality of the foregoing, except for matters set forth in Section 5.01 of the Company Disclosure Letter, otherwise expressly contemplated by this Agreement or required by Law ( that the Company shall, prior to taking any action required by Law that would otherwise be prohibited under this Section 5.01, provide Parent with written notice of such action), from the date of this Agreement until the Effective Time, the Company shall not, and shall not permit any Company Subsidiary to, do any of the following without the prior written consent of Parent (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed):
Conduct of Business
provided
(i) (A) declare, set aside or pay any dividends on, or make any other distributions in respect of, any of its capital stock, other than (1) regular quarterly cash dividends on the Company Common Stock equal to the rate paid during the full fiscal quarter immediately preceding the date hereof with record and payment dates consistent with past practice (, , that any such dividend for the quarter during which the Closing occurs shall be prorated based on the number of days from the immediately preceding dividend record date to the Closing Date) or (2) dividends and distributions by a direct or indirect Company Subsidiary to its parent, (B) split, combine or reclassify any of
provided
however
 
its capital stock or issue or authorize the issuance of any other securities in respect of, in lieu of or in substitution for shares of its capital stock or (C) purchase, redeem or otherwise acquire any shares of capital stock of the Company or any Company Subsidiary or any other securities thereof or any rights, warrants or options to acquire any such shares or other securities (except pursuant to the forfeiture of Company Stock-Based Awards or the acquisition or withholding by the Company of shares of the Company Common Stock in settlement of the exercise price of a Company Stock Option or Company ESPP Option or Tax withholding obligations relating to Company Stock-Based Awards, in each case in accordance with their terms as in effect on the date of this Agreement or on the date of grant);
(ii) issue, deliver, sell, pledge or grant (A) any shares of its capital stock, (B) any Voting Company Debt or other voting securities, (C) any securities convertible into or exchangeable for, or any options, warrants, calls or rights to acquire, any such shares, Voting Company Debt, voting securities or convertible or exchangeable securities or (D) any "phantom" stock, "phantom" stock rights, stock appreciation rights or stock-based performance units, other than (1) the issuance of the Company Common Stock upon the exercise of Company Stock Options and Company ESPP Options outstanding on the date of this Agreement and in accordance with their present terms, (2) the issuance of the Company Common Stock as required pursuant to any Company Benefit Plan or Company Benefit Agreement or other written agreement as in effect on the date of this Agreement (including pursuant to agreements relating to Company RSUs, Company DSUs and Company Restricted Stock), (3) issuance of Company Stock-Based Awards authorized prior to the date hereof or (4) issuance of Company Stock-Based Awards in connection with any action that would be permitted under clause (v) below;
(iii) amend the Company Certificate, the Company Bylaws or other comparable charter or organizational documents of any Company Subsidiary;
(iv) acquire or agree to acquire (A) by merging or consolidating with, or by purchasing a substantial equity interest in or portion of the assets of, or by any other manner, any business or any corporation, partnership, joint venture, association or other business organization or division thereof or (B) any assets that are material, individually or in the aggregate, to the Company and the Company Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, except in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice;
(v) (A) grant to any employee of the Company or any Company Subsidiary any increase in compensation except for increases in cash compensation, (B) grant to any current or former executive officer or director of the Company or any Company Subsidiary any increase in severance or termination pay, (C) enter into any severance or termination agreement with any executive officer or director, (D) establish, adopt, enter into or amend in any respect any collective bargaining agreement or Company Benefit Plan, (E) take any action to accelerate any rights or benefits under any Company Benefit Plan or (F) except as provided on Section 5.01(v)(F) of the Company Disclosure Letter, grant any equity or equity-linked compensation (other than Company RSUs (as hereinafter defined) that (x) have a grant-date value of up to $250,000, in the aggregate for all grants to employees, officers and directors and (y) are on terms consistent with those set forth under Section
 
5.01(v)(F) of the Company Disclosure Letter), except, in the case of the foregoing clauses (A), (B), (C), (D), (E) and (F), (1) as required pursuant to the terms of any Company Benefit Plan, Company Benefit Agreement or other agreement as in effect on the date of this Agreement, or (2) as otherwise expressly permitted by this Agreement or required by applicable Law; that the foregoing clauses (A), (B), (C), (D), (E) and (F) shall not restrict the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries from entering into or making available to newly hired employees or to employees, in the context of promotions based on job performance or workplace requirements, in each case in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practice, plans, agreements, benefits and compensation arrangements (including incentive grants) that have a value that is consistent with the past practice of making compensation and benefits available to newly hired or promoted employees in similar positions;
provided
(vi) make any change in accounting methods, principles or practices materially affecting the reported consolidated assets, liabilities or results of operations of the Company, except insofar as may have been required by a change in GAAP;
(vii) sell, transfer, abandon, lease (as lessor), license, sell and lease back, mortgage or otherwise dispose of or subject to any Lien any properties, rights (including Intellectual Property) or assets that are material, individually or in the aggregate, to the Company and the Company Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, except (A) any sale, transfer, abandonment, lease, license, sale and lease back, mortgage or other disposition of any properties, rights (including Intellectual Property) or assets in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice and (B) Permitted Liens;
(viii) (A) incur, redeem, repurchase, prepay, defease, cancel, acquire or modify in any material respect any indebtedness for borrowed money or guarantee any such indebtedness of another person, except for (1) advances of credit incurred under the Company's existing credit facilities in the ordinary course of business and (2) indebtedness solely involving the Company or any of its direct or indirect wholly owned subsidiaries, (B) issue or sell any debt securities or warrants or other rights to acquire any debt securities of the Company or any Company Subsidiary, guarantee any debt securities of another person, enter into any "keep well" or other agreement to maintain any financial statement condition of another person or enter into any arrangement having the economic effect of any of the foregoing or (C) make any loans, advances or capital contributions to, or investments in, any other person, other than (y) to any direct or indirect Company Subsidiary and (z) advances to employees in respect of travel or other related ordinary expenses and advancement of expenses to officers and directors in accordance with the Company Bylaws and any indemnification agreements to which the Company is a party, in each case in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice;
(ix) except in the ordinary course of business or as required by Law, make, revoke or change any material Tax election, settle or compromise any material Tax liability or refund, change any accounting method for Tax purposes, file any material amended Tax Return, or enter into any material contractual obligation in respect of Taxes with any Governmental Entity;
 
(x) (A) pay, discharge, settle or satisfy any material action, litigation, claim or arbitration for an amount in excess of $100,000 individually, except for settlements that are fully paid by insurance proceeds or (B) waive any claims or rights of material value;
(xi) (A) except in the ordinary course of business, enter into, materially amend or materially modify any Material Contact or Material IP Agreement, or waive, release or assign any material rights or claims under any Material Contract or Material IP Agreement or (B) cancel or terminate any Material Contract or Material IP Agreement (other than any expiration of such Material Contract or Material IP Agreement in accordance with its terms);
(xii) make or commit to make any capital expenditure or expenditures in excess of $30 million in the aggregate;
(xiii) adopt or enter into or modify, amend or terminate any collective bargaining agreement or other labor union Contract applicable to the employees of the Company or any Company Subsidiary;
(xiv) authorize, recommend, propose or announce an intention to or adopt a plan of complete or partial liquidation or dissolution of the Company or any Company Subsidiary; or
(xv) authorize any of, or commit, resolve or agree to take any of, the foregoing actions.
5.02 . Nothing contained in this Agreement shall give Parent, directly or indirectly, rights to control or direct the Company's operations prior to the Effective Time. Prior to the Effective Time, the Company shall exercise, consistent with the terms of this Agreement, complete control and supervision of its and the Company Subsidiaries' operations for purposes of the HSR Act or any other applicable antitrust Law prior to the expiration or termination of any applicable waiting period under the HSR Act or any other applicable antitrust Law waiting period, or prior to the receipt of any applicable approval under any antitrust or competition law.
Control of the Operations
5.03 .
No Solicitation
(a) The Company agrees that neither it nor any Company Subsidiary nor any of their respective directors or officers shall, and the Company shall use its reasonable best efforts to cause its and the Company Subsidiaries' other Representatives not to, directly or indirectly through another person, (i) solicit, initiate or knowingly encourage, or knowingly facilitate, any Company Takeover Proposal or the making or consummation thereof, (ii) enter into, continue or otherwise participate in any discussions or negotiations regarding, or furnish to any person any information in connection with, or otherwise knowingly cooperate in any way with, any Company Takeover Proposal, (iii) take any action to make the provisions of any "fair price," "moratorium," "control share acquisition," "business combination" or other similar anti-takeover statute or regulation (including any transaction under, or a third party becoming an "interested shareholder" under, Section 203 of the DGCL), or any restrictive provision of any applicable anti-takeover provision in the Company Certificate or Company Bylaws, inapplicable to any transactions contemplated by a
 
Company Takeover Proposal or (iv) resolve, publicly propose or agree to do any of the foregoing. The Company shall, and shall cause the Company Subsidiaries and its and their directors and officers to, and shall use its reasonable best efforts to cause its and their Representatives to, immediately cease and cause to be terminated all existing discussions or negotiations with any person conducted heretofore with respect to any Company Takeover Proposal and request the prompt return or destruction of all confidential information previously furnished in connection therewith. Notwithstanding the foregoing, at any time prior to obtaining the Company Stockholder Approval, in response to an unsolicited bona fide written Company Takeover Proposal that the Company Board determines in good faith, after consultation with its outside legal counsel and financial advisors, constitutes or could reasonably be expected to lead to a Superior Company Proposal, and which Company Takeover Proposal was made after the date hereof, has not been withdrawn and did not otherwise result from a breach in any material respect of this Section 5.03(a), the Company may, subject to compliance with this Section 5.03, (X) furnish information with respect to the Company and the Company Subsidiaries to the person making such Company Takeover Proposal (and its representatives) pursuant to an Acceptable Confidentiality Agreement, that all such information has previously been provided to Parent or is provided to Parent prior to or substantially concurrent with the time it is provided to such person, and (Y) participate in discussions or negotiations with the person making such Company Takeover Proposal (and its representatives) regarding such Company Takeover Proposal, if (and only if) and only to the extent that before taking any of the actions described in the foregoing clauses (X) and (Y), the Company Board determines in good faith, after consultation with its outside legal counsel, that failure to take such action could reasonably be determined to be inconsistent with its fiduciary duties under applicable Law.
provided
(b) Except as permitted by this Section 5.03, neither the Company Board nor any committee thereof shall (i) (A) withdraw, qualify or modify in any manner adverse to Parent or Merger Sub, or propose publicly to withdraw, qualify or modify in any manner adverse to Parent or Merger Sub, the Company Recommendation, or (B) approve, recommend or otherwise declare advisable, or propose publicly to approve, recommend or otherwise declare advisable, any Company Takeover Proposal or resolve or agree to take any such action (any action described in this clause (i) being referred to herein as an "") or (ii) approve, adopt or resolve to recommend, or publicly propose to approve, adopt or recommend or cause or permit the Company to enter into any letter of intent, memorandum of understanding, agreement in principle, acquisition agreement, option agreement, asset purchase agreement, share purchase agreement, share exchange agreement, merger agreement, joint venture agreement, partnership agreement or other similar agreement relating to, or that contemplates or that would reasonably be expected to lead to, any Company Takeover Proposal (other than an Acceptable Confidentiality Agreement) (an "") or any tender offer providing for, with respect to, or in connection with, any Company Takeover Proposal. Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, at any time prior to obtaining the Company Stockholder Approval and subject to compliance with Section 5.03(c), the Company Board may (X) effect an Adverse Recommendation Change in response to an Intervening Event if the Company Board determines in good faith, after consultation with its outside legal counsel, that the failure to take such action could reasonably be determined to be inconsistent with its fiduciary duties under applicable Law and (Y) effect an Adverse Recommendation Change and/or cause the Company to terminate this Agreement in accordance with and subject to compliance with Section 8.01(f) if (A) an unsolicited bona fide written Company Takeover Proposal is made to the Company and such Company
Adverse Recommendation Change
Alternative Acquisition Agreement
 
Takeover Proposal was made after the date hereof, has not been withdrawn and did not otherwise result from a breach in any material respect of Section 5.03(a), (B) the Company Board determines in good faith, after consultation with its financial advisors and outside legal counsel, that such Company Takeover Proposal constitutes a Superior Company Proposal and (C) the Company Board determines in good faith, after consultation with its outside legal counsel, that the failure to take such action could reasonably be determined to be inconsistent with its fiduciary duties under applicable Law.
(c) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement, the Company Board shall not be entitled to exercise its right to effect an Adverse Recommendation Change or take any action pursuant to Section 8.01(f) unless (i) the Company has complied in all material respects with this Section 5.03, (ii) the Company promptly notifies Parent, in writing, at least four Business Days before taking that action, of its intention to do so in response to a Company Takeover Proposal that constitutes a Superior Company Proposal (in which case such notification shall have attached thereto the most current version of any proposed agreement or a detailed summary of the material terms of any such proposal and the identity of the offeror) or in respect of an Intervening Event (in which case such notification shall describe such Intervening Event and the reasons for the proposed Adverse Recommendation Change), (iii) if the Adverse Recommendation Change is in response to an Intervening Event, during such four-Business-Day period, if requested by Parent, the Company shall, for so long as Parent engages in good faith negotiations with the Company, engage in good faith negotiations with Parent to amend this Agreement in such a manner that obviates the need for an Adverse Recommendation Change as a result of the Intervening Event, or (iv) if the Adverse Recommendation Change is in response to a Superior Company Proposal, during such four-Business-Day period, if requested by Parent, the Company shall, for so long as Parent engages in good faith negotiations with the Company, engage in good faith negotiations with Parent to amend this Agreement in such a manner that any Company Takeover Proposal which was determined to constitute a Superior Company Proposal no longer is a Superior Company Proposal (taking into account any changes to the financial terms of this Agreement proposed by Parent following the notice provided pursuant to Section 5.03(c)(ii)) (it being understood that the Company shall not take any action described in Section 5.03(b) during such four-Business-Day period, and that any amendment to the financial terms or other material terms of such Superior Company Proposal shall require a new written notification from the Company and an additional two-Business-Day period that satisfies this Section 5.03(c)).
For purposes of this Agreement, the term "" means a customary confidentiality agreement that contains provisions that are no less favorable in the aggregate to the Company than those contained in the Confidentiality Agreement; that (i) an Acceptable Confidentiality Agreement shall include a "standstill" or similar covenant but need not prohibit the making or amendment of a Company Takeover Proposal and (ii) an Acceptable Confidentiality Agreement may include provisions that are less favorable in the aggregate to the Company than those contained in the Confidentiality Agreement, so long as the Company offers to amend the Confidentiality Agreement concurrently with execution of such Acceptable Confidentiality Agreement to include substantially similar provisions for the benefit of the parties thereto.
Acceptable Confidentiality Agreement
provided
For purposes of this Agreement, the term "" means any inquiry, proposal or offer (whether or not in writing) from any third party relating to or
Company Takeover Proposal
 
contemplating (i) any direct or indirect acquisition or purchase, in one transaction or a series of related transactions, of assets (including equity securities of any Company Subsidiary) or businesses that constitute 20% or more of the revenues, net income or assets of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, or 20% or more of any class of equity securities of the Company or any Company Subsidiary, (ii) any tender offer or exchange offer that if consummated would result in any person beneficially owning 20% or more of any class of equity securities of the Company or (iii) any merger, consolidation, business combination, recapitalization, liquidation, dissolution, joint venture, share exchange or similar transaction involving the Company or any Company Subsidiary, in each case, pursuant to which any person or the stockholders of any person would own 20% or more of any class of equity securities of the Company or of any resulting parent company of the Company, in each case other than the Transactions.
For purposes of this Agreement, the term "" means, with respect to the Company, a material event or circumstance that was not known to the Company Board on the date of this Agreement (or if known, the consequences of which are not known to or reasonably foreseeable by such Company Board as of the date hereof), which event or circumstance, or any material consequences thereof, becomes known to the Company Board prior to the time at which the Company receives the Company Stockholder Approval; , , that in no event shall the receipt, existence or terms of a Company Takeover Proposal or any matter relating thereto or consequence thereof constitute an Intervening Event.
Intervening Event
provided
however
For purposes of this Agreement, the term "" means any officer, director or employee of, or any investment banker, accountant, agent, controlled affiliate, attorney or other advisor or representative of the Company or any Company Subsidiary or Parent (as applicable).
Representatives
For purposes of this Agreement, the term "" means any bona fide written offer that was made after the date hereof and did not result from a material breach of Section 5.03(a) that, if consummated, would result in such person's (or in the case of a direct merger between such person and the Company, such person's stockholders') acquiring, directly or indirectly, fifty percent (50%) or more of the outstanding shares of the Company Common Stock (or of the shares of the surviving entity in a merger or the direct or indirect parent of the surviving entity in a merger) or all or substantially all of the assets of the Company, and which offer the Company Board determines in good faith, after consultation with its outside legal counsel and financial advisors, to be more favorable to the holders of the Company Common Stock than the Transactions after giving effect to any changes to the terms of this Agreement proposed by Parent in response to such offer or otherwise and taking into account all financial, regulatory, legal and other aspects of such proposal (including any break-up fee, expense reimbursement provisions, conditions to consummation, likelihood and timing of consummation and financing terms) as the Company Board determines in good faith to be relevant.
Superior Company Proposal
(d) The Company shall, as promptly as practicable (and in any event within 24 hours after the receipt thereof) advise Parent orally and in writing of any Company Takeover Proposal or request for information or inquiry that expressly contemplates or that the Company believes could reasonably be expected to lead to a Company Takeover Proposal, such notice to include the identity of the person making such Company Takeover Proposal and a copy of such Company Takeover Proposal, including draft agreements or term sheets submitted in connection therewith
 
(or, where no such copy is available, a description of the material terms of such Company Takeover Proposal), including any modifications thereto. The Company shall (x) keep Parent reasonably informed in all material respects of the status and details (including any change to the terms thereof) of any Company Takeover Proposal and (y) provide to Parent as soon as reasonably practicable after receipt or delivery thereof copies of all correspondence and other written material sent or provided to the Company or any Company Subsidiary, in each case from any person making such Company Takeover Proposal (or such person's Representatives) that describes any of the material terms or conditions of any Company Takeover Proposal. The Company shall not, and shall cause the Company Subsidiaries not to, enter into any Contract with any person subsequent to the date of this Agreement, and neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary is party to any Contract, in each case, that prohibits the Company from providing such information to Parent.
(e) Nothing contained in this Agreement shall prohibit the Company from (i) taking and disclosing to its stockholders a position contemplated by Rule 14d-9, Rule 14e-2(a) or Item 1012(a) of Regulation M-A promulgated under the Exchange Act or (ii) making any disclosure to the Company's stockholders if, in the good faith judgment of the Company Board (after consultation with its outside legal counsel), failure to so disclose could reasonably be determined to be inconsistent with its fiduciary duties under applicable Law (so long as the Company Board publicly reaffirms the Company Recommendation in such disclosure); , , that this Section 5.03(e) shall not affect the obligations of the Company and the Company Board under Section 5.03(a) (it being understood that neither any "stop, look and listen" letter or similar communication of the type contemplated by Rule 14d-9(f) under the Exchange Act, nor any accurate disclosure of factual information to the Company's stockholders that is required to be made to such stockholders under applicable Law or in satisfaction of the Company Board's fiduciary duties or applicable Law, shall be deemed a modification of the Company Recommendation so long as the Company Board publicly reaffirms the Company Recommendation in such communication or disclosure).
provided
however
(f) Provided that the Company and the Company Board are in compliance with Section 5.03, the Company may grant a waiver or release under, or determine not to enforce, any standstill agreement with respect to any class of Company Capital Stock if (i) the Company Board determines in good faith, after consultation with its outside legal counsel, that the failure to take such action could reasonably be determined to be inconsistent with its fiduciary duties under applicable Law and (ii) if applicable, in connection with granting such waiver or release, the Company grants the same waiver or release under the Confidentiality Agreement.
6.01 .
Preparation of Proxy Statement; Stockholders Meeting
(a) The Company shall, as soon as practicable and in any event within twenty (20) Business Days after the date hereof, prepare and file with the SEC the Proxy Statement in preliminary form, and each of the Company and Parent shall use its reasonable efforts to respond as promptly as practicable to any comments of the SEC with respect thereto. Parent and Merger Sub shall promptly furnish to the Company all information concerning Parent and Merger Sub required to be set forth in the Proxy Statement. Each of Parent and Merger Sub shall promptly
 
correct any information provided by it for use in the Proxy Statement if and to the extent that such information shall have become false or misleading in any material respect and to correct any material omissions therein. The Company shall notify Parent promptly of the receipt of any comments from the SEC or its staff and of any request by the SEC or its staff for amendments or supplements to the Proxy Statement or for additional information and shall make available to Parent copies of all correspondence between the Company and the SEC or its staff with respect to the Proxy Statement. Each of the parties shall use its reasonable best efforts to resolve all SEC comments with respect to the Proxy Statement as promptly as practicable after receipt thereof. If at any time prior to receipt of the Company Stockholder Approval there shall occur any event that should be set forth in an amendment or supplement to the Proxy Statement, the Company shall promptly prepare and mail to its stockholders such an amendment or supplement. The Company shall provide Parent and its counsel a reasonable opportunity to review the Proxy Statement prior to its being filed with the SEC and shall provide Parent and their counsel a reasonable opportunity to review all amendments and supplements to the Proxy Statement and all responses to requests for additional information prior to their being filed with, or sent to, the SEC. The Company shall give reasonable and good faith consideration to any comments made by Parent or its counsel. The Company shall use its reasonable efforts to cause the Proxy Statement to be mailed to the Company's stockholders as promptly as practicable after filing with the SEC.
(b) The Company shall, as soon as practicable after the date hereof, (i) duly call, establish a record date for, give notice of, convene and hold a meeting of its stockholders (the "") for the purpose of seeking the Company Stockholder Approval, and shall use reasonable best efforts to take all lawful action to solicit the adoption of this Agreement by such stockholders, and (ii) through the Company Board, subject to an Adverse Recommendation Change (as permitted by, and in accordance with, Section 5.03), recommend to its stockholders that they give the Company Stockholder Approval. The Company Board shall include the Company Recommendation in the Proxy Statement (except to the extent that the Company Board shall have effected an Adverse Recommendation Change as permitted by, and in accordance with, Section 5.03).
Company Stockholders Meeting
(c) The parties agree to cooperate in good faith to determine whether Parent or Merger Sub "beneficially owns" (within the meaning of the Company Certificate) ten percent (10%) or more of the Company Common Stock as of the record date for the Company Stockholders Meeting. Parent and Merger Sub shall cause all shares of the Company Common Stock owned by Parent and Merger Sub, and shall use reasonable best efforts to cause all shares of the Company Common Stock owned by their controlled affiliates, to be voted in favor of the adoption of this Agreement.
(d) Promptly following the execution of this Agreement, Parent shall cause Merger Sub's sole stockholder to execute and deliver, in accordance with Section 228 of the DGCL and in its capacity as the sole stockholder of Merger Sub, a written consent adopting this Agreement.
6.02 . Subject to applicable Law, and upon reasonable prior written notice, the Company shall, and shall cause each of the Company Subsidiaries to, afford to Parent and to its Representatives reasonable access during normal business hours during the period prior to the Effective Time to all of their properties, offices, personnel and books and records and, during such period, the Company shall, and shall cause each
Access to Information; Confidentiality
 
of the Company Subsidiaries to, furnish promptly to Parent all financial, operating and other data and information concerning its business, properties and personnel as Parent may reasonably request; , , that any such access shall not interfere unreasonably with the business or operations of the Company or the Company Subsidiaries or otherwise result in any unreasonable interference with the prompt and timely discharge by such employees of their normal duties. If any of the information or material furnished pursuant to this Section 6.02 includes materials or information subject to the attorney-client privilege, work product doctrine or any other applicable privilege concerning pending or threatened legal proceedings or governmental investigations, each party understands and agrees that the parties have a commonality of interest with respect to such matters and it is the desire, intention and mutual understanding of the parties that the sharing of such material or information is not intended to, and shall not, waive or diminish in any way the confidentiality of such material or information or its continued protection under the attorney-client privilege, work product doctrine or other applicable privilege. All such information provided by the Company that is entitled to protection under the attorney-client privilege, work product doctrine or other applicable privilege shall remain entitled to such protection under these privileges, this Agreement, and under the joint defense doctrine. All information exchanged pursuant to this Section 6.02 shall be subject to the non-disclosure agreement, dated as of October 31, 2012, between the Company and Parent (the ""). No investigation pursuant to this Section 6.02 or information provided or received by any party hereto pursuant to this Agreement will affect any of the representations or warranties of the parties hereto contained in this Agreement.
provided
however
Confidentiality Agreement
6.03 .
Reasonable Best Efforts; Notification
(a) Upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement, each of Parent, Merger Sub and the Company agrees to use its reasonable best efforts to take, or cause to be taken, all actions and to do, or cause to be done, and to assist and cooperate with the other parties in doing, all things necessary to fulfill all conditions applicable to such party pursuant to this Agreement and to consummate and make effective, in the most expeditious manner practicable, the Merger and the other Transactions, including (i) obtaining all necessary actions or non-actions, waivers, Consents, qualifications and approvals from Governmental Entities and making all necessary registrations, filings and notifications and taking all reasonable steps as may be necessary to obtain an approval, clearance, non-action letter, waiver or exemption from any Governmental Entity (including under the HSR Act); (ii) obtaining all necessary consents, qualifications, approvals, waivers or exemptions from non-governmental third parties; (iii) the defending of any lawsuits or other legal proceedings, whether judicial or administrative, challenging this Agreement or the consummation of the Transactions, including seeking to have any stay or temporary restraining order entered by any court or other Governmental Entity vacated or reversed; and (iv) executing and delivering any additional documents or instruments necessary to consummate the Transactions and to carry out this Agreement.
(b) Without limiting the foregoing, each of the Company, Parent and Merger Sub shall use its reasonable best efforts to make an appropriate filing of a Notification and Report Form pursuant to the HSR Act with respect to the Transactions as promptly as practicable (but in any event no later than January 4, 2013) and any other required submissions under any antitrust law that the Company or Parent determines should be made, in each case with respect to the Transactions, to supply as promptly as reasonably practicable any additional information and
 
documentary material that may be requested pursuant to the HSR Act or any other applicable antitrust law, and to take all other actions necessary to cause the expiration or termination of the applicable waiting periods under the HSR Act as soon as practicable.
(c) The Company, Parent and Merger Sub shall cooperate with each other in connection with the making of all such filings, including furnishing to the others such information and assistance as a party may reasonably request in connection with its preparation of any filing or submission that is necessary or allowable under applicable competition or other Law or requested by any competition authorities. The Company, Parent and Merger Sub shall use their respective reasonable best efforts to furnish to each other all information required for any application or other filing to be made pursuant to any Law (including all information required to be included in the Company's disclosure documents) in connection with the Transactions. To the extent permitted by applicable Law or any relevant Governmental Entity, and subject to all applicable privileges, including the attorney-client privilege, each party hereto shall (i) give the other parties hereto prompt notice upon obtaining knowledge of the making or commencement of any request, inquiry, investigation, action or legal proceeding by or before any Governmental Entity with respect to the Merger or any of the other Transactions, (ii) keep the other parties hereto informed as to the status of any such request, inquiry, investigation, action or legal proceeding and (iii) promptly inform the other parties hereto of any material communication to or from the U.S. Federal Trade Commission, the U.S. Department of Justice, any foreign competition authority or any other Governmental Entity regarding the Merger or any of the other Transactions. The parties hereto will consult and cooperate with one another, and consider in good faith the views of one another, in connection with, and provide to the other parties in advance, any analyses, appearances, presentations, memoranda, briefs, arguments, opinions and proposals to be made or submitted by or on behalf of any party hereto, including reasonable access to any materials submitted in connection with any proceedings under or relating to the HSR Act or any other applicable Federal, state or foreign competition, merger control, antitrust or similar Law, including any proceeding under 16 C.F.R.  803.20.
(d) Any party may, as it deems advisable and necessary, reasonably designate any competitively sensitive material provided to the other parties under this Section 6.03 as "outside counsel only." Such materials and the information contained therein shall be given only to the outside legal counsel of the recipient and will not be disclosed by such outside counsel to employees, officers or directors of the recipient, unless express written permission is obtained in advance from the source of such materials. In addition, except as may be prohibited by any Governmental Entity or by any Law, each party hereto will permit authorized Representatives of the other parties to be present at each meeting or telephone conference of which such party shall have advance notice (other than telephone conversations to the extent they relate solely to administrative matters) with representatives of any Governmental Entity relating to any request, inquiry, investigation, action or legal proceeding and to have access to and be consulted in connection with any document, opinion or proposal made or submitted to any Governmental Entity in connection with any such request, inquiry, investigation, action or proceeding.
(e) Without limiting any other obligations of Parent hereunder, Parent shall respond to and seek to resolve as promptly as reasonably practicable any objections asserted by any Governmental Entity with respect to the Transactions, and shall defend any action, suit, dispute, litigation, proceeding, hearing, arbitration or claim by or before any Governmental Authority,
 
whether judicial or administrative, whether brought by private parties or Governmental Entities or officials, challenging this Agreement or the consummation of the Transactions. Parent shall use reasonable best efforts to take any and all action necessary to ensure that no Governmental Entity enters any order, decision, judgment, decree, ruling, injunction (preliminary or permanent), or establishes any Law, rule, regulation or other action preliminarily or permanently restraining, enjoining or prohibiting the consummation of the Merger or the Transactions, or to ensure that no Governmental Entity with the authority to clear, authorize or otherwise approve the consummation of the Merger, fails to do so by the Outside Date. In the event that any action is threatened or instituted challenging the Merger as violative of any Law, Parent shall use reasonable best efforts to take all action necessary to avoid or resolve such action. In the event that any permanent or preliminary injunction or other order is entered or becomes reasonably foreseeable to be entered in any proceeding that would make consummation of the Transactions in accordance with the terms of this Agreement unlawful or that would restrain, enjoin or otherwise prevent or materially delay the consummation of the Transactions, Parent shall use reasonable best efforts to take promptly any and all steps necessary to vacate, modify or suspend such injunction or order so as to permit such consummation prior to the Outside Date. Subject to Section 6.03(f), the required actions by Parent hereunder shall include, without limitation, the proposal, negotiation and acceptance by Parent prior to the Outside Date of (i) any and all divestitures of the businesses or assets of it or its subsidiaries or its controlled affiliates or of the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries, (ii) any agreement to hold any assets of Parent or its subsidiaries or its controlled affiliates or of the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries separate, (iii) any agreement to license any portion of the business of Parent or its subsidiaries or its controlled affiliates or of the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries, (iv) any limitation to or modification of any of the businesses, services or operations of Parent or its subsidiaries or its controlled affiliates or, following the Closing, of the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries, and (v) any other action (including any action that limits the freedom of action, ownership or control with respect to, or ability to retain or hold, any of the businesses, assets, product lines, properties or services of Parent or its subsidiaries or its controlled affiliates or of the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries), in each case as may be required by any applicable Governmental Entity in order to obtain approval for the Transactions. The parties hereto acknowledge and agree that the obligations of the Company hereunder shall not include any requirement of the Company to defend any proceeding challenging this Agreement or the consummation of the Transactions beyond the Outside Date.
(f) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, Parent's obligations under this Agreement shall not include taking any action that, and Parent shall not be required to accept (and the Company and the Company Subsidiaries shall not accept without Parent's prior written consent) any undertaking or condition, to enter into any consent decree, to make any divestiture, to accept any operational restriction, or take any other action (each of the foregoing, a "") that would reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a material adverse effect on the business, financial condition or results of operations of (i) Parent and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole (excluding the Company and the Company Subsidiaries) or (ii) the Company and the Company Subsidiaries, taken as a whole. For purposes of the immediately preceding sentence, one or more Regulatory Requirements shall be deemed to constitute a "material adverse effect" if one or more of such Regulatory Requirements (X) would reasonably be expected to, individually or in the aggregate, have a Gross Economic Value, assuming the consummation of such Regulatory Requirement, equal to or greater than $131.0 million or (Y) would require Parent or its subsidiaries to license or otherwise make available
Regulatory Requirement
 
television or online measurement data to any third party who intends to offer a service to customers incorporating such television or online measurement data to customers who do not also subscribe to the services provided by Parent or its subsidiaries related to such data.
For purposes of this Agreement, "" of each Regulatory Requirement shall be the Reduced EBITDA of either (A) Parent or the Company or (B) both Parent and the Company if any businesses, services or assets of both Parent and the Company (or their respective subsidiaries) are subject to such Regulatory Requirement, (X) in the case of clause (A), multiplied by the Parent Multiple or the Company Multiple (as the case may be) and (Y) in the case of clause (B), multiplied by the Parent Multiple or the Company Multiple, as the case may be.
Gross Economic Value
For purposes of this Agreement, "" means earnings before interest, taxes depreciation and amortization and after deducting stock based compensation expense, calculated in accordance with the past reporting practices of either Parent or the Company, as the case may be. For purposes of this Agreement, the "" resulting from a Regulatory Requirement shall be determined by multiplying (X) any reduction in annual revenue for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2012 associated with any business, service or asset subject to a Regulatory Requirement under consideration that would have resulted from the action proposed under such Regulatory Requirement had such proposed action been effective on January 1, 2012 and in effect until December 31, 2012 by (Y) the EBITDA Margin for such business, service or asset.
EBITDA
Reduced EBITDA
For purposes of this Agreement, "" shall mean the percentage resulting from dividing EBITDA for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2012 by the GAAP revenues for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2012. EBITDA Margin for a business, service or asset shall be (a) if Parent or the Company track for internal reporting purposes the EBITDA for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2012 associated with the business, service or asset, the percentage determined by dividing EBITDA for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2012 by the GAAP revenues for such business, service or asset, or otherwise (b) the EBITDA Margin for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2012 for Parent or the Company.
EBITDA Margin
For purposes of this Agreement, "" means (i) with respect to that portion of any Regulatory Requirement involving Radio Measurement Services, 9.7, or (ii) with respect to any Regulatory Requirement not involving Radio Measurement Services, 7.5.
Company Multiple
For purposes of this Agreement, "" means 10.8.
Parent Multiple
(g) In the event any Regulatory Requirement is proposed by any Governmental Entity or the Company requests that Parent propose such a Regulatory Requirement to a Governmental Entity, Parent or the Company (as applicable) shall promptly notify and provide details to the other party of such proposal and Parent shall determine within ten Business Days of such proposal (or within ten Business Days of receiving notice of, or a request to make, such proposal from the Company) (but in no event less than two Business Days prior to the Outside Date) of such proposal whether it is required pursuant to Section 6.03(f) to accept such Regulatory Requirement.
 
Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, in the event that (i) Parent proposes a Regulatory Requirement or (ii) Parent determines that it is required pursuant to Section 6.03(f) to accept a Regulatory Requirement, the parties shall take any action necessary to satisfy such Regulatory Requirement. In the event that Parent determines within such period that it is not required pursuant to Section 6.03(f) to accept such Regulatory Requirement, Parent will promptly (and in any event within two Business Days of such determination) provide written notice to the Company setting forth in reasonable detail the basis for such determination and, if Parent determines that it is not required to accept such Regulatory Requirement as a result of clause (X) of the last sentence of the first paragraph of Section 6.03(f), such notice shall include Parent's calculation in reasonable detail of the Gross Economic Value, together with supporting materials. Parent shall provide the Company with reasonable access to Parent's experts and personnel and any other information that the Company reasonably requests in connection with its review of Parent's calculation of Gross Economic Value. In the event the Company disagrees with such calculation, the Company shall promptly (and in any event within two Business Days of such determination) notify Parent of and provide reasonable detail of such disagreement. Following the Company's notification to Parent, the parties shall use reasonable best efforts to attempt, as promptly as practicable, to mutually agree on the amount of the Gross Economic Value. In the event the parties cannot mutually agree upon the Gross Economic Value within five Business Days of first attempting to determine such amount, the parties shall jointly refer such dispute or controversy (the "") to PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP or to such other accounting firm or financial institution as mutually determined by the parties (the ""). The Accounting Arbitrator shall consider only the Disputed Item referred by the parties and shall be required to resolve the Disputed Item in accordance with the terms and provisions of this Agreement (the "") as the exclusive remedy for such dispute. In connection with the resolution of the Disputed Item by the Accounting Arbitrator: (i) each of Parent and the Company shall furnish or cause to be furnished to the Accounting Arbitrator only the data, correspondence and other materials it presented to the other party pursuant to the first sentence of this Section 6.03(g), and no other materials; (ii) each of Parent and the Company shall be afforded the opportunity to make a presentation to the Accounting Arbitrator relating to the Disputed Item and to discuss such Disputed Item with the Accounting Arbitrator, in each case in the presence of the other party; (iii) no ex parte communications with the Accounting Arbitrator with respect to the Arbitration shall be permitted; (iv) the Accounting Arbitrator shall only decide the specific Disputed Item; and (v) the determination by the Accounting Arbitrator shall be delivered in a written report to both Parent and the Company within fifteen (15) days of the submission to the Accounting Arbitrator of the Disputed Item, and shall be the sole and binding determination with respect to the Disputed Item. Parent and the Company shall reasonably cooperate with the Accounting Arbitrator and respond on a timely basis to all reasonable requests for information or access to documents or personnel made by the Accounting Arbitrator or by the other party, all with the intent to fairly and in good faith resolve all disputes relating to the Disputed Item as promptly as reasonably practicable. The parties hereto agree that the Arbitration, and all matters relating thereto or arising thereunder, including the existence of the Arbitration or Disputed Item, the proceeding and all of its elements (including any documents or materials submitted or exchanged, any testimony or other oral submissions, and any decision of the Accounting Arbitrator), shall be subject to the Confidentiality Agreement. Each party hereto shall bear its own fees and costs in connection with the Arbitration; , , that each such party shall pay one-half of any fees and expenses of the Accounting Arbitrator in connection with the Arbitration. Each party
Disputed Item
Accounting Arbitrator
Arbitration
provided
however
 
hereto shall use its best efforts to cause the Arbitration to be conducted in accordance with the procedures set forth in the foregoing provisions of this Section 6.03(g), and hereby further waives the right to object to the conduct of the Arbitration in accordance herewith (other than compliance with the terms hereof).
(h) Parent and Merger Sub agree not to extend any waiting period under the HSR Act or enter into any agreement with any Governmental Authority to delay, or otherwise not to consummate as soon as practicable, any of the Transactions except with the prior written consent of the Company, which consent may be withheld in the sole discretion of the Company.
(i) Each of the Company, on the one hand, and Parent and Merger Sub, on the other hand, shall, to the extent permitted by applicable Law and any relevant Governmental Entity and subject to all privileges (including the attorney-client privilege), promptly (and in any event within two (2) Business Days) notify the other party in writing of:
(i) any notice or other communication from any person alleging that the consent of such person is or may be required in connection with the Transactions;
(ii) any actions, suits, claims, investigations or proceedings commenced or, to its knowledge, threatened against, relating to or involving or otherwise affecting the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries or Parent or any of its subsidiaries, as the case may be, that, if pending on the date of this Agreement, would have been required to have been disclosed pursuant to any of the representations and warranties contained herein, or that relate to the consummation of the Transactions;
(iii) any inaccuracy of any representation or warranty of such party contained in this Agreement at any time during the term hereof that would reasonably be likely to cause the conditions set forth in Article VII not to be satisfied; and
(iv) any failure of such party to comply with or satisfy any covenant, condition or agreement to be complied with or satisfied by it hereunder.
(j) The parties hereto agree that this Section 6.03 shall not govern the obligations of the parties hereto with respect to obtaining the Financing, which obligations are set forth in Section 6.06.
6.04 .
Treatment of Equity Compensation
(a) As soon as practicable following the date of this Agreement, the Company Board (or, if appropriate, any committee administering the Company Stock Plans) shall adopt such resolutions or take such other actions as are required to effect the following, subject in each case to Section 2.02(h), Section 6.04(b) and Section 6.04(c):
(i) except as provided in Section 6.04(a)(ii), all Company Stock Options (whether or not vested as of the Effective Time) shall be canceled at the Effective Time and shall be converted automatically into the right to receive a cash payment equal to (A) the , if any, of (x) the per share Merger Consideration over (y) the exercise price per share of Company Common Stock subject to such Company Stock Option, multiplied by (B) the number of shares of Company Common Stock for which such Company Stock Option shall not theretofore have been exercised as of the Effective Time;
excess
 
(ii) all Company Stock Options (whether or not vested as of the Effective Time) granted under the Company's 1999 Stock Incentive Plan that, by their terms, provide for payment within 15 days following a change of control of an amount equal to the sum of (A) the in-the-money value of the option, and (B) the "Black-Scholes Termination Value" (as that term is defined in the option award agreement) of the option, shall be canceled at the Effective Time and shall be converted automatically into the right to receive a cash payment equal to the sum of (x) and (y), where (x) equals the excess, if any, of (I) the per share Merger Consideration over (II) the exercise price per share of Company Common Stock subject to such Company Stock Option, multiplied by the number of shares of Company Common Stock for which such Company Stock Option shall not theretofore have been exercised as of the Effective Time and (y) equals the "Black-Scholes Termination Value" (as that term is defined in the option agreement), if any, of such option;
(iii) all Company Restricted Stock, Company RSUs and Company DSUs (whether vested or unvested, and whether or not subject to performance-based vesting conditions) outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be canceled in exchange for a cash payment equal to (A) the Merger Consideration, multiplied by (B) the number of shares of Company Common Stock to which such award relates;
(iv) (A) the Company's Employee Stock Purchase Plan shall terminate as of immediately prior to the Effective Time, (B) any open "Offering Period" (as that term is used in such plan) shall end on the earlier of its scheduled date or as of a date prior to the Closing Date that is selected by the Board or the committee administering such plan, and no new Offering Period shall commence after the date hereof, (C) each Company ESPP Option relating to such Offering Period shall be deemed to be exercised in accordance with Section 9.1 of such plan on the last trading day on or prior to such exercise date and (D) the holders of the shares of Company Common Stock shall receive the Merger Consideration with respect to such shares of Company Common Stock in accordance with Section 2.01(c) of this Agreement.
(b) Notwithstanding anything in Section 6.04(a) or in any plan, agreement or arrangement to the contrary, at the Effective Time, each then outstanding Company RSU that is granted after the date of this Agreement (such grants to be in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth in Section 5.01(v)(F) of this Agreement and Section 5.01(v)(F) of the Company Disclosure Letter), shall (i) with respect to fifty percent (50%) of the number of shares of Company Common Stock to which the award was originally granted (such 50% portion, the ""), be assumed by Parent pursuant to the following sentence and (ii) with respect to any remaining outstanding portion be canceled in exchange for a cash payment equal to (A) the Merger Consideration, multiplied by (B) the number of shares of Company Common Stock to which such remaining outstanding portion relates. The Assumed Portion of such RSUs will be assumed by Parent and will continue to have, and be subject to, the same terms and conditions set forth in the applicable Company RSU award agreement (or other document evidencing such Company RSU) immediately prior to the Effective Time (including any vesting or forfeiture
Assumed Portion
 
provisions or repurchase rights), except that (I) the RSU award agreement governing such assumed RSUs shall cover a number of whole shares equal to the product of (A) the number of shares of Company Common Stock subject to the Assumed Portion of such RSU (B) the quotient of (x) the per share Merger Consideration (y) the closing price for one share of common stock of Parent as reported on the NYSE composite transaction tape (as reported in the Wall Street Journal, Northeastern edition, or, if not reported thereby, any other authoritative source chosen by Parent) on the close of business on the Business Day immediately preceding the Effective Time, rounded down to the nearest whole number of shares (the "") and (II) the number of shares of Parent common stock with respect to which the award will vest on each subsequent vesting date shall be determined by dividing the total number of shares of Parent common stock subject to such award by the remaining number of vesting dates under the award after the Effective Time.
multiplied by
divided by
Exchange Ratio
(c) Notwithstanding anything in Sections 6.04(a) or 6.04(b) or in any plan, agreement or arrangement to the contrary, at the Effective Time, any then outstanding Company RSU that was granted after the date of this Agreement to any newly hired employees or to employees in the context of promotions based on job performance or workplace requirements, in each case, in accordance with the last proviso in Section 5.01(v) of this Agreement, that has not vested as of the Effective Time will be assumed by Parent. Each such Company RSU so assumed by Parent under this Section 6.04(c) will otherwise continue to have, and be subject to, the same terms and conditions set forth in the applicable Company RSU award agreement (or other document evidencing such Company RSU) immediately prior to the Effective Time (including any vesting or forfeiture provisions or repurchase rights), except that each Company RSU award agreement shall cover the number of whole shares equal to the product of (A) the number of shares of Company Common Stock subject to such Company RSU award agreement immediately prior to the Effective Time (B) the Exchange Ratio.
multiplied by
(d) All amounts payable pursuant to this Section 6.04 (other than Section 6.04(a)(iv)) shall be paid within five (5) Business Days after the Effective Time and without interest.
(e) The Company Board (or, if appropriate, any committee administering the Company Stock Plans) shall ensure that following the Effective Time no holder of a Company Stock-Based Award or any participant in any Company Stock Plan or other Company Benefit Plan shall have any right thereunder to acquire any capital stock of the Company or the Surviving Corporation.
(f) The Company and Parent shall cooperate to take such actions as they may reasonably agree are required to cause the transactions contemplated by this Section 6.04 and any other disposition of Company equity securities (including derivative securities) in connection with this Agreement by any person who is a director or officer of the Company subject to Section 16 of the Exchange Act to be exempt under Rule 16b-3 under the Exchange Act.
(g) In this Agreement:
"" means any option to purchase Company Common Stock granted under the Company's Employee Stock Purchase Plan.
Company ESPP Option
 
"" means the Company ESPP Options, Company Stock Options, Company RSUs, Company DSUs and Company Restricted Stock.
Company Stock-Based Awards
"" means any option to purchase Company Common Stock granted under any Company Stock Plan other than the Company's Employee Stock Purchase Plan.
Company Stock Option
"" means any deferred stock unit relating to Company Common Stock granted under any Company Stock Plan.
Company DSU
"" means any restricted stock unit relating to Company Common Stock granted under any Company Stock Plan.
Company RSU
"" means the Company 1999 Stock Incentive Plan, Company 2001 Broad Based Stock Incentive Plan, Company 2008 Equity Incentive Plan, and Company Employee Stock Purchase Plan, in each case as amended through the date hereof.
Company Stock Plans
6.05 .
Benefit Plans
(a) Immediately following the Effective Time, Parent shall, and shall cause the Surviving Corporation to, provide to those individuals who are employed by the Company or the Company Subsidiaries immediately prior to the Effective Time (the "") for a period of at least one (1) year: (i) base salary and incentive compensation opportunities that is no less favorable in the aggregate to each Company Employee than the aggregate base salary and incentive compensation opportunities provided to such Company Employee by the Company immediately prior to the Effective Time; and (ii) employee benefits that, taken as a whole, are no less favorable to such employees in the aggregate than those provided to such employees under the Company Benefit Plans. Such compensation and employee benefits may be provided through the Surviving Corporation's continuation of one or more of the Company Benefit Plans, through the admission of the Company Employees to any one or more employee benefit policies, plans or programs maintained by Parent or its affiliates from time to time (each, a ""), or through a combination of the foregoing alternatives, as determined in Parent's sole and absolute discretion. Nothing herein shall require that Parent grant equity of Parent to any Company Employee or continue to maintain any particular Company Benefit Plan or form of incentive or benefit, after the Effective Time in order to satisfy its obligations hereunder.
Company Employees
Parent Plan
(b) Without limiting Section 6.05(a), for a period of at least one (1) year following the Effective Time, Parent shall, and shall cause the Surviving Corporation to, provide severance payments and benefits to Company Employees who are terminated by the Surviving Corporation other than for cause (as determined based on the Company's policies as of the date hereof), which severance payments shall be no less favorable than the greater of (i) the severance payments and benefits based on the Company's current policies and (ii) the severance payments and benefits provided by Parent and its Subsidiaries to similarly situated employees of Parent and its Subsidiaries, provided that Parent may condition such payments and benefits upon execution by the applicable Company Employee of a commercially standard release of claims in a form reasonably satisfactory to Parent.
 
(c) Parent shall, or shall cause the Surviving Corporation to, assume and honor the obligations of the Company and its Subsidiaries under all Company Benefit Agreement and any consulting, retirement and other compensation contracts, arrangements, commitments or understandings, in accordance with their terms, subject to the right to make amendments or modifications to the extent permitted by such terms. Parent hereby acknowledges that (i) the Merger will constitute a "Change in Control" (or concept of similar import) under the Company Benefit Plans and Company Benefit Agreements and (ii) as a result of the Merger, the individuals identified in Section 6.05(c) of the Company Disclosure Letter will be deemed to have experienced a "Position Diminishment" or a "Good Reason" event (or concept of similar import), as applicable, for all purposes under their Company Benefit Agreements.
(d) Parent shall, and shall cause the Surviving Corporation to, give each Company Employee full credit for purposes of eligibility, vesting, benefit accrual and determination of the level of benefits under any employee benefit plans or arrangements that such employees may be eligible to participate in after the Effective Time for such Company Employee's service with the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company to the same extent recognized by the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company immediately prior to the Effective Time; provided that the foregoing shall not apply (i) for benefit accrual purposes under any defined benefit pension plan, (ii) as would result in the duplication of benefits for the same period of service or (iii) for any newly established plan of Parent for which similarly situated employees of Parent do not receive past service credit.
(e) Parent shall, and shall cause the Surviving Corporation to, use commercially reasonable efforts to (i) waive all limitations as to preexisting conditions exclusions and waiting periods with respect to participation and coverage requirements applicable to the Company Employees under any welfare benefit plans that such employees may be eligible to participate in after the Effective Time, other than limitations or waiting periods that are already in effect with respect to such employees and that have not been satisfied as of the Effective Time under any welfare plan maintained for the Company Employees immediately prior to the Effective Time, and (ii) provide each Company Employee with credit for any co-payments and deductibles paid in the plan year in which the Effective Time occurs in satisfying any applicable deductible or out-of-pocket requirements under any welfare plans in which employees are eligible to participate after the Effective Time.
(f) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this Section 6.05, the provisions of Section 6.05 shall apply only with respect to Company Employees who are covered under Company Benefit Plans that are maintained primarily for the benefit of employees employed in the United States (including Company Employees regularly employed outside the United States to the extent they participate in such Company Benefit Plans). With respect to Company Employees not described in the preceding sentence, Parent shall, and shall cause the Surviving Corporation and its Subsidiaries to, comply with all applicable laws, directives and regulations relating to employees and employee benefits matters applicable to such employees.
(g) Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, the Company shall be permitted to establish the terms and conditions of the cash incentive awards relating to calendar year 2013 (the ""). If the Closing occurs before the payment of the 2013 Incentives, (i) the Company shall be permitted to finally and conclusively determine, in good faith
2013 Incentives
 
and consistent with the terms and conditions of the applicable Company Benefit Plans (and, to the extent based on business results, based on the most recent forecast available as of the Closing Date) the amount of the 2013 Incentives earned by each Company Employee through the Closing Date (prorated, if the Closing occurs in 2013, for the portion of the year elapsed between January 1, 2013 and the Closing Date) or through December 31, 2013 if the Closing Date occurs on or after December 31, 2013 (the "") and (ii) Parent shall pay or cause to be paid to each Company Employee (whether or not such employee remains employed following the Closing) the Earned Portion of such Company Employee's 2013 Bonus at the same time 2013 annual bonuses are paid to other Parent employees in the United States, but in all events no later than March 15, 2014. If the Closing occurs in 2013, for the balance of the 2013 calendar year following the Closing Date, Parent shall, or shall cause its Affiliates to, determine the incentive opportunities in accordance with Section 6.05(a).
Earned Portion
(h) This Section 6.05 shall be binding upon and inure solely to the benefit of each party hereto, and nothing in this Agreement, express or implied, is intended to or shall confer upon any other person any right, benefit or remedy of any nature whatsoever under or by reason of this Section 6.05. In no event shall the terms of this Agreement be deemed to (i) establish, amend, or modify any Company Benefit Plan or any other benefit plan, program, agreement or arrangement maintained or sponsored by Parent, the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company or any of their respective Affiliates, (ii) alter or limit the ability of Parent or any of its Subsidiaries (including, after the Effective Time, the Surviving Corporation or any Subsidiary of the Surviving Corporation) to amend, modify or terminate any of the Company Benefit Plans or any other benefit or employment plan, program, agreement or arrangement after the Effective Time, or (iii) confer upon any current or former employee or other service provider of the Company or its Subsidiaries, any right to employment or continued employment or continued service with Parent or any of its Subsidiaries (including, following the Effective Time, the Surviving Corporation or any Subsidiary of the Surviving Corporation), or constitute or create an employment or agreement with, or modify the at-will status of any, employee or other service provider.
6.06 .
Financing
(a) Parent shall use reasonable best efforts to take, or cause to be taken, all actions and to do, or cause to be done, all things necessary, proper or advisable to consummate and obtain the Financing on the terms and conditions described in the Commitment Letter and in a timely manner, including (i) maintaining in effect the Commitment Letter, (ii) negotiating and entering into definitive agreements with respect to the Commitment Letter on terms and conditions contemplated by the Commitment Letter and (iii) satisfying on a timely basis all conditions to the funding of the Financing on the Closing Date applicable to Parent in the Commitment Letter and the definitive agreements with respect thereto and comply with its obligations thereunder. Parent shall have the right from time to time to amend, replace, supplement or otherwise modify, or waive any of its rights under, the Commitment Letter and/or substitute other debt or equity financing for all or any portion of the Financing from the same and/or alternative financing sources, that any such amendment, replacement, supplement or other modification to or waiver of any provision of the Commitment Letter and the definitive agreements with respect thereto that amends the Financing and/or substitution of all or any portion of the Financing shall not impose additional conditions precedent to the Financing as set forth in the Commitment Letter that could reasonably be expected to prevent or materially delay the consummation of the Transactions.
provided
 
Parent shall be permitted to reduce the amount of Financing under the Commitment Letter in its sole discretion, that Parent shall not reduce the Financing to an amount committed below the amount that is required, together with the financial resources of Parent and Merger Sub, including cash on hand of Parent and the Company, to consummate the Merger. If any portion of the Financing becomes unavailable in the manner or from the sources contemplated in the Commitment Letter and such portion is reasonably required (taking into account cash on hand and other financial resources available to Parent) to fund the Merger Consideration, Parent shall use its reasonable best efforts to arrange and obtain alternative financing in an amount sufficient to consummate the Transactions as promptly as reasonably practicable following the occurrence of such event. Parent shall promptly provide the Company with the documentation evidencing such alternative sources of financing, including all relevant agreements, other financing documents and any proposed amendments or waivers thereto, and shall give the Company prompt notice (but in any event within five (5) Business Days) of any material breach by any party to the Commitment Letter that becomes known to Parent or any termination of the Commitment Letter. Parent shall keep the Company reasonably informed on a current basis of the status of its effort to arrange the Financing.
provided
(b) For the avoidance of doubt, if Parent fails to obtain the Financing contemplated by the Commitment Letter or any alternative financing, Parent shall continue to be obligated to perform its obligations under this Agreement, including this Section 6.06, and to consummate the Merger on the terms contemplated hereby (subject only to satisfaction or waiver of the conditions set forth in Section 7.01 and 7.02) unless and until this Agreement is terminated in accordance with Article VIII.
(c) In connection with the Financing, the Company shall use its commercially reasonable efforts to obtain, at Parent's expense, an accountant's comfort letter with respect to financial information relating to the Company that may be included in any offering memorandum used by Parent in connection with the Financing. For the avoidance of doubt, the failure of the Company to obtain a comfort letter shall not be deemed to be a breach of this Agreement and Parent shall continue to be obligated to perform its obligations under this Agreement, including its obligation to consummate the Merger on the terms and subject to the conditions contained in this Agreement.
6.07 .
Indemnification
(a) Parent and Merger Sub agree that from and after the Effective Time until the sixth anniversary of the Effective Time, all rights to indemnification, exculpation and advancement of expenses from liabilities for acts or omissions occurring at or prior to the Effective Time (including any matters arising in connection with the Transactions) in favor of the current or former directors or officers of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries as provided in the Company Certificate, the Company Bylaws, and the respective comparable organizational documents of the Company Subsidiaries, and any indemnification or other agreements of the Company set forth in Section 6.07(a) of the Company Disclosure Letter (in each case, as in effect on the date of this Agreement) shall be assumed by the Surviving Corporation in the Merger, without further action, at the Effective Time, and shall survive the Merger and shall continue in full force and effect in accordance with their terms until the sixth anniversary of the Effective Time with respect to any claims against such directors or officers arising out of such acts or omissions
 
(and until such later date as such claims and proceedings arising therefrom shall be finally disposed of), and from and after the Effective Time until the sixth anniversary of the Effective Time, Parent shall ensure that the Surviving Corporation complies with and honors the foregoing obligations.
(b) Parent shall cause to be maintained for a period of not less than six (6) years from the Effective Time (and until such later time as any proceedings commenced during such period shall be finally disposed of) the Company's current directors' and officers' insurance and indemnification policies ( that Parent may substitute therefor policies with reputable and financially sound carriers of at least the same coverage and amounts containing terms and conditions that are no less favorable to the Indemnified Parties) with respect to events occurring at or prior to the Effective Time (the "") for all persons who are currently covered by such D&O Insurance, so long as the annual premium therefor would not be in excess of 300% of the last annual premium paid prior to the date of this Agreement (such 300% amount, the ""); that (i) if the annual premiums for such D&O Insurance exceed the Maximum Premium, Parent shall maintain the most favorable policies of directors' and officers' insurance obtainable for an annual premium equal to the Maximum Premium and (ii) Parent may satisfy its obligations under this Section 6.07(b) by causing the Company to obtain, on or prior to the Closing Date, prepaid (or "tail") directors' and officers' liability insurance policy at Parent's expense, the material terms of which, including coverage and amount, are no less favorable to such directors and officers than the insurance coverage otherwise required under this Section 6.07(b). Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the Company in its sole discretion elects, by giving written notice to Parent at least two (2) Business Days prior to the Effective Time, then, in lieu of the foregoing insurance, effective as of the Effective Time, the Company shall purchase a directors' and officers' liability insurance "tail" or "runoff" insurance program for a period of six (6) years after the Effective Time with respect to wrongful acts and/or omissions committed or allegedly committed at or prior to the Effective Time (such coverage to have an aggregate coverage limit over the term of such policy in an amount not to exceed the annual aggregate coverage limit under the Company's existing directors' and officers' liability policy, and in all other respects to be comparable to such existing coverage).
provided
D&O Insurance
Maximum Premium
provided
(c) From and after the Effective Time until the sixth anniversary of the Effective Time, to the fullest extent permitted by Law, Parent shall, and shall cause the Surviving Corporation to, indemnify, defend and hold harmless, and provide advancement of expenses to, the present and former officers and directors of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries and any employee of the Company or any Company Subsidiary who acts as a fiduciary under any Company Benefit Plan (each an "") against all losses, claims, damages, liabilities, fees and expenses (including attorneys' fees and disbursements), judgments, fines and amounts paid in settlement (in the case of settlements, with the approval of the indemnifying party (which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld)) (collectively, ""), as incurred (payable monthly upon written request, which request shall include reasonable evidence of the Losses set forth therein) to the extent arising from, relating to, or otherwise in respect of, any actual or threatened action, suit, proceeding or investigation, in respect of actions or omissions occurring at or prior to the Effective Time in connection with such Indemnified Party's duties as an officer or director of the Company or any Company Subsidiary, including in respect of this Agreement, the Merger and the other Transactions, or as a fiduciary under any Company Benefit Plan; , , that an Indemnified Party shall not be entitled to indemnification or advancement of expenses under this
Indemnified Party
Losses
provided
however
 
Section 6.07(c) for Losses arising out of actions or omissions by the Indemnified Party (i) constituting a material breach of this Agreement or criminal conduct or (ii) Losses for which such Indemnified Party would not be entitled to indemnification or advancement of expenses under the Company Certificate, the Company Bylaws or the respective organizational documents of the Company Subsidiaries (in each case, as in effect on the date of this Agreement). Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, neither Parent nor the Surviving Corporation shall (and Parent shall cause the Surviving Corporation not to) settle or compromise or consent to the entry of any judgment or otherwise terminate any claim, action, suit, proceeding or investigation of a covered person for which indemnification may be sought under this Section 6.07(c) unless such settlement, compromise, consent or termination includes an unconditional release of such person from all liability arising out of such claim, action, suit, proceeding or investigation.
(d) This Section 6.07 is intended to be for the benefit of, and shall be enforceable by, each of the Indemnified Parties and their respective heirs and legal representatives. The rights provided for herein shall not be deemed exclusive of any other rights to which an Indemnified Party is entitled, whether pursuant to Law, contract or otherwise.
(e) In the event that, Parent or the Surviving Corporation or any of their respective successors or assigns (i) consolidates with or merges into any other person and is not the continuing or surviving corporation or entity of such consolidation or merger or (ii) transfers or conveys all or substantially all of its properties and assets to any person, or if Parent dissolves or dissolves the Surviving Corporation then, and in each such case, Parent shall cause the successors and assigns of Parent or the Surviving Corporation, as applicable, to assume the obligations of Parent or the Surviving Corporation, as applicable, set forth in this Section 6.07.
(f) Parent shall pay all reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees, that may be incurred by any Indemnified Party in enforcing the indemnity, advancement and other obligations provided in this Section 6.07.
6.08 .
Fees and Expenses
(a) Except as provided below, all fees and expenses incurred in connection with this Agreement, the Merger and the other Transactions shall be paid by the party incurring such fees or expenses, whether or not the Merger is consummated. Notwithstanding the foregoing or anything else in this Agreement to the contrary, any filing fees assessed under the HSR Act shall be paid by Parent.
(b) The Company shall pay to Parent a termination fee equal to $32.7 million (the "") if: (I) (X) prior to the termination of this Agreement, a Company Takeover Proposal is publicly proposed or announced or otherwise becomes publicly known, or any person shall have publicly announced an intention (whether or not conditional and whether or not withdrawn) to make a Company Takeover Proposal, (Y) thereafter this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 8.01(b)(i), Section 8.01(b)(iii), Section 8.01(c), Section 8.01(d)(ii), Section 8.01(d)(iii) or Section 8.01(d)(iv), and (Z) within twelve (12) months following such termination the Company enters into a definitive agreement to consummate, or consummates, the transactions contemplated by such Company Takeover Proposal (solely for purposes of this Section 6.08(b), the term "" shall have the meaning set forth in the definition of
Termination Fee
Company Takeover Proposal
 
Company Takeover Proposal contained in Section 5.03(c) except that all references to twenty percent (20%) shall be deemed references to fifty percent (50%)), (II) Parent terminates this Agreement pursuant to Section 8.01(d)(i) or (III) the Company terminates this Agreement pursuant to Section 8.01(f). Any fee due under this Section 6.08(b) shall be paid by wire transfer of same-day funds to an account designated by Parent (A) in the case of preceding clause (I), prior to or simultaneously with the entry into a definitive agreement relating to the Company Takeover Proposal contemplated by the preceding clause (I), (B) in the case of the preceding clause (II), no later than one Business Day after such termination or (C) in the case of the preceding clause (III), immediately prior to such termination. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event the Reverse Termination Fee is paid (or required to be paid) in accordance with Section 6.08(c), the Company shall not be required to pay the Termination Fee pursuant to Section 6.08(b).
(c) In the event that (i) Parent or the Company terminates this Agreement (A) pursuant to Section 8.01(b)(i) or Section 8.01(c) and at the time of such termination (1) any of the conditions set forth in Section 7.01(b) or Section 7.01(c) (due to any antitrust Law or Judgment issued by any Governmental Entity under any antitrust Law) has not been satisfied or (2) litigation with any Governmental Agency of the U.S. Federal government that is challenging the consummation of the Merger under any antitrust Law has been commenced or threatened in writing or such litigation could reasonably be expected, or (B) pursuant to Section 8.01(b)(ii) (due to any antitrust Law or Judgment issued by any Governmental Entity under any antitrust Law), or (ii) the Company terminates this Agreement pursuant to Section 8.01(e) (as a result of Parent's or Merger Sub's material breach of its obligations under Section 6.03), then Parent shall pay to the Company a non-refundable fee in the amount of $131.0 million (the "") by wire transfer of same-day funds, no later than two (2) Business Days following such termination. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Parent shall not be required to pay the Reverse Termination Fee pursuant to clause (i) of the preceding sentence if (X) there has been a Willful Breach by the Company of its obligations set forth in Section 5.01, which breach, individually or in the aggregate with any other Willful Breaches of Section 5.01, has resulted or would reasonably be expected to result in a Company Material Adverse Effect or (Y) there has been a Willful Breach by the Company of its obligations set forth in Section 5.03, Section 6.01, Section 6.02, Section 6.03, Section 6.04(e) or Section 6.04(f); , , notwithstanding that there has been a Willful Breach, Parent shall be required to pay the Reverse Termination Fee unless Parent has promptly asserted, in a prior written notice delivered to the Company, any such Willful Breach and the Company has not cured by such Willful Breach prior to the earliest of (1) thirty (30) days after delivery of such written notice, (2) termination of this Agreement by the Company and (3) the Outside Date. Parent shall not deliver any notice of Willful Breach after either party delivers a notice of termination of this Agreement.
Reverse Termination Fee
provided
however
(d) With respect to any actions taken by the Company or Parent to collect the Termination Fee or Reverse Termination Fee (as applicable), the prevailing party shall promptly reimburse the other party for all reasonable documented out-of-pocket fees and expenses incurred by the prevailing party (including the reasonable fees and expenses of all attorneys, consultants, economists and other experts retained by the prevailing party and all reasonable duplicating, travel and related expenses).
(e) Acceptance by Parent of the fee due under Section 6.08(b)(III) shall constitute acceptance by Parent of the validity of any termination of this Agreement under Section 8.01(f).
 
Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, in the event that the Termination Fee or the Reverse Termination Fee becomes payable pursuant to Section 6.08(b) or Section 6.08(c) (as applicable) and is paid in accordance therewith, payment thereof shall be the sole and exclusive remedy of Parent and Merger Sub, in the case of a fee paid pursuant to Section 6.08(b), or the Company, in the case of a fee paid pursuant to Section 6.08(c), and, in either case, such party's respective subsidiaries, stockholders, affiliates, officers, directors, employees and Representatives against the other party and any of its directors, officers, employees, Representatives or affiliates with respect to (i) any loss or damage suffered, directly or indirectly, as a result of the failure of any Transaction to be consummated, (ii) the termination of this Agreement, (iii) any liabilities or obligations arising under this Agreement, or (iv) any claims or actions arising out of or relating to any breach, termination or failure of or under this Agreement. The parties hereto acknowledge and agree that in no event shall either party be required to pay a fee due under Section 6.08(b) or Section 6.08(c) on more than one occasion, whether or not such fee may be payable under more than one provision of this Agreement at the same or at different times or upon the occurrence of different events. The Company and Parent acknowledge and agree that the agreements contained in this Section 6.08 are an integral part of the Transactions, and that, without these agreements, neither the Company nor Parent would enter into this Agreement and that the Termination Fee and the Reverse Termination Fee, as the case may be, is not a penalty, but rather is liquidated damages in a reasonable amount that will compensate Parent and Merger Sub or the Company, as the case may be, in circumstances in which such Termination Fee or Reverse Termination Fee is payable for the efforts and resources expended and opportunities foregone while negotiating this Agreement, which amount would otherwise be impossible to calculate with precision.
6.09 . The parties hereto agree that the initial press release to be issued with respect to the Merger shall be in the form heretofore agreed upon by the parties hereto. Except in connection with an Adverse Recommendation Change effected in compliance with this Agreement, Parent and Merger Sub, on the one hand, and the Company, on the other hand, shall consult with each other before issuing, and provide each other the opportunity to review and comment upon, any press release or other public statements with respect to the Merger and the other Transactions, and shall not issue any such press release or make any such public statement prior to such consultation, except as may be required by applicable Law, court process or obligations pursuant to any listing agreement with any national securities exchange.
Public Announcements
6.10 . Except for any Transfer or other Taxes required by reason of the payment to a person other than the registered holder of a Certificate as provided in Section 2.02(b), all stock transfer, real estate transfer, documentary, stamp, recording and other similar Taxes (including interest, penalties and additions to any such Taxes) ("") incurred in connection with the Transactions shall be paid by either Merger Sub or the Surviving Corporation; and the Company shall cooperate with Merger Sub and Parent in preparing, executing and filing any Tax Returns with respect to such Transfer Taxes.
Transfer Taxes
Transfer Taxes
6.11 . Parent shall cause Merger Sub to comply promptly with all of Merger Sub's obligations under this Agreement and Merger Sub shall not engage in any activities of any nature except as provided in or contemplated by this Agreement.
Merger Sub Compliance
6.12 . The Company shall give Parent the opportunity to participate in the defense or settlement of any stockholder litigation against the Company or its
Stockholder Litigation
 
directors arising after the date of this Agreement as a result of the Transactions, and no such settlement shall occur without Parent's prior written consent, not to be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed. It is understood and agreed that this Section 6.12 shall not give Parent the right to direct any such defense.
7.01 . The respective obligation of each party hereto to effect the Merger is subject to the satisfaction or waiver on or prior to the Closing Date of the following conditions:
Conditions to Each Party's Obligation to Effect the Merger
(a) . The Company Stockholder Approval shall have been obtained.
Stockholder Approval
(b) . Any waiting period (and any extension thereof) applicable to the Merger under the HSR Act shall have been terminated or shall have expired.
Antitrust
(c) . No Judgment issued by any Governmental Entity or other Law preventing the consummation of the Merger shall be in effect; , , that prior to asserting this condition, each of the parties hereto shall have complied with Section 6.03.
No Injunctions or Restraints
provided
however
7.02 . The obligations of Parent and Merger Sub to effect the Merger are subject to the satisfaction or waiver by Parent on or prior to the Closing Date of the following conditions:
Additional Conditions to Obligations of Parent and Merger Sub
(a) .
Representations and Warranties of the Company
(i) Each representation and warranty of the Company contained in this Agreement (other than the representations and warranties contained in Section 3.03) that is qualified by reference to a Company Material Adverse Effect shall be true and correct as of the Closing Date, except to the extent such representation and warranty is expressly made as of an earlier date (in which case on and as of such earlier date) and each representation and warranty of the Company contained in this Agreement that is not qualified by reference to a Company Material Adverse Effect shall be true and correct as of the Closing Date, except to the extent that any such representation or warranty is expressly made as of earlier date (in which case on and as of such earlier date), other than for such failures to be so true and correct (without giving effect to any limitation as to materiality, Company Material Adverse Effect or similar qualification set forth therein) that would not reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.
(ii) Each of the representations and warranties set forth in Section 3.03 shall be true and correct in all respects as of the Closing Date as if made on and as of the Closing Date (other than any such representation and warranty made as of a specific earlier date, which shall have been true and correct in all respects as of such earlier date), except for inaccuracies that are de minimis relative to the capitalization of the Company as of the Measurement Date.
(iii) Parent shall have received a certificate signed by an executive officer of the Company to the effect of the foregoing clauses (i) and (ii).
 
(b) . The Company shall have performed or complied with in all material respects all obligations required to be performed or complied with by it under this Agreement at or prior to the Closing Date, and Parent shall have received a certificate signed by an executive officer of the Company to such effect.
Performance of Obligations of the Company
(c) Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, for purposes of Section 7.02(a) and Section 7.02(b), if the Closing occurs after the Original Date, all references to the Closing Date shall be deemed references to the Original Date, except with respect to Section 7.02(b) for any Willful Breach of a covenant which occurs following the Original Date.
7.03 . The obligations of the Company to effect the Merger are subject to the satisfaction or waiver by the Company on or prior to the Closing Date of the following conditions:
Additional Conditions to Obligations of the Company
(a) . Each representation and warranty of the Parent or Merger Sub contained in this Agreement that is qualified by reference to a Parent Material Adverse Effect shall be true and correct as of the Closing Date, except to the extent such representation and warranty is expressly made as of an earlier date (in which case on and as of such earlier date) and each representation and warranty of the Parent or Merger Sub contained in this Agreement that is not qualified by reference to a Parent Material Adverse Effect shall be true and correct as of the Closing Date, except to the extent that any such representation or warranty is expressly made as of earlier date (in which case on and as of such earlier date), other than for such failures to be so true and correct (without giving effect to any limitation as to materiality or Parent Material Adverse Effect set forth therein) that would not reasonably be expected to have a Parent Material Adverse Effect. The Company shall have received a certificate signed by an executive officer of Parent to such effect.
Representations and Warranties of the Parent and Merger Sub
(b) . Parent or Merger Sub shall have performed or complied with in all material respects all obligations required to be performed or complied with by them under this Agreement at or prior to the Closing Date, and the Company shall have received a certificate signed by an executive officer of Parent to such effect.
Performance of Obligations of the Parent and Merger Sub
8.01 . This Agreement may be terminated at any time prior to the Effective Time, whether before or after receipt of the Company Stockholder Approval (except as otherwise provided below):
Termination
(a) by mutual written consent of Parent and the Company;
 
(b) by either Parent or the Company:
(i) if the Merger shall not have been consummated on or before October 1, 2013 (as it may be extended, the ""), unless the failure to consummate the Merger is the result of a material breach of this Agreement by the party seeking to terminate this Agreement (which, in the case of Parent, includes any breach by Merger Sub); , that if on the Outside Date (i) either of the conditions set forth in Section 7.01(b) or Section 7.01(c) has not been satisfied, or (ii) litigation with any Governmental Entity that is challenging the consummation of the Merger or the other Transactions contemplated hereby under the HSR Act or any other antitrust laws has been commenced or threatened, then, upon the request of Parent or the Company and with the written consent of the other party (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld) (, that the requesting party reasonably believes, after consultation with outside legal counsel, that approvals necessary to satisfy the conditions set forth in Sections 7.01(b) and 7.01(c) are reasonably likely to be obtained during such extension period or a subsequent permitted extension period and, in the event of a request by Parent, that the Parent Extension Conditions (as defined below) have been satisfied), the Outside Date then in effect shall be extended by no more than two (2) times in the aggregate, each time by a period of thirty-eight (38) calendar days (and in the case of such extension, any reference to the Outside Date in this or any other provision of this Agreement shall be a reference to the Outside Date, as extended);
Outside Date
provided
provided
(ii) if there shall be any Law or Judgment permanently enjoining, restraining or prohibiting the consummation of the Merger that shall have become final and nonappealable; , , that the right to terminate under this Section 8.01(b)(ii) shall not be available to any party whose material breach of this Agreement has been the principal cause of such action; or
provided
however
(iii) if, upon a vote taken at the Company Stockholders Meeting (or any adjournment or postponement thereof), the Company Stockholder Approval is not obtained;
(c) by Parent, if the Company breaches or fails to perform any of its representations, warranties or covenants contained in this Agreement such that the condition set forth in Section 7.02(a) or Section 7.02(b) would not be satisfied if the date of such termination was the Outside Date, which breach or failure to perform is incapable of being cured by the Company by the Outside Date or, if capable of being cured by the Company by the Outside Date, has not been cured prior to the earlier of (x) thirty (30) days after the delivery of written notice to the Company of such breach and (y) the Outside Date;
(d) by Parent, prior to (but not after) the time at which the Company Stockholder Approval has been obtained, if (i) an Adverse Recommendation Change shall have occurred, (ii) the Company shall have breached or failed to perform in any material respect its obligations or agreements contained in Section 5.03 or Section 6.01 (excluding breaches or failures that are capable of being cured and that are cured within two Business Days following receipt of written notice of such breach of failure from Parent if Parent provides such notice), (iii) the Company failed to reconfirm, after a Company Takeover Proposal has been publicly announced, the Company Recommendation within the Response Period following the receipt of a written request from Parent to do so ( that the Company shall not be required to reconfirm the Company
provided
 
Recommendation more than once, , , that if such Company Takeover Proposal is subsequently materially modified, the Company Board shall be required to again reconfirm the Company Recommendation within the Response Period) or (iv) if any tender offer or exchange offer is commenced by any third party with respect to the outstanding Company Common Stock prior to the time at which the Company receives the Company Stockholder Approval, and the Company Board shall not have recommended that the Company's stockholders reject such tender offer or exchange offer and not tender their Company Common Stock into such tender offer or exchange offer within the Response Period, unless the Company has issued a press release that expressly reaffirms the Company Recommendation within the Response Period (the "" shall mean the period of ten Business Days from the date of commencement of a tender offer or exchange offer or announcement; that such period shall not extend beyond one Business Day before the Company Stockholder Meeting unless such tender offer or exchange is commenced or announcement is made within the two Business Days preceding the Company Stockholder Meeting, in which case such period shall end at the Company Stockholders Meeting);
provided
further
Response Period
provided
(e) by the Company, if Parent or Merger Sub breaches or fails to perform any of its representations, warranties or covenants contained in this Agreement such that the condition set forth in Section 7.03(a) or Section 7.03(b) would not be satisfied if the date of such termination was the Outside Date, which breach or failure to perform is incapable of being cured by Parent or Merger Sub by the Outside Date or, if capable of being cured by Parent or Merger Sub by the Outside Date, has not been cured prior to the earlier of (x) thirty (30) days after the delivery of written notice to Parent or Merger Sub of such breach and (y) the Outside Date; or
(f) by the Company, prior to (but not after) the time at which the Company Stockholder Approval has been obtained, if (i) the Company has not breached or failed to perform in any material respect its obligations or agreements contained in Section 5.03 or Section 6.01 (excluding breaches or failures that are capable of being cured and that are cured within two Business Days following receipt of written notice of such breach of failure from Parent if Parent provides such notice), (ii) the Company Board authorizes the Company, subject to complying with the terms of this Agreement, to enter into a binding definitive Alternative Acquisition Agreement providing for a Superior Company Proposal, (iii) the Company prior to or concurrently with such termination pays to Parent in immediately available funds the Termination Fee and (iv) the Company enters into such Alternative Acquisition Agreement substantially concurrently with such termination.
8.02 . In the event of termination of this Agreement by either the Company or Parent as provided in Section 8.01, this Agreement shall forthwith become void and have no effect, without any liability or obligation on the part of Parent, Merger Sub or the Company, other than the second-to-last sentence of Section 6.02, Section 6.08, this Section 8.02 and Article IX, which provisions shall survive such termination; , , that, except as set forth in Section 6.08(e), no such termination shall relieve any party hereto from any liability for damages incurred or suffered by a party (which the parties acknowledge and agree shall not be limited to reimbursement of expenses or out-of-pocket costs), to the extent such damages were the result of fraud or the Willful Breach by another party of any of its representations, warranties, covenants or other agreements set forth in this Agreement. For purposes of this Agreement, "" shall mean a material breach that is a consequence of an act undertaken, or a failure to act, which the breaching party knew, or reasonably should have known, would, or would reasonably be expected to, result in a breach of this Agreement.
Effect of Termination
provided
however
Willful Breach
 
8.03 . This Agreement may be amended by the parties hereto at any time before or after receipt of the Company Stockholder Approval; , , that after receipt of the Company Stockholder Approval, there shall be made no amendment or waiver that by Law requires further approval by the stockholders of the Company without the further approval of such stockholders. This Agreement may not be amended except by an instrument in writing signed on behalf of each of the parties hereto.
Amendment
provided
however
8.04 . At any time prior to the Effective Time, the parties hereto may, to the extent permitted by applicable Law, (a) extend the time for the performance of any of the obligations or other acts of the other parties hereto, (b) waive any inaccuracies in the representations and warranties contained in this Agreement or in any document delivered pursuant to this Agreement or (c) subject to the proviso of Section 8.03, waive compliance with any of the agreements or conditions contained in this Agreement. Subject to the proviso in Section 8.03, no extension or waiver by the Company shall require the approval of the stockholders of the Company. Any agreement on the part of a party hereto to any such extension or waiver shall be valid only if set forth in an instrument in writing signed on behalf of such party. The failure or delay by any party to this Agreement to assert any of its rights under this Agreement or otherwise shall not constitute a waiver of such rights nor shall any single or partial exercise by any party to this Agreement of any of its rights under this Agreement preclude any other or further exercise of such rights or any other rights under this Agreement.
Extension; Waiver
8.05 . A termination of this Agreement pursuant to Section 8.01, an amendment of this Agreement pursuant to Section 8.03 or an extension or waiver pursuant to Section 8.04 shall, in order to be effective, require in the case of Parent, Merger Sub or the Company, action by its board of directors or the duly authorized designee of its board of directors. Termination of this Agreement prior to the Effective Time shall not require the approval of the stockholders of the Company.
Procedure for Termination, Amendment, Extension or Waiver
9.01 . None of the representations and warranties in this Agreement or in any instrument delivered pursuant to this Agreement shall survive the Effective Time. This Section 9.01 shall not limit any covenant or agreement of the parties hereto that by its terms contemplates performance after the Effective Time.
Nonsurvival of Representations and Warranties
 
9.02 . Each notice, request, demand or other communication under this Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given, delivered or made as follows: (a) if delivered by hand, when delivered; (b) if sent by facsimile transmission before 5:00 p.m. in the delivery location, when transmitted and receipt is confirmed; (c) if sent by facsimile transmission after 5:00 p.m. in delivery location and receipt is confirmed, on the following Business Day; (d) if sent by registered, certified or first class mail, the third Business Day after being sent; and (e) if sent by overnight delivery via a national courier service, two Business Days after being delivered to such courier, in each case to the address or email set forth beneath the name of such party below (or to such other address or email as such party shall have specified in a written notice given to the other parties hereto):
Notices
 
Nielsen Holdings N.V.
40 Danbury Road
Wilton, CT 06897
Facsimile No.: (203) 563-2876
Attention: James W. Cuminale, Chief Legal Officer
with a copy to:
Simpson Thacher & Bartlett LLP
425 Lexington Avenue
New York, New York 10017
Facsimile No.: (212) 455-2502
 
Arbitron Inc.
9705 Patuxent Woods Drive
Columbia, Maryland 21046
Facsimile No.: (410) 312-8613
Attention: Timothy T. Smith, Executive Vice President and Chief Legal Officer
with a copy to:
Morrison & Foerster LLP
1650 Tysons Boulevard
Suite 400
McLean, Virginia 22102
Facsimile No.: (703) 760-7777
9.03 . For purposes of this Agreement:
Definitions
An "" of any person means another person that directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, such first person.
affiliate
"" means any day on which the principal offices of the SEC in Washington, D.C. are open to accept filings or, in the case of determining a date when any payment is due, any day on which banks are not required or authorized by Law to close in New York, New York.
Business Day
 
"" means any change, development, event, effect or occurrence (each, an "") that (i) has a material adverse effect on the business, financial condition or results of operations of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, or (ii) prevents or materially delays the ability of the Company to consummate the Merger; , , that none of the following shall be deemed either alone or in combination to constitute, and none of the following shall be taken into account in determining whether there has been or would be, a Company Material Adverse Effect: any Event (A) generally affecting (1) the geographic regions or industry in which the Company primarily operates (including changes in the use, adoption or non-adoption of industry standards) or (2) the economy, or financial, credit, foreign exchange, securities or capital markets, including any disruption thereof, in the United States or elsewhere in the world (in each case of clauses (1) and (2), to the extent the Company and the Company Subsidiaries taken as a whole are not materially and disproportionately affected relative to other participants in the regions or industries in which the Company and the Company Subsidiaries operate) or (B) to the extent arising or resulting from any of the following: (1) changes after the date hereof in applicable Law or applicable accounting regulations or principles or interpretations thereof (in each case, to the extent the Company and the Company Subsidiaries taken as a whole are not materially and disproportionately affected relative to other participants in the regions or industries in which the Company and the Company Subsidiaries operate), (2) any Events directly or indirectly attributable to the announcement or pendency of this Agreement or the anticipated consummation of the Merger and the other Transactions (including compliance with the covenants set forth herein and the identity of Parent as the acquiror of the Company, or any action taken, delayed or omitted to be taken by the Company at the request or with the prior consent of Parent or Merger Sub), including the impact thereof on relationships, contractual or otherwise, with employees, customers, suppliers, distributors, vendors, licensors, licensees, lenders, investors, subcontractors or partners, (3) national or international political conditions, any outbreak or escalation of hostilities, insurrection or war, whether or not pursuant to declaration of a national emergency or war, acts of terrorism, sabotage, strikes, freight embargoes or similar calamity or crisis (in each case, to the extent the Company and the Company Subsidiaries taken as a whole are not materially and disproportionately affected relative to other participants in the regions and industries in which the Company and the Company Subsidiaries operate), (4) fires, epidemics, quarantine restrictions, earthquakes, hurricanes, tornados or other natural disasters, (5) any decline in the market price, or change in trading volume, of the capital stock of the Company or any failure to meet publicly announced revenue or earnings projections or predictions (whether such projections or predictions were made by the Company or independent third parties) or internal projections (except that the underlying reasons for such decline, change or failure shall be taken into account in determining whether there has been or would be a Company Material Adverse Effect), (6) any proceeding by any of the Company's stockholders arising out of, concerning or related to this Agreement or any of the Transactions, in each case initiated after the date hereof, (7) any Events directly or indirectly attributable to any submissions, or proceedings with any Governmental Entity, under the HSR Act or any other antitrust Law, or (8) any Event that has been cured prior to the Closing.
Company Material Adverse Effect
Event
provided
however
 
"" means, with respect to any matter in question, (a) as to the Company, the actual knowledge of William T. Kerr, Sean R. Creamer, Debra Delman and Timothy T. Smith, and (b) as to Parent, the actual knowledge of David Calhoun, Mitchell Habib, Brian West and James W. Cuminale.
knowledge
"" means that neither Parent nor Merger Sub "beneficially owns" (as defined in the Company Certificate) ten percent (10%) or more of the outstanding shares of Company Common Stock entitled to vote at the Company Stockholders Meeting.
Ownership Condition
"" means the first period of ten (10) consecutive Business Days following the date on which the conditions set forth in Section 7.01 have first been satisfied (other than those that by their terms are to be satisfied or waived at the Closing) and nothing has occurred and no condition exists that would cause any of the conditions set forth in Section 7.01 to fail to be satisfied assuming Closing were to be scheduled for any time during such ten (10) consecutive Business Day period; , that, in no event shall the Marketing Period extend beyond the date that is one Business Day prior to the Outside Date.
Marketing Period
provided
"" means (1) to the extent that Parent has asserted or is or was aware of a Willful Breach by the Company of a covenant that would allow Parent to avoid payment of the Reverse Termination Fee, Parent has agreed in writing to waive such breach, and (2) Parent has paid to the Company $15 million for each such extension, which amount shall be credited against any fee payable pursuant to Section 6.08(c) or, if no such fee is payable, refunded to Parent by the Company as of, and subject to, the Closing or within two Business Days following the termination of this Agreement under circumstances when the Reverse Termination Fee is not payable.
Parent Extension Conditions
A "" means any individual, firm, corporation, partnership, company, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, Governmental Entity or other entity.
person
"" means syndicated services that purport to estimate radio listening, or any segment thereof, using a panel or census data in the United States as a whole or any segment thereof.
Radio Measurement Services
A "" of any person means another person, an amount of the voting securities, other voting ownership or voting partnership interests of which is sufficient to elect at least a majority of its Board of Directors or other governing body (or, if there are no such voting interests, 50% or more of the equity interests of which) is owned directly or indirectly by such first person.
subsidiary
9.04 . The headings contained in this Agreement or in any Exhibit hereto or the Company Disclosure Letter and in the table of contents to this Agreement are for reference purposes only and shall not affect the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement. Any capitalized terms used in any Exhibit or the Company Disclosure Letter, but not otherwise defined therein, shall have the meaning as defined in this Agreement. When a reference is made in this Agreement to an Article, Section or Exhibit, such reference shall be to a
Interpretation; Exhibits and Disclosure Letters
 
Section or Article of, or an Exhibit to, this Agreement unless otherwise indicated. The table of contents and headings contained in this Agreement are for reference purposes only and shall not affect in any way the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement. Whenever the words "include", "includes" or "including" are used in this Agreement, they shall be deemed to be followed by the words "without limitation". The words "hereof", "hereto", "hereby", "herein" and "hereunder" and words of similar import when used in this Agreement shall refer to this Agreement as a whole and not to any particular provision of this Agreement. The term "or" is not exclusive. The word "extent" in the phrase "to the extent" shall mean the degree to which a subject or other thing extends, and such phrase shall not mean simply "if". The definitions contained in this Agreement are applicable to the singular as well as the plural forms of such terms. Any matter disclosed pursuant to any Sections of the Company Disclosure Letter whose relevance or applicability to any representation or warranty made elsewhere in this Agreement is reasonably apparent on its face shall be deemed to be disclosed with respect to such other Section or subsection of such Company Disclosure Letter, notwithstanding the omission of a reference or cross-reference thereto. Any agreement or instrument defined or referred to herein or in any agreement or instrument that is referred to herein means such agreement or instrument as from time to time amended, modified or supplemented. References to a person are also to its permitted successors and assigns. References to matters disclosed in the Filed Company SEC Documents are made without giving effect to any amendment to any such Filed Company SEC Document filed on or after the date hereof and exclude any disclosures set forth in any risk factor section, sections relating to forward looking statements and any other disclosures included in such Filed Company SEC Documents that constitute predictive, cautionary or forward-looking statements.
9.05 . If any term or other provision of this Agreement is determined to be invalid, illegal or incapable of being enforced by any rule or law, or public policy, all other conditions and provisions of this Agreement shall nevertheless remain in full force and effect so long as the economic or legal substance of the Transactions is not affected in any manner materially adverse to any party. Upon such determination that any term or other provision is invalid, illegal or incapable of being enforced, the parties hereto shall negotiate in good faith to modify this Agreement so as to effect the original intent of the parties hereto as closely as possible in an acceptable manner to the end that Transactions are fulfilled to the extent possible.
Severability
9.06 . This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts (including by facsimile), all of which shall be considered one and the same agreement and shall become effective when one or more counterparts have been signed by each of the parties hereto and delivered to the other parties hereto.
Counterparts
9.07 . This Agreement, taken together with the Exhibits hereto, the Company Disclosure Letter and the Confidentiality Agreement, (a) constitute the entire agreement, and supersede all prior agreements and understandings, both written and oral, among the parties hereto with respect to the Transactions and (b) except for Section 6.07 (from and after the Effective Time), Section 9.11(d) and Section 9.12, are not intended to confer upon any person other than the parties hereto any rights or remedies, whether as third-party beneficiaries or otherwise.
Entire Agreement; No Third Party Beneficiaries
 
9.08 . This Agreement shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the Laws of the State of Delaware, regardless of the Laws that might otherwise govern under applicable principles of conflicts of laws thereof.
Governing Law
9.09 . Neither this Agreement nor any of the rights, interests or obligations under this Agreement shall be assigned, in whole or in part, by operation of Law or otherwise by any of the parties hereto without the prior written consent of the other parties hereto. Any purported assignment without such consent shall be void. Subject to the preceding sentences, this Agreement will be binding upon, inure to the benefit of, and be enforceable by, the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns.
Assignment
9.10 . For any matter under this Agreement requiring the consent or approval of any party to be valid and binding on the parties hereto, such consent or approval must be in writing and executed and delivered to the other parties hereto by a person duly authorized by such party to do so.
Consents and Approvals
9.11 .
Enforcement
(a) The parties hereto agree that irreparable damage would occur in the event that any of the provisions of this Agreement were not performed in accordance with their specific terms or were otherwise breached. It is accordingly agreed that prior to the termination of this Agreement the parties hereto shall be entitled to seek an injunction or injunctions to prevent breaches of this Agreement and to enforce specifically the terms and provisions of this Agreement, this being in addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at law or in equity.
(b) Subject to Section 6.08(e), the Company may pursue any other remedy available to it at law or in equity, including monetary damages. It is agreed that neither this provision nor any other provision in this Agreement is intended to provide the Company's stockholders (or any party acting on their behalf other than the Company) the ability to seek (whether in its capacity as a stockholder or purporting to assert any right (derivatively or otherwise) on behalf of the Company) the enforcement of, or directly seek any remedies pursuant to, this Agreement, or otherwise create any rights in the Company's stockholders under this Agreement or otherwise, including against the Company or its directors, under any theory of law or equity, including under the applicable Laws of agency or the Laws relating to the rights and obligations of third party beneficiaries. For the avoidance of doubt as to the parties' intent, the determination of whether and how to terminate, amend, make any waiver or consent under, or enforce this Agreement, and whether and how (if applicable) to distribute any damages award to its stockholders, shall exclusively belong to the Company (acting expressly through its Company Board) in its sole discretion.
(c) In addition, each of the parties hereto (i) irrevocably submits itself to the personal jurisdiction of the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware or, if under applicable Law exclusive jurisdiction over the matter is vested in the Federal courts, any Federal court located in the State of Delaware in the event any dispute (other than a Dispute under Section 6.03(g)) arises out of this Agreement or any Transaction, (ii) agrees that it will not attempt to deny or defeat such personal jurisdiction by motion or other request for leave from any such court, (iii) except as
 
provided in Section 6.03(g), agrees that it will not bring any action relating to this Agreement in any court other than the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware or, if the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware lacks subject matter jurisdiction, any Federal court sitting in the State of Delaware and (iv) waives any right to trial by jury with respect to any suit, action or proceeding directly or indirectly related to or arising out of this Agreement (including the Financing).
(d) Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the Company and its affiliates shall not have any rights or claims against any Financing Source, solely in their respective capacities as lenders, arrangers or originators in connection with the Financing, whether at law or equity, in contract, in tort or otherwise. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary (including Section 9.11(c)), each of the parties hereto agrees that it will not bring (and will not permit any of its affiliates to bring, or support any other party in bringing) any action, cause of action, claim, cross-claim or third-party claim of any kind or description, whether in law or in equity, whether in contract or in tort or otherwise against any Financing Source relating in any way to the Financing or any documents in connection therewith or the performance thereof, in any forum other than the Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in the Borough of Manhattan of the City of New York, or, if under applicable law exclusive jurisdiction is vested in the federal courts, the United States District Court for the Southern District of New York (and appellate courts thereof). The provisions of this paragraph may not be amended in a manner adverse to the Financing Sources without the prior written consent of such Financing Sources. The parties hereto agree that each of the Financing Sources is an express and intended third-party beneficiary under this paragraph and Section 9.08 and, as such, such Financing Sources may independently enforce the provisions of this paragraph. The parties agree that nothing in this Section 9.11(d) shall limit the Company's right to seek to enforce specifically the terms and provisions of this Agreement against the Parent or Merger Sub in accordance with Section 9.11(a)-(c).
9.12 . This Agreement may only be enforced against, and any claims or causes of action that may be based upon, arise out of or relate to this Agreement, or the negotiations, execution or performance of this Agreement may only be made against the entities that are expressly identified as parties hereto and no Parent Related Party or Company Related Party shall have any liability for any obligations or liabilities of the parties to this Agreement or for any claim (whether in tort, contract or otherwise) based on, in respect of, or by reason of, the Transactions or in respect of any oral representations made or alleged to be made in connection herewith. Without limiting the rights of the Company against Parent or Merger Sub hereunder, in no event shall the Company or any of its affiliates, and the Company agrees not to and to cause its affiliates not to, seek to enforce this Agreement against, make any claims for breach of this Agreement against, or seek to recover monetary damages from, any Parent Related Party. For purposes of this Agreement, "" means any of Parent's or Merger Sub's respective former, current or future general or limited partners, stockholders, managers, members, directors, officers, affiliates, employees, representatives or agents and the Financing Sources; , that the term "Parent Related Party" shall not include Parent, Merger Sub or any of their subsidiaries. Without limiting the rights of Parent or Merger Sub against the Company hereunder, in no event shall Parent or Merger Sub or any of their respective affiliates, and Parent and Merger Sub each agree not to and to cause their respective affiliates not to, seek to enforce this Agreement against, make any claims for breach of this Agreement against, or seek to recover monetary damages from, any Company Related Party. For purposes of this Agreement, "" means any of the Company's or a Company Subsidiary's respective former, current or
No Recourse
Parent Related Party
provided
Company Related Party
 
future general or limited partners, stockholders, managers, members, directors, officers, affiliates, employees, representatives or agents; , that the term "Company Related Party" shall not include the Company or any Company Subsidiary.
provided
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Parent, Merger Sub and the Company have duly executed this Agreement as of the date first written above.
 
EXHIBIT A
The name of the corporation (the "") is Arbitron Inc.
Corporation
The address of the registered office of the Corporation in the State of Delaware is 1209 Orange Street in the City of Wilmington, County of New Castle, and the name of the registered agent of the Corporation in the State of Delaware at such address is The Corporation Trust Company.
The purpose of the Corporation is to engage in any lawful act or activity for which corporations may be organized under the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware.
The total number of shares of all classes of stock that the Corporation shall have authority to issue is 1,000 shares of Common Stock having the par value of $0.01 per share.
The number of directors of the Corporation shall be fixed from time to time by the Board of Directors of the Corporation.
In furtherance and not in limitation of the powers conferred upon it by law, the Board of Directors of the Corporation is expressly authorized to adopt, amend or repeal the Bylaws of the Corporation.
Unless and except to the extent that the Bylaws of the Corporation so require, the election of directors of the Corporation need not be by written ballot.
 
To the fullest extent from time to time permitted by law, no director of the Corporation shall be personally liable to any extent to the Corporation or its stockholders for monetary damages for breach of his fiduciary duty as a director.
Each person who is or was or had agreed to become a director or officer of the Corporation, and each such person who is or was serving or who had agreed to serve at the request of the Corporation as a director, officer, partner, member, employee or agent of another corporation, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, trust or other enterprise (including the heirs, executor, administrators or estate of such person), shall be indemnified and advanced expenses by the Corporation to the fullest extent permitted from time to time by applicable law.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK, NY, December 18, 2012  Nielsen Holdings N.V. (NYSE: NLSN), a leading global provider of information and insights into what consumers watch and buy, today announced that it has signed a definitive agreement to acquire Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB), an international media and marketing research firm.
Nielsen has agreed to acquire all of the outstanding common stock of Arbitron for $48 per share in cash, representing a premium of approximately 26 percent to Arbitron's closing price on December 17, 2012. Nielsen has a financing commitment for the total transaction amount. The transaction has been approved by the boards of both companies and is subject to customary closing conditions, including regulatory review.
"U.S. consumers spend almost 2 hours a day with radio. It is and will continue to be a vibrant and important advertising medium," said Nielsen Chief Executive Officer David Calhoun. "Arbitron will help Nielsen better solve for unmeasured areas of media consumption, including streaming audio and out-of-home. The high level of engagement with radio and TV among rapidly growing multicultural audiences makes this central to Nielsen's priorities."
With Arbitron assets, Nielsen intends to further expand its "Watch" segment's audience measurement across screens and forms of listening. "These integrated, innovative capabilities will enable broader measurement of consumer media behavior in more markets around the world," said Steve Hasker, Nielsen President of Global Media Products and Advertiser Solutions. "We will also bring local clients greater visibility to empower more precise advertising placement and campaign effectiveness."
"Radio reaches more than 92 percent of all American teens and adults because they love to listen to music, talk, news and information while at home, at work and in their cars," said William T. Kerr, President and Chief Executive Officer of Arbitron. "By combining Nielsen's global capabilities and scale with Arbitron's unique radio measurement and listening information, advertisers and media clients will have better insights into consumer behavior and the return on marketing investments."
Together, Nielsen and Arbitron generated total revenues of $6.0 billion and combined pro forma adjusted EBITDA of $1.7 billion based on the 12 months ended September 30, 2012. The combined assets will support Nielsen's strong cash flow characteristics and will enable continued investment in growth initiatives. Excluding estimated transaction costs and purchase accounting adjustments, the acquisition is expected to be approximately $0.13 accretive to adjusted EPS 12 months after the close and approximately $0.19 accretive to adjusted EPS 24 months after the close. Cost synergies associated with the acquisition are expected to be at least $20 million and will be largely driven by the integration of technology platforms and data acquisition efforts.
Conference Call Information
Nielsen and Arbitron will host a live conference call to discuss the transaction today, December 18, 2012 at 8:30 a.m. Eastern Time. The dial-in number for U.S. participants is 1-888-317-6016. The dial-in number for international callers is 1-412-317-6016. The passcode is Nielsen. A slide presentation and audio webcast of the call can be accessed live on the investor relations section of Nielsen's website at . An archive will be available on the site after the call.
http://ir.nielsen.com
 
About Nielsen
Nielsen (NYSE: NLSN) is a global information and measurement company with leading market positions in marketing and consumer information, television and other media measurement, online intelligence, mobile measurement, trade shows and related properties. Nielsen has a presence in approximately 100 countries, with headquarters in New York, USA and Diemen, the Netherlands. For more information, visit .
www.nielsen.com
About Arbitron
Arbitron, Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the media  radio, television, cable, and out-of-home  the mobile industry, as well as advertising agencies and advertisers around the world. Arbitron businesses include: measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media, and product patterns of U.S. consumers; providing mobile audience measurement and analytics in the United States, Europe, Asia, and Australia; and developing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data.
The Company has developed the Portable People Meter (PPM) and the PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
Portable People Meter, PPM, and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron, Inc.
Additional Information and Where You Can Find It:
Investors may obtain free copies of the proxy statement when it becomes available, as well as other filings containing information about Arbitron, without charge, at the SEC's Internet site (). These documents may also be obtained for free from Arbitron's Investor Relations web site () or by directing a request to Arbitron at: Arbitron Inc., 9705 Patuxent Woods Drive, Columbia, MD 21046, Attn: Investor Relations.
In connection with the proposed acquisition by Nielsen Holdings, N.V. ("Nielsen") of Arbitron Inc. ("Arbitron") pursuant to the terms of an Agreement and Plan of Merger by and among Arbitron, Nielsen, and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Nielsen, Arbitron will file a proxy statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). Investors are urged to read the proxy statement (including all amendments and supplements to it) because it will contain important information.
http://www.sec.gov
http://www.arbitron.com/investors
Arbitron and its directors and executive officers and other members of management and employees are potential participants in the solicitation of proxies from Arbitron's stockholders in respect of the proposed transaction.
Information regarding Arbitron's directors and executive officers is available in Arbitron's proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of stockholders, filed with the SEC on April 12, 2012. Additional information regarding the interests of such potential participants in the proposed transaction will be included in the proxy statement to be filed with the SEC in connection with the proposed transaction.
Forward-Looking Statements Disclaimer:
This written communication includes information that could constitute forward-looking statements made pursuant to the safe harbor provision of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.
 
These statements may be identified by words such as will', expect', should', could', shall' and similar expressions. These statements are subject to risks and uncertainties concerning Nielsen's proposed acquisition of Arbitron, Arbitron's expected financial performance, as well as Arbitron's strategic and operational plans and actual results and events could differ materially from what presently is expected. The potential risks and uncertainties include the possibility that the transaction will not close or that the closing may be delayed; the possibility that Arbitron may be unable to obtain stockholder approval as required for the transaction or that the other conditions to the closing of the transaction may not be satisfied; the transaction may involve unexpected costs, liabilities or delays; the outcome of any legal proceedings related to the transaction; the occurrence of any event, change or other circumstances that could give rise to the termination of the transaction agreement; general economic conditions; conditions in the markets Nielsen and Arbitron are engaged in; behavior of customers, suppliers and competitors (including their reaction to the transaction); technological developments; as well as legal and regulatory rules affecting Nielsen's and Arbitron's business and specific risk factors discussed in other releases and public filings made by Nielsen and Arbitron (including the their respective filings with the SEC). This list of factors is not intended to be exhaustive. Such forward-looking statements only speak as of the date of this press release, and we assume no obligation to update any written or oral forward-looking statement made by us or on our behalf as a result of new information, future events, or other factors.
 
 
 
Media Contact:
 
Investor Relations Contact:
 
 

Exhibit 99.2
 
Measuring More Media Together
Nielsen Announces Agreement to Acquire Arbitron
December 18, 2012
 
Forward Looking Statements and Other Information
Forward Looking Statements:
This written communication includes information that could constitute forward-looking statements made pursuant to the safe harbor provision of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements may be identified by words such as "will", "expect", "should", "could", "shall" and similar expressions. These statements are subject to risks and uncertainties concerning Nielsen's proposed acquisition of Arbitron, Arbitron's expected financial performance, as well as Arbitron's strategic and operational plans and actual results and events could differ materially from what presently is expected. The potential risks and uncertainties include the possibility that the transaction will not close or that the closing may be delayed; the possibility that Arbitron may be unable to obtain stockholder approval as required for the transaction or that the other conditions to the closing of the transaction may not be satisfied; the transaction may involve unexpected costs, liabilities or delays; the outcome of any legal proceedings related to the transaction; the occurrence of any event, change or other circumstances that could give rise to the termination of the transaction agreement; general economic conditions; conditions in the markets Nielsen and Arbitron are engaged in; behavior of customers, suppliers and competitors (including their reaction to the transaction); technological developments; as well as legal and regulatory rules affecting Nielsen's and Arbitron's business and specific risk factors discussed in other releases and public filings made by Nielsen and Arbitron (including the their respective filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC")). This list of factors is not intended to be exhaustive. Such forward-looking statements only speak as of the date of this written communication, and we assume no obligation to update any written or oral forward-looking statement made by us or on our behalf as a result of new information, future events, or other factors.
Additional Information and Where to Find It:
In connection with the proposed acquisition by Nielsen of Arbitron pursuant to the terms of an Agreement and Plan of Merger by and among Arbitron, Nielsen, and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Nielsen, Arbitron will file a proxy statement with the SEC. Investors are urged to read the proxy statement (including all amendments and supplements to it) because it will contain important information. Investors may obtain free copies of the proxy statement when it becomes available, as well as other filings containing information about Arbitron, without charge, at the SEC's Internet site (www.sec.gov). These documents may also be obtained for free from Arbitron's Investor Relations web site (http://www.Arbitron.com/investors) or by directing a request to Arbitron at: Arbitron, 9705 Patuxent Woods Drive, Columbia, Maryland 21046.
Arbitron and its directors and executive officers and other members of management and employees are potential participants in the solicitation of proxies from Arbitron's stockholders in respect of the proposed transaction.
Information regarding Arbitron's directors and executive officers is available in Arbitron's proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of stockholders, filed with the SEC on April 12, 2012. Additional information regarding the interests of such potential participants in the proposed transaction will be included in the proxy statement to be filed with the SEC in connection with the proposed transaction.
Copyright  2012 Nielsen Holdings N.V. Nielsen and Arbitron Conference Call December 18, 2012 2
 
Nielsen Strategy
Expand coverage of
consumer purchase
behavior globally
Measure more ways
WATCH that consumers spend
time with media
Understand how media
BUY + WATCH consumption relates to
purchase behavior
Copyright  2012 Nielsen Holdings N.V. Nielsen and Arbitron Conference Call December 18, 2012 3
 
Transaction Rationale
Broader Expands global measurement of consumer
Platform behavior
Digital and
Addresses unmeasured areas: streaming
Representative
Measurement audio, out-of-home, multicultural audiences
Advertising Provides local clients linkage to retail and
Effectiveness purchasing impact to improve ROI
lobal Long-term opportunity to measure listening
Expansion audiences in non-U.S. markets
Complementary Different markets and distinct capabilities
Assets and Scale supporting syndicated measurement
Copyright  2012 Nielsen Holdings N.V. Nielsen and Arbitron Conference Call December 18, 2012 4
 
Expanded Measurement of Global Consumers
Retail
E-commerce
Broader
Measurement
Platform
TV/Video
Digital/Social
Radio/Music
Measuring More Media Consumption
(1) Nielsen Cross-Platform Report: Based on Total US Population, Persons 2+ for TV and Online, (Home and Work) 13+ for Mobile; 2nd Qtr 2012; Arbitron Radio Today, 2012
Copyright  2012 Nielsen Holdings N.V. Nielsen and Arbitron Conference Call December 18, 2012 5
 
Complementary Businesses with Great Histories and Future Opportunities
Nielsen
 -  Global leader in measurement and analytics for what consumers buy and watch
 -  Founded by Arthur C. Nielsen Sr. in 1923
 -  Retail sales and market share in 100+ countries; TV, digital audience and cross-platform measurement
 -  Advertising effectiveness solutions for TV/video/digital/social
Arbitron
 -  Leader in measurement of listening audiences at home, at work, out of home
 -  Founded by Jim Seiler in 1949
 -  Local radio ratings, network and national radio audience measurement plus consumer information and software services
 -  Innovator in measurement technologies
Copyright  2012 Nielsen Holdings N.V. Nielsen and Arbitron Conference Call December 18, 2012 6
 
Arbitron Financial Summary
Financial summary ($millions)
Revenue1
EBITDA1
Free Cash Flow2
Revenue Growth
High Margin
Strong Cash Flow
Copyright  2012 Nielsen Holdings N.V. Nielsen and Arbitron Conference Call December 18, 2012 7
 
Transaction Benefits Both Radio and TV Clients and Their Respective Advertisers
Measuring more media consumption
More ways to understand and monetize audiences
 -  Streaming audio
 -  Out-of-home
 -  Deeper measurement of U.S. multicultural audiences
Improving local advertising effectiveness
Links media consumption to retail and purchasing impact ROI Enables broader music industry insights
Bridging different markets Expertise in providing clients with consumer measurement and insights Global footprint
Complementary products, cultures and market fit
Robust and scalable integrated technology platform Strong cash flow enables investments for growth
Benefits of scale
Copyright  2012 Nielsen Holdings N.V. Nielsen and Arbitron Conference Call December 18, 2012 8
 
Complementary Business Fundamentals
Nielsen Arbitron
Mission-critical
Embedded in daily
measurement
client operations
and analytics
Unique consumer Enabling
information and insights client growth
Industry-strength,
Syndicated services
scalable solutions
Opportunity for
Global footprint
global growth
Copyright  2012 Nielsen Holdings N.V. Nielsen and Arbitron Conference Call December 18, 2012 9
 
Transaction Highlights
$48 per share: $1.3 billion equity value
26% premium to 12/17/12 close
100% cash consideration with committed financing
Pro Forma Revenue: $6.0 billion
Pro Forma Adj. EBITDA: $1.7 billion
Expect $0.13 accretive impact to Adj. EPS 12 months after close,
$0.19 accretive impact to Adj. EPS 24 months after close
Expected annualized savings of at least $20MM
Transaction close subject to customary closing conditions and
regulatory review
(1) Pro forma is sum of Nielsen and Arbitron financials for last twelve months as of 9/30/12, adjusted for joint venture consolidation. Pro forma figures exclude transaction costs, estimates for purchase accounting adjustments and synergy benefits. See Appendix for reconciliation to GAAP financial measures (2) Excludes transaction costs and estimates for purchase accounting adjustments
Copyright  2012 Nielsen Holdings N.V. Nielsen and Arbitron Conference Call December 18, 2012 10
 
Similar Financial Models
Nielsen Arbitron
Mid-single digit
Consistent growth
compounding growth
Majority of revenues
Recurring revenue
under contract
Syndicated volume
Operating leverage
drives margin expansion
Strong free cash flow Scale benefits with
conversion low capital intensity
Copyright  2012 Nielsen Holdings N.V. Nielsen and Arbitron Conference Call December 18, 2012 11
 
Pro Forma1 Financials for Last Twelve Months ended 9/30/12
($ millions)
LTM Revenue
LTM Adj. EBITDA2
LTM Cash Flow
(EBITDA  CAPEX)
Growth Rate3
4.2% 7.7% 4.5%
6.4% 9.2% 6.7%
2.8% 16.7% 3.9%
(1) Pro forma is sum of Nielsen and Arbitron financials for last twelve months as of 9/30/12, adjusted for pro forma impact of interest, tax and joint venture consolidation. Pro forma figures exclude transaction costs, estimates for purchase accounting adjustments and synergy benefits (2) See Appendix for reconciliation to GAAP financial measures (3) Based on constant currency growth
Copyright  2012 Nielsen Holdings N.V. Nielsen and Arbitron Conference Call December 18, 2012 12
 
Financial Impact for Nielsen
Key Considerations
 -  Modest increase to leverage
 -  Accretive to Adj. EPS1 $0.13 to Adj. EPS in 12 months $0.19 to Adj. EPS in 24 months
 -  Financing commitment supports
$1 .3B purchase amount
 -  Enhances plan for future return of capital strategy
(1) Pro forma figures exclude transaction costs and estimates for purchase accounting adjustments See Appendix for reconciliation to GAAP financial measures
Copyright  2012 Nielsen Holdings N.V. Nielsen and Arbitron Conference Call December 18, 2012 13
 
Transaction Advances Our Long-Term Objectives
Broader measurement of rapidly changing
consumer behavior
Enable greater marketing efficiency
Robust platforms supporting global solutions
Copyright  2012 Nielsen Holdings N.V. Nielsen and Arbitron Conference Call December 18, 2012 14
 
Q&A
 
Appendix
Copyright  2012 Nielsen Holdings N.V. Nielsen and Arbitron Conference Call December 18, 2012 15
 
Snapshot of Nielsen's Business
2011 Financials 1 YTD 9/30/12
revenue growth2
REVENUE ADJ. EBITDA ADJ. EPS
4.1%
$5,532 MM $1,546 MM $ 1.61
CAGR2
(09-'11) 5.8%
Value proposition
Providing independent third-party measurement and market share to consumer packaged goods and media industries globally
Delivering critical media and marketing information, analytics and industry expertise about what consumers watch and what consumers buy on a global and local basis
Clients
Consumer packaged goods manufacturers and retailers, media content providers and distributors, digital players and online publishers, ad agencies
Key Facts
Clients and operations in 100 countries ~70% of business in long-term contracts
Copyright  2012 Nielsen Holdings N.V. Nielsen and Arbitron Conference Call December 18, 2012 17
 
Snapshot of Arbitron's Business
2011 Financials1
YTD 9/30/12
revenue growth
REVENUE EBITDA EPS
7.6%
$422 MM $119 MM $ 1.93
CAGR
(09-'11) 4.7%
Value proposition
Serving the mediaprimarily radio
Measuring network and local market radio audiences in U.S.; retail, media and product patterns of U.S. consumers; mobile audience measurement and analytics; software services
Clients
Media, mobile, advertising agencies and advertisers
Key Facts
Primarily U.S.-based business
77% revenues from local ratings services
Copyright  2012 Nielsen Holdings N.V. Nielsen and Arbitron Conference Call December 18, 2012 18
 
Certain Non-GAAP measures
Overview of Non-GAAP Presentations
Nielsen consistently uses the below non-GAAP financial measures to evaluate the results of our operations. We believe that the presentation of these non-GAAP measures provides useful information to investors regarding financial and business trends related to our results of operations and that when this non-GAAP financial information is viewed with our GAAP financial information, investors are provided with a more meaningful understanding of our ongoing operating performance. None of the non-GAAP measures presented should be considered as an alternative to net income or loss, operating income or loss, cash flows from operating activities or any other performance measures of operating performance or liquidity derived in accordance with GAAP. These non-GAAP measures have important limitations as analytical tools and should not be considered in isolation or as substitutes for an analysis of our results as reported under GAAP.
Constant Currency Presentation
We evaluate our results of operations on both an as reported and a constant currency basis. The constant currency presentation, which is a non-GAAP measure, excludes the impact of fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates. We believe providing constant currency information provides valuable supplemental information regarding our results of operations, consistent with how we evaluate our performance. We calculate constant currency percentages by converting our prior-period local currency financial results using the current period exchange rates and comparing these adjusted amounts to our current period reported results.
Net Debt and Net Debt Leverage Ratio
The net debt leverage ratio is defined as net debt as of the balance sheet date divided by Adjusted EBITDA for the twelve months then ended. Net debt and the net debt leverage ratio are not presentations made in accordance with GAAP, and our use of these terms may vary from the use of similarly-titled measures by others in our industry due to the potential inconsistencies in the method of calculation and differences due to items subject to interpretation.
Copyright  2012 Nielsen Holdings N.V. Nielsen and Arbitron Conference Call December 18, 2012 19
 
Certain Non-GAAP measures (cont'd)
Adjusted EBITDA
We define Adjusted EBITDA as net income or loss from our consolidated statements of operations before interest income and expense, income taxes, depreciation and amortization, restructuring charges, goodwill and intangible asset impairment charges, stock compensation expense and other non-operating items from our consolidated statements of operations as well as certain other items considered unusual or non-recurring in nature. Adjusted EBITDA is not a presentation made in accordance with GAAP, and our use of the term Adjusted EBITDA may vary from the use of similarly-titled measures by others in our industry due to the potential inconsistencies in the method of calculation and differences due to items subject to interpretation. We use Adjusted EBITDA to consistently measure our performance from period to period both at the consolidated level as well as within our operating segments, to evaluate and fund incentive compensation programs and to compare our results to those of our competitors.
Adjusted Net Income
We define Adjusted Net Income as net income or loss from our consolidated statements of operations before income taxes, depreciation and amortization associated with acquired tangible and intangible assets, restructuring charges, goodwill and intangible asset impairment charges, other non-operating items from our consolidated statements of operations and certain other items considered unusual or non-recurring in nature, reduced by cash paid for income taxes. Also excluded from Adjusted Net Income is interest expense attributable to the mandatory convertible subordinated bonds due 2013. We also describe Adjusted Net Income per share as Adjusted EPS.
Last Twelve Months
LTM refers to the last twelve months in the period ended September 30, 2012. For example, Nielsen LTM ended
September 30, 2012 revenue represents $5,532 for the year ended December 31, 2011, less $4,111 for the nine months ended September 30, 2011 plus $4,148 for the nine months ended September 30, 2012. All other financial information presented for the LTM ended September 30, 2012 follows the same approach.
Copyright  2012 Nielsen Holdings N.V. Nielsen and Arbitron Conference Call December 18, 2012 20
 
Pro Forma Reconciliation for LTM 9/30/12
($ in millions) Last Twelve Months ended 9/30/12
NLSN ARB Eliminations/Ad Total
justments (a)
e / (loss) $ 329 $ 58 $ (41) $ 346
Income from discontinued operations, net (2)   (2)
Interest expense, net 424 1 69 494
Provision / (Benefit) for income taxes 187 36 (28) 195
Depreciation and amortization 521 31  552
EBITDA 1,459 126  1,585
Equity in net (income) / loss of affiliates (5) (7) 15 3
Other non-operating (income) / expense, net (1) 3  2
Restructuring charges 85   85
Stock-based compensation expense 33 9  42
Other items (b) 6   6
Adjusted EBITDA $ 1,577 $ 131 $ 15 $ 1,723
Capital Expenditures (379) (26)  (405)
Cash flow (EBITDA  Capex) $ 1,198 $ 105 $ 15 $ 1,318
Copyright  2012 Nielsen Holdings N.V. Nielsen and Arbitron Conference Call December 18, 2012 21
 
Nielsen Reconciliation to GAAP Financial Measures
($ in millions except per share amounts) Year ended
December 31
(Unaudited)
2011
Net income $ 86
Income from discontinued operations, net (1)
Interest expense, net 471
Provision for income taxes 22
Depreciation and amortization 529
EBITDA 1,107
Equity in net income of affiliates (3)
Other non-operating expense, net (a) 219
Restructuring charges 84
Stock-based compensation expense 27
Other items (b) 112
Adjusted EBITDA $ 1,546
Interest expense, net (471)
Depreciation and amortization (529)
Depreciation and amortization of acquisition-related tangible and intangible assets 182
Cash paid for income taxes (132)
Stock-based compensation expense (27)
Interest expense attributable to mandatory convertible bonds 21
Adjusted net income $ 590
Adjusted net income per share of common stock, diluted (c) $ 1.61
Copyright  2012 Nielsen Holdings N.V. Nielsen and Arbitron Conference Call December 18, 2012 22
 
Nielsen Reconciliation to GAAP Financial Measures
cont d
(a) Non-operating expense for twelve months ended December 31, 2011 reflects debt extinguishment/pre-payment charges of $231M.
(b) Other items primarily consist of Sponsor Advisory Fees (including termination payments of $102 million for the full year ended December 31, 2011), costs related to our initial public offering and other deal related fees.
(c) Adjusted Net Income per share of common stock presented on a diluted basis includes potential common shares associated with stock-based compensation plans that may have been considered anti-dilutive in accordance with
GAAP. The amount also includes the weighted-average amount of shares of common stock convertible associated with the mandatory convertible bonds based upon the average price of our common stock during the period.
Weighted-average shares of common stock outstanding as of
352, 469, 181
year end December 31, 2011, basic
Dilutive shares of common stock from
5,032,773
stock compensation plans
Shares of common stock convertible associated
9,531,994
with the mandatory convertible bonds
Weighted-average shares of common stock outstanding,
367,033,948
diluted
Copyright  2012 Nielsen Holdings N.V. Nielsen and Arbitron Conference Call December 18, 2012 23
 
web http://ir.nielsen.com email ir@nielsen.com phone +1.646.654.4602
@NielsenIR

Exhibit 99.3
I am pleased to announce that we have entered into an agreement with Nielsen to combine our two companies. Together, we believe that a combined business is better positioned to serve clients in today's rapidly evolving media landscape. This transaction has been approved by our Board, as well as by Nielsen's, and is subject to customary closing conditions, including a regulatory review.
Nielsen and Arbitron share a mutual respect for one another, and a deep understanding of what it takes to deliver high quality measurement services. We also share a strong commitment to our customers, and to our employees. And while our businesses are different, they are highly complementary.
Arbitron is best known for our radio audience measurement service and we have been working hard to establish ourselves as a leader in cross-platform and mobile measurement. Nielsen is known for its expertise in TV and online audience measurement and its innovative cross-platform solutions globally. When we join Nielsen upon completion of this transaction, we will bring our radio ratings and media measurement expertise to the combined company, and become part of an enhanced global information and measurement provider.
Until closing, we expect both businesses to continue to operate normally. During this period, it will be "business as usual" at Arbitron. One of our key goals throughout the closing and subsequent integration is to manage the process as seamlessly as possible, with minimal disruption to our employees and our clients.
We know that you have questions, and will have more in the days and weeks to come. Many of them cannot be answered now - it is early in the process. However we are committed to providing you with information and details when we have them.
In the meantime, I am delighted to tell you that Dave Calhoun, the CEO of Nielsen will be joining me and Sean Creamer at an all employee meeting and Webex this morning at 11:30 AM. Details will be coming to you shortly via email.
This is a new and exciting phase for Arbitron. Your commitment to Arbitron and to our customers, which has helped make us the leader in radio audience measurement, will be ever more important as we bring radio expertise and experience to Nielsen's media measurement business. You are a vital part of our transition into this new phase. We are confident that being part of Nielsen will present even greater opportunities for our business and for our employees as we become part of a larger organization.
Thank you for the enthusiasm, creativity and commitment that you bring to Arbitron each day.
A copy of the press release that was issued this morning can be read here: http://arbitron.mediaroom.com/index.php?s=43&item=853
Additional Information and Where You Can Find It:
In connection with the proposed acquisition by Nielsen Holdings, N.V. ("Nielsen") of Arbitron Inc. ("Arbitron") pursuant to the terms of an Agreement and Plan of Merger by and among Arbitron, Nielsen, and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Nielsen, Arbitron will file a proxy statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). Investors are urged to read the proxy statement (including all amendments and supplements to it) because it will contain important information. Investors may obtain free copies of the proxy statement when it becomes available, as well as other filings containing information about Arbitron, without charge, at the SEC's Internet site (http://www.sec.gov). These documents may also be obtained for free from Arbitron's Investor Relations web site (http://www.arbitron.com/investors) or by directing a request to Arbitron at: Arbitron Inc., 9705 Patuxent Woods Drive, Columbia, MD 210476, Attn: Investor Relations.
Arbitron and its directors and executive officers and other members of management and employees are potential participants in the solicitation of proxies from Arbitron's stockholders in respect of the proposed transaction.
Information regarding Arbitron's directors and executive officers is available in Arbitron's proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of stockholders, filed with the SEC on April 12, 2012. Additional information regarding the interests of such potential participants in the proposed transaction will be included in the proxy statement to be filed with the SEC in connection with the proposed transaction.
Forward-Looking Statements Disclaimer:
This written communication includes information that could constitute forward-looking statements made pursuant to the safe harbor provision of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements may be identified by words such as will', expect', should', could', shall' and similar expressions. These statements are subject to risks and uncertainties concerning Nielsen's proposed acquisition of Arbitron, Arbitron's expected financial performance, as well as Arbitron's strategic and operational plans and actual results and events could differ materially from what presently is expected. The potential risks and uncertainties include the possibility that the transaction will not close or that the closing may be delayed; the possibility that Arbitron may be unable to obtain stockholder approval as required for the transaction or that the other conditions to the closing of the transaction may not be satisfied; the transaction may involve unexpected costs, liabilities or delays; the outcome of any legal proceedings related to the transaction; the occurrence of any event, change or other circumstances that could give rise to the termination of the transaction agreement; general economic conditions; conditions in the markets Nielsen and Arbitron are engaged in; behavior of customers, suppliers and competitors (including their reaction to the transaction); technological developments; as well as legal and regulatory rules affecting Nielsen's and Arbitron's business and specific risk factors discussed in other releases and public filings made by Nielsen and Arbitron (including the their respective filings with the SEC). This list of factors is not intended to be exhaustive. Such forward-looking statements only
speak as of the date of this written communication, and we assume no obligation to update any written or oral forward-looking statement made by us or on our behalf as a result of new information, future events, or other factors.

Exhibit 99.4
Today we announced that we have entered into an agreement that would combine our company with Nielsen, a leading global provider of information and insights into what consumers watch and buy. A link to the press release is here<http://click.communication.arbitron.com/?qs=3be05f7bc62e7c0f1dea112cb2eeae392f922f323509f27bb7129ecee3803bfb>.
This transaction has been approved the boards of both companies and is subject to customary closing conditions, including regulatory review. Over the coming weeks, we will remain focused on ensuring that there is no interruption in our day-to-day operations.
The need for robust media measurement across all platforms has never been more of an imperative than it is today. Together, we believe that a combined business is better positioned to serve client needs in today's rapidly evolving media landscape.
Nielsen and Arbitron will have a combined platform to better solve for unmeasured areas of media consumption, such as streaming audio and out-of-home, as well as deeper measurement of multicultural audiences in the U.S. Moreover, the combined offering will bring greater visibility into advertising return on investment, particularly for local market players, and provide a better linkage to retail and purchasing impact for radio.
As always, your representative at Arbitron is available to answer any questions you may have and we will do our best to keep you informed of any progress or developments. Again, we thank you for your commitment to Arbitron and we look forward to continuing our relationship as we enter into this exciting new phase with Nielsen.
Regards,
William T. Kerr
President & Chief Executive Officer
Sean R. Creamer
Executive Vice President,
Chief Operating Officer
Additional Information and Where You Can Find It
In connection with the proposed acquisition by Nielsen Holdings, N.V. ("Nielsen") of Arbitron Inc. ("Arbitron") pursuant to the terms of an Agreement and Plan of Merger by and among Arbitron, Nielsen, and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Nielsen, Arbitron will file a proxy statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). Investors are urged to read the proxy statement (including all amendments and supplements to it) because
it will contain important information. Investors may obtain free copies of the proxy statement when it becomes available, as well as other filings containing information about Arbitron, without charge, at the SEC's Internet site (www.sec.gov<http://www.sec.gov>). These documents may also be obtained for free from Arbitron's Investor Relations web site (http://www.arbitron.com/investors) or by directing a request to Investor Relations at: Arbitron Inc., 9705 Patuxent Woods Drive, Columbia, MD 21046.
Arbitron and its directors and executive officers and other members of management and employees are potential participants in the solicitation of proxies from Arbitron's stockholders in respect of the proposed transaction. Information regarding Arbitron's directors and executive officers is available in Arbitron's proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of stockholders, filed with the SEC on April 12, 2012. Additional information regarding the interests of such potential participants in the proposed transaction will be included in the proxy statement to be filed with the SEC in connection with the proposed transaction.
Forward-Looking Statements Disclaimer
This written communication includes information that could constitute forward-looking statements made pursuant to the safe harbor provision of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements may be identified by words such as will', expect', should', could', shall' and similar expressions. These statements are subject to risks and uncertainties concerning Nielsen's proposed acquisition of Arbitron, Arbitron's expected financial performance, as well as Arbitron's strategic and operational plans and actual results and events could differ materially from what presently is expected. The potential risks and uncertainties include the possibility that the transaction will not close or that the closing may be delayed; the possibility that Arbitron may be unable to obtain stockholder approval as required for the transaction or that the other conditions to the closing of the transaction may not be satisfied; the transaction may involve unexpected costs, liabilities or delays; the outcome of any legal proceedings related to the transaction; the occurrence of any event, change or other circumstances that could give rise to the termination of the transaction agreement; general economic conditions; conditions in the markets Nielsen and Arbitron are engaged in; behavior of customers, suppliers and competitors (including their reaction to the transaction); technological developments; as well as legal and regulatory rules affecting Nielsen's and Arbitron's business and specific risk factors discussed in other releases and public filings made by Nielsen and Arbitron (including the their respective filings with the SEC). This list of factors is not intended to be exhaustive. Such forward-looking statements only speak as of the date of this written communication, and we assume no obligation to update any written or oral forward-looking statement made by us or on our behalf as a result of new information, future events, or other factors.

Exhibit 99.5
 
THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS EDITED TRANSCRIPT NLSNNielsen Holdings to Acquire ArbitronConference Call EVENT DATE/TIME: DECEMBER 18, 2012 / 1:30PM GMT THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS | www.streetevents.com | Contact Us 2012 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of Thomson Reuters. 'Thomson Reuters' and the Thomson Reuters logo are registered trademarks of Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.
DECEMBER 18, 2012 / 1:30PM, NLSNNielsen Holdings to Acquire ArbitronConference Call CORPORATE PARTICIPANTS Liz Zale Nielsen Holdings NVHead of IR David Calhoun Nielsen Holdings NVCEO Bill Kerr Arbitron Inc.President &amp; CEO Sean Creamer Arbitron Inc.EVP &amp; COO Brian West Nielsen Holdings NVCFO CONFERENCE CALL PARTICIPANTS Andrew Steinman JPMorganAnalyst Matt Chesler Deutsche BankAnalyst Mark Zgutowicz Piper Jaffray &amp; Co.Analyst Dave Duckel Sanford C. Bernstein &amp; Co.Analyst Brian Karimzad Goldman SachsAnalyst Suzie Stein Morgan StanleyAnalyst Sara Gubins BofA Merrill LynchAnalyst David Bank RBC Capital MarketsAnalyst William Bird Lazard Capital MarketsAnalyst Doug Arthur Evercore PartnersAnalyst Kelly Flynn Credit SuisseAnalyst Bethany Caster Raymond JamesAnalyst Laura Martin Needham &amp; CompanyAnalyst Dan Moore CJS SecuritiesAnalyst David Hebert Wells Fargo SecuritiesAnalyst PRESENTATION Operator Good morning, and welcome to the Nielsen/Arbitron investor conference call. All participants will be in listen-only mode. (Operator Instructions) After today's presentation, there will be an opportunity to ask questions. (Operator Instructions) Please note, this event is being recorded. I would now like to turn the conference over to Liz Zale, Head of Investor Relations at Nielsen. Please go ahead. THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS | www.streetevents.com | Contact Us 2012 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of Thomson Reuters. 'Thomson Reuters' and the Thomson Reuters logo are registered trademarks of Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.
DECEMBER 18, 2012 / 1:30PM, NLSNNielsen Holdings to Acquire ArbitronConference Call Liz ZaleNielsen Holdings NVHead of IRThank you. Good morning, everyone. I'm pleased to have you join us for this conference call to discuss our announcement of the agreement from Nielsen to acquire Arbitron. With me on today's call from Nielsen are David Calhoun, our CEO; Brian West, our CFO; and joining us from Arbitron is Bill Kerr, President and Chief Executive Officer; and Sean Creamer, Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer. Before we begin, I will refer you to the Safe Harbor for forward-looking statements on page 2, as well as the additional information discussed on that page. A slide presentation that we're using on this call is available under the Events section of our investor relations website at ir.nielsen.com. For today's call, Dave will actually begin. Brian will also provide some information on our slides, and then we will take your questions. So, with that, we will be happy to turn over the call to our CEO, David Calhoun. David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO Good morning, everyone. Just a couple of words upfront before I actually start flipping slides. This deal is a great deal for the Nielsen Company. We have a very, very high regard, and always have had a very high regard for the Arbitron Company and the measurements it provides for its industry, which is an industry we happen to love, in light of its relationship with consumers. I have a very high regard for the people in Arbitron and the leadership team, and I'd like for  turn it over to Bill Kerr for one second upfront to just make a comment. Bill KerrArbitron Inc.President &amp; CEO Thanks, Dave. I can say very clearly that both the Board and management at Arbitron are really excited about this opportunity and this transaction. We put a lot of hard work into our own strategic thinking over the last year. And I think that we've all concluded this is the best way forward for Arbitron, and one that should be beneficial to the Company and to the customers that we serve. Obviously, it does well for our shareholders, but we do think very much that it also does exceptionally well for our customers. It helps bring radio more into the center part of the advertising mix. I think, between us, we will be able to provide greater insights to our media customers, and marketers generally. I would also add I think it does very well for our employees. We are putting together two cultures that are really focused on excellence and innovation in research. I think, for Arbitron, it provides for employees an opportunity to be part of a broader organization with all the kinds of opportunities that that may entail. So, we are excited. I know  Sean, would you like to add a word, too? Sean CreamerArbitron Inc.EVP &amp; COO I would just, obviously, echo that enthusiasm, certainly. We are very excited about the prospects of bringing the collective resources, capabilities and commitments of our companies and our employees to bear for the benefit of our respective customer bases. Obviously, Arbitron has been a strong advocate for radio, and there certainly are few companies, I think, that can boast Nielsen's wealth of media and consumer information, online capabilities, and powerful analytical tools. So, the idea of us being able to leverage that to bring to bear for the benefit of radio, I think, is pretty compelling, and we are very excited about that. David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO Thanks, guys. So, let me just get you to page 3 at the introductory slide. This isn't news to any of the folks who, of course, have been following Nielsen. Our strategy is, in fact, all about consumers. We measure what they buy. We measure what they buy everywhere in the world. And we measure what they watch. That is really the interaction they have with all forms of media, which ultimately influenced their then purchase and buying behavior. Needless to say, the real magic for us is the ability to link the two of those consumer behaviors. THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS | www.streetevents.com | Contact Us 2012 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of Thomson Reuters. 'Thomson Reuters' and the Thomson Reuters logo are registered trademarks of Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.
DECEMBER 18, 2012 / 1:30PM, NLSNNielsen Holdings to Acquire ArbitronConference Call So, moving on to page 4, just by way of transaction rationale. For the Nielsen Company, it gives us a whole new medium to measure, right? Wehave radio; we get to take it all around the world. We do, in fact, have a global footprint. It allows us to now analyze and understand consumersfor another two full hours a day, which is a very big deal. for another two full hours a day, which is a very big deal. We have opportunities between our two companies to measure unmeasured things  things that we know are important to both radio and for Nielsen's respective clients. Streaming audio, out-of-home measurements for television consumption, and most importantly maybe and one of the details that underwrites this thing, is the notion of how radio over-indexes toward multicultural audiences. Very important for Nielsen to represent all audiences, and this helps us in a very significant way in that regard. Ad effectiveness. In the world of ad effectiveness, it's all about what do you get for the money you spend on the medium by way of advertising. Nielsen has data sources across the board that we like to link to these audience measurements in all mediums. For us, this just gives us one more opportunity to provide advertisers real ROI metrics, or the effectiveness of the mediums that they advertise on. I mentioned global expansion. Our global teams will love this product. They will immediately try to learn and understand what it is, and take it to their local markets all around the world. Finally, these business models are entirely compatible  entirely. We understand the model, we understand the relationships that Arbitron has built and enjoys with its clients, and we look forward to integrating it with the Nielsen Company. Page 5. Needless to say, this is the simple notion of what this deal represents. We get a whole new medium, radio, and very importantly, another avenue in the music world, which is both a business opportunity and exposure that's important to us. On the right side, two full hours of a consumer's day. That is a very big deal, when your job is to measure how consumers ultimately form and change behaviors. And it's that linkage of buy and watch that ultimately allows us to provide those insights. So, it's a simple notion, but important notion. Page 6. I think everybody knows the legacies of these Companies. The positions we enjoy with our markets are built from these legacies. It's not built on purely technology or any other form. It's built on knowing and learning and understanding the domains within which we operate. Both Arbitron and Nielsen have been doing this for generations. That is a strength that we respect and we look forward to integrating inside our Company. Page 7 is just a snapshot of the Arbitron financial performance. We like this financial performance. We like the stability of this financial performance. We like the model with which they deploy their services with their clients. Ultimately, we believe we can enhance this in several ways, and look forward to integrating this model with our Company. Equally important for us, as we think about future capital-allocation decisions in our Company, this model helps, if not enhances, that capital-allocation strategy, which will unfold in the year ahead. Page 8 talks a little bit about our respective clients, and what might be in it for them. First and foremost, both of our client sets, whether it's radio or television or in the digital world, are looking for new ways to measure new opportunities and audiences. The simple ones, streaming audio, certainly for all of the radio clients, out-of-home metrics for our TV clients, and then, again, just a deeper understanding and measurement of all the US multicultural audiences are what's very appealing to all of us. With respect to advertising effectiveness, we talked about it. But I think everybody knows, the Nielsen Company is deep in retail data. We capture it every day. We capture it for most households across the United States. What we like to do is link that data to the advertising mediums that our advertisers and clients have ultimately tried to use to influence that behavior. Our ability to wrap that retail data around these media metrics are what differentiate our service, and ultimately, what provide value to the advertisers that we serve. These products are  and the cultures fit really like a glove. So, we look forward to that integration of all of that. Scale matters in this industry. We provide syndicated services to our respective markets. The scale helps us. It allows us to reinvest. It allows us to do more for our respective clients, so that they can go out and win in their marketplace. So, this model, all the way around, we believe, is good for the client sets that Arbitron has served over the years and that Nielsen has served over the years. Page 9, complementary business fundamentals. These are fundamentals that our Company, the Nielsen Company, has talked about since, certainly since this leadership team in 2006 began this mission. Arbitron, again, fits like a glove. They are in the business. They provide mission-critical data THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS | www.streetevents.com | Contact Us 2012 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of Thomson Reuters. 'Thomson Reuters' and the Thomson Reuters logo are registered trademarks of Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.
DECEMBER 18, 2012 / 1:30PM, NLSNNielsen Holdings to Acquire ArbitronConference Call to their clients. Clients that  are measures that matter every day with respect to their clients being able to realize revenue, and ultimately, tomarket their advantages. They have unique consumer information and insight, from which you can derive competitive strategies and other things to help them in their endeavors. Both have built legacies around syndicated services  scalable syndicated services. And then finally, the one very complementary action here is the fact that Nielsen brings a global footprint, and that Arbitron can take advantage of that global footprint in introducing services around the world. So, a very complementary set of business fundamentals. Okay, page 10. I'm going to let Brian  I'll take a drink, and I'll ask Brian to just highlight the transaction itself. Brian WestNielsen Holdings NVCFO Great. Thanks, Dave. As you know, the purchase price is $48 per share, representing $1.3 billion of equity value. It's a 100% cash deal. The combined business go-forward is revenue of around $6 billion, and adjusted EBITDA of $1.7 billion. We expect this transaction to be accretive, day one. And it's going to be meaningful in the first year and the second year in the neighborhood of $0.13 and $0.19, respectively. This is driven by being able to integrate the businesses and derive efficiencies including synergies of at least $20 million annualized. We expect the transaction to close, subject to customary closing conditions and subject to regulatory review. Turn to page 11. Not only are the business models very complementary, but the financial expression is very similar as well. These are very consistent growth businesses. They stand the test of just about any economic environment, and they grow. There's a compounding growth story for both these models. We have recurring revenue for both Nielsen and Arbitron. When we walk into a year, we, respectively, have anywhere from 70% to 80% of our revenue on hand through our long-term, multi-year contracts that we both enjoy. We've got operating leverage because of the syndicated nature of our product offerings, and the free cash flow strength of these models is powerful. It gives ability to scale with very low capital intensity. So, look at page 12. This is the combined business LTM, or last 12-months', view across key financial metrics. So, when you take the $5.5 billion of Nielsen, you add about 8% of additional revenue, and EBITDA for both, respectively, we view this as a good-sized tuck-in. It's one that will be important as we go forward, particularly as you go to the far right, which is the cash flow. Cash flow model, when you put these things together, is very powerful and very accretive. So, very similar, not a big deal relative to the combined, and important for us as we think about the client opportunities ahead of us. Page 13. From a balance sheet standpoint, this represents a modest increase to our leverage on day one. But given the model and the cash flow power, it delevers nicely over time. I mentioned the accretive nature on an adjusted EPS standpoint of $0.13 and $0.19, respectively, in the first two years. We do have a financing commitment that supports this deal in the amount of $1.3 billion. As Dave mentioned, it enhances our future return capital strategy. In fact, I'd go further to say, this deal does not inhibit, in any way, our plans regarding capital allocation that we've described generally. In fact, it enhances our ability to provide returns to shareholders, given the strong cash flow nature that this model brings to us. We will provide more detail around general capital allocation specifics as we get into February on our regularly scheduled year-end earnings call. With that, I'll turn it back over to Dave. David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO So, in the end, this advances all the long-term objectives of our Company, because we capture more of the consumers' time. We have a broader measurement of what is rapidly changing consumer behavior. The ROI point of view is what all of our clients want. They spend money to advertise. They spend money to advertise across mediums. The ability to link buy side data to those advertising exposures is what Nielsen is all about. THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS | www.streetevents.com | Contact Us 2012 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of Thomson Reuters. 'Thomson Reuters' and the Thomson Reuters logo are registered trademarks of Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.
DECEMBER 18, 2012 / 1:30PM, NLSNNielsen Holdings to Acquire ArbitronConference Call Finally, we have invested, over a long period of time, in our global platform. Arbitron will plug into that global platform immediately, and I thinkthey look forward to the potential of that opportunity. So, with that, I will turn it over to our audience and ask for questions. QUESTIONS AND ANSWERS Operator (Operator Instructions) Andrew Steinman at JPMorgan. Andrew SteinmanJPMorganAnalyst Could you just go over, again, Brian, what you just said about how this increased level of debt does not inhibit the capital allocation that you've discussed? With the debt that you're taking out, are there any covenants that would relate to capital allocation that we should know about? Brian WestNielsen Holdings NVCFO On the last point, there aren't any. Again, this is something that we considered to fit nicely within our general capital structure and strategy. For us, it does have a modest uptick on the net leverage ratio. But over time, given, as I mentioned, the strong cash flow model, it will spin off quite a bit of accretive cash flow. Again, it's very consistent with how we think about future return of capital. So, it all is very consistent, in many ways, enhances what we had always talked about as our desire to return cash to shareholders. Andrew SteinmanJPMorganAnalyst But does it change the time frame? Does it push out any timeframe? Brian WestNielsen Holdings NVCFO Not at all. Like I said, it doesn't inhibit it in any way. Operator Matt Chesler at Deutsche Bank. Matt CheslerDeutsche BankAnalyst So, on the synergies, you guys are talking about at least $20 million. Can you talk about why that level is appropriate? Why can't it be $40 million, say? THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS | www.streetevents.com | Contact Us 2012 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of Thomson Reuters. 'Thomson Reuters' and the Thomson Reuters logo are registered trademarks of Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.
DECEMBER 18, 2012 / 1:30PM, NLSNNielsen Holdings to Acquire ArbitronConference Call David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEOWell, Matt, we're getting [one] here so we've a lot of work to do. I will tell you that we plan on doing good things for the radio clients that Arbitron has. So there will be some recapture of synergies in the form of new ROI metrics for their clients. So there are things we are going to do, both in the puts and takes. The case that we've described for you, I would characterize as an underwriting case and a secure case. But first and foremost, we are going to talk to the radio clients about what we can do for them and with the Arbitron domain experts. Matt CheslerDeutsche BankAnalyst What would you foresee dealing with the synergies? Do you expect to reinvest them or let some of it drop to the bottom line? David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO Well, certainly, some will drop to the bottom line because it has to. But, at the end of the day, this is a good placeholder with respect to how you might evaluate that on the bottom line. Then, ultimately, for us, we do things for our clients. As we get closer to a real closing on this transaction, I am sure there will be more to share. Matt CheslerDeutsche BankAnalyst Sure. Just a bigger picture question around the timing for the deal. Can you give us some insight into the history of the transaction and your discussions? Maybe a little bit of insight into there  why now and what made this the appropriate time to go forward with the transaction that probably what was out there but always a possibility for some time. David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO Yes, great question. This was just the right time. I think The Nielsen Company, with respect to its progress post the 2006 private equity investment, allows us  gives us all the leverage in the world to make this acquisition. As Brian said, not only stay on strategy, but enhance our strategy, ultimately, to return capital to shareholders. So, the timing, from our point of view, was really, very good in that respect. I think everyone, who has followed us, knows that it  we wanted to get ourselves in a conservative financial position so that we could do things like this. Then, with respect to the transaction itself, this one happened very quickly. I will let Bill comment. But I will also suggest that there was just a very strong, I think, affinity on the part of the Arbitron Board that this was the right transaction for its employees and for its customers. Therefore, we put it together in a real, real fast pace. Bill KerrArbitron Inc.President &amp; CEO Yes, I would simply add that, as I've suggested at the beginning, our Board and senior management had been and they always are, particularly engaged in trying to figure out the right strategy for us as a company and what is a quite rapidly changing media environment. As this opportunity emerged, I think with the tremendous respect we have between the two companies for each other, as the opportunity to talk to each other and get this going occurred, it did pick up speed very, very quickly. The obvious benefit, I think, for both Nielsen and Arbitron and the customers we serve was so apparent that it was a relatively easy transaction to put together in the final analysis. Matt CheslerDeutsche BankAnalyst Okay. Great. Thank you. Congratulations. THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS | www.streetevents.com | Contact Us 2012 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of Thomson Reuters. 'Thomson Reuters' and the Thomson Reuters logo are registered trademarks of Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.
DECEMBER 18, 2012 / 1:30PM, NLSNNielsen Holdings to Acquire ArbitronConference Call Liz ZaleNielsen Holdings NVHead of IROperator, next question, please? Operator Mark Zgutowicz, Piper Jaffray. Mark ZgutowiczPiper Jaffray &amp; Co.Analyst Just getting back to the synergies. If you could, maybe, just specifically talk about where the crossover points are with TV and radio? What I'm hearing you say is there's certainly some obvious synergies to Arbitron's clients from your TV data. So, I get that. Is that generally the bulk of that $20 million in synergies initially that you will see? Then maybe you could talk about the other side of that? Radio to TV and where that  where those complementary pieces fall into place? David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO Yes. Thanks for asking that question because maybe I wasn't as clear as I needed to be. The real  so the $20 million number is largely a cost-base synergy because the logical things that these models lend themselves to. The revenue-based synergies, and the important ones for the radio world, is the linkage of our [buy] side data to the advertising medium that they measure. So, if you are a radio client spending  or if you are a client of the big radio companies, spending money on advertising, you want to know what you get for it. Ultimately, the buy side data that we have, that is the proof point on the effectiveness of that advertising is why I think they will be very interested. I think it's also a strategic pursuit on the part of the Arbitron team that this satisfies. So, I mean, that is really the guts of the revenue side synergies. Beyond that, it's taking this across the global marketplace. Our deal, in terms of how it was underwritten, we don't need giant lists on either of those things from a revenue standpoint to make this work. But I know we will end up with a lot more satisfied clients every step of the way. Brian WestNielsen Holdings NVCFO It's important to note that the global nature is going to be over the long term. As Dave mentioned, these are primarily cost synergies that we get out of the gate as we build the underwriting case. Mark ZgutowiczPiper Jaffray &amp; Co.Analyst Okay. Fair enough. Then just a clarification. I might have missed this but does the accretion include the impacts of the debt financing? What are your assumptions on the financing side, just roughly? Brian WestNielsen Holdings NVCFO So, that's an all-in number, net of financing. We, given the fact that we are in the markets, it tries to get the best view of what we would expect in the interest rate environment. But we will get more specific as we get closer to closing the transaction over time. Sean CreamerArbitron Inc.EVP &amp; COO (multiple speakers)  exclusive of transaction costs. THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS | www.streetevents.com | Contact Us 2012 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of Thomson Reuters. 'Thomson Reuters' and the Thomson Reuters logo are registered trademarks of Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.
DECEMBER 18, 2012 / 1:30PM, NLSNNielsen Holdings to Acquire ArbitronConference Call Brian WestNielsen Holdings NVCFOYes. Mark ZgutowiczPiper Jaffray &amp; Co.Analyst Okay. Just one last question. For those that might be wondering why radio versus acquisition within the digital sphere and obviously, radio extends to digital. We are not quite  Arbitron is not quite there yet, but clearly it has the power to move into online radio. But specific to just digital in general, there's obviously lots of other areas within digital that you could have looked to acquire and could continue but why Arbitron? Why radio today relative to something in the digital arena, whether that's mobile, whether that's something more on the effectiveness side or extending your offering there? Maybe you can just talk to those two points? David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO Terrific. So, this is definitely not an either/or. So, the Nielsen Company has plenty of firepower and capital. We'll continue making digital acquisitions, which, heretofore, is all we've made. So if you stop and think about the acquisitions we've made since, again, the private equity team came in, we started in mobile with Telephia. We moved [down in] NetRatings. NetRatings, we consolidated our interest in the online space. We went after Buzzmetrics. So we consolidated our position there. We just announced SocialGuide as a very important social media complement to our television ratings. We just announced yesterday an all-in deal with Twitter to complement, again, the paid advertising audience with earned audience in TV. So, make no mistake. That is a very important path to us. We continue on it. This, in no way, shape, or form, precludes us to stay on that path. In many ways, it might allow us to get more aggressive. In the meantime, the notion of  and pursuit of streaming audio, for the purposes of that radio set of clients, Arbitron has been on for itself. So, again, very complementary. Please, in no way, shape, or form is this either/or. We are still going to move down that path. Operator Todd Juenger at Sanford Bernstein. Dave DuckelSanford C. Bernstein &amp; Co.Analyst This is Dave [Duckel] for Todd. We are wondering, can you tell us how you plan to integrate Arbitron's existing cross-platform measurement technology with the one Nielsen has been developing, if at all? David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO Yes. There is nothing to integrate. So, again, the cross-platform discussion gets quite confused. There's really not a client I know of that's actually looking for radio-TV cross-platform. So, Arbitron has, I think, and again, I will ask Sean to comment, a couple of very custom-oriented projects that they are doing with very specific clients to support their endeavor. Nielsen has done a few, none, of which, involve radio. So, there is no real integration of those two activities. We will seek to provide cross-platform solution amongst many other players to our specific client needs. But that is not why we are doing this transaction. Only because I don't think there is a market today. I'm not sure one will develop anytime soon. For us, it really is that linkage of buy side data. And then, the advice and counsel we can provide to marketers around best marketing mix, given the fact that we measure audiences and effectiveness across all mediums. So, that's really, again, the background and strategy here. I just would be careful in the cross media take of it  that's not really part of this deal. THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS | www.streetevents.com | Contact Us 2012 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of Thomson Reuters. 'Thomson Reuters' and the Thomson Reuters logo are registered trademarks of Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.
DECEMBER 18, 2012 / 1:30PM, NLSNNielsen Holdings to Acquire ArbitronConference Call Sean CreamerArbitron Inc.EVP &amp; COO Dave, I would just add  it's Sean. Arbitron's approach to cross-platform is not cross-platform for cross-platform sake, it is to provide customers with valuable insights that they can use to monetize their content across whatever platform they're distributing in that content. Obviously, increasingly, customers are looking to distribute that content over more and more platforms. Our job is to make sure we are providing them full credit for their audiences, wherever those audiences are consuming the content. I think that's very consistent with Nielsen's approach. I think the combination of that goal is going to drive our cross-platform approach. Operator Brian Karimzad at Goldman Sachs. Brian KarimzadGoldman SachsAnalyst If you wouldn't mind helping us with a little bit with history. So you've attempted to work together before. I think there was an experiment to where you had the option to roll out the Portable People Meter together, to help with the national television rating and local television rating? I think the results are an experiment on the buy side when you're trying to integrate the Nielsen buy side data with some of the offerings from Arbitron. P&amp;G was backing it but then it folded at some point. Can you refresh us why those didn't work out and what's changing this time? And then I have a follow-up. David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO Yes, that's a great question. So, in the process of those projects, over time  I will go back. First of all, I started in '06, some of these preceded that. But the one that I think was maybe most important, that actually speaks to the respect we have for one another. Ultimately, why this makes sense, today, was really the single-source initiative that we had, Project Apollo, which was, in effect, to have a single household metric for all things consumed. Then, ultimately, to be able to link that to buy side data, so that we could get a real picture of the effectiveness of a variety of advertising vehicles. The fallacy in that one, and we worked closely with some very big clients, was that the notion of single-source was flawed. It ended up being costly and ultimately, ineffective, because the buy side data was very difficult to accumulate against that single-source. We both  I mean, if you interview the people involved in that process, I think everybody was very excited at the prospect. Everybody willingly invested, including our clients. We just couldn't get to the answer. Today, that linkage with big data and technology available, the way it is, the notion that we can reach in at a discreet level, all of the retail data that Nielsen has in its house today. We can solve for that in a very different way, without necessarily having a single-source to bump up against. So, there just  the technology that is developed over these years and the platforms that we enjoy, allow us to solve for it differently. But the need was always there. It is still there. We are excited at the prospects. I think both sides see it that way. So, I think there's a lot of reasons why, believe it or not, you may have called them failed. These were good, smart tries at a real opportunity that now just makes more sense. Bill KerrArbitron Inc.President &amp; CEO David, I would also add, we've been pretty productive partners together on Scarborough for a number of years. Brian and Sean, who are both on this call, served on the Board together. That's been a very good working relationship. THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS | www.streetevents.com | Contact Us 2012 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of Thomson Reuters. 'Thomson Reuters' and the Thomson Reuters logo are registered trademarks of Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.
DECEMBER 18, 2012 / 1:30PM, NLSNNielsen Holdings to Acquire ArbitronConference Call David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEOThat's a great point, Bill. Sean CreamerArbitron Inc.EVP &amp; COO My perspective does date back to those early initiatives. I, by no means, would characterize them as failures at all. I think they were incredibly informative in helping us, individually, view where the marketplace was and where it was moving. I'd echo what Dave suggested. Each and every one of those conversations was productive and collaborative and helped form our individual views on where the marketplace was going. The collaboration is intuitively obvious for both of us. We think very similarly about our approach to the customers and to measurement science. I think it's just the right time. It's informed  well-informed, by the productive conversations we've had in the past. Brian KarimzadGoldman SachsAnalyst Okay. That's helpful. Then just  I know it's hard to speak on the antitrust part, but I think one of your customers or sunbeam or something, they had a lawsuit. It was about a year or so ago on the local side. I think a judge threw it out. Is that done with at this point, just to clarify? David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO Well, that's for regulators to decide. I will tell you this. It really is as simple as Arbitron is in the radio business. We are in the TV world. So, the overlaps  I mean, frankly, you can barely find any. So, we feel confident about that process. We hope it goes quickly. As in all transactions, we've looked hard at it but feel very good about it. Operator Suzie Stein at Morgan Stanley. Suzie SteinMorgan StanleyAnalyst Just going back to the regulatory approval process. Is it just HSR and FCC approval that you need? Is there any other approval that you need from a regulatory standpoint? David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO No. That's it, Suzie. Suzie SteinMorgan StanleyAnalyst Okay. And is there any breakup fee if the deal doesn't get done for any reason? Brian WestNielsen Holdings NVCFO Yes, on the topic of breakup fees, there's a 2.5% breakup fee for fiduciary arbitrary to Nielsen. There's a 10% breakup fee for regulatory approvals, Nielsen to Arbitron. As Dave mentioned, we're going through that process and we feel confident in the outcome. THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS | www.streetevents.com | Contact Us 2012 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of Thomson Reuters. 'Thomson Reuters' and the Thomson Reuters logo are registered trademarks of Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.
DECEMBER 18, 2012 / 1:30PM, NLSNNielsen Holdings to Acquire ArbitronConference Call Suzie SteinMorgan StanleyAnalystOkay. Then what's the plan for Arbitron management? How long will they stay on? David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO We are doing our very best to keep them. We like them. Sean's been a terrific partner in this whole process. So, let's not guess anything here. Right now, they are the domain experts in radio and that is what we are acquiring. So, believe it, we have a lot of appreciation for what they bring to their clients and that what this is about. Operator Sara Gubins, Bank of America Merrill Lynch. Sara GubinsBofA Merrill LynchAnalyst Could you talk through the key topline drivers for Arbitron pricing versus new clients and contracts? Then, also any commentary you could help us with on margins over time? There's been pretty significant fluctuation in Arbitron's margins over the last seven, eight years, with some nice improvement recently. I'm wondering where that goes over time? Sean CreamerArbitron Inc.EVP &amp; COO It's Sean. Obviously, we can talk historically. We have not provided and aren't going to provide guidance on a forward-looking basis. But our model is very comparable to Nielsen's from a pricing perspective and growth perspective, very stable, long-term contracts established over time. Our typical escalators would, in our view, remain consistent with what historical factors have been. I just don't think we're going to talk a whole bunch about the financial drivers on a going-forward basis. But suffice to say, these models are very comparable. I don't think there's any surprises you would see lining up in Nielsen versus Arbitron from a customer contract perspective. Sara GubinsBofA Merrill LynchAnalyst So is pricing in the 1% to 2% range per year and the rest is volume or does that break down differently? Sean CreamerArbitron Inc.EVP &amp; COO Well, it's a longer question and a longer answer. Obviously, we have transitioned from our [diary] to electronic measurement, which is a more costly product that [phase] in at pricing has resulted in growth rates above historical escalators. Our historical escalators, before that, in transition, have been in the neighborhood of 3% to 4%. Sara GubinsBofA Merrill LynchAnalyst Okay. Then just to clarify the expected annual savings of $20 million on the cost side. Was that included in the accretion number or is that separate? Brian WestNielsen Holdings NVCFO No. That's in there. THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS | www.streetevents.com | Contact Us 2012 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of Thomson Reuters. 'Thomson Reuters' and the Thomson Reuters logo are registered trademarks of Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.
DECEMBER 18, 2012 / 1:30PM, NLSNNielsen Holdings to Acquire ArbitronConference Call Sara GubinsBofA Merrill LynchAnalyst That's in there. Okay, so the $20 million was a pretax number or post-tax? Brian WestNielsen Holdings NVCFO The $20 million is pretax. Sara GubinsBofA Merrill LynchAnalyst Okay. Then, last question. I don't know if you'll go into this, now, but could you give us any thoughts on how you will think about your leverage targets over time in the context of capital allocation plans? David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO The goals haven't changed one iota. I think we've communicated consistently to the marketplace that we are  want to improve our leverage and ultimately be at an investment-grade the next time we need to borrow money to alter our structure. We think we can do that. We think we can return capital to shareholders. We will have a lot more on this subject at our earnings call out in February. Operator David Bank, RBC Capital Markets. David BankRBC Capital MarketsAnalyst Two quick questions. The first one is, could you give a sense of the difference in the level of activeness versus passiveness of each of their watch, or we'll call it, watch-and-listen products now? How do they differ and how do you cross-sell that to your respective client base? Then the second question is, if you look at what the Arbitron technology gives to you, can you talk  can you give us a specific example of, on the matching buy side and measurement of media consumption side? What is a specific initiative? What is a specific product that you will be able to offer that you couldn't offer before? Thank you. David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO Great. So, again, be a little careful. There is no cross-selling because there's not  nobody does that. They have a technology they use and deploy to their radio clients, which, I would guess, has gotten more passive over time and will continue to get more passive with their technology roadmap. That is exactly the same case for Nielsen. We have consistently moved toward more passive forms of measurement. Our goal, I think, probably in both cases, is to become completely passive, where you don't need to touch anything. So, we are both on those roadmaps. We do not know enough about each other's roadmaps today to tell you what synergies might ultimately get integrated there. But that really doesn't happen at the client level. Again, there's no cross-sell involved in that process. With respect to various specific opportunities, again, I will give you an example of it. We don't have a plan for it yet, but the simple idea is, you know we have a joint venture with Catalina. It is a move by which we wrap all of the consumer retail transaction around TV audience exposure. That exact same product can get wrapped around radio audience exposure. The beauty of it is, it can get wrapped around at a very local level, in which case, you can measure it in very discreet markets and ultimately, create ROI opportunities for the radio clients that Arbitron serves, to differentiate their selling against other potential advertising mediums in local markets. THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS | www.streetevents.com | Contact Us 2012 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of Thomson Reuters. 'Thomson Reuters' and the Thomson Reuters logo are registered trademarks of Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.
DECEMBER 18, 2012 / 1:30PM, NLSNNielsen Holdings to Acquire ArbitronConference Call So, that's the product. There are many others, where again, we would attempt to take our retail data and try to wrap it around the audience exposure,such that we can demonstrate ROI for the ROI clients, or for the radio clients that they serve. So, there will be on the Nielsen side, probably, half a dozen buy side data sources that are going to want to wrap themselves around this audience and try to prove their point. We will let the best person win. Operator William Bird at Lazard. William BirdLazard Capital MarketsAnalyst Could you talk a bit about timing, when you would expect this to close? On the topic of synergies, if you were to rank order some of the opportunity sets that are not captured in the $20 million in synergies, how would you go about that? Thank you. Bill KerrArbitron Inc.President &amp; CEO Obviously, we like the transaction to close as fast as we possibly can but understand that there's natural regulatory reviews that we will have to get our way through. So we will have more clarity on timing as we move forward. In terms of synergies, I go to Dave's point, is that we've got very consistent measured platforms. We do things in a very similar way. We will have natural efficiencies that will come from that. My guess is that as we learn more about the power of the models that there could be more. But we also want to remind people that our [plan] is going to be at the same time to reinvest for growth. The opportunities that will be out there for us will be attractive while we still will be able to deliver on efficiencies and cost savings and grow the business at the same time. William BirdLazard Capital MarketsAnalyst The uptick in the accretion from $0.13 to $0.19, two years out, what's the key driver of that? Is it just the phasing in of those synergies? Bill KerrArbitron Inc.President &amp; CEO Primarily. Operator Doug Arthur, Evercore. Doug ArthurEvercore PartnersAnalyst Just a question on international growth expectations. Historically, Arbitron has not, as you pointed out, had a big international book. How  what have the frictions been and how does the combination with Nielsen going to solve that? Sean CreamerArbitron Inc.EVP &amp; COO It's Sean. Certainly, I think a limiting factor for us, with respect to international expansion, has been scale, more than anything else. Obviously, we've got a placeholder, if you will, for some of our international opportunities. Our focus has been on making sure PPM was the currency in the largest THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS | www.streetevents.com | Contact Us 2012 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of Thomson Reuters. 'Thomson Reuters' and the Thomson Reuters logo are registered trademarks of Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.
DECEMBER 18, 2012 / 1:30PM, NLSNNielsen Holdings to Acquire ArbitronConference Call markets domestically before we aggressively moved internationally. I think this adds scale to that opportunity and obviously, a vast infrastructureon the ground in countries that I think affords us an opportunity to accelerate those plans in a pretty dramatic fashion. David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO It's a reasonably big deal. We will be hesitant, at this stage, to give you timing on that, simply because, usually those contracts come up at intervals. We've got to make sure we understand those intervals, how prepared we are in each of the countries. I will tell you this, there will not be a local team in the world that is not going to visit the Arbitron facility to find out everything it can about what it does so it can take it straight back to its market. So, there's a lot of fun and now more excitement on the part of our global teams, and I think, on the part of the Arbitron team. The timing of any realization on that front is really subject to the way those procurements are going to get run in country. But we'll have a much clearer and better view on that as these teams really integrate. Operator Kelly Flynn at Credit Suisse. Kelly FlynnCredit SuisseAnalyst I have a few. First question is just clarification about how you were thinking about the growth prospects of radio? I think there's some investor perception that radio is just not a growth category, but yet, Arbitron has been growing. Could you just clarify  is Arbitron's growth driver been traditional radio measurement, or has this been more about growing and just streaming radio? As you think about the future, does the growth relate to traditional or is this really all about getting this online? Then I have a follow-up. Thank you. Sean CreamerArbitron Inc.EVP &amp; COO It's Sean. The answer is both. We certainly feel very, very good about our current traditional customer base. I think the streamers are an opportunity. But, again, I will go back to my point. Our job is to measure radio wherever it's being consumed. We don't differentiate whether it's being consumed over the air or in stream. We need to provide our customers for full credit for their audience. It is a medium that's growing. The number of people that are listening to radio on a weekly basis continues to grow. Advertising dollars follow audience, and that audience is increasing. There's certainly fragmentation in a world where the proliferation of ways people can consume content is increasing. We think we are uniquely positioned, given the portable measurement that we have, to ensure that our radio customers get that full credit. So, we believe very, very strongly in our traditional customer base and we view it as an opportunity for our traditional customers to increase the monetization of their content through the digital initiatives if we can measure it. There are new players in this space and there will be new players five years from now that we are not even considering. Our job, and I think it's a shared goal between Nielsen and Arbitron, is to make sure we are evolving our measurement to incorporate what we know today and what we expect will be the way people consume content moving forward. David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO Let me just add something here. I don't want to be lost in anybody. That was the single most important question for the Nielsen Company to answer as we pursue this acquisition. Do we believe in the medium? Do we believe in the measurement of that medium over the long haul? The answer was, unequivocal from all of our team who live in the digital world and live in all of these places, yes. So, we actually believe in this one quite a bit. The philosophies are, on both sides, we measure consumption, not distribution. The fact that distribution moves in different ways toward that consumer, we have to stay ahead of it. THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS | www.streetevents.com | Contact Us 2012 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of Thomson Reuters. 'Thomson Reuters' and the Thomson Reuters logo are registered trademarks of Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.
DECEMBER 18, 2012 / 1:30PM, NLSNNielsen Holdings to Acquire ArbitronConference Call The technology that Arbitron deploys is capable of that, just like the technology that Nielsen deploys in the television world is capable of that.Now, as distribution changes and all of those conflicts of interest occur, we weather those storms. But ultimately, there's an audience and it's a great audience. It changes the behavior of consumers. So, we like this medium. We like the fundamentals that underlie it and it's consistent with our approach in the Nielsen Company. So, it's  we really like everything about it. Like I said, single most important question that we had to answer. Sean CreamerArbitron Inc.EVP &amp; COO Getting back to Dave's point earlier, the fact is, the combined entity is going to be measuring what people spend, seven hours a day consuming, adding the two hours of radio to the five hours of television, is powerful. Kelly FlynnCredit SuisseAnalyst Great. Thank you so much. Then, a different question. I appreciate the comments on the EPS accretion. But I was hoping you could get into a little more detail on other hurdle rates you evaluate when you look at acquisitions, whether it be IRR or, other return on invested capital metrics just so we can understand if this, to the extent this goes beyond EPS accretion, how are you thinking about that? Thanks. David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO Make no mistake. I still have roughly a dozen private equity members on my Board. We have just about every set of analytics anyone could ever want, with respect to return on investments. I really love this one. So do they. So, yes, this meets all the hurdles. We are not going to get into specific targets other than, in my lifetime, this one is at the high end of the scale. Kelly FlynnCredit SuisseAnalyst Then last really quick one. Just  I know someone asked about antitrust and you said  Nielsen is really not in radio. But you guys do some radio. Can you just clarify how big Nielsen is currently in radio, and what you think the combined market share in the category will be? David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO Yes, we are not in radio in the US. We just don't do it, which is why we view that we do television and Arbitron does radio. They are different because, we don't have any activities in the US around radio measurement. Operator Bill Warmington at Raymond James. Bethany CasterRaymond JamesAnalyst This is Bethany Caster in for Bill Warmington. Congratulations on the acquisition. David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO Thank you. THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS | www.streetevents.com | Contact Us 2012 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of Thomson Reuters. 'Thomson Reuters' and the Thomson Reuters logo are registered trademarks of Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.
DECEMBER 18, 2012 / 1:30PM, NLSNNielsen Holdings to Acquire ArbitronConference Call Bethany CasterRaymond JamesAnalystThe first question is, with Arbitron addressing more local clients, will this increase pressure on you to build up your local TV products, so you can offer a better buy to watch linkage? David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO This is a really good question. In the end, one of the attractive things about this deal, is the services we can provide to advertisers, regarding local advertising end markets. As you know, we have a very strong local television business. We now have a very strong local digital business, with respect to the OCR product and its capabilities in local markets, and now, radio. So, we have three very important mediums now in those local markets. Those mix decisions are difficult for local advertisers. Now our challenge is going to be to efficiently provide mix services to that crowd. But this helps give us scale and understanding across those markets. At the end of the day it is advertisers who pay all the bills for all the participants in all these industries. The better we can serve them, the better off we are. I believe that this combination gives us just a little more critical mass and understanding of local advertising. If we can provide those services efficiently, this could give us some upside, and I think, some important contributions to our clients. Bethany CasterRaymond JamesAnalyst Okay. One last question. Given the premium, can you tell us if this is a competitive bidding process? David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO Well, as a buyer, I'm sure as hell it was. (laughter) Bethany CasterRaymond JamesAnalyst Fair. Okay, thank you. Sean CreamerArbitron Inc.EVP &amp; COO (multiple speakers)  perspective, it was a robust process. Operator Laura Martin at Needham. Laura MartinNeedham &amp; CompanyAnalyst Just a couple of things. One of the things we're seeing a lot on the Internet is a ton of money being spent trying to break into local markets. I'm wondering now, with the purchase of Arbitron, whether you think that you have a new area to follow this digital money being spent like [Patch] and [Bankrate] and [Supervisor] into these local markets where so much money is being spent. Does it give you a new whole area of things that measurement that they can't do on the Internet today. THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS | www.streetevents.com | Contact Us 2012 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of Thomson Reuters. 'Thomson Reuters' and the Thomson Reuters logo are registered trademarks of Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.
DECEMBER 18, 2012 / 1:30PM, NLSNNielsen Holdings to Acquire ArbitronConference Call Then, on Pandora, if you listen to Pandora, they will say, that Arbitron won't measure them because it's too threatening to the incumbent base. I'mwondering, Dave, now that you own this, would you be more willing to go after the potential disrupters of the core Arbitron base. I'm interested in that answer. Thanks. David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO Just let me  I will answer the first part first. I probably didn't do it well enough the last time. I like everything about local. I like everything that this deal does for us in local. I would  I don't want to distinguish any advertising  one advertising vehicle over another. One of the inside services that our company provides, is better, more discrete data around each of those mediums and the effectiveness of those mediums under what circumstances. So, our ability to build insight practices for local advertising clients is enhanced by this transaction, given the significant role radio plays. But yes, we have also pursued and have tools to measure the digital delivery, i.e., publishing sites at local markets and local television. So, this just helps us understand broadly that set of markets. Sean, you probably want to take a crack at (multiple speakers)  Sean CreamerArbitron Inc.EVP &amp; COO Sure. I will tell you, Arbitron's job is to measure radio, however radio is defined. The marketplace is working through that definition now. We have never said that we will not measure per plays. In fact, we believe we need to. But, we need to measure it in an appropriate fashion. To the extent the models are different, and the delivery is different, it may call for different metrics and a different methodology. We are working with the industry to define that now. It is our expectation that we will reach that definition. But there's absolutely no truth to the fact that we won't measure radio, however it's defined. We will own that space. David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO This  our Company has the same philosophy. If there is anything about our reach or our technology that will help the Arbitron team get to that goal faster, then we will lean in and lean in heavily because that is exactly the way we see the world. We are here to measure consumption. We are here to help all those who are reaching consumers. Operator Dan Moore at CJS Securities. Dan MooreCJS SecuritiesAnalyst Bill and Sean, perhaps, can you elaborate on the one or two most critical capabilities that Nielsen offers that Arbitron could not develop over time as a standalone? Then, any color on how the Board came to determine that the $48 price tag maximized shareholder value would be very helpful. Sean CreamerArbitron Inc.EVP &amp; COO Yes, I think we alluded to it. Certainly, scale is an issue, particularly around the global footprint that Nielsen brings that simply  for us to get from here to there on our own, would have been incredibly challenging, time-consuming and an investment that probably wouldn't have been supported by a return that made sense in the long term, frankly. THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS | www.streetevents.com | Contact Us 2012 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of Thomson Reuters. 'Thomson Reuters' and the Thomson Reuters logo are registered trademarks of Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.
DECEMBER 18, 2012 / 1:30PM, NLSNNielsen Holdings to Acquire ArbitronConference Call So, that's obviously a very compelling opportunity for us on the global path. Obviously, we measure radio. We are going to continue measuringradio. Arbitron  Nielsen continues to measure television. They're going to continue measure television. But I think the key factor is the globalopportunity. Bill KerrArbitron Inc.President &amp; CEO Yes, I would just echo that. I would agree totally with Sean. I think one of our frustrations here is the lack of scale we had to play in the global environment. I think this opens up some major opportunities over time. Sean CreamerArbitron Inc.EVP &amp; COO The question relative to the Board's approach. Obviously, the Board's job is to evaluate opportunities that maximize shareholder value on a risk-adjusted basis. I think our process, and the conclusion here, checked those boxes in a very unique and positive way for employees, customers and shareholders. Dan MooreCJS SecuritiesAnalyst Thank you. That's helpful. Congratulations on the end and the beginning. Liz ZaleNielsen Holdings NVHead of IR Operator, we'll take the last question, please. Operator David Hebert at Wells Fargo. David HebertWells Fargo SecuritiesAnalyst Congrats on the deal. David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO Thank you. David HebertWells Fargo SecuritiesAnalyst Could you just talk about Arbitron's market share in the radio measurement space? Is that something you've disclosed before? Sean CreamerArbitron Inc.EVP &amp; COO We are the currency for radio. Obviously, the market has, for a long time, understood that the buy-sale process is aided by having a single number to transaction  to transact business on. So, obviously, we are the provider. Currently, there are competitors in the marketplace and will continue to be. But obviously, we have a significant share. That is, largely, the a request of our customers and to serve best the buy-sale process. THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS | www.streetevents.com | Contact Us 2012 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of Thomson Reuters. 'Thomson Reuters' and the Thomson Reuters logo are registered trademarks of Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.
DECEMBER 18, 2012 / 1:30PM, NLSNNielsen Holdings to Acquire ArbitronConference Call David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO Look, we like their market position. They are a leader, they've earned it. They get challenged every single day by their clients and we look forward to the same set of challenges. David HebertWells Fargo SecuritiesAnalyst Okay. Fair enough. Then on your leverage targets, you mentioned investment-grade. Is investment-grade the goal, or is investment-grade like credit profile? David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO (laughter) I love this question. I always start on this one and only on this one. I  so look, the answer is yes and yes. Yes, we want to be  we want the financial markets to recognize the stability of this Company and the cash flow nature of our Company, and to give us interest rates accordingly. So far so good. This gets better over time and it gets better as we approach the refinancing hurdles that we will have out in 2016. We want to just be in the best possible shape when that day happens. We will be. So, this transaction enhances that and it allows us to continue, well, to begin a policy that, again, we will disclose some time in February earnings call. Liz ZaleNielsen Holdings NVHead of IR Great. With that, we will close the call. Thank you everyone for joining us today. We look forward to speaking with you in 2013 and wish all of you happy holidays. Operator The conference is now concluded. David CalhounNielsen Holdings NVCEO Thanks everyone. Operator Thank you for attending today's event. You may now disconnect. THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS | www.streetevents.com | Contact Us 2012 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of Thomson Reuters. 'Thomson Reuters' and the Thomson Reuters logo are registered trademarks of Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.
DECEMBER 18, 2012 / 1:30PM, NLSNNielsen Holdings to Acquire ArbitronConference Call DISCLAIMER Thomson Reuters reserves the right to make changes to documents, content, or other information on this web site without obligation to notify any person of such changes. In the conference calls upon which Event Transcripts are based, companies may make projections or other forward-looking statements regarding a variety of items. Such forward-looking statements are based upon current expectations and involve risks and uncertainties. Actual results may differ materially from those stated in any forward-looking statement based on a number of important factors and risks, which are more specifically identified in the companies' most recent SEC filings. Although the companies may indicate and believe that the assumptions underlying the forward-looking statements are reasonable, any of the assumptions could prove inaccurate or incorrect and, therefore, there can be no assurance that the results contemplated in the forward-looking statements will be realized. THE INFORMATION CONTAINED IN EVENT TRANSCRIPTS IS A TEXTUAL REPRESENTATION OF THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S CONFERENCE CALL AND WHILE EFFORTS ARE MADE TO PROVIDE AN ACCURATE TRANSCRIPTION, THERE MAY BE MATERIAL ERRORS, OMISSIONS, OR INACCURACIES IN THE REPORTING OF THE SUBSTANCE OF THE CONFERENCE CALLS. IN NO WAY DOES THOMSON REUTERS OR THE APPLICABLE COMPANY ASSUME ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS MADE BASED UPON THE INFORMATION PROVIDED ON THIS WEB SITE OR IN ANY EVENT TRANSCRIPT. USERS ARE ADVISED TO REVIEW THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S CONFERENCE CALL ITSELF AND THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S SEC FILINGS BEFORE MAKING ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS. 2012, Thomson Reuters. All Rights Reserved. 4973170-2012-12-18T19:58:26.327 THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS | www.streetevents.com | Contact Us 2012 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of Thomson Reuters. 'Thomson Reuters' and the Thomson Reuters logo are registered trademarks of Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.
Additional Information and Where You Can Find It:
In connection with the proposed acquisition by Nielsen Holdings, N.V. ("Nielsen") of Arbitron Inc. ("Arbitron") pursuant to the terms of an Agreement and Plan of Merger by and among Arbitron, Nielsen, and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Nielsen, Arbitron will file a proxy statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). Investors are urged to read the proxy statement (including all amendments and supplements to it) because it will contain important information. Investors may obtain free copies of the proxy statement when it becomes available, as well as other filings containing information about Arbitron, without charge, at the SEC's Internet site (http://www.sec.gov). These documents may also be obtained for free from Arbitron's Investor Relations web site (http://www.arbitron.com/investors) or by directing a request to Arbitron at: Arbitron Inc., 9705 Patuxent Woods Drive, Columbia, MD 210476, Attn: Investor Relations.
Arbitron and its directors and executive officers and other members of management and employees are potential participants in the solicitation of proxies from Arbitron's stockholders in respect of the proposed transaction.
Information regarding Arbitron's directors and executive officers is available in Arbitron's proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of stockholders, filed with the SEC on April 12, 2012. Additional information regarding the interests of such potential participants in the proposed transaction will be included in the proxy statement to be filed with the SEC in connection with the proposed transaction.
Forward-Looking Statements Disclaimer:
This written communication includes information that could constitute forward-looking statements made pursuant to the safe harbor provision of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements may be identified by words such as will', expect', should', could', shall' and similar expressions. These statements are subject to risks and uncertainties concerning Nielsen's proposed acquisition of Arbitron, Arbitron's expected financial performance, as well as Arbitron's strategic and operational plans and actual results and events could differ materially from what presently is expected. The potential risks and uncertainties include the possibility that the transaction will not close or that the closing may be delayed; the possibility that Arbitron may be unable to obtain stockholder approval as required for the transaction or that the other conditions to the closing of the transaction may not be satisfied; the transaction may involve unexpected costs, liabilities or delays; the outcome of any legal proceedings related to the transaction; the occurrence of any event, change or other circumstances that could give rise to the termination of the transaction agreement; general economic conditions; conditions in the markets Nielsen and Arbitron are engaged in; behavior of customers, suppliers and competitors (including their reaction to the transaction); technological developments; as well as legal and regulatory rules affecting Nielsen's and Arbitron's business and specific risk factors discussed in other releases and public filings made by Nielsen and Arbitron (including the their respective filings with the SEC). This list of factors is not intended to be exhaustive. Such forward-looking statements only
speak as of the date of this written communication, and we assume no obligation to update any written or oral forward-looking statement made by us or on our behalf as a result of new information, future events, or other factors.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20130103160944.txt.gz
TIME:20130103160944
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
As previously announced on December 13, 2012, effective as of January 1, 2013, the Board of Directors of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") appointed Sean R. Creamer, aged 48, as President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company. Mr. Creamer succeeds William T. Kerr, who had served as President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company since January 2010. Mr. Kerr will remain a director of the Company. The material terms of Mr. Creamers offer letter and retention agreement are summarized in the Form 8-K filed by the Company on December 13, 2012.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20130204171839.txt.gz
TIME:20130204171839
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On January 24, 2013, a putative class action lawsuit was filed in the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware regarding the proposed merger ("Merger") of TNC Sub I Corporation ("Merger Sub"), a wholly owned subsidiary of Nielsen Holdings, N.V. ("Nielsen") with and into the Company. The complaint ("Complaint") was purportedly filed on behalf of the public shareholders of the Company, and names as defendants, the Company, each of the Company's directors, Merger Sub, and Nielsen. The Complaint alleges, among other things, that the Company's directors breached their fiduciary duties by failing to maximize shareholder value in a proposed sale of the Company. The Complaint further alleges that the Company's preliminary proxy statement fails to provide material information and provides materially misleading information relating to the Merger and that the Company and Nielsen aided and abetted the alleged breaches by the Company's directors. The plaintiff seeks, among other things, class action status, an injunction preventing the completion of the Merger (or, if the Merger is completed, rescinding the Merger or awarding rescissory damages), and the payment of attorneys' fees and expenses. The Company intends to defend the suit vigorously.
On February 4, 2013, the Company issued a press release announcing that the Company and Nielsen have agreed that Nielsen will voluntarily withdraw and refile the Hart-Scott-Rodino ("HSR") notification and report form for the Merger in order to give the Federal Trade Commission additional time to review the proposed transaction. Nielsen originally filed its notification and report form on January 4, 2013. The HSR notification and report form is being withdrawn effective as of February 4, 2013, and Nielsen intends to refile on February 6, 2013. Upon renewing its filing on that date, the waiting period under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act will expire on Friday, March 8, 2013, at 11:59 p.m. New York City time, unless earlier terminated or extended by a request for additional information. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Additional Information and Where to Find It:
The Company will mail the definitive proxy statement to its shareholders as of the record date of the special meeting to vote on the proposed Merger transaction. In addition, Investors may obtain free copies of the preliminary proxy statement and the definitive proxy statement, when it becomes available, as well as other filings containing information about the Company, without charge, at the SEC's Internet site (www.sec.gov). These documents may also be obtained for free from the Company's Investor Relations web site (http://www.arbitron.com/investors) or by directing a request to the Company at: Arbitron Inc., 9705 Patuxent Woods Drive, Columbia, Maryland 21046.
In connection with the Merger, the Company filed a preliminary proxy statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC") on January 18, 2013. Investors are urged to read the preliminary proxy statement, the definitive proxy statement and any other relevant documents filed by the Company with the SEC when they become available, because they will contain important information about the Merger.
The Company and its directors and executive officers and other members of management and employees are potential participants in the solicitation of proxies from the Company's stockholders in respect of the proposed transaction.
Information regarding the Company's directors and executive officers is available in the Company's proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of stockholders, filed with the SEC on April 12, 2012. Additional information regarding the interests of such potential participants in the proposed transaction is included in the preliminary proxy statement filed with the SEC on January 18, 2013, and will be set forth in the definitive proxy statement to be filed by the Company with the SEC.
Forward Looking Statements:
This written communication includes information that could constitute forward-looking statements made pursuant to the safe harbor provision of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements may be identified by words such as "will", "expect", "should", "could", "shall" and similar expressions. These statements are subject to risks and uncertainties concerning Nielsen's proposed acquisition of the Company, the Company's expected financial performance, as well as the Company's strategic and operational plans and actual results and events could differ materially from what presently is expected. The potential risks and uncertainties include the possibility that the transaction will not close or that the closing may be delayed; the possibility that the Company may be unable to obtain stockholder approval as required for the transaction or that the other conditions to the closing of the transaction may not be satisfied; the transaction may involve unexpected costs, liabilities or delays; the outcome of any legal proceedings related to the transaction; the occurrence of any event, change or other circumstances that could give rise to the termination of the Merger Agreement; general economic conditions; conditions in the markets Nielsen and the Company are engaged in; behavior of customers, suppliers and competitors (including their reaction to the transaction); technological developments; as well as legal and regulatory rules affecting Nielsen's and the Company's business and specific risk factors discussed in other releases and public filings made by Nielsen and the Company (including the their respective filings with the SEC). This list of factors is not intended to be exhaustive. Such forward-looking statements only speak as of the date of this written communication, and we assume no obligation to update any written or oral forward-looking statement made by us or on our behalf as a result of new information, future events, or other factors.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
COLUMBIA, MD; February 4, 2013 Arbitron Inc. (NYSE:ARB) today announced that, following informal discussions with the staff at the Federal Trade Commission ("FTC"), Arbitron and Nielsen Holdings, N.V. have agreed to voluntarily provide the FTC with additional time in which to review the proposed merger of TNC Sub I Corporation, a wholly owned subsidiary of Nielsen, with and into Arbitron.
Nielsen, as the acquiring party, will withdraw and refile its pre-merger notification and report form under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act ("HSR"), which will restart the 30-day time frame for initial review of the transaction. The waiting period for the new filing will expire at 11:59 p.m. on March 8, 2013, unless earlier terminated by the FTC, or the FTC makes a formal request for additional information prior to the expiration of the waiting period.
About Arbitron
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the mediaradio, television, cable and out-of-home; the mobile industry as well as advertising agencies and advertisers around the world. Arbitron's businesses include: measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of U.S. consumers; providing mobile audience measurement and analytics in the United States, Europe, Asia and Australia, and developing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. Arbitron has developed the Portable People Meter  (PPM) and the PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
Portable People Meter, PPM and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Additional Information and Where to Find It:
In connection with the proposed merger, Arbitron filed a preliminary proxy statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC") on January 18, 2013. Investors are urged to read the preliminary proxy statement, the definitive proxy statement and any other relevant documents filed by Arbitron with the SEC when they become available, because they will contain important information about the proposed merger.
Arbitron will mail the definitive proxy statement to its shareholders as of the record date of the special meeting to vote on the proposed merger transaction. In addition, Investors may obtain free copies of the preliminary proxy statement and
 
Arbitron Inc. 9705 Patuxent Woods Drive Columbia, Maryland 21046 www.arbitron.com
Arbitron Inc. And Nielsen Holdings, N.V.
Voluntarily Provide FTC Additional Time For Merger Review
February 4, 2013
 
the definitive proxy statement, when it becomes available, as well as other filings containing information about Arbitron, without charge, at the SEC's Internet site (www.sec.gov). These documents may also be obtained for free from Arbitron's Investor Relations web site (http://www.arbitron.com/investors) or by directing a request to Arbitron at: Arbitron Inc., 9705 Patuxent Woods Drive, Columbia, Maryland 21046.
Arbitron and its directors and executive officers and other members of management and employees are potential participants in the solicitation of proxies from Arbitron's stockholders in respect of the proposed transaction.
Information regarding Arbitron's directors and executive officers is available in Arbitron's proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of stockholders, filed with the SEC on April 12, 2012. Additional information regarding the interests of such potential participants in the proposed transaction is included in the preliminary proxy statement filed with the SEC on January 18, 2013, and will be set forth in the definitive proxy statement to be filed by Arbitron with the SEC.
Forward Looking Statements Disclaimer:
This written communication includes information that could constitute forward-looking statements made pursuant to the safe harbor provision of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements may be identified by words such as "will", "expect", "should", "could", "shall" and similar expressions. These statements are subject to risks and uncertainties concerning Nielsen's proposed acquisition of Arbitron, Arbitron's expected financial performance, as well as Arbitron's strategic and operational plans and actual results and events could differ materially from what presently is expected. The potential risks and uncertainties include the possibility that the transaction will not close or that the closing may be delayed; the possibility that Arbitron may be unable to obtain stockholder approval as required for the transaction or that the other conditions to the closing of the transaction may not be satisfied; the transaction may involve unexpected costs, liabilities or delays; the outcome of any legal proceedings related to the transaction; the occurrence of any event, change or other circumstances that could give rise to the termination of the transaction agreement; general economic conditions; conditions in the markets Nielsen and Arbitron are engaged in; behavior of customers, suppliers and competitors (including their reaction to the transaction); technological developments; as well as legal and regulatory rules affecting Nielsen's and Arbitron's business and specific risk factors discussed in other releases and public filings made by Nielsen and Arbitron (including the their respective filings with the SEC). This list of factors is not intended to be exhaustive. Such forward-looking statements only speak as of the date of this written communication, and we assume no obligation to update any written or oral forward-looking statement made by us or on our behalf as a result of new information, future events, or other factors.
 
www.arbitron.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20130205170546.txt.gz
TIME:20130205170546
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On February 5, 2013, Arbitron Inc. issued a status update regarding its Media Rating Council accreditation of Portable People Meter markets. A copy of the press release announcing the status update is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated February 5, 2013
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Press Contact: Kim Myers Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
COLUMBIA, MD; February 5, 2013  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced that the Media Rating Council Inc. (MRC) has accredited the radio average-quarter-hour monthly ratings data produced by the Portable People Meter (PPM) ratings service in four additional markets: Chicago, San Francisco, San Diego and Charlotte-Gastonia-Rock Hill.
TM
The MRC has also voted to continue accreditation in fourteen marketsAtlanta, Baltimore, Cincinnati, Houston, Kansas City, Los Angeles, Milwaukee-Racine, Minneapolis-St. Paul, Philadelphia, Phoenix, Riverside-San Bernardino, San Antonio, St. Louis, and Tampa-St. Petersburg-Clearwater.
In total, 18 markets now display the MRC double checkmark logo for the radio average-quarter-hour monthly ratings data produced by the Portable People Meter radio ratings service.
The MRC voted to not grant accreditation at this time in the remaining 30 PPM markets, and therefore PPM data in those markets continue to be unaccredited.
"MRC accreditation for our PPM markets is an important priority for Arbitron, and we are pleased the MRC continues to recognize the progress we are making," said Gregg Lindner, executive vice president, Service Innovation and Chief Research Officer, Arbitron Inc. "Continuous improvement in our PPM, diary and other information services is our objective, and we remain focused on our efforts to maintain the MRC double checkmarks in our currently accredited PPM markets and to achieve service-wide accreditation for all PPM markets."
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the mediaradio, television, cable and out-of-home; the mobile industry as well as advertising agencies and advertisers around the world. Arbitron's businesses include: measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of U.S. consumers; providing mobile audience measurement and analytics in the United States, Europe, Asia and Australia, and developing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has developed the Portable People Meter (PPM) and the PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
The Media Rating Council is a non-profit industry association, established in 1964, composed of leading television, radio, print and internet companies, as well as advertisers, advertising agencies and trade associations whose goal is to ensure measurement services that are valid, reliable and effective. Measurement services desiring MRC accreditation are required to disclose to their customers all methodological aspects of their service; comply with the MRC ; and submit to MRC-designed audits to authenticate and illuminate their procedures. In addition, the MRC membership actively pursues research issues they consider priorities in an effort to improve the quality of research in the marketplace. Currently approximately 70 research products are audited by the MRC. Additional information about MRC can be found at .
About the Media Rating Council
Minimum Standards for Media Rating Research
http://www.mediaratingcouncil.org/
Portable People Meter, PPM
and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Media Rating Council and the "double checkmark" logo design are registered marks of the Media Rating Council.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Statements in this release that are not strictly historical, including the statements regarding expectations for 2012 and any other statements regarding events or developments that we believe or anticipate will or may occur in the future, may be "forward-looking" statements. There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements. These factors include, among other things, the current global economic recession and the upheaval in the credit markets and financial services industry, competition, our ability to develop and successfully market new products and technologies, our ability to successfully commercialize our Portable People Meter service, the growth rates and cyclicality of markets we serve, our ability to expand our business in new markets, the possibility that the transaction with Nielsen will not close or that the closing may be delayed, the possibility that Arbitron may be unable to obtain stockholder approval as required for the transaction or that the other conditions to the closing of the transaction may not be satisfied, the transaction may involve unexpected costs, liabilities or delays, the outcome of any legal proceedings related to the transaction, the occurrence of any event, change or other circumstances that could give rise to the termination of the transaction agreement, general economic conditions; conditions in the markets Nielsen and Arbitron are engaged in, behavior of customers, suppliers and competitors (including their reaction to the transaction), technological developments, as well as legal and regulatory rules affecting Nielsen's and Arbitron's business, the impact of increased costs of data collection including a trend toward increasing incidence of cell phone-only households, litigation and other contingent liabilities including intellectual property matters, our compliance with applicable laws and regulations and changes in applicable laws and regulations, our ability to achieve projected efficiencies, cost reductions, sales growth and earnings, and international economic, political, legal and business factors. Additional information regarding the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements is available in our SEC filings, including our 2011 Annual Report on Form 10-K. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release and the Company does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statement.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20130225170201.txt.gz
TIME:20130225170201
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 25, 2013, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release reporting fourth quarter and full year 2012 financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated February 25, 2013 regarding fourth quarter and full year 2012 financial results
The information in Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K and the attached Exhibits shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall they be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky
Press Contact
Arbitron Inc.
: Kim Myers
410-312-8500
kim.myers@arbitron.com FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced results for the fourth quarter and full year ended December 31, 2012.
Columbia MD, February 25, 2013
Computed in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), net income for the fourth quarter 2012 was $13.4 million, or $0.50 per share (diluted), compared with $14.1 million, or $0.51 per share (diluted) for the fourth quarter of 2011.
Net income in the fourth quarter 2012 was reduced by $5.2 million pre-taxwhich is $0.18 per share (diluted)due to consulting, legal, and other expenses related to the pending acquisition of Arbitron by Nielsen Holdings N.V.
Net income for the full year 2012 increased 6.8 percent to $56.9 million compared with $53.3 million in 2011. GAAP earnings per share (diluted) for the full year 2012 were $2.11 compared with $1.93 per share (diluted) in 2011.
Excluding expenses directly related to the pending acquisition, earnings per share (diluted) for the fourth quarter and full year 2012 would have been $0.68 and $2.29 respectively. Compared to 2011 earnings per share (diluted) excluding a $3.5 million non-operating impairment charge (or $0.07 per diluted share) taken in the fourth quarter of last year, pro-forma earnings per share (diluted) in 2012 increased 17.2 percent for the quarter and 14.5 percent for the year.
The Company reported revenue of $124.7 million during the fourth quarter of 2012, an increase of $4.6 million or 3.8 percent, compared to revenue of $120.1 million during the fourth quarter of 2011. Costs and expenses for the fourth quarter 2012 were $106.6 million, an increase of $7.1 million or 7.1 percent over costs and expenses of $99.5 million in the fourth quarter 2011. This increase was primarily due to expenses related to the pending acquisition by Nielsen, additional cost of revenue for the PPM service, and additional Scarborough royalties due to increased sales of those services.
Additional Quarterly Financial Highlights
Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) was $24.7 million in the fourth quarter of 2012, as compared to $23.8 million in the fourth quarter 2011. Excluding both the costs for the pending Nielsen transaction recorded in the fourth quarter 2012 and a non-operating impairment charge taken in the fourth quarter 2011, EBIT in the fourth quarter 2012 would have been $29.9 million, and EBIT in fourth quarter 2011 would have been $27.3 million.
The net EBIT investment for Arbitron Mobile and cross-platform combined was $2.5 million in the fourth quarter 2012 as compared to $4.0 million in the fourth quarter 2011.
Earnings before interest, income tax expense, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA) for the fourth quarter of 2012 was $32.5 million compared with EBITDA of $32.0 million for the fourth quarter of 2011.
Excluding both the costs for the pending Nielsen transaction recorded in the fourth quarter 2012 and the non-operating impairment charge taken in the fourth quarter 2011, EBITDA in the fourth quarter 2012 would have been $37.7 million, and EBITDA in the fourth quarter 2011 would have been $35.5 million.
For the full-year ended December 31, 2012, revenue was $449.9 million, an increase of 6.5 percent or $27.5 million, as compared to revenue of $422.3 million in 2011.
Additional Full Year 2012 Financial Highlights
Revenue in 2012 increased primarily due to growth in revenue for PPM-based ratings service, in part due to the nearly completed phase-in of contracted PPM price increases. Revenue in 2012 also grew due to an increase in Scarborough qualitative service revenue, an increase in Diary-based ratings service revenue, and an increase in revenue for the Arbitron Mobile serviceThe 2012 revenue growth was partially offset by a decrease in international equipment sales.
.
Revenue for cross-platform and Arbitron Mobile was $3.2 million compared to $1.5 million in the 2011.
Costs and expenses for the full year 2012 were $361.6 million, an increase of $24.4 million or 7.2 percent compared to costs of $337.2 million in 2011. Contributing to the increase in costs were: expenses related to the pending transaction with Nielsen; increases in PPM survey costs, including costs to maintain and improve panelist response rates; increased costs for address based sampling, in-person recruiting and cell-phone household recruiting; increased Scarborough royalty costs due to improved sales of the Scarborough service in 2012; and higher costs associated with Arbitron Mobile, which was acquired in July 2011. These increases were partially offset by a decrease in costs of goods sold for international equipment sales.
Earnings before interest and income tax expense (EBIT) for 2012 was $95.4 million, as compared to $88.9 million in 2011. The net EBIT investment for Arbitron Mobile and cross-platform combined was $13.4 million 2012 as compared to $9.2 million in 2011.
EBITDA for the full year 2012 was $126.2 million, an increase of 5.9 percent compared to $119.1 million in 2011. EBITDA margin for the full year 2012 was 28.0 percent, as compared to 28.2 percent in 2011. Excluding both the costs for the pending Nielsen transaction recorded in the fourth quarter 2012 and the non-operating impairment charge taken in the fourth quarter 2011, EBITDA in 2012 would have been $131.4 million and EBITDA in 2011 would have been $122.6 million with corresponding EBITDA margins of 29.2 percent and 29.0 percent respectively.
Said Sean R. Creamer, President and Chief Executive Officer:
Management Comment on 2012 Results
"In 2012, we maintained our focus on long-standing objectives: continued growth in our core revenue, improving margins while aggressively investing in the quality of our radio ratings services, and entry into new markets such as digital radio, cross-platform, and mobile.
"Over the past year, we were able to increase the number of PPM markets that are accredited by the Media Rating Council. Today, 18 PPM markets, including six of the top 10 radio markets, display the Council's coveted doublecheck marks.
"Also in 2012, we enhanced the radio data that advertisers can use in their marketing mix models. We believe our enhanced data will improve the resulting measures of radio's impact on sales and will help advertisers better appreciate the return on investment that radio can deliver on their marketing dollars.
"And importantly, we renewed contracts with a number of our top radio group clients, including Cumulus. This contract returned nearly 250 radio stations in more than 50 markets as subscribers to our diary-based radio ratings services."
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to either net income as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the mediaradio, television, cable and out-of-home; the mobile industry as well as advertising agencies and advertisers around the world. Arbitron's businesses include: measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media and product patterns of U.S. consumers; providing mobile audience measurement and analytics in the United States, Europe, Asia and Australia, and developing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data. The Company has developed the Portable People Meter (PPM) and the PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
About Arbitron
Portable People Meter
TM
, PPM
and PPM 360
TM
are marks of Arbitron Inc.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "intends," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," or "plans" or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied by such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2012, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(2) Arbitron's management believes that presenting EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization), both non-GAAP financial measures, as supplemental information helps investors, analysts, and others, if they so choose, in understanding and evaluating Arbitron's operating performance in some of the same manners that management does because EBIT and EBITDA exclude certain items that are not directly related to Arbitron's core operating performance. Arbitron's management references these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing current performance and making decisions about internal budgets, resource allocation and financial goals.
EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, and depreciation and amortization to net income. EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered substitutes either for net income as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. EBIT margin and EBITDA margin are calculated as a percentage of revenue.
Note: The December 31, 2011, Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet is derived from the audited Balance Sheet included in the Company's
Form 10-K
for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20130304162234.txt.gz
TIME:20130304162234
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(e) 2012 Non-Equity Incentive Plan On February 26, 2013, the Compensation and Human Resources Committee (the "Committee") of Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") approved the Companys 2013 non-equity incentive plan for executive officers, which would be payable in early 2014 (the "Incentive Plan"). Provided that the Companys return on invested capital for the twelve months ending December 31, 2013 exceeds 12%, the Committee may make cash Incentive Plan awards to each executive officer in an amount between 0% and 200% of the executive officers target award under the Incentive Plan. The target Incentive Plan award for the Companys President and Chief Executive Officer, Sean R. Creamer, is equal to 100% of his 2013 base salary of $580,000 under his offer letter regarding his promotion to President and Chief Executive Officer, effective as of January 1, 2013, and the target Incentive Plan award for other executive officers range from 50-60% of 2013 base salary. If the threshold return on invested capital goal is satisfied, the Committee may exercise its discretion in awarding a cash payment that is linked to the Committees assessment of the Companys financial performance (weighted 40%) and delivery of quality services to the Company's customers (weighted 60%). Awards under the Incentive Plan can vary from 0% to 200% of the target amount, subject to minimum thresholds of performance and depending on the Committees assessment of performance against the goals. The Committee has negative discretion to eliminate or reduce the amount of any award under the Incentive Plan. 2013 Long-Term Incentive Plan Also on February 26, 2013, the Committee established the performance objectives and other terms of the Companys 2013 Long-Term Incentive Plan (the "2013 LTI Plan") for certain executive officers of the Company. With the exception of Mr. Creamer, the target 2013 LTI Plan opportunity is within a range from 50% to 150% of 2013 base salary. The equity award will be in the form of restricted stock units, pursuant to the Companys 2008 Equity Compensation Plan, and will vest quarterly over a four year period, assuming continued employment. In connection with Mr. Creamers assumption of the positions of President and Chief Executive Officer effective January 1, 2013, Arbitron granted to Mr. Creamer restricted stock units with a value equal to approximately 250% of his annual base salary, which vest quarterly over a three year period, assuming continued employment.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20130308171604.txt.gz
TIME:20130308171604
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On March 8, 2013, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") received a request for additional information and documentary materials (a "Second Request") from the Federal Trade Commission ("FTC") regarding the proposed merger of TNC Sub I Corporation ("Merger Sub"), a wholly owned subsidiary of Nielsen Holdings, N.V. ("Nielsen") with and into the Company (the "Merger"). Nielsen also received a similar Second Request. The Second Requests were issued under the notification requirements of the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976 ("HSR Act"). The effect of the Second Requests is to extend the waiting period imposed by the HSR Act until 30 days after the Company and Nielsen have substantially complied with the Second Requests, unless that period is extended voluntarily by the parties or terminated sooner by the FTC. The Company intends to respond expeditiously to the Second Request and continue to work cooperatively with the FTC in connection with this review. Completion of the acquisition remains subject to the expiration or termination of the waiting period under the HSR Act, customary closing conditions and approval by the Company's stockholders.
Additional Information and Where to Find It:
The Company will mail the definitive proxy statement to its shareholders as of the record date of the special meeting to vote on the proposed Merger transaction. In addition, Investors may obtain free copies of the preliminary proxy statement and the definitive proxy statement, when it becomes available, as well as other filings containing information about the Company, without charge, at the SEC's Internet site (http://www.sec.gov). These documents may also be obtained for free from the Company's Investor Relations web site (http://www.arbitron.com/investors) or by directing a request to the Company at: Arbitron Inc., 9705 Patuxent Woods Drive, Columbia, Maryland 21046.
In connection with the Merger, the Company filed a preliminary proxy statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC") on January 18, 2013. Investors are urged to read the preliminary proxy statement, the definitive proxy statement and any other relevant documents filed by the Company with the SEC when they become available, because they will contain important information about the Merger.
The Company and its directors and executive officers and other members of management and employees are potential participants in the solicitation of proxies from the Company's stockholders in respect of the proposed transaction.
Information regarding the Company's directors and executive officers is available in the Company's proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of stockholders, filed with the SEC on April 12, 2012. Additional information regarding the interests of such potential participants in the proposed transaction is included in the preliminary proxy statement filed with the SEC on January 18, 2013, and will be set forth in the definitive proxy statement to be filed by the Company with the SEC.
Forward Looking Statements:
This written communication includes information that could constitute forward-looking statements made pursuant to the safe harbor provision of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements may be identified by words such as "will", "expect", "should", "could", "shall" and similar expressions. These statements are subject to risks and uncertainties concerning Nielsen's proposed acquisition of the Company, the Company's expected financial performance, as well as the Company's strategic and operational plans and actual results and events could differ materially from what presently is expected. The potential risks and uncertainties include the possibility that the transaction will not close or that the closing may be delayed; the possibility that the Company may be unable to obtain stockholder approval as required for the transaction or that the other conditions to the closing of the transaction may not be satisfied; the transaction may involve unexpected costs, liabilities or delays; the outcome of any legal proceedings related to the transaction; the occurrence of any event, change or other circumstances that could give rise to the termination of the transaction agreement; general economic conditions; conditions in the markets Nielsen and the Company are engaged in; behavior of customers, suppliers and competitors (including their reaction to the transaction); technological developments; as well as legal and regulatory rules affecting Nielsen's and the Company's business and specific risk factors discussed in other releases and public filings made by Nielsen and the Company (including the their respective filings with the SEC). This list of factors is not intended to be exhaustive. Such forward-looking statements only speak as of the date of this written communication, and we assume no obligation to update any written or oral forward-looking statement made by us or on our behalf as a result of new information, future events, or other factors.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20130416171043.txt.gz
TIME:20130416171043
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.07 Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
On April 16, 2013, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") held its special meeting of stockholders (the "Special Meeting"). The certified results of the matters voted upon at the meeting, which are more fully described in the Company's definitive proxy statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 13, 2013, are as follows:
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20130507170257.txt.gz
TIME:20130507170257
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On May 7, 2013, Arbitron Inc. issued a press release reporting first quarter 2013 financial results. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Press Release of Arbitron Inc. dated May 7, 2013
The information in this Form 8-K and attached Exhibit shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Press
Information
Arbitron Inc. 410-312-8239 thom.mocarsky@arbitron.com
Investor Contact: Thom Mocarsky
Press Contact
Arbitron Inc.
: Kim Myers
410-312-8500 kim.myers@arbitron.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Columbia MD, May 7, 2013  Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) today announced financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2013.
Computed in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), net income for the first quarter was $16.3 million or $0.60 per share (diluted), compared with $17.8 million, or $0.64 per share (diluted), for the first quarter of 2012.
Costs and expenses in the first quarter 2013 included $3.2 million of consulting, legal, and other expenses related to the pending acquisition of Arbitron by Nielsen Holdings N.V. ("Nielsen")which impacted net income by $0.12 per share (diluted).
Excluding the expenses directly related to the pending acquisition, earnings per share (diluted) for the first quarter would have been $0.72 per share (diluted), an increase of 12.5 percent over the first quarter 2012.
For the first quarter of 2013, the Company reported revenue of $111.8 million, an increase of 5.1 percent compared to revenue of $106.4 million during the first quarter of 2012.
Additional Financial Highlights
Costs and expenses for the first quarter 2013 were $81.4 million, an increase of $6.2 million or 8.3 percent compared to $75.2 million in the first quarter 2012. In addition to the $3.2 million of expenses related to the pending Nielsen transaction, costs in the quarter increased as a result of planned incremental investments in Arbitron Mobile panels
,
costs associated with address-based sampling, in-person recruiting, and cell-phone household recruiting.
EBIT (earnings before interest and income tax expense) for the first quarter 2013 was $28.0 million compared with EBIT of $28.9 million for the first quarter of 2012.
Excluding the costs for the pending Nielsen transaction, EBIT in the first quarter 2013 would have been $31.2 million, an increase of $2.4 million or 8.2 percent compared to the first quarter 2012, yielding EBIT margins of 27.9 percent as compared to 27.1 percent in the first quarter of 2012.
The net pre-tax investment in our cross platform initiatives and in Arbitron Mobile during the first quarter of 2013 was $4.4 million, compared to $2.9 million in the first quarter last year.
EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) was $34.7 million in the first quarter of 2013 compared with EBITDA of $36.6 million in the first quarter of 2012.
Excluding the costs for the pending Nielsen transaction, EBITDA in the first quarter 2013 would have been $37.9 million, an increase of $1.3 million or 3.6 percent compared to the first quarter 2012, with resultant EBITDA margins of 33.9 percent versus 34.4 percent in the first quarter of 2012
Other Matters
On April 16, 2013, Arbitron's shareholders voted to approve the proposed acquisition of Arbitron by Nielsen. The transaction remains subject to certain regulatory approvals, including expiration of the Hart-Scott-Rodino antitrust waiting period, and customary closing conditions.
Said Sean R. Creamer, President and Chief Executive Officer:
Management Comment on First Quarter 2013 Results
"In the first quarter, we continued to pursue our long-standing objectives: maintaining our investments in the quality of our radio ratings services, growing our core revenue, and entering new markets such as digital radio, cross-platform, and mobile.
"Our focus on the quality of our core services helped us achieve Media Rating Council accreditation of four additional Portable People Meter markets in February. Our goal remains achieving or maintaining accreditation in all our syndicated radio markets.
"We continue working to leverage our investment in the PPM technology and consumer panels utilizing our platform in new initiatives such as advertising and promotion effectiveness studies, while enhancing our measurement capabilities for radio and across platforms."
The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, and not as a replacement for, or superior to either net income as an indicator of Arbitron's operating performance, or cash flow, as a measure of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
Presentation of Non-GAAP Information
Arbitron Inc. (NYSE: ARB) is an international media and marketing research firm serving the mediaradio, television, cable, and out-of-home; the mobile industry; as well as advertising agencies and advertisers around the world. Arbitron's businesses include: measuring network and local market radio audiences across the United States; surveying the retail, media, and product patterns of U.S. consumers; providing mobile audience measurement and analytics in the United States, Europe, Asia, and Australia; and developing application software used for analyzing media audience and marketing information data.
About Arbitron
The Company has developed the Portable People Meter (PPM) and the PPM 360, new technologies for media and marketing research.
Portable People Meter
TM
PPM
and PPM 360 are marks of Arbitron Inc.
PPM ratings are based on audience estimates and are the opinion of Arbitron and should not be relied on for precise accuracy or precise representativeness of a demographic or radio market.
Arbitron Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements regarding Arbitron Inc. and its subsidiaries in this document that are not historical in nature, particularly those that utilize terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "likely," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "believes," "plans," or comparable terminology, are forward-looking statements based on current expectations about future events, which we have derived from information currently available to us. These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties that may cause our results to be materially different from results implied in such forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include, in no particular order, whether we will be able to:
There are a number of additional important factors that could cause actual events or our actual results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, without limitation, the risk factors set forth in the caption "ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS" in our Annual Report on
Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2012, and elsewhere, and any subsequent periodic or current reports filed by us with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
In addition, any forward-looking statements contained in this document represent our estimates only as of the date hereof, and should not be relied upon as representing our estimates as of any subsequent date. While we may elect to update forward-looking statements at some point in the future, we specifically disclaim any obligation to do so, even if our estimates change.
(1) The terms EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization) are non-GAAP financial measures that the management of Arbitron believes are useful to investors in evaluating the Company's results. For a reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP equivalent, see the EBIT and EBITDA Non-GAAP Reconciliation, along with related footnotes, below.
(2) Arbitron's management believes that presenting EBIT (earnings before interest and income taxes) and EBITDA (earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization), both non-GAAP financial measures, as supplemental information helps investors, analysts, and others, if they so choose, in understanding and evaluating Arbitron's operating performance in some of the same manners that management does because EBIT and EBITDA exclude certain items that are not directly related to Arbitron's core operating performance. Arbitron's management references these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing current performance and making decisions about internal budgets, resource allocation and financial goals.
EBIT is calculated by adding back net interest expense and income tax expense to net income. EBITDA is calculated by adding back net interest expense, income tax expense, and depreciation and amortization to net income.
EBIT margin and EBITDA margin are calculated as percentages of revenue.
EBIT and EBITDA should not be considered substitutes either for net income as indicators of Arbitron's operating performance, or for cash flow as measures of Arbitron's liquidity. In addition, because EBIT and EBITDA may not be calculated identically by all companies, the presentation here may not be comparable to other similarly titled measures of other companies.
Note: The December 31, 2012 Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet is derived from the audited Balance Sheet included in the Company's
Form 10-K
for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2012.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARB/ARB-8K-20130522162318.txt.gz
TIME:20130522162318
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
On May 21, 2013, Arbitron Inc. (the "Company") held its 2013 Annual Meeting of Stockholders. The certified results of the matters voted upon at the meeting, which are more fully described in the Company's proxy statement, are as follows:
Broker Non-Vote of 3,261,812 shares for each director.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
